885261
Waikato_District
Waikato District is a territorial authority of New Zealand, in the northern part of Region, Island.  Waikato District is administered by the Waikato District Council, with headquarters in Ngaruawahia.The district is centred to the north and west of the city of Hamilton, and takes in much of the northern Plains and also the Range. The north of the district contains swampy floodplain of the River and several small lakes, of which the largest is Waikare.Other than Ngaruawahia, the main population centres are Huntly, Raglan, and Kauwhata. The main industries in the district are farming, forestry, and coal mining. There is a major coal-fired power station at Huntly. Te Kauwhata is at the centre of a major wine region.At the 2006 census the district had a population of 43,959. Of these, 6834 lived in Huntly, 5106 in Ngaruawahia, 2637 in Raglan, and 1294 in Te Kauwhata.  In 2010, the district is scheduled to acquire part of the adjacent District, which will be dissolved.External links* Hamilton & Waikato Regional Tourism* Waikato District official website* Huntly Townde:Waikato-Distriktde Waikatodi WaikatoDistrictzh:
888803
3554_Amun
3554 Amun is an M-type asteroid (meaning it crosses Earths orbit) and a Venus-crosser. It was discovered on 4 March 1986 by Carolyn  and Shoemaker at Palomar Observatory. Its estimated diameter is 2.5 kilometers, making it one of the smallest known M-type asteroids.Amun was once considered metallic, based on its M-type spectrum.  However, like the asteroids Kalliope and Lutetia, the radar albedo of the object is inconsistent with a metallic composition.  In Mining the Sky, planetary scientist S. Lewis calculated the value of 3554 Amun at $20 trillion dollars http://www.nss.org/resources/books/non_fiction/NF_011_miningthesky.html.1986 DA is another M-type near-Earth asteroid with lower inclination that is actually metallic.Amun passes closest to Venus, and in 1964, 2034, and 2103 comes within 10 Gm of it. http://chemistry.unina.it/~alvitagl/solex/External links* Economic value of asteroid 3554 Amun*AmunAmnAmunAmunAmun()AmunAmunAmun
891618
Stelco
300px|thumb|Hamilton Waterfront Trail, Stelco in backgroundUS Steel Canada (formerly Stelco) is a steel company based in Ontario, Canada.HistorySeveral existing smaller steelworks combined and were incorporated as the Steel Company of Canada in 1910.() Charles S. Wilcox was the first president of Iron and Steel Company of Canada, (later called simply Stelco), which was formed from five companies:* Canada Screw Company  1864 Ontario* Hamilton Steel and Iron Company  1861 Ontario* Montreal Rolling Mills  1790s Quebec* Dominion Wire Manufacturing Company  Quebec* Canada Bolt and Nut Company  OntarioHamilton Steel and Iron Company and The Canada Screw Company were founded before 1867 and Montreal Rolling Mills predates to the 1790s by businessman Bigelow.Canada Screw Company was founded in 1864 in Dundas, Ontario by P. Billington and Forsyth and later moved to Hamilton.On August 27, 2007, US Steel purchased Stelco for $1.9 billion--$1.1 billion in cash, and assuming $800 million in debt. The deal closed effective October 31, 2007. The company was renamed U. S. Steel Canada Inc. and its shares were delisted from the Stock Exchange.On March 3, 2009, Steel announced that further consolidating was necessary to maximize efficiency while meeting customer demands. In this regard, they announced a temporary idling of the finishing and coking operations at Hamilton Works in Ontario, and the steelmaking and finishing operations at Lake Erie Works near Ontario. Coking operations at Lake Erie Works will continue production. Approximately 1,500 employees will be affected.Environmental ImpactMany of its main buildings in the north end of Hamilton are built on reclaimed or infilled land, which harmed the drainage of Hamilton and the water ecology of Hamilton Harbour. Several union drives at the plant were unsuccessful, until the founding strike of Local 1005 of the Steelworkers of America in 1946.OperationsIn addition to the main Hilton Works, named after the late company president (Hugh Hilton), its operations include Stelco McMaster Works in Contrecoeur Quebec, Stelwire and the Lake Erie Works in Nanticoke on Erie. The Nanticoke plant was notable because it is of a relatively modern design, and uses far less water than a fear.Stelco Tower, associated with Lloyd D. Jackson Square in downtown Hamilton, has been an office building for the company and others since the 1970s, but has now been completely vacated by Stelco and re-named to 100 King St. West.  In 2004, Stelco has been having financial difficulties and has been under court ordered protection from its creditors, including the Bank.Bankruptcy and AcquisitionStelco exited CCAA protection on March 31, 2006. It has divested itself of several non-core operations, including Stelwire, Norambar (formerly Stelco McMaster Works) and Welland Pipe. The CCAA exit has seen the remaining operations restructured into 9 separate operating businesses, held by the corporate entity of Stelco.In 2007, Stelco was purchased by US Steel and has since been renamed Hamilton Works  US Steel Canada.ShutdownsShutdown of Lake Erie and Hamilton plantsIn an effort to streamline operations, U.S. Steel announced on March 3, 2009 that it would be temporarily shutting down its Hamilton plant and most of its Lake Erie plant putting more than 2,000 people out of work. This announcement came 4 months after U.S. Steel laid off 700 employees at the Hamilton plant when it shut down its blast furnace.()2nd shutdown of Hamilton plantMarket conditions and declining customer orders have prompted US Steel to shut down Hamilton Works October 1, 2010.() 100 jobs were restored when a German company managed to buy out two steel mills from US Steel.(German buyer firing up two shuttered U.S. Steel mills - TheSpec.com) More jobs are expected to be created when the mills are in full production.(References(External links* Stelco* Stelco History* Hamilton Steel* Photos from the Stelco Steel mill * Lake Erie Steel* Hamilton Coke* Lake Erie Coke* Hamilton Energy* Lake Erie Energy* Hamilton Land* Lake Erie Land* HLE Mining* - Bud Johnston Library* Stelco timeline to takeoverfr:Stelconl:Stelco
894522
Columbia_School_of_Engineering_and_Applied_Science
The Fu Foundation School of Engineering and Applied Science (popularly known as SEAS) is a school of University which awards of Science, of Science, Master of Financial Engineering, of Philosophy, of Science, of Engineering degrees in engineering, physics and mathematics. Columbia, originally chartered as Kings College in 1754, is the fifth oldest institution of higher learning in the United States. The Fu Foundation School of Engineering and Applied Science was founded as the School of Mines in 1863 and then the School of Mines, Engineering and Chemistry before becoming the School of Engineering and Applied Science. It is the countrys third such institution. On October 1, 1997, the school was renamed in honor of Chinese businessman Y. Fu, who had donated $26 million to the school.Today, the Fu Foundation School of Engineering and Applied Science is a premier and exclusive engineering school known for the depth and breadth of its offerings as well as its cutting-edge, interdisciplinary research with other academic, corporate institutions including of Bologna, University, NASA, IBM, MIT, and Earth Institute. It is also known for numerous patents which generate over $10 million annually for the university. SEAS faculty and alumni are responsible for technological achievements including the developments of FM radio and the maser. As of today, Columbia Engineering is the only academic institution to hold a share of patents for MPEG-2 technology.The Schools engineering and science programs are each widely regarded as one of the strongest programs in the States according to US News; its Engineering program in Research is one of the best in the nation and is ranked in the top 3 worldwide.(http://www.advancedtrading.com/showArticle.jhtml?articleID209102204 The Top 10 Quant Schools) The current SEAS faculty include 21 members of the Academy of Engineering and one Nobel Laureate. In all, the faculty and alumni of Columbia Engineering have won 9 Nobel Prizes in physics, chemistry, medicine, and economics.A student to faculty ratio of 8 to 1 allows SEAS to offer numerous research opportunities. The small engineering school with around 300 undergraduates in each graduating class also draws upon Columbia Universitys endowment, in excess of $7 billion dollars, and maintains close links with all of the universitys graduate schools and its undergraduate arts school Columbia College which offers of Arts degree. The Schools current administrative dean is Pena-Mora.HistoryOriginal charter of 1754Included in the original charter for Columbia College was the direction to teach the arts of Number and Measuring, of Surveying and Navigation ... the knowledge of ... various kinds of Meteors, Stones, Mines and Minerals, Plants and Animals, and everything useful for the Comfort, the Convenience and Elegance of Life. Engineering has always been a part of Columbia, even before the establishment of any separate school of engineering. From the original charter, the existing science and engineering departments established within then Columbia College gave birth to what is now known as the Fu Foundation School of Engineering and Applied Science. Starting in 2011, the school will drop its SEAS acronym for CE, or Columbia Engineering.(http://bwog.com/2011/06/07/from-seas-to-shining-ce/)An early and influential graduate from the school was John Stevens, Class of 1768. Instrumental in the establishment of U.S. patent law, Stevens procured many patents in early steamboat technology, operated the first steam ferry between New York and New Jersey, received the first railroad charter in the U.S., built a pioneer locomotive, and amassed a fortune, which allowed his sons to found the Institute of Technology. (Excerpt from SEAS website.)When Columbia University first resided on Street, engineering did not have a school under the Columbia umbrella. After Columbia outgrew its space on Wall Street, it relocated to what is now Manhattan in 1857.Then President Barnard and the Trustees of the University, with the urging of  Professor Egleston and General Vinton, approved the School of Mines  in 1863.  The intention was to establish a School of Mines and Metallurgy with a three-year program open to professionally motivated students with or without prior undergraduate training. It was officially founded in 1864 under the leadership of its first Dean, Columbia professor F. Chandler, and specialized in mining and mineralogical engineering.An example of work from a student at the School of Mines was Barclay Parsons, Class of 1882. He was an engineer on the Chinese railway and the Cape Cod and Panama Canals. Most importantly he worked for New York, as a chief engineer of the citys first subway. Opened in 1904, the subways electric cars took passengers from City Hall to Brooklyn, the Bronx, and the newly renamed and relocated Columbia University in Morningside Heights, its present location on the Upper West Side of Manhattan.Renaming to the School of MinesIn 1896, the school was renamed to the School of Mines, Engineering and Chemistry. During this time, the University was offering more than the previous name had implied, thus the change of name.The faculty during this time included I. Pupin, after whom Hall is named. Pupin himself was a graduate of the Class of 1883 and the inventor of the coil, a device that extended the range of long-distance telephones. Students of his included Langmuir, Nobel laureate in Chemistry (1932), inventor of the gas-filled tungsten lamp and a contributor to the development of the radio tube. Another student to work with Pupin was Howard Armstrong, inventor of radio. After graduating in 1913 Armstrong was stationed in France during War I. There he developed the receiver to detect the frequency of enemy aircraft ignition systems. During this period, Columbia was also home to the Father of Biomedical Engineering L. Gaden.Recent and future developmentsThe university continued to evolve and expand as the United States became a major political power during the 20th century. In 1926, the newly renamed School of Engineering prepared students for the nuclear age.Graduating with a masters degree, George Rickover, working with the Navys of Ships, directed the development of the worlds first nuclear-powered submarine, the Nautilus, which was launched in 1954.After a substantial grant of $26 million from Chinese businessman Y. Fu, the engineering school was renamed again in 1997. The new name, as it is known today is the Fu Foundation School of Engineering and Applied Science. SEAS continues to be a world-class teaching and research institution, now with a large endowment of over $400 million, and sits under the Columbia umbrella endowment of $7.2 billion. As an initiative to make information more accessible, Columbia Engineering operates a highly viewed open-course video network (http://www.cvn.columbia.edu/) similar to the one established in MIT. It is the only university to hold a share in the MPEG-2 patent. The school continues research into science with the Robert A. Gross Plasma Physics Lab. The school is also home to Columbias High-Beta Tokamak (HBT-EP), and conducts further research into plasma physics with the Collisionless Terrella Experiment (CTX), and the Non-neutral Torus (CNT) experiment. The schools new engineering department collaborates closely with the Medical School to conduct interdisciplinary researches such as materials science, environmental chemistry, medical digital libraries, digital government, new media technologies, and GK-12 education,(http://www.engineering.columbia.edu/history Columbia Engineering history) bridging the biological and physical in the engineering world. The school is closely associated with Columbias other departments, including Physics, Chemistry, Earth Science, and Mathematics. It also engages in research and academic iniatives with the Business School, College of Physicians and Surgeons, Graduate School of Journalism, the School of International and Public Affairs, Law School, and the Teachers College.Columbia is extending its reach globally, setting up genomic research collaborations in Beijing and dual engineering programs in Bologna. In April 2010, Columbia partnered with IBM for the Smarter Cities Skills Initiative, which aims to develop smarter, more energy-efficient city grids and green technology. The partnership opens IBM laboratories and its 40 Innovation centers across the world to Columbia faculty and students.ResearchColumbia faculty members currently focus on interdisciplinary fields of sensors, bioengineering, and nanotechnology that address key problems in health, energy and sustainability. The Schools Dean Pena-Mora coins this innovative research direction with the word CyberBioPhysical Systems.New groundbreaking researches at Columbia include a laser-based method to create a single crystal film for a variety of devices, applications of reality. Columbia Engineering faculty has made advances in media and communication. Since 2000, researchers have been involved in lasers, compression algorithm technology behind DVDS and HDTV, and VOIP. Departmental researches have made possible sharper display screens in high-end smart phones technology.Professor Lackner of the Environmental Engineering Department is engaged in research that creates artificial trees which would remove carbon dioxide from air. The project aims to halt warming through natural synthesis. Professor Eitan Grinspun of the Computer Science Department is creating computer simulations that model physical behaviors in the real world adopted into the virtual world.Professor Vunjak-Novakovic of the Biomedical Engineering Department, an electee of Women in Technology Hall of Fame has found new way to grow bone grafts for jaw damaged by birth defects, injuries or disease. As a result of her work, facial reconstructive surgery can now use living tissue. Professor Keren Bergman is developing advanced computing and networking technology for electronic financial trading.AdmissionsThe admissions rate for the SEAS undergraduate class of 2015 was 9.9%, making it the second most selective engineering research college behind MIT and the most selective school of engineering in the League.(http://www.columbiaspectator.com/2011/03/30/cc-admit-rate-drops-64-percent)Approximately 95% of accepted students were in the top 10% of their graduating class; 99% were in the top 20% of their class. 58% of admitted students attended high schools that do not rank. The yield rate for the class of 2013 was 56%.(http://www.columbia.edu/cu/opir/abstract/admissions_all.htm)As for SAT scores, SEAS students within the Columbia University community have raised the composite SAT statistic for the undergraduates at Columbia University.(http://profiles.asee.org/profiles/4625/screen/19?school_nameColumbia+University)(ttp://www.studentaffairs.columbia.edu/admissions/applications/stats.php) The Class of 2013s SAT interquartile range was 2060-2320 and 1400-1560 (old SAT). The ACT composite interquartile range was 32-34.Those accepting enrollment at Columbia SEAS typically completed engineering programs at the undergraduate level and are pursuing professional graduate school in engineering, business, law, or medical school, so as to become what Columbia terms engineering leaders. Engineering leaders are those who pioneer or define engineering: patent lawyers, doctors with specialties in biophysical engineering, financial engineers, inventors, etc.Columbia Engineerings graduate programs have an overall acceptance rate of 28.0% in 2010.(http://engineeringschoolsinusa.com/) The Ph.D. student-faculty ratio at the graduate level is 4.2:1 according to the 2008 data compiled by News & World Report.(http://grad-schools.usnews.rankingsandreviews.com/best-graduate-schools/top-engineering-schools/items/02116) Ph.D. acceptance rate was 12% in 2010.AcademicsCurriculumthumb|right|Miner statue outside Mudd HallSEAS focuses on leadership development.  Many classes revolve around social awareness and responsibility while also enforcing high expectations for achievement.  Undergraduates are required to participate in professional level opportunities in addition to their theoretical bases of knowledge.Similar to the Columbia College requirements, there is a rigorous set of required core engineering classes in empirical science, computer science, and math.The core classes typically consist of a semester or more of classes in each of these disciplines:* Calculus* Chemistry* Physics* Computer ScienceColumbia engineers also take non-technical courses like those below, which fall into two basic categories: the Columbia College Core, or other non-technical courses.Engineers are required to take classes from Columbia Colleges famous Core Curriculum. These may include the following:* (2) Semesters of: Literature Humanities, Contemporary Civilization, or Major Cultures* (1) Semester of: Art Humanities, or Music Humanities* (1) Semester of University WritingAdditionally, there are other non-technical classes required:* Economics* (2) semesters of Physical Education (anything from aerobics to karate to fencing)Engineers take a total of 29 credits of non-technical classes. There is usually a high degree of freedom aside from the require Humanities Core in choosing ones non-technical classes; these classes bolster the development of a well rounded mind and body. Because Columbias Engineers are required to take so many non-technical classes, many, including employers, find that the educational quality at Columbia is not only unusual and rigorous, but also desirable and useful. SEAS finds this element of the curriculum to be an important addition to an engineering education; in fact, this component of the education will contrast the heavily vocationally focused large state school engineering programs. It is considered that the SEAS curriculum is set apart from other engineering curricula in the way that the human implications of engineering are studied just as seriously as the technology and theoretical fundamentals. The non-technical courses are sometimes used by students to fulfill one of Columbias many available minors, while also offering relief from a bombardment of vocationally driven curriculum usually found at other engineering-reduction schools.Inside the engineering school, all classes (including introductory first-year classes) are taught by professors. While graduate students may teach recitation sections, all lectures, seminars, and research sections are taught by faculty. On average, the student to professor ratio in SEAS is 8:1.The newest addition to the Core Curriculum is a freshman design course. The school mandates freshmen to take the Gateway Lab course. The goal is to immerse students in engineering design, practice, and philosophy at the earliest possible point in an engineers education.Many students also bolster their in-class education with participation in collegiate design competitions. 30% of the mechanical engineering students are in either Splash (Solar Boating) or the Formula-One SAE competition. SEAS is also host to a very competitive intra-university venture capital competition, where students compete for $50,000 in seed capital to get their ideas off the ground and flying. Other students find it an important aim to join the CU Without Borders (CUEWB), which recently sent students to India to build Micro-Hydro power plants and have received commendable grants from respected institutions offering $75,000 or more for a single project. CUEWB as of Fall 2009 is sending groups to India, Uganda, and Ghana. Of course, international service opportunities are available to engineers including Columbia Students for International Service, Rotaract, and others.  In addition, nearly all students are actively involved in some way in Columbias approximately 600 (about 400 of which are officially recognized and funded) student groups, which range from clubs managing investment funds to clubs organizing fashion shows featuring famous designers.Liberal Arts MinorsColumbia Engineering emphasizes a strong liberal arts background for its engineering students. The school offers a variety of minors not necessarily connected to a field of engineering. A Columbia student takes on average one to two liberal arts minors along with his/her engineering major. Undergraduates declare minors during their sophomore year. Liberal arts minors at the engineering school constitute over twenty subjects few of which are studies, history, dance, economics, science, music, history, and foreign languages.Joint ProgramsColumbia SEAS offers its undergraduate students joint programs in arts, business, and law. The 4-1 Combined Plan gives the engineering students an opportunity to spend one more year upon graduation at Columbia College or College to earn a Bachelor of Arts degree in addition to a Bachelor of Science with the same tuition benefits a typical undergraduate enjoys.Undergraduates and graduates also have the opportunity to earn a dual degree in engineering and business. The Industrial Engineering and Operations Research Department and the Business School grant the joint M.S. and M.B.A degree. The option is available although not limited to students in industrial engineering, operations research, and financial engineering programs. The joint degrees can be granted after five terms of study that fulfills 45 points in the engineering school and 30 points in the business school.(http://www.ieor.columbia.edu/pages/graduate/joint_ms_mba/index.html joint degree for business and engineering) In addition, undergraduates may choose a similar but separate program, in which joint degrees in M.B.A and M.S. in Earth Resources Engineering are awarded.Two nominated undergraduates at Columbia SEAS have the opportunity to participate in a fast-track joint program with the Law School, whereby the students complete the requirements for degrees of Bachelor of Science and Doctor of Jurisprudence in six years. The option is open only to undergraduates at the School of Engineering and Applied Science. External candidates may not apply.A group of Columbia Engineering undergraduates each year are selected for a joint degree program with the School of International and Public Affairs. Students participate in the program fulfill requirements for degrees of Bachelor of Science and Master of International Affairs in five years. Columbia students usually apply for the program in their junior year through the internal Center for Student Advising.Columbia graduates interested in advanced degree have the opportunity to enroll at the Engineering School and study in the world-renowned Institute. The students participating in the program must complete courses required by the Institute separate from the  degree requirements. The program provide students with world-class faculty as their mentor and supervisor in research and studies.RankingsColumbias School of Engineering and Applied Science is one of the top engineering schools in the States and the world. It is ranked 16th among the best engineering graduate schools by News & World Report, and second within the League behind Cornell.In 2010, the US National Research Council revealed its new analyses and rankings of American university doctoral programs since 1995. Columbia Engineering ranked 10th in biomedical engineering, 18th in chemical engineering, 26th in electrical engineering, 14th in mechanical engineering (5th in research), 9th in operations research & industrial engineering, 7th in applied mathematics, and 6th in computer sciences.(http://sites.nationalacademies.org/PGA/Resdoc/index.htm)The schools department of science is ranked 17th in the nation,(http://grad-schools.usnews.rankingsandreviews.com/best-graduate-schools/top-computer-science-schools/rankings) 20th in the world by Ranking of World Universities,(http://www.arwu.org/SubjectCS2009.jsp) and 13th according to PhDs.(http://graduate-school.phds.org/rankings/computer-science/rank?w2-4&w34&w15&w93&w103&w75&w175&w85&w18-2&w24-2&w252&w262) Its engineering program is among the top 15 according to US News and is ranked 7th by PhDs.org.(http://graduate-school.phds.org/rankings/biomedical-engineering/rank?w2-4&w34&w15&w93&w103&w75&w17-5&w8-4&w18-5&w24-2&w252&w262)Among the small prestigious programs, the schools engineering is ranked 20th, engineering and engineering mechanics 18th, engineering 3rd, physics 4th, engineering and research 4th, engineering 10th, science 15th, and mathematics 15th, according to Science Foundation.(http://www.phds.org/) From the Chronicle of Higher Education, Columbias mechanics is 6th in the nation, its engineering 4th, industrial engineering 7th, mechanical engineering 5th, applied physics 8th, and operations research 6th. Finally, Columbias engineering program is one of the top three in the world.(http://www.advancedtrading.com/showArticle.jhtml?articleID209102204 Financial engineering ranking by insiders)DepartmentsApplied Physics and Applied MathematicsThe Department of Applied Physics and Applied Mathematics was founded in 1978 by then Dean Peter Likens. The proposal was to combine the interdepartmental doctoral program in physics with the existing division of nuclear Science and engineering. The departments first faculty members included:  Goldstein, C. K. Chu, Robert Gross, William Havens, Shayne Johnston, Thomas Marshall, Leon Lidofsky, Edward Melkonian, and Gerald Navratil.Under the chairmanship of Robert Gross, the department developed a broader program encompassing physics, electronics, and mathematics in addition to the core theoretical areas of plasma and physics.In 1997, the Fu Foundation donated large sums of funding supporting researches at the department, and in 1998, it officially changed its name to the Department of Applied Physics and Applied Mathematics due to the departments ever expanding stature. In the same year of the donation, renowned Professors Aron Pinczuk and Stormer joined the department. In 2000, the department expanded again, creating two joint faculty positions with the Department of Earth and Environmental Sciences. That year, the Materials Science and Engineering Program of the Krumb School of Mines was integrated with the Department of Applied Physics and Applied Mathematics.Since 1978, the department has grown from nine to thirty one full-time faculty members, who are involved in interdisciplinary areas of research relating to nanoscale science, science, advanced scientific computing, materials and information technologies, and plasma physics.The departmental faculty has recently received numerous accolades, including three Sloans, four Guggenheims, and one Packard fellowship, one Prize in physics, one Bell Prize, and two Buckley Prizes. Faculty members do extensive research in Columbias Nanoscience and Engineering Center, the Materials Research Science and Engineering Center, the Plasma Physics Laboratory, the Center for Terascale Computer Simulation.  Recently, the department has developed the sequential lateral solidification process that creates high-quality crystalline silicon films which generate major patent income.The department grants three undergraduate majors, including applied physics, applied mathematics, and materials science and engineering. Its graduate programs address these same three fields in a broader range. Each year, the department awards the Robert Simon Memorial Prize to its graduate student with the most distinguished doctoral dissertation.Biomedical EngineeringThe Department of Biomedical Engineering was founded in 2000. It is one of the fastest growing, most reputed engineering department at Columbia.It has been consistently ranked in the top 15 BME departments across the nation in various surveys. The department has close contact with the medical school and other engineering departments in interdisciplinary researches. The educations tracks of the biomedical engineering department include biomechanics, biomedical imaging, and cell and engineering.The departments faculty of 19 full-time professors and five adjunct professors is equally divided among the three above-mentioned disciplines. The biomedical engineering department represents one-fifth of the total number of engineering majors at the school. Its majors are the most popular among students not only wishing to pursue engineering but also finance or pre-med at Columbia University.The department draws financial resources from the university as a whole as well as from the Foundation. An undergraduate at Columbia has access to laboratory tools usually reserved for advanced research. In addition to the core biomedical facilities, the department has a tissue culture facility, a histology facility, an atomic force microscope, and epifluorescence microscope, and a large machine shop.Chemical EngineeringColumbias Chemical Engineering Department has a broad spectrum of research and teaching. Its core focus concerns with materials and process analysis, concepts that are key to a wide range of technologies. Some areas the faculty are involved in include the engineering of polymers and other soft materials, the electrochemistry of cells, the bioengineering of organs, the sequencing of the human genome, polymer interactions and synthesis, the biophysics of cellular processes, the physics of DNA, the physical chemistry of nanoparticles, neutron scattering, atmospheric chemistry, and multiple theoretical studies revolving around both mathematical physics and computational analysis.The Ph.D. students in the department obtained their undergraduate degrees from numerous areas of study including engineering, chemistry, physics, biochemistry, and other natural science fields. The program highly emphasizes interdisciplinary research, with some doctoral students advised by two faculty members. The undergraduate program provides a degree that leads to diverse career options that historically includes biochemical engineering, environmental management, pharmaceuticals, and medicine, but also law, banking and finance, and politics.Current research activities at the chemical engineering department encompass the science and engineering of soft materials, genomic engineering, biophysics and soft matter physics, engineering of bioinductive and biomimetic materials, and interfacial engineering and electrochemistry.The chemical engineering department utilizes facilities including a polymer synthesis lab that houses metal evaporator system, a Miligen 9050 peptide synthesizer, and thin-film preparation stations. The department also uses XPS imaging systems, digital analysis systems, X-ray reflectometers, and MCT detectors, among others. For computational studies, a cluster of dedicated computers is available for intensive simulations and numerical calculations. The chemical engineering department shares facilities with the chemistry department. Shared facilities consist of equipments including fluorescence spectrometers, EPR spectrometers, nanosecond laser photlysis instruments, photon counter, and chromatographic devices. The facilities of Columbia Genome Center are also at the departments disposal.Civil Engineering and Engineering MechanicsColumbias department of civil engineering and engineering mechanics is one of the longest running, most prominent small-size engineering departments in the United States. The department of civil engineering was formed in 1868. It evolved to include curriculum in metallurgy, electricity, mechanics, chemistry, and engineering before separate departments were established.Some of the departments alumni include Barclay Parsons, Steinman, P. Chilton, and Jeff Bleustein. William Barclay Parsons received his civil engineering degree in 1882 and later founded the world-renowned company Parsons-Brinkerhoff. Steinman received a doctorate from the department in 1911. He designed the Henry Hudson Bridge and founded the firm of Steinman Engineers, a lead designer of famous bridges in New York City and the United States. Chilton received a M.S. and became one of the first astronauts to pilot the space shuttle. Jeff Bleustein received a doctorate in engineering mechanics, later becoming the CEO of Harley-Davidson Motorcycle Company.The civil engineering department has enjoyed top ranking since the 1950s, especially for its engineering mechanics program. Its notable faculty includes Bieniek, Bleich, Burmister, Freudenthal, Mindlin, Salvadori, and Skalak.Computer ScienceThe Columbia department of computer science is one of the biggest, most reputed departments in the world. The department offers an integrated curriculum consisting of programming, architecture, systems operating, and theoretical computer science/mathematics. Among the research tracks in the department are intelligence, natural language processing, computational complexity, of algorithms, computer communications, methods, computer architecture, computer graphics, data bases, mathematical computational models, optimization, and programming environments.Undergraduates in the department are involved in advanced faculty research projects. Students serve as consultants at the Columbia Computer Center, which operates the microcomputers and terminals on campus. Upper-level students in computer science may assist faculty members with research projects and help to develop software.Graduate students in the department can choose among 18 different tracks of concentration, including computational biology, new computer security, foundations of computer science, machine learning, natural language processing, software systems, vision and graphics, and network systems among others.The Computer Science major students lead numerous departmental clubs and organizations. Those are Women in Computer Science, Women in Science at Columbia, Association for Computing Machinery, Engineering Student Council, and Graduate Advisor Group.Current faculty projects include algorithmic analysis, computational complexity, software tool design, distributed computation, computer modeling and performance evaluation, computer networks, computer architecture and VLSI design, computer graphics, programming environments, expert systems, natural language processing, computer vision, robotics, multi-computer design, VLSI applications, artificial intelligence, combinatorial modeling, and microprocessor applications.Graduates of the computer science department go into wide range of careers, from industry to government. Recent graduates have found top positions in both academic and professional institutions such as Sinai School of Medicine, Facebook, Buzzient, RedHat, Sachs, and Company, Microsoft, Wireless Generation, FactSet, martin, UBS, Bloomberg, Electronics, Google, Watson, IntuVision Inc., Citigroup, Corporate Research, Shaw, & Company, Veson Nautical, and Stanley. Other students have gone on to graduate studies in Mellon University, University, University, of California-Berkeley, University, of Maryland, and MIT.The computer science faculty is world distinguished. Many are recognized with membership in the Academy of Engineering, ACM awards, IEEE awards, John von Neumann Medals, Prize, fellows status in various engineering/scientific societies, IBM awards, Presidential Early Career Awards, membership in the Academy of Arts and Sciences, board membership in academies, and numerous fellowships such as Sloan and Guggenheim.The departmental faculty members conduct researches in numerous facilities including the Autonomous Agents Lab, Columbia Vision and Graphics Center, Computer Architecture Laboratory, and Robotics Laboratory.Earth and Environmental EngineeringThe Columbia University Department of Earth and Environmental Engineering focuses on research that finds solutions to global sustainability. The department traces hits history to the Henry Krumb School of Mines, concentrating in areas of water resources and climate risks, sustainable energy and materials, and environmental health engineering.The Henry Krumb School of Mines has been a leading institution in mining and metallurgy research, having pioneered works in mineral beneficiation, chemical thermodynamics, kinetics, and transport phenomena in mineral extraction. HKSM has been a leader in mining and metallurgy research and education, including the first mining handbook by Professor Peele, the first mineral processing handbook by Professor Taggart.During the 19th and 20th centuries, HKSM contributed to the development of technologies that provided basic materials need. Today the traditional mining and mineral engineering of the department were transformed to embody material and environmental engineering. The department maintains close ties with the Columbia Institute directed by economist Sachs.The M.S. degree in Earth Resources Engineering was established in 1996 to supplant the mining and mineral engineering degree. The B.S. program in Earth and Environmental Engineering was initiated in 1998 with a student:faculty ratio of 3:1.The department enjoys external partnerships with other engineering departments, Columbia Earth Institute, the Earth Observatory, the Research Institute for Climate and Society, the School of Public Health, and the of International and Public Affairs.The department offers the bachelor of science, master of science, doctor of philosophy, doctor of engineering science, and joint M.B.A degree with Columbia Business School. Recent graduates have gone on to work for Schlumberger, Ltd., CDM, HydroQual, Kleinfelder, Zurich U.S. Environmental. Others have gone on to further studies in Stanford, University of California-Berkeley, and MIT.Electrical EngineeringThe first recommendation for an electrical engineering department in Columbia came from Edison to President Barnard. Edison stated, Crocker and I maintained that there is an electrical science which is the real soul of electrical engineering. In the late 19th century, at Edisons suggestion, the Columbia trustees established a department of electrical engineering with two faculty members: Francis Bacon Crocker and Idvorsky Pupin. Crocker was among the first presidents in the American Institute of Electrical Engineers. Pupin was known for his invention of the coil.In 20th century, full four-year undergraduate program was created for electrical engineering. From 1901 to 1904, the class size grew from five to thirty. The department was housed in what is todays Mathematics Building at Columbia. Pupin served as its chair before transferring the position to Walter Slichter who led the department until 1941. In the mid-20th century, the electrical engineering department played a significant role during War II, bringing radio communications to France and lecturing in London. The military used the FM radio system developed in the department. Throughout the Slichter era, the department evolved along two dominant technical tracks: electrical motors and power, and radio. During this period pupils including Armstrong and Morecroft became dominant forces in radio technology.Between 1950s and 1960s, the department saw dramatic growth in faculty and students. Professor R. Ragazzini joined Columbia in 1941 and chaired the department, and in 1945, faculty under his leadership developed the operational amplifier which became a key building block in electronic circuits. The department recruited other top professors such as Ralph J. Schwatz as well as students like A. Zadeh. 1953 I. Jury became the first doctoral student in the department working with professor Millman, who joined the department in 1952. In the 1960s, another Ph.D student of Ragazzinni Kalman produced pioneering work in the area of time varying and nonlinear systems.In the 1970s, Columbia, already renowned for theoretical research in electrical engineering, returned to the technical aspects of research. Research resumed in solid state devices, plasma physics, millimeter waves, and integrated circuits. The department also began attracting accomplished industry professionals. Two important recruits were Alexander Schelkunoff and W.R. Bennett.In 1968 the department was renamed the Department of Electrical Engineering and Computer Science before reverting back to its original name in 1979.The department today continues to contribute to communications and networking, signal processing, digital and analog integrated circuits, electromagnetic and plasma physics, photonics, and microelectronic devices.The department is currently home to 2 members of the National Academy of Engineering, 9 NSF Career Awardees, 6 APS Fellows, 18 Fellows, 3 Guggenheim Fellows, 1 Humboldt Fellow, and 1 Fulbright scholar.Industrial Engineering and Operations ResearchThe Industrial Engineering and Operations Research Department at Columbia is a relatively new department. It is already highly rated throughout the world and provides its students with a launch pad to lucrative jobs in Street, finance, government, and industry. Whereas in other universities the department of operations research resides in the business school, Columbias department of operations research is part of the engineering school.The department offers four main areas of study: Engineering Management Systems, Engineering, Engineering and Research.Engineering Management Systems is a field that emphasizes both technology and management perspectives in solving problems. The departmental curriculum provides exposure to deterministic optimization and stochastic modeling that are essential elements of engineering and management.  Graduates from this program often assume positions as business analysts, analysts, managers of funds and banks, and executives in investment banks, insurance firms, and other financial firms.Financial Engineering is a multidisciplinary field that covers financial theory, methods of engineering, mathematics, and computer programming. Courses in financial engineering train students in the application of engineering and quantitative methods to finance. Graduates usually become what is referred to as quants. Many go into securities, banking, financial management, consulting firms, finance departments in general manufacturing/service firms, and corporate/government treasuryIndustrial Engineering emphasizes design, analysis, and control of production/services. Industrial engineers work for every kind of organization in manufacturing, distribution, transportation, mercantile, and service. Their responsibility is often managerial, which involve the integration of the physical, financial, economic, and human components of systems such as production planning/control, plant layout, materials management, and work station design. The industrial engineering programs at Columbia began in 1919.Operations Research is an applied science, concerned with quantitative problem solving.  The allocation of limited resources leads to problems often arising in all types of industry and financial firms. Operations research analysts develop models to solve logistical problems by using engineering methodology. Analysis involves mathematical optimization techniques, statistical methods, experiments, and simulations. Operations Research program was established in Columbia in 1952.The faculty members of the Industrial Engineering and Operations Research Department are prominent academicians in their respective fields and Wall Street professionals. Its chair Derman is a superstar quant who was a former executive at Sachs and author of best-selling book My Life as a Quant. Among the departments many faculty members are adjunct professors from the Columbia Business School and the School of Arts and Sciences.Mechanical EngineeringThe Department of Mechanical Engineering is one of the longest running traditional engineering departments at Columbia. The department was established in 1897. It has enjoyed a national and international reputation since its inception. The department was home to professors Dudley D. Fuller, Harold G. Elrod, and Vittorio Castelli, leaders in the field of lubrication theory and practice. In the 1960s, Professor Freudenstein (known as the Father of Modern Kinematics) taught in the department and ushered in the computer age in kinematics synthesis.The department conducts substantial research in the fields of theory, thermofluids, biomechanics, and manufacturing.Its faculty members regularly give keynote lectures in the United States and at international conventions. Many members also serve as editors and associate editors of professional journals. Some hold leadership positions in professional societies. The department is the smallest in the school, allowing for close student-faculty interaction.Facilities of the department include Computer-Aided Design Lab, Mechatronics Laboratory. New research laboratories have been recently added for nanotube science, optical nanostructures, nanomechanics, nonlinear and autonomous vehicle control, medical robots, and microfluidics.The department is home to interdisciplinary research projects such as biomechanics, mechanics of materials, energy systems, and nanotechnology. It has partnerships with other engineering departments, the Lamont-Doherty Geological Laboratory and University Medical Center.FacilitiesColumbias Plasma Physics Laboratory is part of the School of Engineering and Applied Science (SEAS), in which the HBT and Columbia Non-Neutral Torus are housed.The school also has two tunnels, a shop, a nanotechnology laboratory, a Dynamics TRIGA Mk. II nuclear reactor, a large scale centrifuge for geotechnical testing, and an axial tester commonly used for testing York City bridge cables. Each department has numerous laboratories on the Heights campus; however, other departments have holdings throughout the world. For example, the Applied Physics department has reactors at Nevis Labs in Irvington, NY and conducts work with CERN in Geneva.Many students take their engineering classes in the Seeley W. Mudd building on the northeast side of the main Morningside campus. Mudd is the heart of the engineering school; department offices, labs, lecture rooms, and student spaces are located in this building.Connected to this building is the Sherman Fairchild Center, which largely houses biology labs and sciences. To the left of Mudd facing north is the Shapiro Center for Engineering and Physical Science Research (CEPSR) where additional lecture halls, research offices, labs, and student space is available.To the left of this is Hall, which houses the physics department; in this building, professors and affiliates (including Nobel Laureates) worked on the Project. To the south of Pupin is Havemeyer and Chandler, which houses chemistry. Mathematics Hall, further south of Havemeyer, houses the math department.Together, these buildings, Mudd, Fairchild, Shapiro CEPSR, Pupin, Chandler, Havemeyer, and Mathematics, is where the bulk of engineering students take their classes. Non-technical classes are taken in other buildings to the south of these buildings. All of the schools buildings are on the same campus and vicinity as Columbia College, Business School, Law School, School of Social Work, College, Union Theological Seminary, Barnard, Jewish Theological Seminary, Graduate School of Arts and Sciences, and others on the beautiful Morningside Campus.thumb|right|Entrance to The Lamont-Doherty Earth ObservatoryIn close association with Columbia Engineerings Earth and Environmental Engineering department and the Institute, the Lamont-Doherty Earth Observatory center in Palisades, York (40 minutes by Shuttle), is an earth-studies campus which welcomes a brand new research (the Gary C. Comer Geochemistry building) facility that has recently won 3 coveted architecture awards for design and sustainability. thumb|left|Schapiro Center for Engineering and Physical Science ResearchWhile Mudd, nicknamed the brick, is tucked behind the Fairchild Center, much of Columbias buildings were designed by the famed McKim, Mead, and White architects. The campus is in keeping with Neo-classical design themes popular in the early 20th century. It retains old-world charm and originality not found at many of this nations pseudo-gothic styled campuses.The school is also awaiting the completion of a new Northwest Science and Engineering building. At fourteen stories, and designed by award-winning architect Moneo, the building will house new space to conduct research and lectures; it will be completed by 2010. In addition, this building will contain a new library, cafe, research labs, lecture hall, and other amenities. This building is situated between Havemeyer, Chandler and Pupin and will include many bridges to facilitate interdepartmental exchanges and access.Alongside the completion of the Northwest Science building, the last available plot on the Morningside campus, the University looks ahead to Manhattanville. In this  area situated only 5 blocks Northwest from the School of Engineering and Applied Science, Manhattanville represents a growth opportunity for the engineering school as well as the University as a whole. The $7 billion project proceeds with the permission of  neighboring residents, city officials, and business owners in the area. SEAS looks to expand an additional  in this new area. Buildings are being designed by award winning Renzo Piano.Mission and new objectivesDirections for the new centuryAs an integral part to Columbias beliefs for the future engineer, the liberal arts curriculum is celebrated and remains a central object of a SEAS students education. The liberal arts curriculum provides the surest chart with which an engineer can navigate the future; all undergraduates must complete a modified rigorous version of Columbia Colleges celebrated Core Curriculum. It is these courses in Western Civilization and other major cultures that best prepare a student for advanced course work; a wide range of eventual professions; and a continuing, life-long pursuit of knowledge, understanding, and social perspective. It is also these Core courses that most closely tie todays student to the alumni of centuries past. Through a shared exposure to the nontechnical arts, all Columbia engineering studentspast, present, and futuregain the humanistic tools needed to build lives not solely as technical innovators, but as social and political ones as well.Engineering philosophy*This excerpt is taken from the Columbia Engineering website:** The Fu Foundation School of Engineering and Applied Science, as a part of the world-class teaching and research university, strives to provide the best in both undergraduate and graduate education. We are preparing engineering leaders who will solve the problems of the new century, fostering scientific inquiry but never losing sight of its human implications. The Schools programs are designed to produce well-educated engineers who can put their knowledge to work for society. This broad educational thrust takes advantage of the Schools links to a great liberal arts college and to distinguished graduate programs in law, business, and medicine. Through a synergy of teaching and research, we seek to educate a distinguished cadre of leaders in engineering and applied science who will thrive in an atmosphere of recently emerging technologies.Columbia embraces innovative approaches, including computer-assisted design, the use of smart materials, and collaborations with other Columbia departments and schools are opening frontiers in an expanding host of fields: from financial engineering to corrosion control, cryogenic manufacturing to biomedical engineering.Notable alumniThe School of Engineering and Applied Science celebrates its ties and affiliations with at least 9 Laureates. The university as a whole celebrates Columbias 95 Nobel Laureate affiliates (the most affiliates for any institution). Columbia University has graduated the third most Nobel Laureates (38), behind Cambridge (61) and Harvard (48).Alumni of Columbia Engineering have gone on to numerous fields of profession. Many have become prominent scientists, astronauts, architects, government officials, pioneers, entrepreneurs, company CEOs, financiers, and scholars. Below is a short list of the Schools ever growing elite alumni. For a more complete list of alumni of the university, see the of Columbia University people.Image:Robert C. Merton.jpg|Robert C. Merton, Winner of 1997 Memorial Prize in Economic SciencesImage:Hollerith.jpg|Herman Hollerith, Founder of IBMImage:Woodin2.jpg|William Woodwin, of Treasury under Franklin D. RooseveltImage:Isaac.Asimov01.jpg|Isaac Asimov, World renowned fiction writerImage:LangstonHughe 25.jpg|Langston Hughes, poet during the RenaissanceImage:Hyman Rickover 1955.jpg|Hyman Rickover, inventor of submarine and Father of NavyImage:Imam Feisal Abdul Rauf (1).jpg|Imam Feisal Abdul Rauf, author and activist in bridging the differences between the East and the WestImage:Michael Massimino.jpg|Michael Massimino, NASA astronautImage:Nullsleep-2006.jpg|Nullsleep, musician and founder of 8bitpeoplesImage:Ted Rall.jpg|Ted Rall, American columnist and cartoonistImage:Dewitt.jpg|Dewitt Clinton, American politician and the Sixth New York GovernorImage:StephenHSchneiderJI1.jpg|Stephen Schneider, climatologist and Nobel Peace Prize LaureateImage:EdwinHowardArmstrong.jpg|Edwin Armstrong, developer of FM Radio* Chester Beatty (1875), mining magnate and millionaire, often referred to as King of Copper* Hollerith (1879), Founder of IBM* Idvorski Pupin (B.S. 1883), Serbian physicist and physical chemist whose inventions include the coil, winner of Prize for his autobiography* Tucker (1887), architect and artist* Calvin Kendall (1908), Winner of 1950 Prize for Physiology or Medicine* William Parsons (1882), Chief Engineer of New York Citys subway system* Langmuir (1903), Winner of the 1932 Prize in Chemistry, produced gas-filled incandescent lamp, explorer of the vacuum* Huntington Chester, Professor at Hamilton College and Huntington College and the namesake of Chester Peak.* Armstrong (1913), inventor of the FM transmission method* Hughes (1922), poet of the Renaissance* Asimov, One of the Big Three science-fiction writers, along with A. Heinlein and C. Clarke* Rickover (1929), Father of the Nuclear Navy* D. Mindlin (1931), renowned researcher and professor known for his contributions to mechanics, physics, and engineering sciences, recipient of Medal of Science* W. Schulz (1933, 1934), President Dynecology, developed uranium centrifugation (centrifuge), laser analysis, safe waste conversion* G. Newman, Chairman and former CEO of world-leading engineering firm AECOM* Marc Gaudin (1921), professor at MIT and a founding member of Academy of Engineering* F. Schreiber, renowned electrical engineer and developer of optical recognition machine* Loening, American aircraft manufacturer* S. Coleman (1946), acting dean of College, Columbia University who was held hostage during the University protests of 1968.(Martin, Douglas. Henry S. Coleman, 79, Dies; Hostage at Columbia in 68, New York Times, February 4, 2006. Accessed September 12, 2009.)* Henry Michel (1949), Civil Engineer, President of Brinckerhoff* Moog, pioneer of music, inventor of the synthesizer* DiGiulio (1950), President Products Corporation* I. Jury (1953), Initiated field of discrete time systems, pioneered z-transform (the discrete time equivalent of the Transform), and created stability criterion test* Weinig (1954), CEO of Research Corporation, Vice Chairman for Engineering and Manufacturing for SONY America* Emil Kalman (1957), electrical engineer and recipient of Medal of Science* Bowersox, engineer, States officer and a former NASA astronaut* Shinozuka (1960), probabilistic mechanics, stability, and risk assessment* H. Trinh (1972), Vietnamese-American scientist and astronaut* P. Chilton (1977), engineer, the current Commander, Strategic Command, former NASA astronaut* Lawry Norton, Lab engineer, developer of equivalent circuit* C. Merton (1966), Winner of the 1997 Prize in Economics and co-author of the Black-Scholes pricing model* D. Lilley (1969), Fmr. CU Trustee,  Fmr. President AT&T* Albaugh (1974), Current President and CEO of Commercial Airplanes, EVP of its parent company, Boeing Company.* Pandit (1976, 1977, 1980, B 1986), Current CEO of Citigroup* Barton (1979), pioneering researcher of repair* G. Gregory (1980), NASA astronaut* Kazanjian Longobardo, founder of the National Society of Women Engineers* Bloch (1982), engineer, Chief Java Architect at Google* Perlman (1983), Founder and CEO, Rearden LLC; creator, OnLive Gaming; lead development, QuickTime at Computer; created WebTV (now MSN TV), and other ventures* Lee (1983), one of the most prominent figures in the Chinese internet sector and founder/president of China* Rall (dropped out 1984), cartoonist, President of the of American Editorial Cartoonists* Massimino (1984), Current engineer and astronautmission specialist, STS-109, STS-125.* H. Johnson (1985), Current colonel, engineer, astronaut for Space Station. STS-109, support for STS-125.* Dunn, former president of Union and recipient of Edison Medal* M. Bakish (1985), President of Networks International* Eppstein (1989),  developer of geometry, algorithms, and mathematics* Burns (1991), Current CEO of Corporation, the first woman African-American 500 company CEO; Xerox is also the largest company a woman African American CEO is running.* Ross (2001), Go band member: guitarist, keyboard, backup vocals* Nullsleep (2003), 8-bit musician and founder of the 8bitpeoples collective.* L. Gaden, Father of Engineering* F. Engelberger, Father of Industrial Robotics* Loughren, Pioneer in engineering and engineering* Steinman, director of the reconstruction of Bridge* Seeley Mudd, Founder of Mudd College of Engineering, Metallurgical Engineer, President of Mines Corporation* Loening, designer of first successful monoplane* Krumb, Pioneer in development of copper deposit* G. Gregory, former NASA astronaut* Kip Finch, renowned American engineer and educator* C. Drucker, American engineer and recipient of Medal of Science* Spinrad, American computer engineer and former director of Xerox Palo Alto Research Center* K. Nayar, inventor of 360 camera and developer of Reflectance Model* Bishop, chemist and inventor of innovative cosmetics* Hoberman, inventor and architect* E. Shaw, founder of  fund, equity and technology development firm E. Shaw & Co.* Ahuja, current CEO of Augere and former CEO of Orange* Ral Capablanca, one of the greatest chess players of the 20th century* Moisseiff, American engineer and designer of the Bridge* Sporn, renowned Australian engineer and recipient of Edison Medal* Asker Zadeh, a renowned Iranian mathematician, electrical engineer, and computer scientist* E. Isakoff, chemical engineer and former director of DuPont* Clinton  United States Senator and the sixth Governor of New York* Holmes Aldrich, former director of Academy in Rome and architect* Amarel, computer scientist and pioneer in intelligence* L. Anderson, established Fermi Institute and nuclear physicist in the Project* Freudenstein, mechanical engineer, professor, and widely considered the Father of Modern Kinematics* Fu Lee, founder and former president of ChinaAffiliates of the SchoolSome Columbia Engineering affiliates include* Ludwig Strmer  Rabi professor of physics and physics, winner of 1998 Prize in Physics* Idvorski Pupin Professor, Serbian physicist and physical chemist whose inventions include the coil* Zoli, adjunct professor of civil engineering and structural engineer* F. Chandler  American chemist, first Dean of Universitys of Mines* Clayton Urey Professor, Laureate (1934), extensive development in the Project, discoverer of Deuterium.* Anastassiou Professor of Engineering, developer of MPEG-2 technology* Egleston, founder of Columbia School of Mines and professor of mining and metallurgy* B. Medaris Commanding General of U.S. Army Ordinance Missile Command (ABMA), planned of Normandy; professor* Isaac Rabi Professor, Ph.D. from Columbia (1927), Laureate, Discoverer of Magnetic Resonance* Salvadori Architect, Structural Engineer, Professor (1940s-1990s), consultant on Project, inventor of thin concrete shells* Lackner, Professor of Environmental Engineering* Wu Chinese Marie Curie, first lady of physics, and Professor (19441980) who disproved of parity* M. Harris, Professor of Electrical Engineering and architect* Foster Ramsey Jr. Discovery of deuteron electric quadrupole moment, molecular beam spectroscopy. Professor (19401947), B.A. Ph.D. Columbia.* Press Geophysicist, work in seismic activity and wave theory, counsel to four Presidents. M.A., Ph.D. Columbia, and researcher.* M. Lederman A Laureate, discoverer of muon neutrino 62, bottom quark 77. Professor (19511989). M.A., Ph.D. Columbia* Kandel Biophysicist, Laureate, uncovered secrets of synapses. Professor Physicians & Surgeons (1974-); research with the Biomedical Engineering department.* F. Traub Founding chairman of the science department at Columbia* Derman, Professor and Director of Columbias engineering program, co-authors of the Modelers Manifesto* Aho Canadian computer scientist widely known for his co-authorship of the programming language* Gertrude Fanny Neumark one of the worlds leading experts on doping wide-band semiconductors* Hard Townes professor and an American Prize-winning physicist who helped to invent the laser (About Seas Birth Place of Laser)* Millman Professor of Engineering, creator of Theorem* R. Dunning School Dean, physicist who played key roles in the development of the bomb* M. Bellovin Professor of Science* Kim Professor of Applied Physics and Mathematics* Yannakakis Professor of Science, famous scholar noted for his work in the fields of complexity theory, Databases* Chudnovsky, professor of operations research and industrial engineering* E Keyes, professor of applied mathematics* Federgruen, Affiliate Professor of Operations Research and Industrial Engineering* F. Maxemchuk Professor of Engineering* Stein Professor of research and engineering* Breslow Professor of chemical engineering, now University Professor* Calatrava (Honorary Doctorate, 2007), world renowned architect, sculptor and engineer, designer of Communications Tower and  Trade Center Transportation Hub* Freudenstein, Higgins Professor Emeritus of Mechanical Engineering* Spotnitz, Affiliate Professor of Biomedical Engineering* Christian Kavanagh, professor of civil engineering* Vapnik, Professor of Computer Science and co-developer of theory* Lanier, visiting scholar at the Computer Science department* Weinig, Professor of Operations Research and Industrial Engineering and founder of Research Corporation* Tang, professor of civil engineering and former chairman of Society of Civil Engineers* C. Mow, professor of biomedical engineering and member of the Academy of Engineering, of Medicine* Berg, member of Mechanical Engineering Department research group and one of Time 100 Most Influential People in the WorldDepartmental links* Applied Physics and Mathematics** Webpage* Engineering** Webpage* Engineering** Webpage* Engineering and Mechanics** Webpage* Science** Webpage* Earth and Engineering** Webpage* Engineering** Webpage* Engineering and Research** Webpage* Science and Engineering** Webpage* Engineering** WebpageSpecialized CentersColumbia Engineering faculty are a central force in creating many groundbreaking discoveries that today are shaping life tomorrow. They are at the vanguard of their fields, collaborating with other world-renowned experts at Columbia and other universities to bring the best minds from a myriad of disciplines to shape the future.Large, well-funded interdisciplinary centers in science and engineering, materials research, nanoscale research, and genomic research are making step changes in their respective fields while individual groups of engineers and scientists collaborate to solve theoretical and practical problems in other significant areas. Last year, Columbia Engineerings 2007-2008 research expenditures were $92,000,000, a very respectable number given the small size of the school. Harvards research expenditures in the same period were $35,000,000. Columbia Engineering Ph.D. students have ~60% more monetary resources to work with using the research expenditure : Ph.D. student ratio.* Henry Krumb School of Mines*  Center for Advanced Technology* Center For Applied Probability* Center for Computational Biology and Bioinformatics* Center for Computational Learning Systems* Columbia Nanoscale Science and Engineering Center* Center for Financial Engineering* Center for Integrated Science Engineering* Center for Life Cycle Analysis* Center for Particulate and Surfactant Systems* Center for the Study of Sustainable Use of Resources* Clean Ocean and Shore Trust* Columbia University Energy Frontier Research Center* Materials Research Science and Engineering Center* Columbia Water Center* Computational Optimization Research Center* Earth Engineering Center* Environmental Molecular Sciences Institute* Industry/University Cooperative Research Center for Advanced Studies in Novel Surfactants* Center for Technology, Innovation, & Community EngagementSpecialized LabsThe Fu Foundation School of Engineering and Applied Science occupies five laboratory and classroom buildings at the north end of the campus, including the Schapiro Center for Engineering and Physical Science Research and the new Northwest Building on Morningside Heights. Because of the Schools close proximity to the other Morningside facilities and programs, Columbia engineering students have ready access to the whole of the Universitys resources.The School is the site of an almost overwhelming array of basic and advanced research installations which include both the NSEC and the MRSEC NSF-funded interdisciplinary research centers, as well as the Columbia High-Beta Tokamak, the Robert A.W. Carleton Strength of Materials Laboratory, and a state-of-the-art 200g geotechnical centrifuge.The Botwinick Multimedia Learning Laboratory is the Schools state-of-the-art facility for computer-aided design (CAD) and media development. It is equipped with 50 Apple Mac Pro 8-core workstations, as well as a cluster of Apple Xserves with Xraid storage, that serve the labs 300-plus users per semester. The workstations are custom tailored for 3D modeling and animation, and offer students the latest modeling software commonly used in professional settings.* The Botwinick Multimedia Learning Lab* Robert A. W. Carleton Strength of Materials Lab* Center for Electron Transport in Molecular Nanostructures* Columbia Nanoscale Science and Engineering Center* Columbia High-Beta Tokamak* Materials Research Science and Engineering Center* Geotechnical Centrifuge* Lightwave Research LabRelated Centers* Lamont-Doherty Earth Observatory* The Earth Institute at Columbia* The Goddard Institute for Space Studies (NASA)* Lenfest Center for Sustainable EnergyOther programs* Undergraduate Research Involvement Program**Each SEAS department sponsors opportunities to do novel undergraduate research which have applications in the real world. Departmental Chairs supervise students through the process, and mentoring with a professor is provided.**Opportunities* Science and Engineering** Program in the Department of Applied Physics and Mathematics, sharing teaching and research with the faculty from Krumb School of Mines.** APAM Webpage** Program Webpage* Engineering** Administered by both the Electrical Engineering and Computer Science Departments through a joint Computer Engineering Committee.** Webpage* The Combined Plan Programs** The 3-2, B.A./B.S., is designed to provide students with the opportunity to receive both a B.A. degree from an affiliated arts college and a B.S. degree from SEAS within five years. Students complete the requirements for the liberal arts degree along with a pre-engineering course of study in three years at their college and then complete two years at Columbia.** The 4-2 M.S. program is designed to allow students to complete an M.S. degree at SEAS in two years after completion of a B.A. degree at one of the affiliated schools. This program will allow students the opportunity to take undergraduate engineering courses if necessary.** WebpageSee also* League* of Columbia University people* in New York City* UniversityReferencesExternal links* Engineering School Home Page* Engineering Student Council* Engineering Graduate Student Council* History of the Engineering School* CUSJ - Columbia Undergraduate Science Journal* 1997 Columbia University Record article
899111
University_of_Zagreb
website          unizg.hrThe University of Zagreb (, ) is the biggest Croatian university and the oldest continuously operating university in the area covering Central Europe south of Vienna and all of Europe. As of 2011, University of Zagreb is ranked among 500 Best Universities of the world by the Shanghai Academic Ranking of World Universities. History  Academy The beginnings of the later university date back to 23 September 1669 when Emperor and King Leopold I Habsburg issued a decree granting the establishment of the Jesuit Academy of the Royal Free City of Zagreb.(Regg, Walter: European Universities and Similar Institutions in Existence between 1812 and the End of 1944: A Chronological List, in: Regg, Walter (ed.): A History of the University in Europe. Vol. 3: Universities in the Nineteenth and Early Twentieth Centuries (18001945), Cambridge University Press, 2004, ISBN 978-0-521-36107-1, p. 685) According to that document the study of philosophy in Zagreb acquired a formal and legal status as Neoacademia Zagrabiensis and officially became a public institution of higher education.The academy was run by the Jesuits for more than a century until the order was dissolved by Pope XIV in 1773. Under a new leadership in 1772 the academy enrolled a total of 200 students. In 1776 Empress and Queen Maria Theresa issued a decree founding the Royal Academy of Science ().( It consisted of three studies or faculties of philosophy, theology, and law. The former political-cameral studies became part of the newly established faculty of law, and thus were integrated into the academy. Each of the faculties of the Royal Academy of Sciences had several chairs teaching one or several courses.The academy in Zagreb remained until 1874, despite numerous organizational changes, the focal institution of higher education in Croatia, educating most of the members of the Croatian intelligentsia. University Bishop Juraj Strossmayer in 1861 proposed to the Parliament the founding of a university at Zagreb. During his visit to Zagreb in 1869 the Emperor Joseph signed the decree on the establishment of the University of Zagreb. Five years later the Parliament passed the Act of Founding, which was ratified by the Emperor on 5 January 1874. On 19 October 1874 a ceremony was held in the name of the founding of the University of Zagreb, making it the third university in the Hungarian realm of the Empire.(Charle, Christophe: Patterns, in: Regg, Walter (ed.): A History of the University in Europe. Vol. 3: Universities in the Nineteenth and Early Twentieth Centuries (18001945), Cambridge University Press, 2004, ISBN 978-0-521-36107-1, p. 41)In 1874 the University had four faculties:* Law (Pravno-dravoslovni fakultet)* Theology (Bogoslovni fakultet)* Philosophy (Mudroslovni fakultet)* Medicine (Lijeniki fakultet)The Faculty of Medicine, however, was not put into function in 1874, it had to wait until 1917. The Faculty of Philosophy served as the general scientific faculty. Since 1876 it had geology, botany, physics, mathematics, and chemistry; since 1877 zoology; since 1882 pharmacy; since 1883 geography.In 1860, the School of Husbandry and Forestry was originally founded in Krievci. In 1898, the Academy of Forestry (umarska akademija) was founded as part of the Faculty of Philosophy, which encompassed all technical studies. In 1919, this school became the Faculty of Husbandry and Forestry.In 1919, the School of Technology (Tehnika visoka kola) was founded, which was transformed into a University Faculty in 1926. Also in 1919 the School of Veterinary Medicine (Veterinarska visoka kola) was founded, transformed into a University Faculty in 1925.In the Faculty of Philosophy, major reorganization ensued in the 1920s, as mathematics, pharmacy and other sciences started to split off, first with the creation of separate mathematics and pharmaceutical departments in 1928, when the faculty was renamed into its current name Filozofski fakultet.In 1926, the University was composed of seven faculties:* Theology (Bogoslovni fakultet)* Law (Pravniki fakultet)* Medicine (Lijeniki fakultet)* Philosophy (Mudroslovni fakultet)** Philosophy dept. (Filozofski odjel)** Pharmacy dept. (Farmaceutski odjel)* Husbandry and Forestry (Gospodarsko-umarski fakultet)* Veterinary Medicine (Veterinarski fakultet)* Technology (Tehniki fakultet)** Construction dept. (Graevni odsjek)** Engineering dept. (Strojarski odsjek)** Chemical dept. (Kemijski odsjek)During the State of Croatia (19411945), the university was known as the Croatian University (Hrvatsko sveuilite).The individual departments of the Faculty of Philosophy became separate faculties in 1942, 1946 when the Faculty of Sciences was formed, and finally in 1963.In 1956, the Faculty of Technology was divided into four separate faculties:* Architecture-Construction-Geodesy (Arhitektonsko-graevinsko-geodetski fakultet)* Electrical engineering (Elektrotehniki fakultet)* Mechanical engineering-Shipbuilding (Strojarsko-brodograevni fakultet)* Chemistry-Food technology-Mining (Kemijsko-prehrambeno-rudarski fakultet)These eventually split up into the current layout.FacultiesRectors:Source: List of rectors at the University of Zagreb websiteLegacySince 1874, more than 200,000 students have received a bachelors degree, more than 18,000 a masters, and more than 8,000 a doctorate from the University of Zagreb.See also* Universities Network* of modern universities in Europe (18011945)* of universities in Croatia* and University Library ZagrebReferencesExternal links* Official websiteu ZagrebuZagrebde Zagrebde Zagrebu Zagrebuvan Zagrebw Zagrzebiuv Zagrebu u Zagrebuyliopistoi Zagrebniversitesi
902426
U.S._Route_209
spur_typeUSU.S. Route 209 is a  long highway in the states of Pennsylvania and York. Although the route is a spur of U.S. Route 9, US 209 never intersects US 9, making the connection via U.S. Route 9W instead. The southern terminus of the route is at Pennsylvania Route 147 in Pennsylvania. The northern terminus is at US 9W north of Kingston in New York, where the road continues east as New York State Route 199. US 209 is one of the original highways in the 1926 Highway System plan.  US 209 is one of the few US highways whose terminus is at a state, rather than a US highway.In Pennsylvania, the highway travels through the length of the Water Gap National Recreation Area. For part of its route in York, US 209 runs alongside the defunct and Hudson Canal, which ran from Port Jervis to Kingston.()Route description|-|PA || 150.60( || 242.37|-|NY || 61.14( || 98.40|-|Total || 211.74 || 340.76|}Although signed as a north&ndash;south route in both states for its entire length, 209 actually runs closer to east&ndash;west along its southern sections in Pennsylvania, only gently trending northward. Only at Stroudsburg does it begin to turn more to the north as it begins to follow the River. In New York it runs almost due northeast for its entire length.Much of the highway in both states is a two-lane road, running through narrow mountain valleys, but there are expressway portions. In Pennsylvania, one near Stroudsburg connects concurrencies with PA 33 and 80; in New York, the north end is an expressway, the remnants of a failed project to make the whole state portion one.PennsylvaniaFrom Millersburg, 209 runs alongside the Berry Mountain ridge into Schuylkill County, finally climbing a valley headwall near Tower City to intersect 81 on the other side, then continues on to Tremont. Beyond that, the generally straight route starts to curve a little more frequently into Pottsville, after which it follows the upper Schuylkill as it heads into lightly populated mining regions such as Port Carbon, Cumbola, New Philadelphia, and Middleport on its way to Tamaqua.6 and US 209 in Matamoras.jpg|thumb|left|Route 209 as it passes through Matamoras, concurrent with US 6.Several miles beyond, it crosses into Carbon County at Lansford, where it nestles between Nesquehoning, Sharpe  and Pisgah mountains until it finally turns slightly to the north just before Nesquehoning. From there it follows the Nesquehoning Creek valley down to the River, which 209 follows southeasterly through Jim Thorpe to Lehighton, the largest community along the route so far. At the south end of the town, it crosses the river and resumes its north-trending eastward course, which brings it presently to an interchange at  476, the Turnpikes northeast extension.Once again, there are no major settlements along 209 as it heads through isolated valleys, this time with more agricultural use evident, into Monroe County and eventually to its absorption into Route 33. Business 209 leaves the road at Sciota for travelers wishing to bypass the expressway.At the next exit, 209 takes its own short branch of expressway several miles to I-80 just outside Stroudsburg. It stays with the interstate through the city and neighboring East Stroudsburg, leaving to the north at one of the last exits before the state line.From this point on, 209 runs much more northerly, reconnecting with Business 209 after several miles and taking its more firmly northeast bearing to eventually run along the River shortly after entering Pike County, its last in the state. This  segment provides access to Jersey via bridges at Dingmans Bridge and Milford Crossing, where US 206 comes to its northern end. Just beyond the latter bridge, the road reaches the eponymous community, where US 6 joins it.Image:Port Jervis-Matamoras Bridge.jpg|left|250px|thumb|The Bridge, taking Route 209, along with Route 6, from Pennsylvania (right) into New York.The two highways eventually start to run alongside Interstate 84, and development picks up as they approach Matamoras, the easternmost town in the state. After crossing under the interstate at its final Pennsylvania interchange, they form the boroughs Main Street and cross into New York via the Bridge.New York6 and 209 remain concurrent as they enter Port Jervis, but after less than a mile 209 strikes out to the northeast again on its own. After leaving the city, it enters the valley between the Ridge and the Catskill Plateau to its west, following the River until crossing it just prior to the hamlet of Cuddebackville. While the scenery is often spectacular, the settlements along the road are few, with only one blinker between Port Jervis and the Sullivan County line. At Wurtsboro, shortly after the NY 17 (future Interstate 86) interchange, the first light is finally reached.right|thumb|The Delaware and Hudson Canal, seen from the highway here in New Yorks Sullivan County.The road follows along some of the old and Hudson Canal, a Historic Landmark and passes Airport, out of the county into Ulster County, and eventually reaches another village, more bustling Ellenville. Just past it, in the hamlet of Napanoch, it picks up its first concurrency partner since route 6, NY 55. These two routes run together as Creek crosses and eventually runs alongside the road.At another small hamlet, Kerhonkson, 55 leaves to join US 44 at the latters western terminus. 44 and 55 offer access ultimately to Poughkeepsie,  to the east. The valley begins to widen as another road, NY 213, joins for a mile before leaving at a blinker in downtown Stone Ridge. To the north, the road eventually widens into four lanes, then four divided lanes as the freeway begins just short of NY 28 just west of Kingston, just inside the Park.After turning to the east again, 209 crosses the York State Thruway but does not have an exit. The eastbound highway remains an expressway to the Bridge. Route 209, however, does not make it that far, becoming NY 199 where it crosses over US 9W.HistoryUS 209 was assigned as part of the establishment of the Highway System in 1926. The route was initially an intrastate highway contained entirely within the state of Pennsylvania. It began at an intersection with U.S. Route 11 (now US 22 / US 322) in Clarks Ferry (east of Duncannon) and ended at U.S. Route 6 in Milford.() US 209 was extended northward to U.S. Route 9W in Kingston, New York ca. 1935()() and truncated to Pennsylvania, by 1938.() The portion of US 209 in New York north of Port Jervis was previously designated as US 6 from 1926 to 1928 and U.S. Route 6N from 1928 to 1933.() thumb|right|The US 209 freeway between PA 33 and I-80.US 209 was realigned onto highways in two locations along its routing during the 1960s. In Kingston, New York, construction began on a highway bypassing downtown to the northwest in the early 1960s. The highway began at US 209 south of the city and ended at US 9W north of downtown Kingston.()() It opened to traffic as a realignment of US 209 by 1964.() In Pennsylvania, US 209 was moved onto a pair of new expressways south and east of the borough in the 1960s. US 209s former routing into Stroudsburg was redesignated as U.S. Route 209 Business.()()Major intersections*81 near Pennsylvania*476/Turnpike near Pennsylvania*Route 33 near Pennsylvania*80 in Pennsylvania*Route 206 near Pennsylvania*Route 6 in Pennsylvania (southern terminus of concurrency)*Interstate 84 in Pennsylvania*Route 6 in Jervis, New York (northern terminus of concurrency)*York State Route 17 near New York*Route 44/York State Route 55 in New York*York State Route 28 in New York*Route 9W/York State Route 199 in Katrine, New YorkReferencesExternal links*Unbuilt Catskill Expressway @ NYCROADS.com
905516
Catherine_Cookson
 spouse        Tom Cookson (19401998 - his death)Dame Catherine Cookson DBE (ne McMullen) (27 June 1906  11 June 1998) was a British author. She became the United Kingdoms most widely read novelist, with sales topping 100 million, while retaining a relatively low profile in the world of celebrity writers. Her books were inspired by her deprived youth in East England, the setting for her novels.Early lifeBorn as Catherine Ann McMullen at 5 Leam Lane in Dock, Shields, (then part of Durham), she was known as Kate as a child. She moved to East Jarrow, Durham (now in and Wear), which would become the setting for one of her best-known novels, The Fifteen Streets. The illegitimate child of an alcoholic named Kate Fawcett, she grew up thinking her unmarried mother was her sister, as she was raised by her grandparents, Rose and John McMullen. Biographer Kathleen Jones tracked down her father whose name was Alexander Davies, a bigamist and gambler from Lancashire.She left school at 13 and, after a period of domestic service, took a laundry job at Harton Workhouse in Shields. In 1929, she moved south to run the laundry at Hastings Workhouse, saving every penny to buy a large Victorian house, and then taking in lodgers to supplement her income.In June 1940, at the age of 34, she married Tom Cookson, a teacher at Grammar School. After experiencing four miscarriages late in pregnancy, it was discovered she was suffering from a rare vascular disease, telangiectasia, which causes bleeding from the nose, fingers and stomach and results in anemia. A breakdown followed the miscarriages, from which she took a decade to recover.Writing careerShe took up writing as a form of therapy to tackle her depression, and joined Writers Group. Her first novel, Kate Hannigan, was published in 1950. Though it was labelled a romance, she expressed discontent with the stereotype. Her books were, she said, novels about people and conditions she knew. Cookson had little connection with the London literary circus. She was always more interested in practising the art of writing. Her research could be uncomfortable  going down a mine, for instance, because her heroine came from a mining area. Having in her youth wanted to write about above stairs in grand houses, she later and successfully concentrated on people ground down by circumstances, taking care to know them well.Cookson wrote almost 100 books, which sold more than 123 million copies, her novels being translated into at least 20 languages. She also wrote books under the pseudonyms Catherine Marchant and a name derived from her childhood name, Katie McMullen. She remained the most borrowed author from libraries in the UK for 17 years, only losing the title in 2002, four years after her death.(Public Lending Right)Books in film and televisionMany of Cooksons novels have been transferred to stage, film and radio. It was on television, however, that she achieved her greatest media success, with a series of dramas on ITV lasting over a decade and achieving huge ratings. Eighteen books were adapted for television between 1990 - 2001. They were all produced by Ray Marshall  from Film & TV who was given permission by Catherine Cookson in 1988 to bring her works to the screen. The first film to be made, The Fifteen Streets(http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0097352/) starring Sean Bean & Owen Teale was nominated for an Emmy in 1990. The second production, The Black Velvet Gown,(http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0106422/) won an International Emmy for Best Drama in 1991. The mini series regularly attracted audiences over 10 million and are still showing in the UK on the Yesterday Channel.The first film from her work was Jacqueline -1956  Directed by Roy Ward Baker  based on her book A Grand Man http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0049377/followed by Rooney -1958 - Directed by George Pollock.based on her book Rooney. http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0052147/ Both films starred John GREGSON .PhilanthropyAlthough she became a multi-millionaire from her books, Cookson was frugal with her spending. She did, however, indulge in discreet philanthropy, supporting causes in East England and research in areas that were close to her heart. When public lending rights were introduced for authors, she became immediately eligible for the maximum 5,000 a year but donated it for the benefit of less fortunate writers. She also donated more than 1 million for research into a cure for the illness that afflicted her. In 1985, she pledged more than 800,000 to the University of Newcastle. In gratitude, the university set up a lectureship in hematology. Some 40,000 was given to provide a laser to help treat bleeding disorders and 50,000 went to create a new post in ear, nose and throat studies, with particular reference to the detection of deafness in children. She had already given 20,000 towards the universitys Hatton Gallery and 32,000 to its library. In recognition of this generosity, a building in the university medical faculty has been named after her.(Advance: Philanthropy at Newcastle University) Her foundation continues to make donations to worthy causes in the UK, particularly those offering services to young people and cultural ventures, such as the Cinema.(Catherine Cookson Charitable Trust)HonoursShe was created an Officer of the Order of the British Empire in 1985 and was elevated to a Commander of the Order of the British Empire in 1993Cookson received the Freedom of the Borough of Tyneside, and an honorary degree from the University of Newcastle. The Variety Club of Great Britain named her Writer of the Year, and she was voted Personality of the North East.Later life and deathIn later life, Cookson and her husband Tom returned to the North East and settled first in Haldane Terrace, Jesmond. They then moved to Corbridge, a town near Newcastle, and later to Northumberland, a small village nearby. As her health declined, they moved for a final time to the Jesmond area of upon Tyne to be nearer medical facilities. For the last few years of her life, she was bed-ridden and she gave her final TV interview to East Tonight, the regional Tyne Tees news programme, from her sickbed. It was conducted by Mike Neville. Catherine Cookson died at the age of 91 (16 days before her 92nd birthday) at her home in Newcastle, although her novels, many written from her sickbed, continued to be published posthumously until 2002.  Tom died on 28 June 1998, just 17 days later.(Hastings Chronicle page dedicated to Catherine Cookson) He had been hospitalised for a week and the cause of his death was not announced. He was 86 years old.LegacyIn March 2008, the Dame Catherine Cookson Memorial Garden was unveiled in the grounds of South Tyneside District Hospital in South Shields, based on the theme of a serpentine symbol, commonly used to symbolise health and caring. The hospital occupies the site of the Harton Workhouse, where Cookson worked from 1924 to 1929. The project was partly funded by the Catherine Cookson Trust.(STHCT.nhs.uk)Tom and Catherine, a musical about the couples life, was written by local playwright Tom Kelly. It played to sell-out crowds at the Customs House in South Shields.BibliographyWritten as Catherine Cookson* The Fifteen Streets (1952)* Colour Blind (1953)* Maggie Rowan (1954)* Rooney (1957)* The Menagerie (1958)* Fanny McBride (1959)* Fenwick Houses (1960)* The Garment (1962)* The Blind Miller (1963)* The Wingless Bird (1964)* Hannah Massey (1964)* The Long Corridor (1965)* The Unbaited Trap (1966)* Slinky Jane (1967)* Katie Mulholland (1967)* The Round Tower (1968)* The Nice Bloke (1969) aka The Husband (1969)* The Glass Virgin (1969)* The Invitation (1970)* The Dwelling Place (1971)* Feathers in the Fire (1971)* Pure as the Lily (1972)* The Invisible Cord (1975)* The Gambling Man (1975)* The Tide of Life (1976)* The Girl (1977)* Cinder Path (1978)* The Man Who Cried (1979)* The Whip (1983) aka The Spaniards Gift (1989)* The Black Velvet Gown (1984)* The Bannaman Legacy (1985) aka A Dinner of Herbs (1985)* The Moth (1986) aka The Thorman Inheritance (1989)* The Parsons Daughter (1987)* The Harrogate Secret (1988) aka The Secret* The Cultured Handmaiden (1988)* The Spaniards Gift (1989) aka The Whip (1983)* The Black Candle (1989)* The Thorman Inheritance (1989) aka The Moth (1986)* The Gillyvors (1990) aka The Love Child (1991)* My Beloved Son (1991)* The Rag Nymph (1991) aka The Forester Girl (1993)* The House of Women (1992)* The Maltese Angel (1992)* The Golden Straw (1993)* The Forester Girl (1993) aka The Rag Nymph (1991)* The Year of the Virgins (1993)* The Tinkers Girl (1994)* Justice Is a Woman (1994)* A Ruthless Need (1995)* The Bonny Dawn (1996)* The Branded Man (1996)* The Lady on my Left (1997) aka The Mists of Memory (1965) by Catherine Marchant* The Obsession (1997)* The Upstart (1998)* The Blind Years (1998)* Riley (1998)* Solace of Sin (1998)* The Desert Crop (1999)* The Thursday Friend (1999)* A House Divided (2000)* Rosie of the River (2000)* The Simple Soul and Other Stories (2001)* Silent Lady (2002)The Kate Hannigan series* Kate Hannigan (1950)* Kate Hannigans Girl (2001)The Mary Ann stories* A Grand Man (1954)* The Lord and Mary Ann (1956)* The Devil and Mary Ann (1958)* Love and Mary Ann (1961)* Life and Mary Ann (1962)* Marriage and Mary Ann (1964)* Mary Anns Angels (1965)* Mary Ann and Bill (1967)The Mallen Novels* The Mallen Streak (1973)* The Mallen Girl (1974)* The Mallen Litter (1974)The Tilly Trotter trilogy* Tilly Trotter aka Tilly (1980)* Tilly Trotter Wed aka Tilly Wed (1981)* Tilly Trotter Widowed aka Tilly Alone (1982)The Hamilton series* Hamilton (1983)* Goodbye Hamilton (1984)* Harold (1985)The Bill Bailey trilogy* Bill Bailey (1986)* Bill Baileys Lot (1987) aka Bill Baileys Litter* Bill Baileys Daughter (1988)* The Bondage of Love (1997)Childrens stories* Matty Doolin (1965)* Joe and the Gladiator (1968)* The Nipper (1970)* Blue Baccy (1972) aka Rorys Fortune (1988)* Our John Willie (1974)* Mrs Flannagans Trumpet (1976)* Go Tell It to Mrs Golightly (1977)* Lanky Jones (1981)* Nancy Nutall and the Mongrel (1982)* Rorys Fortune (1988) aka Blue Baccy (1972)* Bill and The Mary Ann Shaughnessy (1991)Autobiographies* Our Kate (1969)* Catherine Cookson Country (1986) aka My Land of the North (1999)* Let Me Make Myself Plain (1988)* Plainer Still (1995)* Just A Saying (2002)Written as Catherine Marchant* Heritage of Folly (1961) aka Heritage of Folly (1961) by Katie McMullen* The Fen Tiger (1963) aka The House on the Fens (1963)* House of Men (1963)* The Mists of Memory (1965) aka The Lady on my Left (1997) by Catherine Cookson* The Iron Facade (1965) aka Evil at Rodgers Cross (1965)* Miss Martha Mary Crawford (1975)* The Slow Awakening (1976)Written as Katie McMullen* Heritage of Folly (1961) aka Heritage of Folly (1961) by Catherine MarchantBiographies* To Be a Lady: Biography of Catherine Cookson by Goodwin (1994)* The Girl From Leam Lane: The Life and Writing of Catherine Cookson by PDudgeon (1997)* Cookson by Jones  Constable(1999)* Kates Daughter: The Real Catherine Cookson by Dudgeon (2003)* Catherine Cooksons Da by Jones Constable (2004)Books in film and television* The Fifteen Streets (1989) starring Bean and Horrocks, which became hugely successful.* The Black Velvet Gown (1991), with McTeer, Peck, Somerville  won the Emmy award for best drama.() In 1994,* Cinder Path with Zeta-Jones, Tracy Whitwell and Ray Stevenson in The Dwelling Place.* The Tide of Life (1996) with Kearney and future Rome co-star Purefoy.* The 1995 adaption of The Gambling Man starring Green.* Mallens (19791980) with Hallam and Stevenson;* The Black Candle (1991) with Parker and Bond;* The Man Who Cried (1993) with Hinds and Root;* The Glass Virgin (1995) with Havers, Mortimer and Coyle;* The Girl (1996) with Cake and Siobhan Flynn;* The Moth (1997) with Davenport, Aubrey and Waddell;* The Rag Nymph (1997) with Weeks, Newman and McLane;* The Wingless Bird (1997) with Skinner, Reid and Wadham;* Colour Blind (1997) with Cusack, Tony Armatrading, Malik, and Ejogo;* The Round Tower (1997) with Fox, Miles and Lawson;* Tilly Trotter (1998) with Carli Norris and Shepherd;* The Secret (1999) with Colin Buchanan, Yelland, Carling and Clare Higgins;* A Dinner of Herbs (2000) with Kerrigan, Clark Pullen, Stephenson, Threlfall and Whitelaw.ReferencesExternal links**CatherineCookson.net  independent fansite.*catherinecookson.site11.com  Catherine Cookson community -CooksonCooksonCooksonCooksonCooksonCookson
909195
Belle_Vue_(football)
thumb|350px|The Main Stand of the stadium, destroyed due to a gas leak and now totally demolished.Belle Vue was the home of English professional football club Doncaster Rovers from 1922 to 2006. The ground was affectionately called by fans as Old Belle Vue or OBV.HistoryThe ground was opened by Charles E. Sutcliffe from Football League on Saturday, 26 August 1922. The opposition was Gainsborough Trinity. The initial capacity was for 7,000 spectators, which was extended year-on-year as finances allowed. In 1927 the main stand at Doncasters former ground in the suburb of Bennetthorpe was jacked up and moved on rollers to Belle Vue to form the family stand, where it remained until 1985 when the tragic events at Bradford City meant that the old wooden structure was deemed unsafe and was demolished.In 1938 the capacity of Belle Vue was increased to 40,000 and it was in 1948 that the stadium recorded its highest attendance of 37,099 against Hull City, although apocryphal accounts refute this and claim that many more gained entry to the ground by climbing over walls and thus avoided having to pay.Rovers decline and 1995 fireIn the later years of the 20th century, as the clubs fortunes began to decline and finances became tighter, the capacity of Belle Vue was cut dramatically, falling as low as 4,859 in May 1987 when mining subsidence was found underground beneath the Popular Stand terrace.A fire in the Main Stand one night in June 1995 caused extensive damage and nine months later Chairman Ken Richardson was arrested after the full time whistle blew on an evening match against Fulham. He was charged with conspiracy to commit arson and was subsequently found guilty. He was sentenced to four years imprisonment. The actual arsonist, 41-year-old Tyneside man Alan Kristiansen, received a one-year prison sentence; it was revealed that Kristiansen, a former SAS soldier, had been paid 10,000 by Richardson to start the fire. His accomplices Ian Hay (aged 54 and from Gateshead) and Alan Cracknall (aged 32 and from Newcastle-upon-Tyne) both received nine-month prison sentences suspended for two years.()2003 renovationsIn the summer of 2003 work began to repair the Town End terrace, to replace the old seating in the Main Stand and to extend the Rossington terrace. In the summer of 2004 the Popular Stand terrace was also extended and executive boxes were built at the Town End of the stadium. New club offices, a new supporters bar and the application of tarmac to the car park completed a much needed facelift. In a move that angered some fans Belle Vue was renamed Earth Stadium as part of a sponsorship deal with Rotherham based finance company Earth Finance. The capacity reached the region of 11,500.Keepmoat Stadium and Belle Vue closesthumb|left|500px|The Belle Vue Stadium from The Rossington End.A new stadium had long been mooted for Doncaster Rovers. The stadium finally started to become a reality when permission was granted. Construction started on 17 October 2005 of a 15,000 all-seater community stadium complex. The new ground was named the Stadium.The last ever game at Belle Vue was on 23 December 2006 against League One leaders, Nottingham Forest. Doncaster finished their time at the stadium with a win, with a goal from Streete ensuring a 1-0 victory.()Life after footballOn Wednesday, February 7, 2007 nearby residents to the old stadium described a sound like a bomb going off in the early hours of the morning, the impact of the blast left more than half of the Main Stand obliterated and much of the roof in pieces.Two people at the scene received hospital treatment for injuries sustained in the explosion - one of whom had to be transferred to a specialist burns unit in Nottingham - while one lane of Bawtry Road had to be closed for two hours because of scattered debris and the risk of further explosions. It was rumoured in the town that earlier in the evening somebody had broken into the stadium and stolen the boiler, while leaving the gas pipes open, filling the stand with gas. Two different men later entered the stadium through wide open gates and doors before inadvertently igniting the gas, causing the explosion. The alarm was raised at 3.17am on Wednesday, February 7, when a police patrol officer on duty near the stadium in Bawtry Road witnessed the explosion and called for the fire brigade. One man in his 20s was arrested in connection with the incident and was questioned by police.Demolition of the stadium, home to Doncaster Rovers for 84 years, was expected to be imminent because of the safety threat that the derelict site posed to the public.Following the explosion, demolition of the stadium was rapidly speeded up and now very little remains of the ground. Areas of terrace are still identifiable and large sections of the pitch remain but The Main Stand and Popular Side have now been reduced to rubble while floodlights, executive boxes, turnstiles, snack bars and offices have either been removed or destroyed, along with the grounds club house, the Rovers Return.The site was patrolled by security following the explosion and was fenced off whilst demolition work was undertaken. Since demolition, the security fences have remained to prevent access onto the site.The ground was renowned for having one of the top five biggest pitches in the UK, at 110 yards long, and 72 yards wide. In addition to the size of the pitch, it was considered to have one of the best playing surfaces due to the fertile soil, providing a near perfect pitch.ReferencesVue
911516
Rolling_blackout
 A rolling blackout, also referred to as load shedding, is an intentionally-engineered electrical outage where electricity delivery is stopped for non-overlapping periods of time over geographical regions. Rolling blackouts are a last-resort measure used by an utility company in order to avoid a total blackout of the power system. They are usually in response to a situation where the demand for electricity exceeds the power supply capability of the network. Rolling blackouts may be localised to a specific part of the electricity network or may be more widespread and affect entire countries and continents. Rolling blackouts generally result from two causes: insufficient generation capacity or inadequate transmission infrastructure to deliver sufficient power to the area where it is needed.Rolling blackouts are a common or even a normal daily event in many countries where electricity generation capacity is underfunded or infrastructure is poorly managed.  Rolling blackouts in countries are rare because demand is accurately forecasted, adequate infrastructure investment is scheduled and networks are well managed; such events are considered an unacceptable failure to plan and can cause significant political damage to responsible governments. In well managed under-capacity systems blackouts are scheduled in advance and advertised to allow people to work around them but in most cases they happen without warning, typically whenever the transmission frequency falls below the safe limit. Due to the shortage of electricity, load shedding is extremely common in India.IndiaIn 2004-05, electricity demand outstripped supply by 7-11%.(http://www.indiacore.com/power.html) Due to a chronic shortage of electricity, power-cuts are common throughout India, adversely affecting the countrys potential for economic growth.(Electricity and power shortage holding India back)(India Faulted for Failure to Improve Power Supply) Even in the nations capital of Delhi, rolling blackouts are common, especially during the hot summer season when demand far outstrips supply. Rural areas are the most severely affected; it is common for the 44% of rural households having access to electricity to lose power for more than 12 hours each day.(http://www.adb.org/Documents/Periodicals/Impact/IND/200901.asp)  States periodically and chronically affected by load-shedding are Delhi, Pradesh, Nadu, Bihar, Bengal, Assam, Maharashtra, Pradesh, Rajasthan and Pradesh. States of Punjab, Goa, Orissa, Gujarat and Kerala are largely free of any load-shedding due to surplus power. Karnataka still occasionally experiences power cuts.(http://mangalorean.com/news.php?newstypebroadcast&broadcastid176485)JapanJapan instituted rolling blackouts starting on March 14, 2011 due to power shortages caused by the Thoku earthquake and tsunami. The Electric Power Company, which normally provides approximately 40,000 MW of electricity, announced that it can only currently provide about 30,000 MW, a shortfall of 25 percent. This is due to the fact that about 40 percent of the electricity used in the greater Tokyo area is supplied by power plants in the Niigata and Fukushima prefectures.(http://www.tepco.co.jp/index-j.html - Tokyo Electric Power Company) Two of those plants, the Fukushima Dai-ichi and Fukushima Dai-ni, were automatically taken offline when the first earthquake occurred and have sustained major damage related to the earthquake and subsequent tsunami. Rolling blackouts of three hours were expected to last until the end of April 2011 and will affect the Tokyo, Kanagawa, Shizuoka, Yamanashi, Chiba, Ibaraki, Saitama, Tochigi, and Gunma prefectures.(http://www.nikkansports.com/general/news/f-gn-tp0-20110313-748042.html - nikkansports.com)Republic of IrelandOn several occasions in the 1970s and 1980s trade union strikes in Irelands power utility, the Electricity Supply Board (ESB), led to rolling blackouts. However, rolling blackouts have not occurred for this reason since 1991. For such eventualities, the ESB have a zone rota system in place.  The country is divided into regions which in turn are subdivided into zones, referred to by the letter codes A, B, C, X, Y, and Z. During periods when blackouts may occur, advertisements are placed in the national newspapers informing customers which region and zone they are in, and at what times of the day they have a high, moderate or low risk of supply interruption. (Customers fortunate enough to live close to a hospital may find they are on a priority line and dont lose power at all). The authorities appeal to the public to conserve electricity (especially during hours of peak demand); however, if and when electricity demand exceeds available supply, supply is cut in some or all of the high risk zones. If there is still a shortfall once all the high risk zones have had power cut, then the moderate risk zones start experiencing power cuts. The level of risk in each zone changes every three hours moving from Low to Moderate to High and back to Low.South AfricaThe history and causes of rolling blackouts in South Africa are multiple. In South Africa the major producer and distributor of electricity is Eskom, which provides over 95% of the countrys energy usage. During the 1980s Eskom mothballed three of their coal-fired power stations, as there was an excess of generation capacity at the time. With the demise of Apartheid in the 1990s came massive investment and economic growth. At the same time the government tried to deregulate the electricity supply industry by inviting the sector to build new power stations to meet the rapidly growing demand for electricity. Eskom was at the time prevented from building new power stations (including de-mothballing the three existing power stations) or from strengthening the transmission network. The transmission network is especially important in delivering power from Mpumalanga, where the majority of the power stations are located, to other parts of the country such as KwaZulu-Natal and the Cape. With no bidders coming forward to construct new power stations, there was effectively no investment into new generation plants during the early 1990s, which eventually led to the shortage of capacity that was experienced in the 2000s.In 1998, the Department of Minerals and Energy released a detailed energy review in which it explicitly warned that unless timely steps were taken to ensure that demand does not exceed available supply capacity, generating capacity would reach its limit by 2007.(Mail and Guardian - Govt chose guns over power stations)Blackouts in Western and Northern Cape 20052006The energy consumed by the Western and Cape are only partially supplied by nuclear power station, with the balance of the energy supplied by the coal-fired power stations in Mpumalanga via the transmission network. In December 2005, a bolt left in Koeberg Unit 1 reactor after maintenance caused extensive damage to the rotor, resulting in it tripping out. Consequently, there was insufficient power to supply the Cape, with the transmission network only partially able to supply the electricity demand. As a result, rolling blackouts were implemented across the two provinces.The blackouts and the accompanying brouhaha in the media resulted in Eskom and the government announcing a number of plans for new power stations, and Eskom started returning mothballed power stations to service as well as expediting plans to build new gas-fired power stations to support the Western Cape supply.Country-wide blackouts 20072008With the freeze on any new developments being placed on Eskom during the early 1990s, South Africa was faced with a situation where for the next few years the electricity demand kept rising, without any new power stations being built to keep up the necessary supply. By October 2007 the situation had deteriorated to such an extent that Eskom implemented rolling blackouts throughout the country. Blackouts occurred in most suburbs throughout the country for a period of two hours at a time.The situation came to a head on 24 January 2008 when the national grid was brought to near collapse. Multiple trips at a number of different power stations rapidly reduced the available supply, resulting in Eskom declaring majeure( ) and instructing its largest industrial customers (mainly gold and platinum mining companies) to shut down their operations and reduce consumption to minimal levels, just sufficient to evacuate workers that were still in the mines.()In January 2008, with no short- or medium-term relief available to ease the power shortages, Eskom warned the public that the countrys electricity demand would exceed the supply until 2013 (when the first new power stations would be brought online).Eskom also began recommissioning older power stations which had been mothballed in earlier decades.(.)TajikistanIn January 2008 Tajikistan faced its coldest winter in 50 years, and the countrys energy grid began to fail. By February 2008 Tajikstans energy grid was near collapse and there were blackouts in most of the country. Hospitals throughout the country were on limited electricity use, and nurses and doctors were forced to keep newborn babies warm with hot water bottles. There were reports of newborns freezing to death. The UN reported that with so much energy required to keep warm there was a danger of people starving to death.()(Situation Report No. 4  Tajikistan  Cold Wave/Compound crisis (25 February 2008) United Nations Office for the Coordination of Humanitarian Affairs)United KingdomThe Week of January to March 1974, introduced to limit electricity consumption, and thus conserve coal supplies which were severely reduced due to industrial action, meant that non-essential commercial users were only allowed to consume electricity for three days each week. Home electricity supplies were also limited in some areas.United StatesTexasIn April 2006, parts of Texas experienced rolling blackouts due to excessive air conditioner use because of unexpectedly high temperatures. The longest power outage lasted for a period of five hours, affecting areas in the Middle to the South of Texas.In February 2011, North and Central Texas experienced rolling blackouts due to 50 power plants tripping offline.(http://www.dallasnews.com/news/community-news/dallas/headlines/20110202-cold-cripples-50-power-plants-triggering-blackouts-for-thousands-across-dallas-fort-worth.ece) Temperatures ranged between 8 F and 19 F, the coldest in 15 years. The time of the power outages ranged from 20 minutes to over eight hours. Areas affected included Bell, Bexar, Brazos, Collin, Comal, Dallas, Delta, Denton, El Paso, Fort Bend, Guadalupe, Harris, Hays, Hill, Hidalgo, Hunt, McLennan, Montgomery, Navarro, Palacios, Smith, Tarrant, Travis, Webb and Williamson counties, as well as some counties in New Mexico, Including Doa Ana, Otero, and Eddy Counties.(http://www.nbcdfw.com/news/local-beat/Power-Grid-Taxed-Rolling-Blackouts-Ordered-115093224.html)The 2006 and 2011 blackouts were the only two to occur in two decades.() However, the EPA under the Obama administration is to implement rules that will eliminate much of ERCOTs generation capability.(http://www.power-eng.com/articles/2011/07/ercot-calls-epa-cross-state-rule-unreasonable.html)CaliforniaThough the term did not enter popular use in the U.S. until the electricity crisis of the early 2000s, outages had indeed occurred previously. The outages were almost always triggered by unusually hot temperatures during the summer, which causes a surge in demand due to heavy use of conditioning. However, in 2004, taped conversations of Enron traders became public, showing that traders were purposely manipulating the supply of electricity, in order to raise energy prices.(Lauren Johnston. Enron tapes anger lawmakers. CBS Evening News. Posted: June 2, 2004.)On December 13, 2003, shortly before leaving office, Governor Davis officially brought the energy crisis to an end by issuing a proclamation ending the state of emergency he declared on January 17, 2001. The state of emergency allowed the state to buy electricity for the financially strapped utility companies. The emergency authority allowed Davis to order the California Energy Commission to streamline the application process for new power plants. During that time, California issued licenses to 38 new power plants, amounting to the addition of 14,365 megawatts of electricity production when completed.Rolling blackouts were again imposed in late August 2005 in California due to the loss of a key transmission line; the transmission line shut itself off because of a faulty sensor.Most of California is divided into 14 power grids, each containing approximately 7% of electricity customers in the state, creating a total of 98%.  The remaining 2% are placed on a separate grid, where users such as hospitals and stations are exempt from ever having their power deliberately cut off.In a Stage 1 emergency only a general call for voluntary conservation is issued, while a Stage 2 emergency results in power being temporarily cut off to certain large users, primarily industrial concerns, who have agreed to this arrangement in exchange for lower rates. When a Stage 3 power emergency is declared, electricity to one of the grids is shut off for a fixed period of time, which can range from 60 minutes to 2 hours. If after this period of time the Stage 3 emergency still exists, power is restored to this grid but then the next grid in the sequence is blacked out, and so on, until the situation is stabilized &mdash; the blackout thus rolls from one grid to the next.In California, each customers electric bill includes the number of the power grid (from 1 to 14) that customer belongs to; this gives customers at least some advance notice of when their electricity might be turned off in the event of a Stage 3 emergency.  The grids are set up in such a manner as to ensure that a large percentage of customers in the same neighborhood would not be blacked out concurrently, which could invite looting and other related problems.  Normal electricity customers can fall within the areas reserved for emergency use (if they are near a hospital or other critical infrastructure), in which case their electric bill will indicate a power grid of 99 and they will not be affected by rolling blackouts.ElsewhereIn many East Coast states (such as York State and Jersey), brownouts rather than rolling blackouts are implemented during power emergencies. In this scenario, instead of the power being cut off altogether to a certain percentage of customers, the voltage is reduced by a certain percentage to all customers &mdash; the resulting dimming of electric lights being the origin of the term brownout.  Brownouts can cause significant damage to unprotected electronic equipment, but usually have no effect (other than reduced performance) on incandescent lights or some types of motors.Footnotes(Stromnetz)de cargalectriquebergilirja:
913998
Alta_Ski_Area
Alta is a area located in the Mountains, just east of Salt Lake City, Utah.  With a skiable area of 2200 acres (8.9 km), beginning at a base elevation of 8530 ft (2600 m) and rising to 10,550 ft (3216 m) for a vertical gain of 2020 ft (616 m). Alta is one of the oldest ski resorts in the country, opening its first lift in 1939.() It has an average annual snowfall of 514 inches (1,306 cm).(ALTA, UTAH - Climate Summary)  Alta is one of three remaining ski resorts in America that prohibits snowboarders, along with nearby competitor Valley and Vermonts River Glen.() HistoryEarly historyAlta is one of the oldest ski areas in the U.S. and is one of just a few ski areas in America that limit access to skiers (snowboarders are not allowed). It is best known for the ash-light quality of its snow, commonly referred to as powder snow. Located at the head of Cottonwood Canyon barely  from the Salt Lake, Alta resides in a unique climate characterized by high volume, low moisture snowfalls. Typical annual snowfall totals exceed 500 inches (1270 cm).The Alta ski area features long, straight, fall-line pitches. Among the most well known and sought after of these are High Rustler, Eddies High Nowhere, Stone Crusher and the Baldy Chutes. Though widely respected as one of the most challenging of in-bounds ski areas in the world, Alta has always viewed itself as a locals and family oriented ski area with some 40% of its terrain devoted to intermediate and beginner skiers.The community of Alta was established in 1871 as an offshoot of the silver mining operations in Cottonwood Canyon. A fire destroyed most of the town in 1878, then a cataclysmic avalanche in 1885combined with the decline of miningheralded a period of dormancy for the town. The area experienced a modest resurgence in mining in the 1900s, but the town declined again shortly thereafter, and was deserted with the exception of a few hardy miners who continued to intermittently prospect the area.In 1935 the Forest Service retained the noted skier Engen to hike into the area and determine its potential as a future ski area. Engens reports expressed great promise for the area, and recommended the purchase of additional surrounding lands to form the ski area. In 1937 a prominent Salt Lake City lawyer, Joe Quinney, along with other local businessmen, formed the Utah Winter Sports Association to oversee the development of skiing at Alta. In the following year construction began on the original Collins chairlift, then just the third such lift in the United States, after Sun Valley and the Mile at Lodge on Hood. Alta opened to skiers for the first time on January 15, 1939,( offering a single ride on the chair for 25 cents. Alta is best known for the verticality of its skiing pitches and abundant powder snow.Recent developmentsAltas original ski lift, the Collins lift, was fashioned from a surplus mining ore tramway system that featured a clamp-cam bullwheel that gripped a metal cable to which single-seat chairs were affixed. Slow but dependable, the lifts grip system emitted a disconcerting, high pitched wailing sound when in motion.The ski area did not install its first triple chair until 1991, when the Germania double chair was upgraded. The resort did not have a developed snowmaking infrastructure until 1996, and the system was not completed until 2000. However, Alta has moved toward snowmaking in order to remain competitive by opening earlier in the season, and retaining good skiable conditions in drier years. The late 1990s and early 2000s were marked with further modernization. In 1999 the Sunnyside lift was replaced with a detachable triple chair, the resorts first chairlift. Two years later the Supreme chair was upgraded to a triple, and the Sugarloaf chair was replaced with a detachable quad. The most recent lift development was the new Collins chair for the 2004-05 season, a detachable quad, replacing the old Collins and Germania chairs. Also, during the 2007-08 season, Alta introduced a new Axess RFID electronic ticket system, similar to that of Ski Resort. Alta was relatively slow to provide safety bars on its chairlifts, introducing them to the Sunnyside lift in 2010. They were to have added bars on the Collins, Sugarloaf, and Supreme chairs in the summer of 2011.thumb|right|Albion Basin base at Alta ski resortEventually, users will be able to track their vertical and lift ride data online and purchase Alta Cards using ticket vending machines.  Most recently during the 2008-09 season Alta added a conveyor system at the start point of the Supreme lift that assists skiers in getting on the fixed-triple lift.The resort currently has 2 detachable quad chairs, 1 detachable triple chair, 1 triple chair grip, 3 double chairs, and 5 surface tows.  The terrain is classified as 25% Beginner, 40% Intermediate, and 35% Advanced.Baldy Chutes.JPG|thumb|200px|right|Snowbird ski resort is accessible from Mount Baldy at Alta ski resortPartnership with Snowbird ski resortBeginning in the winter of 2002, Alta and its neighbor, Snowbird, began offering a joint day pass and a joint season ticket, allowing skiers to fully access all of the terrain of both resorts. The offer coincided with the opening of a new lift in Mineral Basin, a large bowl owned by Snowbird on the back of Snowbirds Hidden Peak and Altas Sugarloaf mountains, that allowed access to Alta from the Basin. Other access points between the two resorts exist as well. The offer is open to skiers only, as a result of Altas skiers-only policy; Snowbird allows snowboarders.Chairlifts and Tow Ropes*Collins Express*Sugarloaf Expressthumb|right|Summit of Sugarloaf Express*Sunnyside Express*Supreme Chair*Wildcat Chair*Albion Chair*Cecret Chair*Rustler Chair*Transfer Tow*Grizzly Tow*Lodge Tow*Little Grizzly TowReferencesExternal links*Alta.com - official site*Alta Skiing Guide Book - The Powder Hounds Guide to Skiing Alta, a 160 page guide book that describes each of the important runs on one of the most challenging mountains in alpine skiing.*Ski Lifts.org - Alta - current and removed liftsSki Area
917868
Comparative_genomics
__NOTOC__Comparative genomics is the study of the relationship of genome structure and function across different biological species or strains. Comparative genomics is an attempt to take advantage of the information provided by the signatures of selection to understand the function and evolutionary processes that act on genomes. While it is still a young field, it holds great promise to yield insights into many aspects of the evolution of modern species. The sheer amount of information contained in modern genomes (3.2 gigabases in the case of humans) necessitates that the methods of comparative genomics are automated. finding is an important application of comparative genomics, as is discovery of new, non-coding functional elements of the genome.Image:BrowserFoxp2.jpg| Human FOXP2 gene and evolutionary conservation is shown in a multiple alignment (at bottom of figure) in this image from the Genome Browser.  Note that conservation tends to cluster around coding regions (exons). |thumb|rightComparative genomics exploits both similarities and differences in the proteins, RNA, and regions of different organisms to infer how selection has acted upon these elements.  Those elements that are responsible for similarities between different species should be conserved through time (selection), while those elements responsible for differences among species should be divergent (selection).  Finally, those elements that are unimportant to the evolutionary success of the organism will be unconserved (selection is neutral).One of the important goals of the field is the identification of the mechanisms of eukaryotic genome evolution. It is however often complicated by the multiplicity of events that have taken place throughout the history of individual lineages, leaving only distorted and superimposed traces in the genome of each living organism. For this reason comparative genomics studies of small organisms (for example yeast) are of great importance to advance our understanding of general mechanisms of evolution.Having come a long way from its initial use of finding functional proteins, comparative genomics is now concentrating on finding regions and siRNA molecules. Recently, it has been discovered that distantly related species often share long conserved stretches of DNA that do not appear to code for any protein.(Bejerano G, Pheasant M, Makunin I, Stephen S, Kent WJ, Mattick JS, Haussler D. Ultraconserved elements in the human genome. Science. 2004 May 28;304(5675):1321-5) One such ultra-conserved region, that was stable from chicken to chimp has undergone a sudden burst of change in the human lineage, and is found to be active in the developing brain of the human embryo.(Pollard KS, Salama SR, Lambert N, Lambot MA, Coppens S, Pedersen JS, Katzman S, King B, Onodera C, Siepel A, Kern AD, Dehay C, Igel H, Ares M Jr, Vanderhaeghen P, Haussler D. An RNA gene expressed during cortical development evolved rapidly in humans. Nature. 2006 Sep 14;443(7108):167-72. )Computational approaches to genome comparison have recently become a common research topic in computer science. A public collection of case studies and demonstrations is growing, ranging from whole genome comparisons to gene expression analysis.() This has increased the introduction of different ideas, including concepts from systems and control, information theory, strings analysis and data mining. It is anticipated that computational approaches will become and remain a standard topic for research and teaching, while multiple courses will begin training students to be fluent in both topics.See also* Evolution* evolution* drift* Selection* clock* biology* anatomy* organism* Homology References Further reading* * * * * * * * * * * External links* Genomes OnLine Database (GOLD)* Genome News Network* JCVI Comprehensive Microbial Resource* Pathema: A Clade Specific Bioinformatics Resource Center* CBS Genome Atlas Database* The UCSC Genome Browser* The U.S. National Human Genome Research Institute* Ensembl The Ensembl Genome Browser* Genolevures, comparative genomics of the Hemiascomycetous yeasts* Phylogenetically Inferred Groups (PhIGs), a recently developed method incorporates phylogenetic signals in building gene clusters for use in comparative genomics.* Metazome,  a resource for the phylogenomic exploration and analysis of Metazoan gene families.* IMG The Integrated Microbial Genomes system, for comparative genome analysis by the DOE-JGI.* Dcode.org Dcode.org Comparative Genomics Center.* SUPERFAMILY Protein annotations for all completely sequenced organisms* Comparative Genomics* Blastology and Open Source: Needs and Deedscomparativacomparativeko:is:Samanburarerfamengjafrija:zh:
920843
Brits,_North_West
footnotes           Brits is a large town and district situated in a fertile, citrus, vegetable and grain-producing area that is irrigated by the waters of the Dam in North West Province of Africa. It is close to the of Tshwane Metropolitan Municipality in Gauteng, which includes Pretoria and it has the same dialling code as Pretoria. In addition to being a centre for agriculture, the town is home to several heavy industries, it is worth mentioning the presence of a factory of the Italian car manufacturer Romeo that produced cars for the domestic market and export to Asia from 1974 to 1985. The town also plays an important role in the South African mining industry: 94% of South Africas platinum comes from the Rustenburg and Brits districts, which together produce more platinum than any other single area in the world. In addition, there is a large vanadium mine in the district.The Indian area in Brits is called Primindia. Brits is part of the Local Municipality. Brits was linked to the Pretoria by the N4 Bakwena Toll Road in the early 2000s, which significantly cut travel time between Brits and the major cities of Gauteng., Brits was experiencing a development boom, because of increased mining activity in the region.()HistoryBrits was founded in 1924 on the farm Roode Kopjes (Red Hills) and was named after the owner, Johannes Nicolaas Brits. The armistice treaty for the civil war was signed in 1864 beneath a karee tree just to the south of Brits. A speech by General Hertzog in 1912 at the nearby De Wildt railway station led to the formation of the National Party.AnimalsThe Wildt Cheetah and Wildlife Centre, renowned for its success in breeding and studying cheetah, cheetah, brown hyena, suni, blue duiker and wild dogs is situated in the small town of De Wildt, just east of Brits.Brits is also the birthplace of the first cloned animal in Africa, a cow.()Notable people* Nicolaas Brits, farmer* Mphela (born 1984), footballer References af:Brits(Sudafrica)(Zuid-Afrika)pl:Britsro:Britsru:
923872
Quern-stone
Image:Quernupper.jpg|thumb|The upper stone of a Scottish hand quern from Mill, North Ayrshire.Quern-stones are stone tools for hand grinding a wide variety of materials. They were used in pairs. The lower, stationary, stone is called a quern, whilst the upper, mobile, stone is called a handstone. They were first used in the Neolithic to grind cereals into flour.(British Museum: The oldest known tool for making flour found in the Middle East)Uses of quern-stonesGrainImage:Cliffecastlemus 016.jpg|thumb|left|250px|Revolving beehive quern-stones and lower a saddlestone on display at Castle Museum, Keighley.Quern-stones have been used throughout the world to grind materials, the most important of which was usually grain to make flour for bread-making. They were generally replaced by millstones once mechanised forms of milling appeared, particularly the mill and the windmill, although animals were also used to operate the millstones. However, in many non-Westernised, non-mechanised cultures they are still manufactured and used regularly and have only been replaced in many parts of the world in the last century or so.In early civilizations the process of nixtamalization was distinctive in that hard, ripe kernels of maize (corn) were boiled in water and lime, thus producing nixtamal which was then made into unleavened dough for flat cakes by grinding with a handstone on a quern (metate).( page  13)Other materialsAs well as grain, ethnographic evidence and Mesopotamian texts shows that a wide range of foodstuffs and inorganic materials were processed using stone querns or mortars, including nuts, seeds, fruit, vegetables, herbs, spices, meat, bark, pigments, temper and clay.(Wright 1992:87f) Moreover, one study analysing quern-stones noted that a number of querns had traces of arsenic and bismuth, unlike their source rocks, and had levels of antimony which were ten times higher than those of the rocks. The authors concluded that this was probably due to the use of these querns in the preparation of medicines, cosmetics, dyes or even in the manufacture of alloys.(Lease et al. 2001:235)Querns were widely used in grinding metals ores after mining extraction. The aim was to liberate fine ore particles which could then be separated by washing for example, prior to smelting. They were thus widely used in mining in antiquity.In the Shetlands tobacco wasnt smoked at first, but ground up into snuff, and inhaled up the nose. Snuff-querns consisted of an upper and lower stone, fixed together by a central iron pivot. The quern was held on the users lap, the eye was filled with dried tobacco leaves and then the upper-stone was turned using the handle. The friction caused by the turning ground the leaves into a fine powder that built up around the edge of the lower-stone. Many snuff-querns had a small hole or cut made near the edge of the upper-stone, into which a pointed end of a lambs horn was placed in order to turn the stone; an alternative to using a handle.(Snuff Quern. Accessed | 2009-11-20)Incidental usesImage:Quern-stones in China small.jpg|thumb|right|150px|A stack of quern-stones for sale in a market in Haikou, Hainan, China. These quern-stones are only about 30 cm wide.There are however, more surprising recorded uses of quern-stones. For example DeBoer, in his review of the traditional gambling games of North American tribes, reports that one of the games involved bouncing a group of split canes off a quern.(DeBoer 2001:223.) Violence is recorded in the of Judges (9:53; NRSV): But a certain woman threw an upper-millstone on Abimelechs head, and crushed his skull.Manufacture of quern-stonesThe best type of stone from which to manufacture quern-stones are igneous rocks such as basalt. These have naturally rough surfaces, but grains do not detach easily, so the material being ground does not become gritty. However, such rocks are not always available, meaning that quern-stones have been manufactured from a wide variety of rocks, including sandstone, quartzite and limestone. Quernmore Crag near Lancaster in England is named after the quarrying of millstone grit used to make quern stones in these parts. Rutter was able to show, for the southern Levant, that basalt quern-stones were preferred to those manufactured from other rock types. Basalt quern-stones were therefore transported over long-distances, leading  to argue that, despite their every-day, utilitarian function, they were also used as a symbol.(Rutter 2003:236.)Evolution of quern-stonesThe earliest form of quern was the saddle quern. The earliest quern so far discovered dates to c. 95009000 BC and was found at Abu Hureyra, Syria.( A later development was the rotary quern, which takes several forms.Saddle quernThe saddle quern is produced by rocking or rolling the handstone using parallel motions (i.e., pushing and pulling the handstone), which forms a shape looking like a saddle. These are the most ancient and widely used type of quern-stone. The handstones for saddle querns are generally either roughly cylindrical (not unlike a pin) and used with both hands, or rough hemispheres and used with one hand. This provides a crushing motion, not a grinding action and is more suitable for crushing malted grain. It is not easy to produce flour from a saddle quern with unmalted grain.Rotary hand quernAs the name implies, the rotary quern used circular motions to grind the material, meaning both the quern and the handstone were generally circular. The handstone of a rotary quern is much heavier than that of saddle quern and provides the necessary weight for the grinding of unmalted grain into flour. In some cases the grinding surfaces of the stones fit into each other, the upper stone being slightly concave and the lower one convex.Beehive quernFile:Quern stones.JPG|left|thumb|190px|Querns from the Whithorn Museum.In this type the upper stone is hemispherical, or bun-shaped, with a central conical hopper to hold the grain that falls down a hole to the grinding surface. It is held in position with a pivot that fits into a central hole in the bottom stone. The upper stone also has a deep horizontal socket in its steep side in which to place the wooden peg used as a handle to rotate or oscillate the upper stone. This was the earliest type of rotary quern to appear in the British Isles. It arrived in Britain in the middle of the Iron Age (about 400-300 BC) and spread into the northern half of Ireland, probably from Scotland, some time after the 2nd century BC.(J.T. Koch, An Atlas for Celtic Studies (2007), p. 150.)Disc quernright|thumb|190px|A hand quern being operated.(Garnett, T. Observations on a Tour through the Highlands and part of the Western Isles of Scotland, particularly Staff and Icolmkill. Pub. T. Cadell. The Strand. P. 155.)The adjustable, discoid rotary quern has larger, flatter and more discoid stones than the beehive type. The lower stone was completely perforated. The long handle rotated in a shallow socket in the upper surface of the upper stone. They are thought to have originated in Spain 2,500 years ago() and appear to have arrived in maritime Scotland from about 200 BC with people who built the defensive homes known as brochs. This Iron Age type closely resembles the adjustable Highland quern still in use is historic times.(E.W. MacKie, The broch cultures of Atlantic Scotland: origins, high noon and decline: part 2: The Middle Iron Age: high noon and decline c.200 BC - AD 550, Oxford Journal of Archaeology, vol. 29, no 1. (2010), pp. 89-117 (100).)  Garnett in his 1800 tour of Scotland describes the use of a hand quern as follows: The quern consists of two circular pieces of stone, generally grit or granite, about twenty inches in diameter. In the lower stone is a wooden peg, rounded at the top; on this the upper stone is nicely balanced, so as just to touch the lower one, by means of a piece of wood fixed in a large hole in this upper piece, but which does not fill the hole, room for feeding the mill being left on each side: it is so nicely balanced, that though there is some friction from the contact of the two stones, yet a very small momentum will make it revolve several times, when it has no corn in it. The corn being dried, two women sit down on the ground, having the quern between them; the one feeds it, while the other turns it round, relieving each other occasionally, and singing some Celtic songs all the time.(Other types of quern stonesOther forms of quern-stone include hopper-rubbers and Pompeian mills, both used by the Romans. The larger rotary mills were usually worked by a donkey or horse via an extension arm of wood attached to the upper stone.Laws against useThere was a legal requirement in Scotland for tenants to pay for use of the barons mill. Early leases of mills gave to the miller the legal right to break quern-stones which were being used in defiance of thirlage agreements.(Enid Gauldie, The Scottish Miller 17001900(John Donald 1981), ISBN 0-85976-067-7.)The obligations of thirlage eventually ceased to apply, but thirlage in Scotland was only formally and totally abolished on 28 November (Martinmas) 2004 by the of Feudal Tenure etc. (Scotland) Act 2000.()Similar requirements existed and were enforced actively in England.(Querns and millstones)Ornament and inscriptionThree beehive querns found in Ireland have inscribed ornament of Tne type.( A quern was discovered at Dunadd in Scotland which has a cross carved into the upper stone. The cross has expanded terminals and ultimately derives its form from Roman and Byzantine predecessors of the fifth and sixth centuries. This example has a high quality of finishing which reflects its cost and enhances its symbolic value and social significance. The cross is likely to have protected the corn and the resultant flour from evil, such as fungal rust or ergot. Various legends give miraculous power to mill-stones and several have been found which have been re-used in the construction of burial cists or as tomb stones. The association between quern stones and burial may be because they are used in the process of making bread, the staple of life. A broken or disused quern therefore can be seen as symbolic of death.(Ewan Campbell, A cross-marked quern from Dunadd and other evidence for relations between Dunass and Iona, Proceedings of the Society of Antiquaries of Scotland, vol. 5, no. 117 (1987), pp. 105 - 117.) In Clonmacnoise, near Athlone in County Offaly in Ireland, a quern stone was found which had been made into a tombstone, having been ornamented and the name Sechnasach, who died in 928 AD, inscribed onto it.(Janet and Colin Bord, Mysterious Britain (Garnstone 1973), ISBN 0-85511-180-1. P. 62.)Synonyms* (Malay)*Metate*MillstoneSee also*Scottish Rural Life, History Dictionary*stoneNotesBibliography*DeBoer, W. 2001 Of dice and women: gambling and exchange in Native North America, In Journal of Archaeological Method and Theory 8:215-268.*Gauldie, Enid 1981 The Scottish Miller 17001900. Pub. John Donald. ISBN 0-85976-067-7. 98-99.*Lease, N., Laurent, R., Blackburn, M. and Fortin, M. 2001 Caractrisation ptrologie dartefact en basalte provenant de Tell Atij et de Tell Gudeda en Syrie de Nord (3000-2500 av J-C), In Serie archomtrie 1:227-240.*Wright, K. 1992 Ground stone assemblage variations and subsistence strategies in the Levant, 22,000 to 5,500 bp, unpublished PhD thesis, Yale University.External links*Rutter, G. 2003 Basaltic-rock procurement systems of the southern Levant - Information on basaltic artefacts, including quern-stones. Also includes PDF version of the PhD thesis.*Atlas of European millstone quarries(mlnek)de:Mahlsteinet:Ksikivieo:Manmuelejo grainsgirnosnl:Kweernno:Hndkvernpl:arna
925675
Harehills
Harehills is an inner-city area of east Leeds, Yorkshire, England. It is approximately  north east of city centre.  Harehills is situated between the A58 (towards Wetherby) and the A64 (towards York). Overview It is situated between Burmantofts and Gipton, and adjacent to Chapeltown.  As the name suggests it is a hill area, basically a south-facing slope, with many streets of terraced houses on hills.  In the middle is Banstead Park, a grassy slope with trees and play areas, giving a view over the city of Leeds.  Banstead Park was home to rioting in 2001.(BBC News 6 June, 2001 No excuse for Leeds riot)  Along with neighbouring Chapeltown, Harehills has suffered from rioting and sporadic unrest.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/1xtra/tx/documentaries/round_my_way.shtml)  However, there have been no notable incidents of unrest in Harehills since 2001.The cheaper housing has made it attractive to immigrants, with the result that it has a considerable cultural and ethnic mixture.  There are two main shopping streets, Harehills Lane and Harehills Road which join at the junction of Roundhay Road (road) leading to Oakwood.  Also, heading  up Harehills Lane towards the A64 York Road at the junction with Compton Road, is Harehillss other main shopping area.Official Government figures have listed Harehills as the 429th most deprived of Englands 8,414 electoral wards  in the top 5%.  Unemployment in Harehills is at 9%, compared to less than 4% across the of Leeds.(http://www.yorkshire-forward.com/www/view.asp?content_id1406&parent_id1226)James University Hospital is partly situated in Harehills.On the Bank Holiday the Carnival is held with a procession through Harehills and Chapeltown.IMPaCT is a community partnership which aims to improve the Chapeltown and Harehills areas. History By 1850, Leeds had grown through industrialisation, to the North, South and West, however there was a particular lack of development to the East of the city.  The existing villages did not seem to stimulate any suburban growth in this area.  The mining activity to the East of the city also failed to stimulate growth.  At this time there was open countryside only a mile from Briggate.  The building of the tramway along York Road and Roundhay Road began to stimulate some growth, and by the time of the production on the 1906 Ordnance Survey Map, Harehills was an established community.  At this time Harehills was home to a purpose built reservoir, owned by the Leeds Corporation Water Works.  There were also by this time two large textile factories on Hudson Road, as well as two large brick works, The Harehills Brickworks and the Gipton Brickworks (the latter being on Darfield Road in Harehills and not in Gipton as the name would suggest), there was the York Road Iron Works as well as a few farms, which were quickly redeveloped.Harehills and the surrounding area also had significant mining infrastructure, with collieries at York Road, Killingbeck, Hill, Osmondthorpe and Burmantofts.  However none of these collieries survived beyond the 1960s.  Throughout the second half of the Twentieth century, coal was generally brought from Rothwell, Castleford and Pontefract.Until 1900 the tramways on York Road were pulled by horses, however in 1900 they were electrified.  This improved transportation  and stimulated further growth around Harehills, Burmantofts and Osmondthorpe.  The location of St James Hospital also stimulated growth in the area.  The Hospital quickly grew to be one of the citys main hospitals, and is now the largest in Yorkshire.By the 1960s, the mining and textile industry in Harehills was dwindling and the area was particularly run down.  This led to the development of new housing, particularly around the hospital, such as the building of the Shakespeare rise flats.  Most of Harehills stayed the same, and even now, most of the Victorian terraces and back to backs still stand.  Most of the council development around East Leeds was in new communities such as Gipton, Seacroft, Moor, Swarcliffe and Whinmoor.  Throughout the latter decades of the twentieth century Harehills industrial areas generally declined and have been converted into car garages, light warehouses, self storage centres and such.Low rental prices coupled with the fact that most could not qualify for a council house attracted many commonwealth immigrants to Harehills, throughout the 1950s, 1960s, 1970s and 1980s.  Harehills now has significant Asian and Afro-Caribbean communities.  Crime and deprivation continue to be an issue in Harehills.  Racial tension has caused problems in the area, resulting in rioting in 2001.() Amenities thumb|right|220px|Harehills Parade, Roundhay RoadHarehills amenities are not located within one centre but spread across the area, mainly on Roundhay Road and Harehills Lane.  Harehills Lane is a traditional shopping street with many individual shops and the library.  Harehills Conservative Club is a large brick building on Harehills Lane, and Harehills Liberal Club is round the corner on Foundry Approach.  The areas largest supermarket, Kwiksave on Roundhay Road recently closed.  There is however still a Co-op, a Farmfoods, a small Sainsburys and a large new continental supermarket.  However, there are a great many individual shops frequently aimed at the various immigrant communities, as can be seen by shop signs in languages other than English.  Harehills is home to many different fast food shops, and Roundhay Road has been referred to as The Curry Mile.(http://www.crimestoppers-uk.org/wanted/index.asp?aID38882)  There are several houses in Harehills, although considerably fewer than there once were.  This has been partly ascribed to the increase in the Muslim population, who do not drink alcohol.(  Pubs remaining in Harehills include Delaneys Irish Bar, The Dock Green and The Smiths pub, The Brown Hare. There are no secondary schools actually in Harehills but many situated close by. Transport File:Construction of Leeds Tramway 1889.jpg|thumb|right|220px|Construction of the former Tramway along Roundhay Road in Harehills.Harehills is situated between the A58 and the A64. It has no form of public transport other than the numerous bus routes that run through various parts of the district. It was formerly on the network of the Tramway and was on a proposed route of the Supertram before its cancellation. However it may yet gain a light transit system, if its inclusion on the Trolleybus comes to fruition as suggested. The location of James University Hospital has prompted the inclusion of Harehills in such projects. In 1949 Tetleys Coaches, a local coach operator, was founded in Harehills. However since then the coach operator has moved its offices to Hunslet.( Tetleys Coaches) Harehills is well placed for access to city centre and Wetherby. Buses run through Harehills to city centre, Oakwood, Roundhay, Gipton, Seacroft and Wetherby. Buses running through Harehills are operated by Leeds, while other infrastructure is maintained by Metro.Leeds OvergroundHarehills is served by four bus services on the Leeds Overground (frequent bus services identified by a schematic colour coded map similar to that used on the Underground). The Orange line runs along the A58 Roundhay Road, linking Harehills with Seacroft, city centre and Horsforth. The Purple line also runs along Roundhay Road linking Harehills with Seacroft, city centre and Bramley. The Blue line runs along Roundhay Road linking Harehills with Oakwood, Roundhay and city centre. The Mauve line runs along Harehills Lane, linking Harehills with Gipton, city centre and Farnley.(http://www.firstgroup.com/ukbus/yorkhumber/leeds/map/Leedsoverground.pdf) Religion The area has at least eight places of worship, indicative of the changing population of the area, with an Anglican church being the oldest and a mosque the most recent.(Harehills 2008 Hufton et al. Religious Mapping of Leeds, University of Leeds Dept of Theology and Religious Studies)  The oldest is St Aidans, the Anglican parish church, a Victorian brick building, noted for its Brangwyn mosaics.  It was completed in 1894, and is on Roundhay Road, on the south side of Banstead Park. The vicar of St Aidans Church, Alan Taylor, is also (2010) a Leeds City Councillor.(democracy.leeds.gov.uk/ Councillor Alan taylor)  Another Anglican Church is St Wilfrids on Chatsworth Road, a 1927 brick building, part of the in Faith movement.( The Catholic parish church is St Augustines, a 1937 brick building on Harehills Road, a little to the north of Banstead Park.(St Augustines Webpage)  On Banstead Terrace, the north side of Banstead Park is the Trinity United Church a 1983 brick building.( Trinity United Webpage) It combined congregations from a Methodist and two Reform Churches in the area. On Harehills Lane is the Baptist Church, a 1928 brick building (Foundation Stone) and the Jamia Masjid Bilal Mosque built in 1996 to serve the local Pakistani community, but now having a much more diverse congregation of recent immigrants.(  On Easterly Road an old school building is (since 1988) home to the New Testament Church of God, a Pentacostal congregation of mainly African or Afro-Caribbean origin.(  The only Orthodox Church in Leeds is The Three Hierarchs, in a former Methodist Church (1906 stone building) on Harehills Avenue, which attracts worshippers from all over Yorkshire.(Image:StAidansChurchLS8 5QD.jpg|St Aidans Anglican Church 1894Image:StWilfridHarehills.jpg|St Wilfrids Anglican Church 1927Image:St Augustine Harehills.jpg|St Augustines Roman Catholic Church 1937Image:TrinityChurchHarehills.jpg|Trinity United Church 1983Image:HarehillsLaneBaptistChurch1.jpg|Harehills Lane Baptist Church 1928Image:HarehillsMosqueDome.jpg|Jamia Masjid Bilal Mosque 1996Image:NTChurchofGodHarehills.jpg|New Testament Church of GodImage:ThreeHierarchsLeeds.jpg|Three Hierarchs Greek Orthodox Church (former Methodist 1906) Crime Fforde Green.jpg|thumb|right|220px|The continental supermarket on the A58 Roundhay Road, was formerly the Fforde Green, a troubled pub which eventually closed.Harehills has a poor reputation in the Leeds area.  Harehills shares its poor reputation with neighbouring Chapeltown.  Harehills was subject to sporadic rioting in 2001,()(http://www.bbc.co.uk/leeds/citylife/harehills_guide.shtml) however there has been no unrest on such a scale since.  The Fforde Green Public House had a poor reputation and has since been closed down and is now a continental supermarket.  Racial motives were cited as the reason for the rioting, a claim which the Yorkshire Police said was a poor excuse for legitimising criminal behaviour.(  Harehills also has problems with dealing and crime.(()()()()() Bad Press A Kooky Old Place, a BBC ReportThe area has been subject to much bad press over the years.  In 2002, the BBC(http://www.bbc.co.uk/leeds/citylife/harehills_kevin_hickson.shtml) interviewed local residents.  One resident described Harehills as a horrible place to live and complained about joy riding, rubbish, drug dealing, arson and vermin.  The mans report went on to say:Often you will see a group of young children chasing vermin into an overgrown backyard. This is a sight you would expect to see in a third-world country not the modern, vibrant city that Leeds portrays itself to be.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/leeds/citylife/harehills_mr_sutcliffe.shtml)Another resident described it as being a pleasant place since the 1970s, but has since changed beyond recognition.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/leeds/citylife/harehills_kevin_hickson.shtml)However a third interviewed resident was more positive, although critical in her report, and echoing many of the complaints before, she mentions the pride of the residents in the upkeep of their houses.(http://www.bbc.co.uk/leeds/citylife/harehills_juliet_wilson.shtml)Yorkshire Evening PostThe Evening Post has reported on numerous crimes in Harehills.  Most articles regarding Harehills are regarding serious crime in the area, including assault, robbery and shootings.(http://www.yorkshireeveningpost.co.uk/googlesearch.aspx?KeywordsHarehills)  From June to August 2008, the Yorkshire Evening Post reported on four murders and serious assaults (including the use of firearms)(http://www.yorkshireeveningpost.co.uk/news/Harehills-street-sealed-off-after.4400659.jp)(http://www.yorkshireeveningpost.co.uk/crime/Leeds-Harehills-shooting-FIRST-PICTURE.4229539.jp)(http://www.yorkshireeveningpost.co.uk/crime/VIDEO-Leeds-Harehills-shooting-victim.4224358.jp)(http://www.yorkshireeveningpost.co.uk/news/Leeds-Harehills-shooting-efit-issue.4238179.jp)The Yorkshire Evening Post has also reported on the poor state of public space in Harehills.(http://www.yorkshireeveningpost.co.uk/letusplay/LET-US-PLAY--city39s.4238247.jp) Regeneration thumb|right|Street sign in HarehillsIn October 2003, Harehills received 100,000 toward regeneration from Forward.(  City Council have also invested in the area.  Investment has also included a new childrens centre.(http://leedslibdems.org.uk/news/000224/childrens_centre_to_boost_harehills_regeneration.html)  A feature of the community effort is a number of colourful mosaic street signs, made by youths who are residents of Harehills.(Over the past years residents and local agencies, have come together and organised community events Festival and the improvements to the local library to include a one stop shop for the local council.City CouncilGalleryImages of HarehillsImage:BansteadParkLS8.jpg|Banstead ParkImage:HarehillsTerrace2a.jpg|Terraced HousingImage:Hasseen2.jpg|Clothing ShopImage:PunjabJewellers.jpg|JewellersImage:Delaneys.jpg|Delaneys BarImage:Darvish.jpg|Persian Tea-houseImage:Nazma.jpg|Fish and ChipsImage:KabulExpress.jpg|One of many fast-food shopsImage:VilniusHarehills.jpg|Eastern European Food ShopImage:LeedsCarnival20085577.jpg|Leeds Carnival 2008Image:LeedsCarnival20085574.jpg|Leeds Carnival 2008Image:LeedsCarnival20085581.jpg|Leeds Carnival 2008Location gridSee also* Riot* Corner* Amateur Rugby League References  External links * IMPaCT Community Website* BBC Guide to Harehills*  Appeal after take-away shooting*  Historical and genealogical resource for area including Harehills* Leodis Aerial view of Harehills (1990s)es:Harehills
928282
Minelayer
Image:Sankaty minelaying2 1941.jpg|thumb|right|250px|Canadian sailors with a mine aboard the minelayer H.M.C.S. Sankaty off Halifax, Nova Scotia during War II.Minelaying is the act of deploying explosive mines. Historically this has been carried out by ships, submarines and aircraft. Additionally, since World War I the term minelayer refers specifically to a ship used for deploying mines.() Mine planting(http://www.fortmiles.org/firepower/batteries/batt8.html#AMP |Ft. Miles - Principle Armament - Mine Field - Army Mine Planters) was the term used for installing mines at predetermined positions in connection with coastal fortifications or harbor approaches that would be detonated by shore control when a ship was fixed as being within the mines effective range.(http://www.militarymuseum.org/Mines.html| Submarine Mine Defense of San Francisco Bay) Before World War I, mine ships were termed mine planters generally. For example, in an address to the U.S. Navy ships of Mine Squadron One at Portland, England Admiral Sims used the term mine layer while the introduction speaks of the men assembled from the mine planters.(http://www.archive.org/stream/northernbarragem00annarich#page/106/mode/2up | The Northern Barrage, Mine Force, United States Atlantic Fleet, The North Sea, 1918 (p. 107) - Speech of Admiral W. S. Sims, U. S. Navy) During and after that war the term mine planter became particularly associated with defensive coastal fortifications. The term minelayer applied vessels deploying both defensive and offensive mine barrages and large scale sea mining. Minelayer lasted well past the last common use of mine planter in the late 1940s. An armys special-purpose engineering vehicles used to lay landmines are sometimes called minelayers.Naval minelayersthumb|right|250px|Swedish minelayer lvsborg (1974)The most common use of the term minelayer is a ship used for deploying sea mines. In the Campaign of War I, mines laid by the Ottoman Empires Navys Nusret sank , , and the French battleship Bouvet(http://www.naval-history.net/WW1NavyFrench.htm | WORLD WAR 1 at SEA) in the Dardanelles on 18 March 1915.(http://query.nytimes.com/gst/abstract.html?res9A03E0DF153EE033A25753C2A9659C946496D6CF | New York Times, Saturday, March 20, 1915)  Russian minelayers were also efficient; sinking the Japanese battleships Hatsuse and Yashima in 1904 during the War.(Fitzsimons, B. (Ed.), The Illustrated Encyclopedia of 20th Century Weapons and Warfare, p 104.)In World War II, the British employed the class minelayers both as minelayers and as transports to isolated garrisons, such as Malta and Tobruk. Their combination of high speed (up to 40 knots) and carrying capacity was highly valued. The French used the same concept for the Pluton.A naval minelayer can vary considerably in size, from coastal boats of several hundred tonnes in displacement to destroyer-like ships of several thousand tonnes in displacement. Apart from their loads of sea mines, most would also carry other weapons for self-defense.Submarines can also act as minelayers. The first submarine to be designed as such was the Russian submarine Krab.  was also one such minelaying submarine.In modern times, most navies worldwide no longer possess minelaying vessels; the States Navy, for example, uses aircraft to lay sea mines instead. Mines themselves have evolved from purely passive to active; for example in the U.S.  CAPTOR (enCAPsulated TORpedo) that sits as a mine until detecting a target upon which a torpedo is launched. A few navies still have minelayers in commission, including those of Turkey, South Korea, Norway, Sweden and Finland, countries with long, shallow coastlines where sea mines are most effective.Aerial minelayingBeginning in War II, aircraft were used to deliver naval mines by dropping them, attached to a parachute. Germany, Britain, and the U.S. made significant use of aerial minelaying. A new type of magnetic mine dropped by a German aircraft in a campaign of mining the Thames Estuary in 1939 landed in a mudflat, where disposal experts determined how it worked, which allowed Britain to fashion appropriate countermeasures.The RAF operations were codenamed Gardening. As well as mining the North Sea and approaches to German ports, mines were laid in the River near Belgrade, Yugoslavia, starting on 8 April 1944, to block the shipments of products from the refineries at Ploeti, Romania.(Adkins, Paul; Codeword Dictionary; 1997; Osceola, Wisconsin; Motorbooks International; p. 79.) In the Pacific, the U.S. dropped thousands of mines in Japanese home waters, contributing to that countrys defeat.Aerial mining was also used in the War and in Vietnam. In Vietnam, rivers and coastal waters were extensively mined with a modified bomb called a destructor that proved very successful. Landmine laying Some examples of minelaying vehicles:* minelaying system* GMZ family of minelayers, which the Tyulpan is based on, using TM-62 series mines* Minenwerfer Skorpion * Type94 Minelayer *  El-Fahda (Egypt)* Istrice (M113 variant) See also * Planter (ship)* (ship)* mines in U.S. harbor defense Notes References* Hartcup, Guy. The Challenge of War. New York: Taplinger Publishing Company, 1970.* Hartmann, Gregory K. Weapons that Wait: Mine Warfare in the U.S. Navy. Annapolis, MD: United States Naval Institute Press, 1979. ISBN 0870217534.bs:Minopolaga(vaixell)cs:Minonoskada:Minelggerde:Minenlegerel:es:Minadoreo:Minportilode mineshr:Minopolagait:Posamine nl:Mijnenleggerja:minsk:Mnonoskash:Minopolagafi:Miinalaivasv:Minfartyg
931753
Leoben
Leoben is a Styrian city in central Austria, located by the Mur river. With a population of about 25,000 it is a local industrial center and hosts the of Leoben which specialises in mining. The of Leoben, an armistice between Austria and France preliminary to the of Campo Formio, was signed in Leoben in 1797.The Center Leoben is a prison designed by architect Josef Hohensinn, which was completed in 2005. Past and present Leoben is known as the Gateway to the Styrian Iron Road. The 13th century Main Square features the Hackl House with its baroque faade in red and white. The City Parish Church, St. Xaver, built in 1660, comprises a 17th century interior and is considered one of the most significant Jesuit churches in Austria. Also of note is the Art Nouveau Lutheran church which is at the upper end of the Franz-Josef-Strasse. The oldest convent for women in Styria is Gss Abbey. Founded in 1020 A.D., it was run by the Benedictine nuns until it was dissolved in 1782. The early Romanesque crypt is of note as is the Gsser Ornat, which can be seen in Vienna (Museum for Applied Arts). Next to the convent is the Beer brewery, which includes a brewery museum.Current cultural events include classical concerts in the Congress Leoben, productions of the Summer Philharmonic in July and performances of local and guest productions in the oldest operating theater in Austria.(City of Leoben: A City on the move. In: City of Leoben) Tradition & Avantgarde Leoben was shaped for centuries by the trade with iron and the research in raw materials carried out at the of Leoben, which was founded in 1840. Mining traditions still play an important part in citylife. Examples are the Miners Parade, the St. Barbara Celebration or the Ledersprung (Leatherjump). The Gsser Kirtag, a street fair, takes place on the Thursday after the first Sunday in October and attracts tens of thousands of visitors to Leoben. Other components of the vigorous cultural life of the Mining City include classical concerts in the Congress Leoben, productions of the Summer Philharmonics in July and performances of locally created and guest productions in the oldest still-running theater in Austria. Notable people * Schachner (aka Schoko), football trainer* Weinek, actor* Linz, football player* Morawetz, botanist(Morawetz)* Egon Kapellari, bishop References  External links * Official website* University of Leoben* Pictures of Leoben and information in English languagezh-min-nan:Leoben(grad)br:Leobenbg:cs:Leobenda:Leobende:Leobenet:Leobenel:es:Leobeneo:Leobenfa:fr:Leobenis:Leobenit:Leobenhe:kk:la:Liupinalv:Leobenelb:Leobenlt:Leobenashu:Leoben(stad)ja:no:Leobenpl:Leobenpt:Leobenro:Leobenru:sk:Leobensl:Leobensr:fi:Leobensv:Leobenuk:vi:Leobenvo:Leobenwar:Leobenzh:
933919
Burns_Lake,_British_Columbia
footnotes                thumb|309px|right|Burns Lakes welcome signBurns Lake is a rural village in the North-Central Interior of British Columbia, Canada, incorporated in 1923.  It is the location of the head offices of the Regional District of Bulkley-Nechako.There are three Nations reserves that are part of the town, and another three nearby, making it one of the few communities in the province that have almost equal populations of native and Canadians of European descent. Local nations include First Nation, Babine Nation, Band, Lake band, Tyee band and Tahi Buhn band.The town serves as a hub for the local logging, saw-milling, mining and tourist industries.  The town boasts a secondary school, District Secondary School, with a Fine Arts program.  A K-7 school program is offered at William Konkin Elementary School.  Burns Lake hosts annual Performing Arts and Alternative Arts Festivals, drawing talent from around the region. Burns Lake features three pubs, and a small selection of stores and services as well as a library and a hospital.Rails  Prince Rupert train calls at the Lake railway station several times per week.HistoryBob Gerow, one of the main founders of Burns Lake,  entered into partnership with Jack Seely and Howard Laidlaw to create Burns Lake  Trading Company. Together, they built a store/hotel and a sawmill on Gerow Island. In 1911, there was just a pack trail through the bush where the main part of the village now stands. A bridge was constructed to connect Gerow Island to the mainland. All men not already employed by the railroad were hired to help build the bridge.The first newspaper in Burns Lake was called the Observer, published and edited by Sidney Godwin. In the late 1950s, another newspaper, also called the Observer, was operated by Ralph Vipond. It closed in 1961.A number of historic buildings still stand:The Old HospitalFirst built in 1933 by the Womens Missionary Society of the Church of Canada, the hospital was officially opened by Canadas former Governor General Tweedsmuir. Once the largest and finest public building between Prince George and Prince Rupert, it was famous for its fine gardens. It was later occupied by senior citizens apartment complex, then declared a heritage building in 1982 and redeveloped as an office building by its owner, the Lake Native Development Corporation.The Bucket of BloodLocated adjucent to the Burns Lake Museum, this square-cut log building is a former fur trade post which later became a gambling den. A stabbing over a game of poker led to the buildings name. It now contains a display of historical artifacts from the life of Craig Wafflehouse, one of the founders of Burns Lake.Recreationthumb|250px|Early morning mist on Burns Lakethumb|250px|OpalSkiingThe area around Burns Lake was settled by many Scandinavians, who brought with them their love of skiing.  For many years, local residents participated in all forms of skiing, including jumping and downhill, through the Omineca Ski Club.  By the late 20th century, however, the Omineca Ski Club was exclusively a cross-country (Nordic) ski club.  Its facilities have hosted several national championships and are considered to rank among western Canadas best trail networks. Omineca ski club was one of the first ski club in Canada  Notable past members have included Kaare Engstad, Karl Lindaas, Alford Eakin, Esther Bahen (Miller), Marvin Strimbold, Lana Lindaas and Chris Paulson.Opal BedsThe 1.9 kilometre Opal Bed Trail is the main hiking path in the region leading to the opals and agates. The hiking trail begins by hiking to a short ridge. From the ridge the trail leads pass a flat field to views overlooking a creek. Opals are recorded as being found in between the creek and the trail. Also the natural wonders referred to as Hoodoos (rock formations) are seen above the creek at this point of the hike. Burns Lake is well known for the trails running through the Opal beds. The trail network is best known for the precious minerals in the area which include opals and agate rocks. Today, the main trail leads to an active rock hounding destination so people can look and hunt for precious minerals.(http://www.northbceh.com/burns_lake/parks/opal.htm)Spirit SquareIn February of 2007, the Village of Burns Lake received funding from the Government of BC for the construction of a public open space under the BC Spirit Squares program. Spirit Squares are intended to honour the past and celebrate the future; improve the economic health of communities; and enhance the social and cultural life of the community. It contains an wide array of free exercise equipment which uses your body weight as resistance.GolfThe Carnoustie Golf & Country Club opened in 1955, has nine holes and was built to go with the natural lay of the land.  It covers  with water hazards on several assets. The original developers were very dedicated to golf and this was a family run business until 2000.TennisBurns Lake has recently completed construction of two free tennis courts which are open to the public. Racket rentals are available at the local Visitor Center.Mountain Bike Trails & Bike ParksBurns Lake offers a world class trails network surrounding Boer Mountain designed by Gravity Logic. The Mountain Bike Park is the only mountain bike park to be built on Crown land in Canada - it is free to use. More information available at Burns Lake Mountain Biking Association website.DirectionsBurns Lake is located east from Topley (51), British Columbia (81), Granisle (100), Smithers (147), Terrace (350), and Rupert (494). The other way is Lake (69), Vanderhoof (128), St. James (175), and Prince George (223).Further readingThe book Landscapes Along Highway 16, written by de Leeuw, includes a short essay on Burns Lake titled Screamed on  a Fence, Beside a Passing Train.ClimateReferences*Community Profile: Burns Lake, British Columbia; Statistics CanadaExternal links* Village of Burns Lake* Chamber of CommerceLake (British Columbia)Lakezh:
936012
Union_violence
When Union violence has occurred, it has frequently been in the context of unrest.(Philip Taft and Philip Ross, American Labor Violence: Its Causes, Character, and Outcome, The History of Violence in America: A Report to the National Commission on the Causes and Prevention of Violence, ed. Hugh Davis Graham and Ted Robert Gurr, 1969.) Union violence is generally a defensive measure carried out against guards or strikebreakers during attempts to undercut strikes.( Violence has ranged from isolated acts by individuals, to wider campaigns of organised violence to further union goals within an industrial dispute.(The Wall Street Journal, November 2, 1990.)(Michael Gartner, Nation Shrugs as Thugs Firebomb Freedom, The Wall Street Journal, November 29, 1990.)(The New York Times, November 15, 1990.)violence has also occurred frequently in the context of industrial unrest, and has often involved the collusion of management and government authorities, private agencies, or citizens groups( )( )( )()(Mixer and server , Volume 12, Hotel and Restaurant Employees International Alliance and Bartenders International League of America., 1903, page 44) in organising violence against unions and their members.((((According to a study in 1969, the United States has had the bloodiest and most violent labor history of any industrial nation in the world, and there have been few industries which have been immune.(Philip Taft and Philip Ross, American Labor Violence: Its Causes, Character, and Outcome, The History of Violence in America: A Report to the National Commission on the Causes and Prevention of Violence, ed. Hugh Davis Graham and Ted Robert Gurr, 1969. )OverviewAccording to a 1969 study, no major labor organization in American history has ever advocated violence as a policy.( However, violence does occur in the context of industrial disputes. When violence has been committed by, or in the name of, the union, it has tended to be narrowly focused upon targets which are associated with the employer in question, or upon others closely associated with the target.( If union recognition was extended, an employer was more likely to consider a strike just a temporary rupture in labor relations. Violence was greater in conflicts in which there was a question of whether union recognition would be extended.(Employers and workers have each been on the side of aggressor and victim at different times.( The most virulent violence in industrial disputes has been committed to deny unions recognition, or to destroy a functioning union.(Union violence most typically occurs in specific situations, and has more frequently been aimed at preventing replacement workers from taking jobs during a strike, than at managers or employers.(Protest and verbal abuse are routinely aimed against union members or replacement workers who cross picket lines (blacklegs) during industrial disputes. The inherent aim of a union is to create a labor monopoly so as to balance the monopsony a large employer enjoys as a purchaser of labor. Strikebreakers threaten that goal and undermine the unions bargaining position, and occasionally this erupts into violent confrontation, with violence committed either by, or against, strikers.( Some who have sought to explain such violence observe, if labor disputes are accompanied by violence, it may be because labor has no legal redress.(J. Bernard Hogg, Public Reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question, Pennsylvania History 11 (July 1944), 171--199, citing John Bascom, Civil Law and Social Progress, The Independent, vol. xliv (September 15, 1892), p. 1279.) As early as 1894, workers were declaring,...the right of employers to manage their own business to suit themselves, is fast coming to mean in effect nothing less than a right to manage the country to suit themselves.(J. Bernard Hogg, Public Reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question, Pennsylvania History 11 (July 1944), 171--199, citing the advisory committee of the Amalgamated Association of Iron and Steel Workers during the Homestead Strike)Occasionally a violent dispute can involve entire unions, when one union breaks anothers strike. In 2004, the murder of Keith Frogson in the village of Woodhouse, Nottinghamshire in England may have been the result of a feud dating from the coal-miners strike in the 1980s, when Mr Frogson and his alleged killer were members of two opposed unions, the established and militant National Union of Mineworkers and the breakaway of Democratic Mineworkers.()HistoryOne of the historical problems in labor disputes was the inability of existing police forces to deploy enough trained personnel to perform necessary responsibilities.(Harry Spiller, Sheriff: a memoir of a lawman from Bloody Williamson County, Illinois, Turner Publishing Company, 1999, page 11) Corporations frequently turned to private agencies and guard services to fulfill their security needs. In 1866, a Pennsylvania law gave corporations the privilege of securing from the state government a commission for a watchman or policeman, who had the power to act on the corporations property. The entity thus established was commonly referred to as the and Iron Police.(J. Bernard Hogg, Public Reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question, Pennsylvania History 11 (July 1944), 171--199) In 1894, States Marshals and special guards, together with state and federal troops, assisted in putting down the Strike.( In 1902, during the Anthracite strike, hundreds of commissions for the Coal and Iron Police were issued.( But this is also when the concept of a state police force to deal with labor issues first saw fruition.( However, for more than a century governors have continued to call out the militia, or the National Guard to deal with labor unrest. The army has also been used during labor disputes, including in situations where use of the National Guard proved inadequate (or disastrous, as in the Ludlow Strike).Great Railroad Strike of 1877The great railroad strike of 1877 saw considerable violence by, and against, workers, and occurred before unions were widespread. It started on July 14 in West Virginia, in response to the cutting of wages for the second time in a year by the & Ohio Railroad (B&O). Striking workers would not allow any of the stock to roll until this second wage cut was revoked. The governor sent in state militia units to restore train service, but the soldiers refused to use force against the strikers and the governor called for federal troops.Violent street battles occurred in Maryland between the striking workers and the Maryland militia.  When the outnumbered troops of the 6th Regiment fired on an attacking crowd, they killed 10 and wounded 25.() The rioters injured several members of the militia, damaged engines and train cars, and burned portions of the train station.( On July 2122, the President sent federal troops and Marines to Baltimore to restore order.In Pittsburgh, strikers threw rocks at militiamen, who bayoneted their antagonists, killing twenty people and wounding twenty-nine others.In Pennsylvania, workers conducted mass marches, blocked rail traffic, committed trainyard arson, and burned a bridge. The state militia shot sixteen citizens in the Railroad Massacre. The militia responsible for the shootings was mobilized by Reading Railroad management, not by local public officials.( )Chicago was paralyzed when angry mobs of unemployed citizens wreaked havoc in the rail yards. The strike was eventually suppressed by thousands of vigilantes, National Guard, and federal troops.Haymarket affair of 1886In 1886 the affair (also known as the Haymarket massacre or Haymarket riot) was a protest rally and subsequent violence on May 4 at the Haymarket Square(Originally at the corner of Des Plaines and Randolph) in Chicago. The rally supported striking workers. When police began to disperse the public meeting, an unknown person threw a dynamite bomb into their midst. The bomb blast and ensuing gunfire resulted in the deaths of eight police officers, mostly from fire, and an unknown number of civilians.()() In the internationally publicized legal proceedings that followed, eight anarchists were tried for murder. Four men were convicted and executed, and one committed suicide in prison, although the prosecution conceded none of the defendants had thrown the bomb.The Haymarket affair is generally considered significant for the origin of international Day observances for workers.()() The causes of the Haymarket Affair are still controversial, but can be traced in part to an incident the previous day, in which police fired into a crowd of agitated workers during shift change at the McCormick Works, where the regular work force was on strike, and at least two workers were killed.() In popular literature, the Haymarket Affair inspired the caricature of a bomb-throwing anarchist.Illinois Governor Peter Altgeld later pardoned the three living survivors of the Haymarket prosecution, concluding (as have subsequent scholars) that there had been a serious miscarriage of justice in their prosecutions.(Steven Laurence Danver, Revolts, protests, demonstrations, and rebellions in American history: an encyclopedia, ABC-CLIO, 2010, page 575)(Carlotta R. Anderson, All-American anarchist: Joseph A. Labadie and the labor movement, Wayne State University Press, 1998, page 123)Burlington strike of 1888During the Burlington Railroad strike of 1888, workers were arrested for wrecking a train. When one of those arrested turned out to be a detective, organized labor complained that the detective had incited the others.(J. Bernard Hogg, Public Reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question, Pennsylvania History 11 (July 1944), 171--199, page 175, citing Journal of United Labor, July 12, 1888.)Labor unrest in 1892In the 1890s violent outbreaks occurred in the North, South, and West, in small communities and metropolitan cities, testifying to the common attitudes of Americans in every part of the United States.( Workers with different ethnic origins who worked under very different conditions in widely separated parts of the United States nonetheless responded with equal ferocity when unions came under attack.( Serious violence erupted in several major strikes of the 1890s, the question of union recognition being a factor in all of them.(1892 in particular was a year of considerable labor unrest. Governors of five states called out the national guard and/or the army to quell unrestagainst miners in East Tennesee and in DAlene, Idaho, where a shooting war followed the discovery of a labor spy, against switchmen in New York, against a strike in Orleans, Louisiana, and against the Pennsylvania steel strike.(Emma Goldman, Candace Falk, Emma Goldman, Vol. 1: A Documentary History of the American Years, Volume 1: Made for America, 1890-1901, University of Illinois Press, 2008, page 23)Coeur dAlene, Idaho labor strikeThe strike of 1892 in dAlene, Idaho erupted in violence when a union miner was killed by mine guards,( and was further inflamed when union miners discovered they had been infiltrated by a Pinkerton agent who had routinely provided union information to the mine owners.On Sunday night, July 10, armed union miners gathered on the hills above the Frisco mine. More union miners were arriving from surrounding communities, and a showdown was inevitable. At five in the morning, shots rang out, and the firing became continuous. The miners claimed the guards fired first, the guards accused the miners. The union miners, exposed on the logged-off hillside, hadnt positioned themselves for a gunfight, while mine guards were able to shelter in buildings. The union men circled above the mill, and got into a position where they could send a box of powder down the flume into one of the mine buildings. The building exploded, killing one company man and injuring several others. The union miners fired into a remaining structure where the guards had taken shelter. A second company man was killed, and sixty or so guards surrendered. Union men marched their prisoners to the union hall.The violence provided the mine owners and the governor with an excuse to declare Martial Law,(Mark Wyman, Hard Rock Epic, Western Miners and the Industrial Revolution, 1860-1910, 1979, page 170.) and bring in six companies of the National Guard to suppress insurrection and violence. Federal troops also arrived, and they confined six hundred miners in bullpens without any hearings or formal charges. Some were later sent up for violating injunctions, others for obstructing the United States mail.(Labors Greatest Conflicts, Emma F. Langdon, 1908, page 13.)Homestead Strike, and an assassination attemptOne of the most notorious incidents of violence against management occurred in 1892 during the Strikeone of the most violent industrial disputes in American historywhen Berkman attempted to assassinate Clay Frick, chairman of the Steel Company and manager of the mill where the strike occurred. Frick had locked out the workers, and later hired three hundred armed guards from the Pinkerton Detective Agency to break the unions picket lines, resulting in gunfire and flaming barges on the Ohio River. There was a consensus of all parties that the presence of the Pinkertons inflamed the attitudes of the strikers.( The strikers defeated the Pinkertons, but could not keep the mills from operating after the National Guard was deployed.(Berkman, an avowed anarchist, had no connection to the union involved in the strike, but believed he was acting in the workers interests. He was motivated by newspaper reports of,...Henry Clay Frick, whose attitude toward labor is implacably hostile; his secret military preparations while designedly prolonging the peace negotiations with the Amalgamated; the fortification of the Homestead steel-works; the erection of a high board fence, capped by barbed wire and provided with loopholes for sharpshooters; the hiring of an army of Pinkerton thugs; the attempt to smuggle them, in the dead of night, into Homestead; and, finally, the terrible carnage.(Alexander Berkman, Prison memoirs of an anarchist, Mother earth publishing association, 1912, pages 1-2)Berkmans attack, called an attentat by the anarchists, injured but failed to kill Frick. Having anticipated that his act would launch a worker uprising, Berkman was surprised when a carpenter hit him with a hammer after he had been restrained. The attempted murder alienated the anarchist community from much of the labor movement, as well as dividing the anarchist community itself.( Frick had been widely hated, but in at least one analysis, becoming the victim of such an attack transformed him into a folk hero in the public view.(During the Homestead strike, Carnegie Steel Company employees in Duquesne joined the strike that was occurring across the river. A riot broke out, and a number of the workers were arrested. It turned out that two of the strikers were Pinkerton detectives, and convictions were secured.(J. Bernard Hogg, Public Reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question, Pennsylvania History 11 (July 1944), 171--199, citing Pittsburgh Commercial Gazette, July 24, 1892.)Battle of Virden, 1898In 1897, the Pana Coal Company attempted to import African-American strikebreakers. A train car was intercepted by armed striking miners, and the strikebreakers were sent home unharmed.The following year, however, another company, the Chicago-Virden Coal Company, attempted a similar strike-breaking effort, this time with an armed escort on the train car. The result was called the of Virden.  Guards fired their rifles as they disembarked from the train. In the ensuing gun battle, fourteen men, including eight strikers, were killed.( Governor Tanner criticized the company, and called up the National Guard, who were able to restore order. The National Guard prevented a similar incident by turning away additional strikebreakers the day after the riot.(Coeur dAlene, Idaho labor confrontation of 1899In April 1899, as the Federation of Miners (WFM) was launching an organizing drive of the few locations not yet unionized, superintendent Albert Burch declared that the company would rather shut down and remain closed twenty years than to recognize the union. He then fired seventeen workers that he believed to be union members and demanded that all other union men collect their back pay and quit.(J. Anthony Lukas, Big Trouble, 1997, page 111)On April 29, 250 angry union members belonging to the WFM seized a train in Burke.(schwantes, carlos (1996). The Pacific Northwest: An Interpretive history. University of Nebraska Press. p.320) At each stop through Burke-Canyon, more miners climbed aboard. At Frisco, the train stopped to load eighty wooden boxes, each containing fifty pounds of dynamite. Nearly a thousand men(J. Anthony Lukas, Big Trouble, 1997, page 112.) rode the train to Wardner, the site of a $250,000 mill of the Bunker Hill mine. After carrying three thousand pounds of dynamite into the mill, they set their charges and scattered. Two men were killed,(RoughneckThe Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, Peter Carlson, 1983, pages 53-54.) one of them a non-union miner, the other a union man accidentally shot by other miners. Their mission accomplished, the miners once again boarded the Dynamite Express and left the scene.(J. Anthony Lukas, Big Trouble, 1997, pages 113-114.)From Kellog to Wallace, ranchers and laboring people lined the tracks and, according to one eyewitness, cheered the union men lustily as they passed.(J. Anthony Lukas, Big Trouble, 1997, page 114.)Once again, miners were rounded up and herded into bullpens and held there for months.(William D. Haywood, The Autobiography of Big Bill Haywood, 1929, page 81.)Colorado Labor Wars of 1903-04During the Federation of Miners strike of 1903-04, there was considerable violence, including an explosion at the Vindicator mine which killed two, and an explosion at the Independence Depot which killed thirteen. The Cripple Creek Mining District was under occupation by the Colorado National Guard, the Alliance was active in the district, and historians continue to debate who was responsible for each incident of violence.(All That GlittersClass, Conflict, and Community in Cripple Creek, Elizabeth Jameson, 1998, page 233)(The Labor History of the Cripple Creek District, Benjamin McKie Rastall, 1905, pages 150,153)(Colorados War on Militant Unionism, James H. Peabody and the Western Federation of Miners, George G. Suggs, Jr., 1972, pages 114,189) One likely perpetrator was convicted assassin Orchard, who many historians believe may have been a double agent. A major in the National Guard later testified that the militia was responsible for orchestrated beatings of striking miners.(Louis Freeland Post, The Public, November 5, 1904, page 487)(Durango Democrat, Startling Exposure, Member of State Militia Makes Affidavit As To Cause Of Disturbances in Cripple Creek, October 29, 1904)International Association of Bridge Structural Iron Workers, 1906-1911Perhaps the most significant example of a campaign of union violence, the International Association of Bridge Structural Iron Workers employed dynamite attacks and assault from 1906 to 1911 over employers demands for an shop. After an initial peace offer, employers refused to talk to the union, and the union leadership adopted violent tactics as a direct response. Approximately one hundred structures were damaged or destroyed by dynamite, and about a hundred non-union workers were assaulted. The tactics were considered a colossal blunder.(Battle of Blair Mountain, 1921Two years of conflict between miners and mine owners, characterized by utilization of the Detective Agency for infiltrating, sabotaging and attacking the United Mine Workers union, culminated in the Battle of Blair Mountain in 1921.(George D. Torok, A guide to historic coal towns of the Big Sandy River Valley, Univ. of Tennessee Press, 2004, page 119) The largest armed insurrection since the Civil War was touched off by the murders of Hatfield and Ed Chambers on the courthouse steps of West Virginia.(Chuck Kinder, Last Mountain Dancer: Hard-Earned Lessons in Love, Loss, and Honky-Tonk, Da Capo Press, 2005, page 149) The Battle of Blair Mountain was a spontaneous uprising of ten thousand miners from throughout West Virginia who fought the coal companys hired guns and their allies, the state police for three days before federal troops intervened.(The Herrin Massacre, 1922Williamson County, Illinois, a county with a unique history of violence for a rural county, was the location of the Herrin Massacre, one of the most horrific and perplexing incidents of union violence.(Harry Spiller, Sheriff: a memoir of a lawman from Bloody Williamson County, Illinois, Turner Publishing Company, 1999, page 10) The 1922 incident is considered the most notorious of the United Mine Workers struggles in Illinois.(Stu Fliege, Tales and trails of Illinois, University of Illinois Press, 2002, page 180) Williamson was a hotbed of Ku Klux Klan activity at the time, with many in the community embracing that organization in opposition to bootlegging of liquor during Prohibition, and for purposes of racial exclusion.((James Ballowe, The Work of Our Fathers, http://www.chicagoreader.com/chicago/the-work-of-our-fathers/Content?oid887838 retrieved April 22, 2011) The massacre was committed by members (and possibly at the instruction of local leadership) of the United Mine Workers, just eight years after the deaths of miners wives and children during the Massacre.( Accounts differ, but most record the strike-related deaths of three union men, followed the next day by union miners committing the brutal murders of 20 men of a group of fifty strikebreakers and mine guards. The ruthless retaliation occurred against the backdrop of broken promises, double dealing, and missed opportunities on both sides.(Illinois: A Descriptive and Historical Guide, US History Publishers, A.C. McClurg & Company, Chicago, 1939, page 453) False flag operations False flag operations are efforts to turn public opinion against an adversary, while pretending to be in the camp of that adversary. Historian Bernard Hogg, who studied agencies hired by companies to undermine unions, and who wrote Public Reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question, observed:A detective will join the ranks of the strikers and at once become an ardent champion of their cause. He is next found committing an aggravated assault upon some man or woman who has remained at work, thereby bringing down upon the heads of the officers and members of the assembly or union directly interested, the condemnation of all honest people, and aiding very materially to demoralize the organization and break their ranks. He is always on hand in the strikers meeting to introduce some extremely radical measure to burn the mill or wreck a train, and when the meeting has adjourned he is ever ready to furnish the Associated Press with a full account of the proposed action, and the country is told that a prominent and highly respected member of the strikers organization has just revealed a most daring plot to destroy life and property, but dare not become known in connection with the exposure for fear of his life!(Public Reaction to Pinkertonism and the Labor Question, J. Bernard Hogg, Pennsylvania History 11 (July 1944), 171--199, page 175, citing Journal of United Labor, July 12, 1888. Hogg block-quotation contains a typo, interpretation is assumed as a single quote rendered as a comma.)Some labor spy agencies advertised their false flag operations; for example, Auxiliary Company, a labor spy agency which boasted 499 corporate clients in the early 1930s,(John J. Abt, Michael Myerson, Advocate and activist: memoirs of an American communist lawyer, University of Illinois Press, 1993, page 63) told prospective clients,In event other methods of sabotaging the union fail, our operative in the union turns extremely radical. He asks for unreasonable things and keeps the union embroiled in trouble. If a strike comes, he will be the loudest man in the bunch, and will counsel violence and get somebody in trouble. The result will be that the union will be broken up.(Harry Wellington Laidler, Boycotts and the labor struggle economic and legal aspects, John Lane company, 1913, pages 291-292)While such practices may seem outdated, some apparently still subscribe to just such tactics. For example, Deputy Prosecutor in Indianas Johnson County, Carlos Lam, suggested in an email that Wisconsins Governor Walker should mount a flag operation to undermine pro-union protesters involved in the Wisconsin protests, which would make it appear as if the union was committing violence. After initially claiming that his email account was hacked, Lam admitted to sending the suggestion and resigned.(Debra Cassens Weiss, American Bar Association Journal, posted Mar 25, 2011, http://www.abajournal.com/news/article/a_second_indiana_prosecutor_is_out_of_a_job_for_unusual_advice_to_wisconsin/ retrieved April 2, 2011)(CBS News, posted March 25, 2011, http://www.cbsnews.com/8301-503544_162-20047130-503544.html retrieved April 2, 2011) Governor Walkers office disclaimed support for the proposal.()FrameupsA variation of the false flag operation is the frameup, in which operatives attempt to accomplish the same negative reaction, but aim for specific consequences more significant or damaging than mere bad publicity. During the Labor Wars, the Colorado National Guard had been called into the Creek Mining District to put down a strike. The occupation had apparently dissipated perceived threats from striking miners against mine properties, and Colorado National Guard leadership became concerned that the Owners Association had not lived up to their agreement to cover the payroll of the soldiers during the deployment. About the middle of February, 1904, General Reardon ordered Major Ellison to take another soldier he could trust to secretly hold up or shoot the men coming off shift at the Vindicator mine in order to convince the mine owners to pay.( When such violence occurred, it was most probable that the blame would be placed upon the union.(The Westerners brand book, 1963, page 430) However, Major Ellison believed that the miners took a route out of the mine that would not make ambush possible. Reardon ordered Ellison to pursue an alternative plan, which was shooting up one of the mines. In the dark of night, Major Ellison and Sergeant Gordon Walter fired sixty shots from their revolvers into the Vindicator and Lillie shaft house.( The plan worked, and the mine owners paid up.(During the same strike, detectives attempted to frame union leaders for a plot to derail a train. A jury of non-union ranchers and timbermen unanimously found three accused union men not guilty, and testimony during the trial pointed at a plot by the detectives.(Peter Carlson, RoughneckThe Life and Times of Big Bill Haywood, 1983, pages 69-70)(William D. Haywood, The Autobiography of Big Bill Haywood, 1929, pages 142-143)(Elizabeth Jameson, All That GlittersClass, Conflict, and Community in Cripple Creek, 1998, pages 210-211.)(George G. Suggs, Jr., Colorados War on Militant Unionism, James H. Peabody and the Western Federation of Miners, 1972, page 101)(Benjamin McKie Rastall, The Labor History of the Cripple Creek District, 1905, page 105)Frameups in labor disputes sometimes swing public opinion one way or the other. During a strike in Lawrence, Massachusetts, police acting on a tip discovered dynamite and blamed it on the union. National media echoed an anti-union message. Later the police revealed that the dynamite had been wrapped in a magazine addressed to the son of the former mayor. The man had received an unexplained payment from the largest of the employers. Exposed, the plot swung public sympathy to the union.()Research on union violenceResearchers in industrial relations, criminology, and wider cultural studies have examined violence by workers or trade unions in the context of industrial disputes.(Rhodri Jeffreys-Jones (1979), Theories of American Labour Violence, Journal of American Studies, 13, pp 245-264, doi:10.1017/S0021875800011439 )(Armand J. Thieblot, Jr. and Thomas R. Haggard, 1983, Union Violence: The Record and the Response by Courts, Legislatures and the NLRB, Industrial Research Unit, Wharton School, University of Pennsylvania.)(Brinker, Paul, Violence by U.S. labor unions, Journal of Labor Research, 1985-12-01, Volume 6, Number 4, p. 417-427)(  US and Australian government reports have examined violence during industrial disputes.(Closing the Legal Loophole for Union Violence: Hearing Before the Committee On the Judiciary, United States Senate, One Hundred Fifth Congress, First Session, On S. 230 ... September 3, 1997, Washington: U.S. G.P.O., 1998.)() Incidents Examples of union violence since 1925 include:* 2011 - It was reported on September 9, 2011 that members of the International Longshore and Warehouse Union (ILWU) frightened security guards, dumped grain, and vandalized property belonging to EGT, LLC, over a labor dispute. No one was hurt, and no one had been arrested at the time the incident was reported. District Judge Ronald Leighton later issued a preliminary injunction against the ILWU citing their reported behavior.(Judge warns Wash. union to halt illegal tactics after 500 storm grain terminal, trap guards, Associated Press September 9, 2011)* 1997 - On August 7, 1997, teamsters Orestes Espinosa, Angel Mielgo, Werner Haechler, Benigno Rojas, and Adrian Paez beat, kicked, and stabbed a UPS worker (Rod Carter) who refused to strike, after Carter received a threatening phone call from the home of Anthony Cannestro, Sr., president of Teamsters Local 769.()()* 1996 - On 19 August, 1996, Australian unionists physically broke into the Parliament & fought Federal Police during the Parliament House Riot.(http://www.aph.gov.au/hansard/senate/dailys/ds200896.pdf)()* 1993 - Eddie York was murdered for crossing a Mine Workers (UMW) picket line at a coal mine in Logan County, West Virginia, on July 22, 1993. Like the 1990 NY Daily News strike, criminal charges under the Hobbs Act were declined, with the FBI and Justice Department citing the Enmons case.()(Fitzgerald, Randy, Murder in Logan County, Readers Digest, Feb. 1995)* 1990 - on the first day of The York Daily News strike, delivery trucks were attacked with stones and sticks, and in some cases burned, with the drivers beaten.((( Strikers then started threatening newsstands with arson, or stole all copies of the Daily News and burned them in front of the newsstands.((( James Hoge, publisher of the Daily News, alleged that there had been some 700 serious acts of violence. The New York Police Department claimed knowledge of  229 incidents of violence. Criminal charges under the Hobbs Act were declined, however, citing the aforementioned Enmons case.(((* 1986 - During protests by the Brotherhood of Electrical Workers Local 1547 against a non-unionized workforce getting a contract, picketers threatened and assaulted workers, spat at them, sabotaged equipment, and shot guns near workers.()() In 1999, the Alaska Supreme Court ruled that the union had engaged in ongoing acts of intimidation, violence, destruction of property, awarding the plaintiff $212,500 in punitive damages.((* 1984 - Taxi driver David Wilkie was killed by striking miners while driving a non-striking worker during the NUM UK mining strike of 1984-85.()(Tim Jones, Miners get life for taxi murder, The Times, 17 May 1985)* 1926 - In the context of the United Kingdom general strike, striking miners derailed The Flying Scotsman on May 10.(http://www.railwaysarchive.co.uk/documents/MoT_AnnitsfordCramlington1926.pdf)() Legal status People who commit acts of violence in the furtherance of industrial disputes can be prosecuted under the normal laws of all countries.  In several countries, however, unions have accused state prosecutors of taking either no or insufficient steps against the alleged perpetrators of violence against union leaders, leaving a significant majority of the crimes in partial or total impunity; at present such accusations are most often made in respect of Colombia, and in particular the case of the murder of Isidro Gil is currently (2004) being pursued in a court in Florida.Under the States Supreme Courts 1973 Enmons decision (States v. Enmons), the actions of union officials in organizing strikes and other united acts of workers are exempt from prosecution under US federal anti-extortion law.  Similar legal protections are enjoyed by unions in other democratic countries.  These protections do not however confer any immunity from prosecution for violent acts.Management violenceManagement violence usually takes the form of bullying of or aggression against union organisers or sympathisers in the workplace.  It is rarely if ever delivered by employers or senior managers directly, but by front-line managers (e.g. chargehands or foremen) or by other employees incited by management.  In a number of well-known cases, however, violent action has been taken against union workers, often using hired squads, and unions have charged that this was at the instigation of management or of government bodies sympathetic to managements aims.See also* to trade unions* spies* bustingPeople* Norris J. Nelson, Los Angeles City Council member, commenting on union violenceReferencesExternal links* BBC report on arrests in the case of Chea Vichea* The Independent report on the murder of Keith Frogson
937796
Charles_Fox_Parham
thumb|220px|right|Charles Fox ParhamCharles Fox Parham (4 June 1873 - c. 29 January 1929(While some feel Parhams exact death date is obscure, details and timing shown in the biography The Life of Charles F Parham (p413), written by his wife, confirm 29 January 1929 as the date of his death. In addition to providing his exact date of death, the biography provides dates for a number of events prior to and following his death which confirm the date. The obscurity concerning the date of Parhams death may relate to the low profile of his passing away - to prevent an adverse reaction by those who were against Parham, he was buried in a simple grave, the location was not advertised, and it was not until later that a larger, more public, marker was placed over his grave.)) was an American preacher and evangelist. Together with J. Seymour, Parham was one of the two central figures in the development and early spread of Pentecostalism. It was Parham that associated glossolalia with the in the Holy Spirit, a theological connection crucial to the emergence of Pentecostalism as a distinct movement.() Parham continues to spark controversy, especially regarding his attitudes and beliefs on race.(Eddie L. Hyatt (Fall 2004), Across the Lines: Charles Parhams Contribution to the Inter-Racial Character of Early Pentecostalism, Pneuma Review.) Personal lifeParham, one of five sons of William and Ann Parham, was born in Iowa, on 4 June 1873 and moved with his family to Kansas, by covered wagon in 1883. William Parham owned land, raised cattle, and eventually purchased a business in town. Parhams mother died in 1885. The next year his father married Harriet Miller, the daughter of a Methodist circuit rider. Harriet was a devout Christian, and the Parhams opened their home for religious activities.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 44.) He married Sarah Thistlewaite, the daughter of a Quaker. Their engagement was in summer of 1896,(), and they were married December 31, 1896, in a Friends ceremony.()MinistryEarly ministryParham began conducting his first religious services at the age of 15. In 1891, he enrolled at Southwestern College in Kansas, a Methodist affiliated school. He attended until 1893 when he came to believe education would prevent him from ministering effectively. He then worked in the Episcopal Church, North as a supply pastor (he was never ordained).(Blumhofer 1993, pp. 44-45.) Parham left the Methodist church in 1895 because he disagreed with its hierarchy. He also complained that Methodist preachers were not left to preach by direct inspiration.( Rejecting denominations, he established his own itinerant evangelistic ministry, which preached the ideas of the movement and was well received by the people of Kansas.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 45.)Topeka, KansasSometime after the birth of their son, Claude, in September 1897, both Parham and Claude fell ill. Attributing their recovery to divine intervention, Parham renounced all medical help and committed to preach healing and pray for the sick.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 46.) In 1898, Parham moved his headquarters to Kansas, where he operated a mission and an office. It was also in Topeka that he established the Bethel Healing Home and published the Apostolic Faith magazine. Parham operated on a faith basis. He did not receive offerings during services, preferring to pray for God to provide for the ministry.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 47.)Parham, deciding to know more fully the latest truths restored by the later day movements, took a sabbatical from his work at Topeka in 1900 and visited various movements.(Sarah Parham, p. 48.) While he saw and looked at other teachings and models when he visited the other works, most of his time was spent at Shiloh, the ministry of Sandford in Maine and in an Ontario, Canada, religious campaign of Sandfords.( From Parhams later writings, it appears he incorporated some, but not all, of the ideas he observed into his view of Bible truths (which he later taught at his Bible schools).() In addition to having an impact on what he taught, it appears he picked up his Bible school model, and other approaches, from Sandfords work.(  When he returned from this sabbatical, those left in charge of his healing home had taken over and, rather than fighting for control, Parham started Bible College at Topeka in October 1900. The school was modeled on Sandfords Holy Ghost and Us Bible School, and Parham continued to operate on a faith basis, charging no tuition. He invited all ministers and Christians who were willing to forsake all, sell what they had, give it away, and enter the school for study and prayer. About 40 people (including dependents) responded.( The only text book was the Bible, and the teacher was the Holy Spirit (with Parham as mouthpiece).(Blumhofer 1993, p. 50.)Prior to starting his Bible school, Parham had heard of at least one individual in Sandfords work who spoke in tongues and had reprinted the incident in his paper. He had also come to the conclusion that there was more to a full baptism than others acknowledged at the time.(  By the end of 1900, Parham had led his students at Bethel Bible School through his understanding that there had to be a further experience with God, but had not specifically pointed them to speaking in tongues. While Parhams account indicates that when classes were finished at the end of December, he left his students for a few days, asking them to study the Bible to determine what evidence was present when the early church received the Holy Spirit,( this is not clear from the other accounts.((  The students had several days of prayer and worship, and held a New Years Eve watch-night service at Bethel (December 31, 1900). The next evening (January 1, 1901) they also held a worship service, and it was that evening that Ozman felt impressed to ask to be prayed for to receive the fullness of the Holy Spirit.(  Immediately after being prayed for, she began to speak in what they referred to as in tongues, speaking in what was believed to be a known language.(Apostolic Faith MovementFinding support for this new experience was difficult and within months Parhams ministry had dissolved. It was not until 1903 that his fortunes improved when he preached on Christs healing power at Dorado Springs, Missouri, a popular health resort. Mary Arthur, wife of a prominent citizen of Kansas, claimed she had been healed under Parhams ministry. She and her husband invited Parham to preach his message in Galena, which he did through the winter of 1903-1904 in a warehouse seating hundreds. In January, the Missouri, News Herald reported that 1,000 had been healed and 800 had claimed conversion. In the small mining towns of southwest Missouri and southeastern Kansas, Parham developed a strong following that would form the backbone of his movement for the rest of his life.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 53.) Out of the Galena meetings, Parham gathered a group of young coworkers who would travel from town to town in bands proclaiming the apostolic faith. Unlike other preachers with a holiness-oriented message, Parham encouraged his followers to dress stylishly so as to show the attractiveness of the Christian life. It was at this time in 1904 that the first frame church built specifically as a Pentecostal assembly was constructed in Kansas. Other apostolic faith assemblies (Parham disliked designating local Christian bodies as churches) were began in the Galena area.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 54.) Parhams movement soon spread throughout Texas, Kansas, and Oklahoma. In Houston, Parhams ministry included conducting a Bible school around 1906. Several African Americans were influenced heavily by Parhams ministry there, including J. Seymour.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 55.) Both Parham and Seymour preached to Houstons African Americans, and Parham had planned to send Seymour out to preach to the black communities throughout Texas. In 1906 however, Seymour left Houston to become the associate pastor of an African-American holiness mission in Angeles, California. Seymours work in Los Angeles would eventually develop into the Street Revival, which is considered by many as the birthplace of the Pentecostal movement. Seymour requested and received a license as a minister of Parhams Apostolic Faith Movement, and he initially considered his work in Los Angeles under Parhams authority.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 55.) However, Seymour soon broke with Parham over his harsh criticism of the emotional worship at Asuza Street and the intermingling of whites and blacks in the services.(Gary B. McGee, Tongues, The Bible Evidence: The Revival Legacy of Charles F. Parham, Enrichment Journal.) This, and his support of Israelism, has often led people to consider him as a racist; however, some have noted that Parham was the first to reach across racial lines to African Americans and Mexican Americans and included them in the young Pentecostal movement. He preached in black churches and invited a black woman, Lucy Farrow, to preach at his campmeeting in south Texas in 1906. In the context of the early 20th century, Parhams views on race reflected those of his time, but he was willing at times to defy those social mores when it was not a popular thing to do.( Another blow to his influence in the young Pentecostal movement were allegations of sexual misconduct in fall 1906 and especially in 1907. In addition there were allegations of financial irregularity and of doctrinal aberrations.( As the focus of the movement moved from Parham to Seymour, Parham became resentful. His attacks on emerging leaders coupled with the allegations alienated him from much of the movement that he began. He became an embarrassment to a new movement which was trying to establish its credibility.(DeathAs a boy, Parham had contracted a severe fever which damaged his heart and contributed to his poor health. At one time he almost died. Parham recovered to an active preaching life, strongly believing that God was his healer. While he recovered from the rheumatic fever, it appears the disease probably weakened his heart muscles and was a contributing factor to his later heart problems and early death.(  By 1927 early symptoms of heart problems were beginning to appear, and by the fall and summer of 1928, after returning from a trip to Palestine (which had been a lifetime desire), Parhams health began to further deteriorate.In early January 1929, Parham took a long car ride with two friends to Texas, where he was to be presenting his pictures of Palestine. On January 5, he collapsed while showing his slides. When his wife arrived, she found out that his heart was bad, and he was unable to eat. Against his wishes (he wanted to continue his preaching tour), his family brought him home to Springs, Kansas, where he died on the afternoon of January 29, 1929.()(Sarah Parham, p. 413.)BeliefsParhams beliefs developed over time. Several factors influenced his theological ideas. He preferred to work out doctrinal ideas in private meditation, he believed the Holy Spirit communicated with him directly, and he rejected established religious authority. He focused on salvation by faith; healing by faith; laying on of hands and prayer; sanctification by faith; coming (premillennial) of Christ; the baptism of the Holy Ghost and fire, which seals the bride and bestows the gifts.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 46.)  Initial evidenceHis most important theological contributions were his beliefs about the baptism with the Holy Spirit. There were Christians speaking in tongues and teaching an experience of Spirit baptism before 1901. However, Parham was the first to identify tongues as the Bible evidence of Spirit baptism. It is not clear when he began to preach the need for such an experience, but it is clear that he did by 1900. Initially, he understood the experience to have eschatological significanceit sealed the bride for the marriage supper of the Lamb.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 46.) The bride of Christ consisted of 144,000 people taken from the church who would escape the horrors of the tribulation. It was Parhams desire for assurance that he would be included in the rapture that led him to search for uniform evidence of Spirit baptism.Later, Parham would emphasize speaking in tongues and evangelism, defining the purpose of Spirit baptism as an enduement with power for service.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 50.) Parham believed that the tongues spoken by the baptized were actual human languages, which would eliminate the need for missionaries to learn foreign languages and thus aid the spread of the gospel.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 52.)Other beliefsParham believed in annihilationismthat the wicked are not eternally tormented in hell but are destroyed. According to this belief, immortality is conditional, and only those who receive Christ as lord and savior will live eternally. He stated in 1902, Orthodoxy would cast this entire company into an eternal burning hell; but our God is a God of love and justice, and the flames will reach those only who are utterly reprobate.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 45.) He also believed in Israelism, an ideology maintaining that the Anglo-Saxon peoples were the Lost Tribes of Israel.(Blumhofer 1993, p. 47.)  He also supported Herzl and the struggle for a homeland, lecturing on the subject often.Pentecostals would reject Parhams belief that only Spirit baptized Christians would be taken in the rapture. More vehement was the rejection of his teachings on British Israelism and the annihilation of the wicked.(LegacyParham originated the doctrine of initial evidencethat the baptism of the Holy Spirit is evidenced by speaking in tongues.( It was this doctrine that made Pentecostalism distinct from other holiness Christian groups that spoke in tongues or believed in an experience subsequent to salvation and sanctification. In a move criticized by Parham,( his Apostolic Faith Movement merged with other Pentecostal groups in 1914 to form the Council of the Assemblies of God in the United States of America.(Creech, Joe (1996). Visions of Glory: The Place of the Azusa Street Revival in Pentecostal History. Church History 65, no. 3. Pages 415417.) Today, the worldwide of God is the largest Pentecostal denomination. The Charles F. Parham Center for Pentecostal-Charismatic Studies is an independent research facility on the campus of South Texas Bible Institute in Houston, Texas. It is one of several organizations to consider Parham a founding leader of the Pentecostal movement.(http://www.stbi.edu/cfp_intro.html) References Further reading*A Voice Crying in the Wilderness (Baxter Springs, KS: Apostolic Faith Bible College, 1902)*The Everlasting Gospel (Baxter Springs, KS: Apostolic Faith Bible College, 1911)*Selected Sermons of the Late Charles F. Parham, ed Sarah E. Parham (Baxter Springs, KS: Apostolic Faith Bible College, 1941)*The Life of Charles F. Parham, Founder of the Apostolic Faith Movement, by Sarah E. Parham (Baxter Springs, KS: Apostolic Faith Bible College, 1930)Fox ParhamParhamja:Fox ParhamFox ParhamFox ParhamFox ParhamFox Parham
940246
Nakusp,_British_Columbia
footnotes               The Village of Nakusp () is a small community located on the shores of Upper Arrow Lake, a portion of the River, in the West Kootenay region of Columbia. The town has a population of around 1,800, and it is known primarily for its nearby springs, which are a popular destination for tourists, as well as its picturesque mountain lakeside setting.Servicesthumb|left|200px|Nakusp beachNakusp has a recreational centre that consists of an ice rink, squash courts, curling rink and an auditorium as well as outdoor tennis courts and a soccer field. Lakes Hospital serves the village and surrounding communities. There is an elementary school, a high school, and a campus of College. The schools are part of District 10 Arrow Lakes which has its board office in Nakusp. The area also provides many opportunities for recreation, including the Summit Lake Ski Hill, a short drive out of town towards New Denver.HistoryThe area around Nakusp was occupied by aboriginal peoples from the Shuswap, Sinixt and Kutenai First Nations. In 1811, the first reported European explorer on the Arrow Lakes was Finan McDonald, an associate of David Thompson.(http://www.nakusp.com/siteengine/activepage.asp?PageID3 Village of Nakusp History)thumb|left|200px|The waterfront walkwayEuropean settlers arrived in 1890, and the settlement took shape in 1892 with opening of the first post office, the first store and the first sawmill. The nearest train link was the CPR at Revelstoke, so all goods were shipped to the fledgling port of Nakusp. In 1954, the last of the sternwheelers, the Minto was retired.The construction of the Dam north of Castlegar in 1968 and the resulting rise of the lake level caused the rearrangement of the village and its waterfront.(Wilson, J.W. (1973). People in the Way. Toronto, ON: University of Toronto Press.)Mining was historically the most important industry in the area, but it was eclipsed by forestry which is today the major economic base of the village.(http://www.nakusp.com Village of Nakusp History)CultureNakusp is home to a radio station, CJHQ-FM.In 2004 the village held its first Music Fest, which has proved to be a popular attraction. Since then, the Festival has gotten bigger, supporting larger names. It is now known as the Interiors largest classic rock festival, although classic rock isnt the only genre being played.Notable peopleLarsen is a professional ice hockey left winger who played several seasons in the Hockey League.ClimateNotes(External links*Village of Nakusp*Nakusp Music Fest Website*Nakusp Hot Springs*Halcyon Hot Springsfr:Nakusp
946141
List_of_people_from_Cornwall
This is a list of people from Cornwall, a county of England in the Kingdom. Those included are either native Cornish people or others who have been long-term residents. The demonym of Cornwall is Cornish. This list is arranged alphabetically by surname if available:__NOTOC__A* Couch Adams, co-discoverer of the planet Neptune(Roger Hutchins, Adams, John Couch (18191892), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* An Gof (Michael Joseph), leader of the Cornish Rebellion of 1497()* Arnold, watchmaker and pioneer of the chronometer(Jonathan Betts, Arnold, John (1735/61799), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Arundell, leader of the Rebellion of 1549(J. P. D. Cooper, Arundell, Humphrey (1512/131550), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Jan 2008  accessed 17 Dec 2008)B* Jonah Barrington, squash player()* William Bickford, inventor of the safety fuse(Ronald M. Birse, Bickford, William (bap. 1774, d. 1834), rev., Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Sheila Bird, local history writer from Falmouth()* Janie Bolitho, crime writer()* Thomas Bond, topographer from Looe(John Westby-Gibson, Bond, Thomas (17651837), rev. Christine North, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 23 Jan 2009)* John Boson, Boson, and Boson, 18th-century writers in the Cornish language(Matthew Spriggs, Boson family (per. c.16751730), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Jan 2008  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Maria Branwell, mother of the Bront sisters()C* Richard Carew, translator and antiquary(S. Mendyk, Carew, Richard (15551620), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Carne, geologist(Denise Crook, Carne, Elizabeth Catherine Thomas (18171873), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Carne, geologist, industrialist and Fellow of the Royal Society(Denise Crook, Carne, Joseph (17821858), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Causley, poet ()* Clift, naturalist and Fellow of the Royal Society (Phillip R. Sloan, Clift, William (17751849), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Oct 2007  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Henry Collins, mining engineer, mineralogist and geologist ()* of Cornwall, Cornish ruler and saint* Cookworthy, discoverer of china clay (kaolinite) in Cornwall (Winchester, Angus J. L. (2004) Cookworthy, William (17051780), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Corentin, missionary to Brittany()* Corineus, the legendary founder of Cornwall in of Monmouths Regum Britanniae(Corineus. (2008). In Britannica. Retrieved December 16, 2008, from Encyclopdia Britannica Online: http://www.britannica.com/EBchecked/topic/137554/Corineus)* Couch, naturalist and physician( )* Quiller Couch, naturalist(G. T. Bettany, Couch, Richard Quiller (18161863), rev. Yolanda Foote, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)D* Darke, playwright()* Sir Davy, scientist, inventor and President of the Society(David Knight, Davy, Sir Humphry, baronet (17781829), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Dowriche, historian, poet and protestant writer(Joann Ross, Anne Dowriche in Diana Maury Robin, Anne R. Larsen, and Carole Levin (eds.), Encyclopedia of women in the Renaissance: Italy, France, and England. Santa Barbara, CA: ABC-CLIO, 2007; pg. 115.)* du Maurier(Margaret Forster, Du Maurier , Dame Daphne (19071989), rev., Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 20 Dec 2008)* Dunkin, FRS, President of the Astronomical Society and the Institution of Cornwall(Allan Chapman, Dunkin, Edwin (18211898), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)E* Richard Edmonds, geologist and antiquary(Robert Hunt, Edmonds, Richard (18011886), rev. Denise Crook, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004 accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Passmore Edwards, Chartist and philanthropist(A. J. A. Morris, Edwards, John Passmore (18231911), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Oct 2008  accessed 16 Dec 2008)*family of Enys in Cornwall, includes many landowners, MPs and public officials( Burkes Genealogical and Heraldic Dictionary of the Landed Gentry  Part 1 (1862),  Page 551 Enys of Enys, on Google Books.)F* Flamank, leader of the Rebellion of 1497(Ian Arthurson, Flamank , Thomas (d. 1497), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Jan 2008  accessed 17 Dec 2008)* Fleetwood, drummer (http://www.fleetwoodmac.net/fwm/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id57&Itemid71)(http://www.rottentomatoes.com/celebrity/mick_fleetwood/)(http://keynotespeakers.com/speaker_detail.php?speakerid4779)(http://www.zildjian.com/En-Us/artists/artistDetail.ad2?artistID2590)* Foote, dramatist (accessed 15 Sept 2009)* Robert Were Fox, FRS, geologist(Denise Crook, Fox, Robert Were (17891877), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Jan 2008  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* family of Falmouth, entrepreneurs and philanthropistsG* Gaisford, GMTV presenter and reporter: trained at College Falmouth()* Gendall()* George()* Gilbert, applied mathematician and technocrat, President of the Royal Society(Miller, David Philip (2004), Gilbert Giddy, Davies (17671839), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Oct 2007  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Golding(Kevin McCarron, Golding, Sir William Gerald (19111993), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, May 2006  accessed 20 Dec 2008)* Gorlois, a mythical of Cornwall* Graham, Poldark series(Dennis Barker, Graham, Winston Mawdsley (1908?2003), Dictionary of National Biography, online edn, University Press, Jan 2007  accessed 20 Dec 2008)* Gregor, discoverer of titanium and clergyman(Boase, G. C. (2004), Gregor, William (17611817), rev. Anita McConnell, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004; online edn, Oct 2005  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Sir Gurney, inventor of limelight(G. B. Smith, Gurney, Sir Goldsworthy (17931875), rev. Anita McConnell, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)H* John Hawkins, geologist, traveller and FRS(H. S. Torrens, Hawkins, John (17611841), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Heald()* Healey, automotive engineer (http://www.austin-healey-club.com/Pages/Donald-Healey.html)* Hellins, FRS, mathematician, curate of Constantine.(R. E. Anderson, Hellins, John (d. 1827), rev. Adrian Rice, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004; online edn, May 2008  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Hewish, astronomer()* Graham Hicks (born 1990), guitarist and comedian, popular in Tanzania*Robert Hicks, asylum superintendent()*Hobhouse, humanitarian during the War(http://www.spartacus.schoolnet.co.uk/Whobhouse.htm)* Hocking, author and preacher(R. G. Burnett, Hocking, Silas Kitto (18501935), rev. Sayoni Basu, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004; online edn, May 2006  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Wellington Hunkin, bishop of Truro()J* Jenner(Peter W. Thomas, Jenner, Henry (18481934), Dictionary of National Biography, online edn, University Press, May 2005  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Birch Jerrard, mathematician (http://www-history.mcs.st-andrews.ac.uk/Biographies/Jerrard.html)* Brown Jordan, engineer(Anita McConnell, Jordan, Thomas Brown (18071890), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Richard Jose, singer()* Joyce, skateboarder and member of Dirty SanchezK*Edsel Kragg, performance artist(Edsel Kragg at the Internet Movie Database (IMDb))L* Richard Lander, explorer of Africa(Elizabeth Baigent, Lander, Richard Lemon (18041834), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Latham, contemporary witch and village wisewoman of Buryan, Cornwall()* le Carr()* Charles Lee, (18701956)()* Loam, inventor of the engine()* Richard Lower, transfusion pioneer(Marcus B. Simpson jun., Lower, Richard (16311691), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)*Lucas (15 January 1900 &ndash; 21 June 2010)(Oldest people in Britain) from Bude, Cornwall was a British supercentenarian.M* Mann, crime writer()* of Cornwall, ruler of Cornwall in the legend of and Iseult (see also Tristan)* Martyn, former England footballer ()* Mayow, physiologist()* McGrath, comedian (http://www.information-britain.co.uk/famousbrits.php?id3189)* Paul Moyle, meteorologist and mining writer(Denise Crook, Moyle, Matthew Paul (17881880), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Murdoch, engineer, inventor and sometime Cornish resident(John C. Griffiths, Murdock , William (17541839), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Oct 2007  accessed 16 Dec 2008)N* Morton Nance(Brian Murdoch, Nance, Robert Morton (18731959), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Nettles, actor()* William Noye, Victorian entomologist(F. H. N. Smith (1997). The Moths and Butterflies of Cornwall and The Isles of Scilly. Wallingford: Gem Publishing Company)* Newton, actressO* William Oliver, FRS, inventor of the Bath Oliver and a founder of the Mineral Water Hospital at Bath(Anne Borsay, Oliver, William (16951764), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)P* Pengelly, geologist and archeologist(Michael J. Bishop, Pengelly, William (18121894), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Pentreath, claimed to be the last speaker of the Cornish language.(Matthew Spriggs, Pentreath , Dorothy (bap. 1692, d. 1777), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 17 Dec 2008)* Petroc, a saint of Cornwall(Caroline Brett, Petroc (fl. 6th cent.), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Arthur Phillips, FRS, geologist, metallurgist, mining engineer(T. G. Bonney, Phillips, John Arthur (18221887), rev. Denise Crook, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Piran, a saint of Cornwall and tin miners(Caroline Brett, Piran Piran (supp. fl. 6th cent.), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008) Q * Arthur Quiller-Couch (aka Q), author and critic(Smith, Michael Douglas (2004) Couch, Sir Arthur Thomas Quiller- (18631944), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)R* Ralfs, botanist(James H. Price, Ralfs, John (18071890), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Hearle Rodd, ornithologist(B. B. Woodward, Rodd, Edward Hearle (18101880), rev. Yolanda Foote, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)S* Scawen, soldier and linguist(Matthew Spriggs, Scawen, William (16001689), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Scott-Thomas, actress (http://www.tmaw.co.uk/kristinst.html)T* Tangye, engineer(W. B. Owen, Tangye, Sir Richard (18331906), rev. H. C. G. Matthew, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Treffry, colonial administrator and international financier.()( )* Giant Tregeagle()* Trelawny(Kernowland childrens novels)* Jonathan Trelawny, Anglican bishop and antagonist of James II(Andrew M. Coleby, Trelawny, Sir Jonathan, third baronet (16501721), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 17 Dec 2008)*Trelawny, journalist and Radio 3 presenter(BBC Radio 3 bio)* Trengrouse, inventor of a rocket-powered maritime rescue system(Pollard, A. F. (2004), Trengrouse, Henry (17721854), rev. R. C. Cox, Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, 2004  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Trescothick England cricketer of Cornish lineage. (http://www.ancestry.com/facts/trescothick-family-history-uk.ashx)* Trevail architect, mayor of Truro and President of the Society of Architects(Best, R. S. The life and good works of John Passmore Edwards, with an appendix on the architect Silvanus Trevail, who designed nine Passmore Edwards buildings (pp.47-48). Dyllansow Truran (1982) ISBN 0-907566-18-9.)* Trevelyan author and publisher()* Trevithick, inventor, engineer and builder of the first locomotive(Payton, Philip, Trevithick, Richard (17711833), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Oct 2007  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* Tristan, hero of the and Iseult legend, nephew of of CornwallV* Vivian, Trevithicks cousin and collaborator, and captain of Mine (Payton, Philip (2004), Trevithick, Richard (17711833), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Oct 2007  accessed 16 Dec 2008)W*William Wagstaff, ornithologist and naturalist(Radio Scilly)(Sea Salt Cornwall Feature)(Guardian Article)* Wallis, explorer of the Pacific(Glyndwr Williams, Wallis, Samuel (17281795), Dictionary of National Biography, University Press, Sept 2004; online edn, Jan 2008  accessed 16 Dec 2008)* family of Caerhays and Burncoose, landowners and entrepreneursSee also*Cornwall-related lists*people*of Cornish Christians*of Cornish saintsReferencesa dus a Gernow
949056
Fivepenny_Piece
Fivepenny Piece are a five-piece band, originally formed in 1969 in the area of East Lancashire around Ashton-under-Lyne and nearby Stalybridge in Cheshire. The band met and performed on Wednesday nights at Ashtons Broadoak Hotel, which gave them their original name The Wednesday Folk in 1967.CareerTheir break came when they entered and won the TV talent show Faces in 1968, which led to a contract with the Gay agency, a contract with EMI, and their new name.The bands original members all hailed from the Ashton/Stalybrige area.  Many of their mostly self-penned songs reflected their roots, using Lancashire dialect, with references to the mining and weaving trades, the mills and factories, and the Lancashire characters who lived in the area. But there was another side to the groups music, perhaps best described as more pop oriented. The bands music is most often categorised as folk, though many felt that is too limiting a description.The original personnel were John Meeks (born 24 March 1937, Stalybridge, Cheshire) guitar, vocals); Johns sister Lynda Meeks (born 3 August 1947, Stalybridge) (vocals); brothers George Radcliffe (born 9 August 1937, Ashton-under-Lyne, Lancashire) (bass, vocals) and Colin Radcliffe (born 19 January 1934, Ashton-under-Lyne) (guitar, vocals); and Eddie Crotty (born 24 February 1942, Staylbridge) (guitar, vocals). Meeks and Colin Radliffe wrote most of their best-known songs, although Crotty also penned several. The unofficial sixth member of the band was the drummer Phil Barlow, who accompanied them in many of their concerts and on their albums.During the bands 1970s heyday they released over a dozen albums for EMI and then Philips, and reached the Top 10 in the Albums Chart with their LP Cotton.() They performed many times on national television, and had their own Television series, The Fivepenny Piece Show.By the early 1980s the group had reached an impasse, and John Meeks departure was followed soon afterwards by Lyndas. With Johns replacement Trevor Chance (born 1 March 1942, Gilsland, Cumberland) and Andrea Mullins (formerly of the Caravelles), the band continued until 1985 when they broke up.The band later reformed, and played occasional gigs with various personnel, including the Lancashire folk singer and comedian Wrigley - Crotty and George Radcliffe continued to play in the band, along with Mullins. George Radcliffe died at the end of 2002, whilst Eddie Crotty, the sole surviving original member, died in hospital on 11 April 2009, aged 67 years. Chart albums*Making Tracks (1973) - UK  #37*King Cotton (1976) UK #9(ReferencesExternal links*www.5pp.co.uk
951124
Auric_Goldfinger
Auric Goldfinger is a character and the main antagonist in the Bond film and novel Goldfinger. His first name, Auric, is an adjective meaning of gold. Fleming chose the name to commemorate the architect Goldfinger, who had built his home in Hampstead, near to Flemings; it is possible, though unlikely, that he disliked Goldfingers style of architecture and destruction of Victorian terraces and decided to name a memorable villain after him.() According to a 1965 Forbes article and New York Times, the Goldfinger persona was based on gold mining magnate W. Engelhard, Jr.()In 2003, the Film Institute declared Auric Goldfinger the 49th greatest villain in the past 100 years of film. In a poll on IMDb, Auric Goldfinger was voted the most sinister James Bond villain, beating out in order Stavro Blofeld, Dr. No, Zorin, and Largo.(Daily Poll Results) Magazine listed Auric Goldfinger as the 91st greatest villain of all time.Auric Goldfinger was played by German actor Frbe. Goldfinger was banned in Israel after it was revealed that Frbe had been a member of the party during War II. The ban, however, was lifted many years later when a Jewish family publicly thanked Frbe for protecting them from persecution during the war.Gert Frbe, who did not speak English well, was dubbed in the film by Michael Collins, an English actor. In the German version, Frbe dubbed himself back again. Of his role as Goldfinger, Frbe later remarked: I am a big man, and I have a laugh to match my size. The ridiculous thing is that since I played Goldfinger in the James Bond film there are some people who still insist on seeing me as a cold, ruthless villain - a man without laughs.Novel biographyIn the novel, Auric Goldfinger is a 42-year-old expatriate who emigrated at age 20 in 1937 from Riga, Latvia. He is 5 feet (152 cm) tall, has blue eyes, red hair, and has a passion for his tan.Goldfingers name was borrowed from Ian Flemings neighbour in his Hampstead home, architect Goldfinger, and his character bears some resemblance.() Ern Goldfinger consulted his lawyers when the book was published, prompting Fleming to suggest renaming the character Goldprick, but Goldfinger eventually settled out of court in return for his legal costs, six copies of the novel, and an agreement that the characters first name Auric would always be used. Goldfinger is typically a German-Jewish name, and the protagonists of the novel know this, but neither Bond nor Mr. Du Pont think Goldfinger is Jewish. Instead, Bond pegs the red-haired, blue-eyed man as a Balt. And, indeed, Goldfinger proves an expatriate Latvian.()Now a UK commonwealth citizen naturalised to Nassau, he has become the richest man in England, though his wealth is not in English banks and he hasnt paid taxes on it. Rather, it is spread as bullion in many countries. Goldfinger is the treasurer of SMERSH, Bonds nemesis. Goldfinger fancies himself an expert pistol shot who never misses, and always shoots his opponents through the right eye. He tells Bond he has done so with four Mafia heads at the end of the novel. Goldfinger is obsessed with gold, going so far as to have yellow-bound erotic photographs, and have his lovers painted head to toe in gold so that he can make love to gold. (He leaves an area near the spine unpainted, but painting this area also is what kills Masterton, as in the film). He is also a jeweller, a metallurgist, and a smuggler.When Goldfinger first meets Bond in Miami, he claims that he is agoraphobic; a ploy to allow him to cheat a previous acquaintance of Bonds at a game of two-handed Canasta. Bond figures out how Goldfinger is managing this, and blackmails him by forcing him to admit his deception. This incident also establishes Goldfinger as boundlessly greedy - as whatever sums he can gain by this elaborate cheating are negligible compared with what he already has in his possession. Goldfinger is also an avid golfer, but is known at his club for being a smooth cheater there, also. When Bond contrives to play a match with Goldfinger, he again cheats the cheater by switching Goldfingers Dunlop 1 golf ball with a Dunlop 7  he had found while playing. In both the novel and film, Goldfinger is aided in his crimes by his manservant, Oddjob, a mute, monstrously strong Korean who ruthlessly eliminates any threat to his employers affairs.Goldfinger is the owner of Enterprises Auric A.G. in Switzerland, maker of metal furniture, which is purchased by many airlines including India. Twice a year, Goldfinger drives his vintage Silver Ghost car from England to Enterprises Auric. Bond learns that Goldfinger makes drops of gold bars for SMERSH along the way, and that his cars bodywork is 18 carat (75%), solid white gold under the ploy that the added weight is armour plating. Once at Enterprises Auric, his car is stripped down, melted and made into seating for an airline company that Enterprises Auric is heavily invested in. The plane(s) are then flown to India where the seats are melted down again into gold bars and sold for a much higher premium rate; 100 to 200 percent profit.Operation Grand Slam200px|thumb|left|Goldfinger during Operation Grand Slam.In the novel, Goldfinger captures Bond and threatens to cut him in half with a high-power buzz saw. Bond is also tortured at the same time, as Oddjob works his pressure points. He offers to work for Goldfinger in exchange for his life, but Goldfinger initially refuses to spare his prisoner as Bond blacks out. He wakes to find that Goldfinger is going to take him up on his offer after all, however. Bond becomes Goldfingers prisoner and secretary (the unlikelihood of which led to a recurrent joke in the spoof Austin Powers films). While working at this job he finds out about Operation Grand Slam. This is Goldfingers codename for his scheme that involves knocking off the Bullion Depository at Knox, Kentucky. Through the use of a nerve agent (GB, also known as Sarin), Goldfinger plans to poison the water supply at Fort Knox, killing everyone at the base. From there, Goldfinger would use an bomb designed for a Corporal Intermediate Range Guided Missile that he had purchased for one million USD in Germany, to blow open Fort Knoxs impregnable vault. With the help of American gangsters, Goldfinger would then remove roughly $15 billion in gold bullion by truck and train, and escape to the Union on a cargo boat.(After publication of the novel, the details of Operation Grand Slam were questioned, with critics noting it would have taken hours if not days to remove $15 billion from Fort Knox, during which the U.S. Army would inevitably intervene. The issue of getting every soldier on the base to drink the poisoned water without an alarm was also raised. A final problem that was the clean atomic bomb, tactical or not, in all likelihood would not only have annihilated the vault. Consequently, the film uses a different plan: The bomb is dirty, and the destruction and contamination of the gold, not its theft, is the objective, so that the value of Goldfingers own gold would increase tenfold. The film points out logistical flaws in the novels original plan during a confrontation between Goldfinger and Bond.)Bond foils Goldfingers plan by getting word to Leiter of the impending operation, by means of a message taped inside an airliner toilet. With the help of Pentagon, Leiter is able to stop Goldfinger and foil the operation. Goldfinger escapes, however.ConclusionLater, Goldfinger and his henchman learn from SMERSH who Bond is, and determine to take him with them in defecting to the Soviet Union. They pose as doctors to incapacitate crew and passengers (including Bond) with drugged inoculations. Then they hijack the BOAC Boeing 377 Stratocruiser (service ceiling 32,000 ft), carrying Goldfingers total savings of gold. The hijacked plane is headed for Soviet Union airspace. In the novel, Oddjob meets his end when he is sucked through an airliner window after Bond pierces it with a knife. Goldfinger then attacks Bond by kicking him. Bond and Goldfinger engage in a brief struggle, during which Bond is seized by a violent rage for the first time in his life, strangling Goldfinger to death. Bond then turns to the pilots and forces the airplane to turn back from its intended flightpath, and this causes it to ditch in the ocean after running out of fuel. The airplane sinks rapidly (presumably due to its payload of gold), with Bond and Goldfingers pilot, Galore, as the only survivors.Henchmen* Oddjob* GaloreAssociatesIn addition to Henchmen, Goldfinger enlists the help of several American gangsters:* Helmut M. Springer &mdash; The Purple Gang (Detroit) (This gang is not fictional, but existed historically).*:Springer backs out of the deal and does not participate in Goldfingers Operation Grand Slam. Moments later, Springer has an accident, falling down the staircase as he is leaving. In fact, he and his bodyguard are killed by Oddjob.* Jed Midnight &mdash; Shadow Syndicate (Miami, Havana)* Billy (The Grinner) Ring &mdash; The Machine (Chicago)* Jack Strap &mdash; The Spangled Mob (Las Vegas); see Diamonds Are Forever* Mr. Solo &mdash; Unione Siciliano (the Mafia)* Miss Galore &mdash; The Cement Mixers (Harlem, York City) The Cement Mixers had previously been a band of all-female acrobats headed by trapeze artist Pussy Galore, called Pussy Galore and the Abrocats. When their act failed, they had become cat-burglars. Pussy in Flemings novel is openly lesbian, but is ultimately seduced by Bond.Goldfingerisms from the novel*Money is an effective winding sheet.*The safest way to double your money is to fold it twice and put it in your pocket.*Laws are the crystallised prejudices of society.*Once is happenstance. Twice is coincidence. The third time its enemy action. (Attributed as a saying in Chicago, and used in three sections also as titles for the novels three main sections.)*Riches may not make you friends, but they greatly increase the quality of your enemies.Film biographyIn the film, Goldfinger is a gold smuggler, accomplishing this feat by having a car built with gold body castings and transporting it via airplane. Once the car arrives at its destination, Goldfinger has the body-work re-smelted. However, this secret smuggling operation drew suspicion from Colonel Smithers of the of England and it resulted in Bond being sent to investigate. Goldfinger is also an avid golfer who plays with a Slazenger 1 ball (changed from a Dunlop in the novel presumably for legal reasons). He is defeated, however, when he is tricked by Bond after attempting to cheat. Auric Goldfinger owns many properties throughout the world including Auric Enterprises, AG, which is the headquarters for most of his smuggling operations. Located in Switzerland, it is where Bond is nearly cut in half by an industrial laser when Goldfinger has him bound to a table. The film also contains what are considered two of the most famous exchanges between Bond and a villain::Bond: I think you made your point. Thank you for the demonstration.:Goldfinger: Choose your next witticism carefully, Mr. Bond. It may be your last.and:Bond: Do you expect me to talk?:Goldfinger: No, Mr. Bond. I expect you to die.Goldfinger also owns a stud-farm in Kentucky called Auric Stud.In the film, Felix Leiter says that Goldfinger is British, however this may simply mean he possesses British citizenship, judging by his accent and red-blond hair he is probably German by birth. Frbe was chosen as the villain because producers Saltzman and Broccoli had seen his performance in a German thriller titled geschah am hellichten Tag (It happened in broad daylight, 1958), which is based on the story Das Versprechen (The Pledge), by Drrenmatt. In that film, Frbe played a killer named Schrott, who kills children to vent his frustrations with his domineering wife. Broccoli and Saltzman had seen the movie and decided upon the big bad German for the role. In the film, Goldfinger reveals his fascination with Nazi gold when Bond tempts him to betting high stakes against a lost, historical Nazi gold bar, an incident not in the novel (the golf game is merely for a large amount of cash).SchemeGoldfingers film scheme, codenamed Operation Grand Slam, involves breaking into the Bullion Depository at Knox, penetrating the main storage building with the high powered laser, and detonating a dirty nuclear weapon inside, thus contaminating the United States gold reserve and thereby dramatically increasing the value of his gold holdings (while also providing the Communist Chinese, from whom Goldfinger has obtained the nuclear material, an opportunity to create economic chaos in the West).DeathAfter his plan to contaminate the gold is thwarted, Goldfinger tricks Bond into getting onto his private jet as it takes off for Cuba. After Bond has boarded the plane and it has taken off, Goldfinger appears and announces his intention to kill him, but when Bond makes a grab for his golden pistol it goes off and shatters a window. In the fate suffered by his henchman Oddjob in the novel, he is sucked out of the cabin to his doom, but Bond and Galore (the pilot) manage to escape the plane just before it crashes into the ocean, parachuting to safety on an island. Before parachuting from the plane, Pussy inquires about Goldfingers fate, prompting Bond to quip that hes playing his golden harp.(http://www.007.info/Villains.asp)Henchmen*Oddjob*Galore and Pussy Galores Flying Circus* Kisch* Mr. Ling* Goldfingers private army of Korean foot soldiers with light blue jumpsuits and gold cummerbund armed with 98k rifles and 40 guns.Goldfingers golden motifs*In the novel Goldfinger has a yellow-jacketed pornographic book and gold-painted prostitutes, a yellow-painted car, yellow briefs for sunbathing, a blonde secretary, and a ginger-coloured cat (which is eaten by Oddjob). He employs Korean servants who are repeatedly referred to as yellow-faced. In compensation, the film adds many similar motifs by making Goldfingers female henchwomen in the film (save his jet stewardess, who is Korean) red-blonde, or blonde, including Pussy and all of her crew (both Masterson and Pussy specifically have black hair in the novel). Goldfinger also sports yellow or golden items of clothing in every film scene, including a golden pistol when disguised as a Colonel. Goldfingers factory henchmen in the film wear yellow sashes, Pussy at one point wears a metallic gold vest, and Pussys pilots wear yellow sunburst insignia on their uniforms. A bit of Goldfingers homage to gold (I love its colour, its brilliance, its divine heaviness) is one of few dialogue lines from the novel to be kept relatively intact in the film.*Goldfingers Silver Ghost of the novel is particularly appropriate for a personal armoured car capable of carrying heavy white-gold armour (which would have appeared silver), as some of this model was converted to the Armoured Car during and after W.W. I. This car is replaced in the film with a newer (1937) yellow-painted Royce Phantom III with 18 kt. gold bodywork. The license plate of this car is AU 1.*In the novel, Goldfinger may even eat and drink gold. At his house, Goldfinger and Bond dine on cheese souffl, and curry (which in pre-1970 Britain referred to a dish coloured yellow with turmeric; see British section in Curry#British_cuisine), and Bond drinks Piesporter Goldtrpfchen wine (named for town and vineyard, but like all white wines, gold in colour). Goldfinger in popular culture, and appearance in later fictional works and games * He is parodied in Powers in Goldmember as the titular Dutch villain, whose trademark was to paint his enemies genitalia gold, for he himself lost his genitalia in an unfortunate smelting incident. His accent was actually German.* Los Angeles ska-punk band Goldfinger got its name from the character.* Goldfinger and Oddjob are referenced in New Travellers Almanac that appears in the back of League of Extraordinary Gentlemen, Volume II comic book.*Auric Goldfinger and Oddjob are multiplayer characters in the video game Nightfire.  They are brought back to life in the 2004 Arts game Rogue Agent. In the game, Goldfinger recruits the protagonist, GoldenEye, a former secret agent ousted by MI6. Goldfinger is also an ally of Scaramanga, the villain of The Man with the Golden Gun and the SPECTRE organization. In the game, Goldfingers scientists develop what is considered to be the deadliest weapon known to mankind: the (Organic Mass Energy Neutralizer), and plan to use it against Dr. Nos forces. He is killed when, after having betrayed GoldenEye and Scaramanga and taken over his volcano lair, GoldenEye and Scaramanga make use of a computer virus to overload the O.M.E.N. Goldfinger (along with Dr. No) also makes a minor appearance as an unlockable character in the multiplayer mode of 2005 game From Russia With Love.* Goldfinger also appears in the animated series Bond Junior, in which he has a teenaged daughter, Goldie, who is as greedy and ruthless as her father.*Auric Goldfinger came 10th place in the 2002 Fictional 15.See also*(film)ReferencesGoldfingerGoldfingerGoldfingerGoldfingerGoldfingerGoldfingerGoldfingerGoldfinger
953175
Oranjemund_Constituency
thumb|250px|Oranjemund constituency in southern NamibiaOranjemund is a constituency in the Region of Namibia. It covers an area of 27,000 sqkm and has a population of 18,200 inhabitants. The main towns are the district capital Oranjemund and the mining town of Pinah, the constituency also contains the Sendelingsdrift border post.()Economic activities concentrate on mining and tourism, the  unemployment rate is 48%.(PoliticsIn the 2010 regional elections, SWAPOs Iita won the constituency with 1,928 votes. His only challenger was Murorua of the Rally for Democracy and Progress, who received 257 votes.(Results from the Electoral Commission of Namibia)References()(Wahlkreis)electoral de Oranjemund
956388
Eight_Legged_Freaks
 gross           $45,867,333()Eight Legged Freaks is a 2002 horror directed by Elkayem and stars Arquette, Whrer and Terra. The plot concerns a collection of spiders that are exposed to toxic waste, causing them to grow to gigantic proportions and begin killing and harvesting. The film was dedicated to the memory of Seurat, the mother of producer Devlin, who died of cancer the previous year.PlotIn the quiet mining town of Prosperity, Arizona, an accident involving a rabbit causes a barrel of toxic waste to land in a reservoir. An exotic spider farmer named Joshua (Noonan) has been making regular visits to the site, where he collects crickets for his spiders. Although the spiders have ingested the toxins, he is oblivious since the arachnids seem unaffected. Joshua shows Mike (Terra), a local boy, his collection. After Mike leaves, Joshua is bitten by an escaped tarantula and accidentally knocks down the spider cages. He is killed by the spiders and, after devouring him, the spiders grow to even huger proportions. His pet parrot is also presumed killed, when a tarantula grabs on to its head.On his way home, Mike is accosted by his mother, Sheriff Sam Parker (Whrer) and Deputy Pete pulling the toxic barrel out of the pond. Wade, the Mayor of Prosperity, is holding a town meeting in the mall about whether they should sell the mines and relocate. Chris McCormick (Arquette), whose father owned the mines before he died ten years ago, shows up and stands against Wades proposition. Chris also sparks a romance with Sam.Meanwhile, Harlan Griffiths (E. Doug), an eccentric extraterrestrial enthusiast, is broadcasting his theory that various missing pets around town have been abducted by extraterrestrials. Inevitably his theory is dismissed as the product of a deranged imagination. Mike sneaks out on foot and finds Joshua and the spiders missing, the farm covered in webbing, and the dead body of Joshua. Although he sees an enormous spider shadow in the mines and tells Chris that the spiders have grown to enormous sizes, based on a giant spider leg he found at the mine entrance, Chris disbelieves his story. Meanwhile, the mines have reopened with the miners searching for a famous gold lode.One miner is eaten by a gigantic spider, whose clan have made the mines their home. Seeing as the entire town is connected in some way to the mines, spiders show up in many different places. Ashley breaks up with her boyfriend Bret, and he and his motorcyclist friends are chased by jumping spiders, with him being the only survivor, accidentally cutting off the telephone line and being stuck in the mine. Chris finds out that his Aunt Gladys and her dog are abducted by a male orb weaver in their basement. Sam is convinced Chris and Mike are delusional. However, her skepticism fades when she witnesses a giant male orb-weaver attempting to abduct Ashley, her daughter and Chris; Sam saves them both.Sam contacts Pete and tells him to bring all guns in the police stations possession and they escape to Harlans trailer, knowing he has a radio station that he operates from within his trailer. As Sam broadcasts the threat over the radio, a giant tarantula, the tank of the horde, assaults the trailer but they manage to escape. As the town is besieged by vicious spider horde, Sam tells everybody to evacuate to the mall. Chris, Sam, Mike, Ashley, Harlan, Wade and many other townspeople all escape and barricade themselves in the mall (but Wade flees into the mines and locks the gate before the attack) and defend themselves from the spiders. Meanwhile, Harlan and Chris climb onto the roof and ascend the radio mast and try to get a signal to call the army as they are being attacked by the spiders, but are believed to be pranksters. Harlan jumps from the roof, after the tarantula breaks open the gates and lets the spiders enter the mall, and lands in some bushes, where he meets up with Pete. The two run from spiders as Chris meets up with the remaining townsfolk and goes down to the basement. Meanwhile Bret, still wandering the mines, gets a good peek at Consuela during her feeding and encounters the cowardly Wade before his abduction.While the townsfolk are in the basement, Bret arrives on a forklift that brings down the locked gate, and they all head to through the mines straight to the front entrance, discovering the methane-filled tunnels. After losing Norman and freeing Wade, Chris goes to look for his Aunt Gladys in the mines and finds her and the gold his father was searching for, but is confronted by the gigantic Conseula. He uses perfume to distract the spider and the escapes using Brets motorcycle. Chris then blows up the spiders and the mines utilizing Gladyss smoking addiction and the high concentrations of gas. The police finally arrive. They had not believed the reports of the spiders but believed Harlarns theory that the assailants were extraterrestrial in nature, until Chris tells them that the assailants were just spiders, that had ingested extremely high levels of toxic waste.As the story ends, Harlan is heard making a radio report about the spiders. He concludes that the town has decided to cover up the whole incident, but have let Harlan continue broadcasting the incident, knowing nobody will believe him. He also mentions Chris reopening the gold mines and putting everyone back to work, but tells us that is another story altogether. As the camera zooms in close on his mouth, it is clear that he now has three gold teeth.Cast*Arquette as Chris McCormick*Whrer as Sheriff Sam Parker*Terra as Mike Parker*Johansson as Ashley Parker*E. Doug as Harlan Griffiths*Overton as Deputy Pete Williams*Rippy as Wade*Czuchry as Bret*Ryan as Gladys*Earl Waterman as Norman the Janitor*Noonan (uncredited) as Joshua TaftProductionDirector Elkayem got the idea from his 1997 short film, Larger than Life, which also handled a spider-fighting storyline.The film was originally titled Arach Attack or Arac Attack (under which it was released in some parts of Europe and other countries around the world) but the similarity to Iraq Attack made the title seem inappropriate near the start of the Iraq War.The title Eight Legged Freaks is a line that Arquette ad-libbed in the movie: Get back, you eight-legged freaks!  The title however contains a punctuation error in that it drops the hyphen, changing both the meaning (eight freaks with legs instead of freaks with eight legs) and the pronunciation (legged as one syllable instead of two).;Filming locations* The town of Prosperity does not exist in Arizona. The scenes inside Prosperity Mall were actually shot in an abandoned mall in Arizona. The location was formerly Valley West Mall and also known as Manistee Mall. This movie would be the last operation that took place in the mall, as it was demolished soon after shooting was completed.* The scenes in Aunt Gladyss house in the kitchen and in Gladys basement were filmed at the Manistee Ranch in Glendale, Arizona.;Spiders used in the film* spider* spider* Tarantula (several species are featured, including the redknee tarantula, the Pink Foot Goliath, and the birdeater)* spider* funnel-web spider;Alternate credits* The alternate beginning is an extended version in which Harlan does a broadcast promoting the mall, after which a worker at the mall sees Wade having the toxic waste put in the basement.* In the alternate ending, after the mines are blown up, the townsfolk walk down a road to get help. They meet up with Pete and Harlan who were walking through the desert, Pete trying to convince Harlan the spiders were not aliens. Afterward, Sam and Chris kiss as the scene ends.ReceptionEight Legged Freaks currently holds an approval rating of 48% on Tomatoes.()ReferencesExternal links* * * * Attack  Angriff der achtbeinigen MonsterAttack, les monstres  huit pattesAttackAttack - Mostri a otto zampeLegged Freaks!Legged Freaks - Kjempeedderkoppene angriper!pajkwLegged FreaksLegged Freaks
958621
Douglas,_Alaska
Douglas, Alaska is an area on Island in southeastern Alaska. Itoriginated in 1881 as a place providing services to miners of the nearby gold mine, and was incorporated as a city in 1902. Douglas was once a larger town than neighboring Juneau, but dwindled in the early 1900s as mining activity moved to other locations. Today Douglas is a residential community on Douglas Island and is legally a part of the and Borough of Juneau. It is connected to Juneau, which is on the Alaska mainland, by a bridge over the Channel that separates them. Some historical reports indicate an early settler to the area may be credited for the naming of Douglas Island (Douglas A. Laska). The Department of Corrections has its headquarters in Douglas.(Department of Corrections Home Page. Department of Corrections. Retrieved on December 7, 2009.)thumbnail|700px|center|Panoramic photograph of Douglas, taken in 1914.References
962375
Nissen
Nissen may refer to:* a creature in Norse mythology, see Tomte* a Danish patronymic surname meaning son of Nis (Danish short form of Nicholas)* a building shaped like a tube cut in half along the middle and made from corrugated iron sheets, see hut* The Building in North Carolina People named Nissen include:* Nissen (1914-2010) inventor of the modern Trampoline* Nikolaus von Nissen (17611826), Danish diplomat and writer, known as a biographer of Wolfgang Amadeus Mozart* Nissen (1893-1980), German bass-baritone* Joerg Nissen (born 1935), German archaeologist.* Norman Nissen (18711930), Canadian mining engineer.* Nissen (18961981), German surgeon and inventor of the fundoplication.* Nissen (18701923), German industrialist and philanthropist.* E. Nissen (born 1949), heart specialist and chairman of cardiovascular medicine at the Cleveland Clinic.de:Nissenfr:Nissenja:(andre betydninger)
964466
USS_Lansdale_(DD-101)
{|Ship notes|}The first USS Lansdale (DD-101) was a Wickes-class destroyer in the States Navy during War I and later designated, DM-6 in the years following. She was named in honor of Philip Van Horne Lansdale.HistoryLansdale was laid down 20 April 1918 by River Shipbuilding Corporation, Massachusetts; launched 21 July 1918; sponsored by Mrs. Ethel S. Lansdale, widow of Lieutenant Lansdale; and commissioned 26 October 1918 at Boston, Comdr. C. W. Margruder in command.Assigned to the and Transport Force, Lansdale steamed to Norfolk 4 November to 7 November and joined a European bound convoy as escort 12 November. Sailing via the Azores, she reached Gibraltar 26 November for patrol duty in the Mediterranean. Operating out of Gibraltar until January 1919, she made three voyages to Tangier, Morocco, and one to Algiers, Algeria. Steaming to Venice, 4 January to 13 January, she joined the U.S. Naval Force operating the eastern Mediterranean. She performed dispatch duty in the Sea, principally between Venice and the ports of Austria (on Croatian coast). Departing Split, Croatia (then of Serbs, Croats and Slovenes, 10 June, she steamed to Gibraltar and the Azores and reached New York 22 June.During the next year Lansdale operated along the Atlantic coast with Destroyer Force, Atlantic Fleet. Arriving Philadelphia 11 July 1920, she was converted to a light minelayer and reclassified DM-6. She steamed to Rhode Island, 2 June to 3 June 1921; joined the Mine Force, Atlantic Fleet 5 July at Massachusetts; and until late October practiced laying mines off the England and Virginia coasts. After overhaul at Boston, she steamed to Guantanamo Bay 4 January to 9 January 1922 for maneuvers, mining exercises, and war games in the Indies with Mine Squadron 1. Departing Island 19 April, she arrived at Philadelphia 25 April and decommissioned 25 June.Lansdale recommissioned 1 May 1930 at Philadelphia, Comdr. Frank R. Berg in command. She joined Mine Squadron 1 at Yorktown 17 May; engaged in mining and tactical exercises along the eastern seaboard; then arrived at London, Connecticut, 30 September to serve as target ship for submarines. She departed 12 November; and, after visiting Boston, she arrived at Philadelphia 22 December. Remaining there, Lansdale decommissioned 24 March 1931. On 28 December 1936 she was reduced to a hulk for disposal in accordance with the London Treaty for limitation and reduction of naval armaments. Her name was struck from the Naval Register 25 January 1937, and she was sold 16 March 1939 to Union Shipbuilding Company, Maryland.References*External links* NavSource Photos
967337
Green_Pond,_New_Jersey
 cities  Green Pond is the name of both a lake and of a private lakeside residential community in northern Jersey.  The lakeside community is managed by two  corporations, Green Pond Corporation and Lake End Corporation.  Despite a name suggestive of a small lily pad and algae-coated pool, Green Pond lake is fairly large (approximately 2.5 mi long and 0.5 mi mile in breadth at its widest point - 465 acres (0.72 sq mi) total), and the water clarity is high due to the lakes source (underground cold-water springs).Green Pond is located in Rockaway Township in Morris County, but has a New Jersey (Passaic County) mailing address. Newfoundland came to wider attention in 2003 when large portions of the film, Station Agent, were filmed there.  Several scenes of this film took place on Green Pond Road (County Route 513), a public thoroughfare which connects a former York, Susquehanna and Western Railway depot and Route 23 to Lake End Road and to the private lanes of the Green Pond Village community.  Lakeside scenes of The Station Agent that were set on Green Pond were actually filmed elsewhere, as the Lake End and Green Pond Corporations denied lake access to the film-makers.New homeowners in either Green Pond or Lake End Corporations pay a fee to the relevant corporation in addition to the usual real estate closing fees, and become stockholders in exchange for an interest in the common lands which surround the community. Only stockholders and their guests may access the lake and the community facilities, which include tennis courts, ballfields, a community center, and a membership-only yacht club that races Comet sailboats.  On summer weekends and major holidays, a security guard is stationed at the entrance to Green Pond village to prevent unauthorized access to the beach areas.Green Pond is a spring-fed lake (elevation 1,048 feet) that runs along a roughly northeast-southwest axis, bordered on the longer, lateral sides by rocky terrain.  On the eastern side is Copperas Mountain (elevation 1,222 feet), and on the west, Green Pond Mountain (elevation 1,240 feet) rises sharply from the lake with a boulder-strewn shoreline.  The lakes outflow at the southwestern end is into tributaries of the River, which run through the States Armys Arsenal and through an area of legally-designated wetlands where development is restricted.The lake has a number of bars and other shoaling features, and the average depth is . There are deeper areas also: the maximum depth was measured at 54 feet during soundings taken in the 1970s by John Stenz and Doug Charlton.  The lake is stocked seasonally with trout and bass; other aquatic species include sunfish, perch, catfish, bluegills, pickerel, and snapping turtles.Geology and Mining HistoryThe geology of the Green Pond region is peculiar.(United States Geological Survey primer on New York City Geology) The lake is situated in the center of the precambrian York-New Jersey Highlands, a northeast-southwest system of folded and faulted igneous and metamorphic rocks that form numerous ridges and valleys. The Green Pond Outlier, named for the lake, is a thin belt of Paleozoic sedimentary rocks that bisects the precambrian crystalline rocks and extends for more than  between 80 in New Jersey and the York Thruway in New York.  In some places, the ground cover is glacial till from the moraine of the glaciation.From the Revolutionary War period onwards, the area around Green Pond was a site of extensive mining activity - especially iron mining, which peaked in the 19th century.  Currently, there is no active mining in New Jersey.  The name Copperas (an older term for sulfate) attests to this history, and the ruins of at least 3 mines are reportedly visible nearby:(W.S. Bayley, The Iron Mines of New Jersey (1910), New Jersey  Geological Survey, Final Report Series of the State geologist, volume VII, 512p.)* Canfield Mine at the base of Copperas Mountain, where the mined ore was magnetite hosted in Pochuck gneiss.* Winter Mine, iron in magnetite ore, located east of Green Pond, which opened in 1882 and reopened in the spring of 1885, but closed before 1886. The ore vein was 4 meters wide.* Pardee Mine, another iron mine in magnetite ore hosted in Poichuck gneiss. Located east of Green Pond at the base of Copperas Mountain, Pardee started about 1870 and closed in 1872, then reopened about 1882 and closed permanently in 1884. This mine reportedly produced 2,500 tons of ore.Settlement historyBefore Dutch settlement of northern Jersey began in the late 17th century, the region was home to the Lenape Native American tribes.  However, despite the 18th- and 19th-century mining activity in nearby areas, the Green Pond lakeshore and immediate environs were sparsely populated by permanent residents until the 20th century.  Green Pond village, at the north end of the Lake, was a Methodist church summer camp from the 1920s into the 1940s, and many of the village houses that date to this period remain unheated bungalows of the Craftsman style that are used primarily during the summertime.  However, due to pressure from rising real estate costs in the York City suburbs, these holiday cottages are gradually giving way to year-round dwellings with central heating.  Along the eastern and southern shores of the lake - areas controlled by the Lake End Corporation - almost all of the houses are now inhabited year-round.  A few houses are accessible only by boat, most notably the Seven Sisters, an isolated cluster of summer houses on the west side of the lake.Notable residentsNotable current and former residents of Green Pond include:*Benfatti (1971-), former tackle for the York Jets (1994-1996).(Lange, Randy. CRUSHING HALT TO JETS CAREER: BROKEN NECK KOS BENFATTI, Record (Bergen County), April 8, 1997. Accessed August 2, 2007. Benfatti hides his turmoil well behind a calm demeanor that has been his trademark at Morris Knolls High School, at Penn State, and as a third-round draft pick of the Jets in 1994.)(Lou Benfatti, Knolls High School. Accessed August 2, 2007.)*Robin Cook (1940-), a medical doctor and prolific author of medical thrillers is most known for his fiction novel, Coma (1977).  Cooks other works include Outbreak (1987), Vital Signs (1991), and Toxin (1998). References **Pond
971310
University_of_Oviedo
logo             thumb|right|230px|Original university buildingThe University of Oviedo (, Asturian: Universid dUviu) is a university in Asturias (Spain). Its the only university in the region. It has three campus and research centres, located in Oviedo, Gijn and Mieres.HistoryThe University of Oviedo was established under the terms and conditions of the will of Archbishop de Valds Salas (14831568), who was the Inquisitor under II of Spain, and funded by his estate. In 1574 Gregory XIII granted the Bull to create the university and in 1604  Philip III issued its charter. It first opened for the teaching of classes on September 21, 1608.The ancient university had three faculties: the Faculty of Arts, which every student had to graduate from in order to continue his training in one of the other; and the Faculties of Theology and Law, sometimes known as the higher faculties.After the French invasion of Spain the Historical Building of the University was occupied by invading troops and lectures were suspended until the War ended in 1812.During the 19th century, a group of liberal professors tried to bring the University closer to the working class with the Extensin Universitaria (a popular education programme sponsored by the institution). However, this goal was not fully achieved, and on October 13, 1934, during the Socialist-led miners revolt in Asturias, strikers set fire to the University (including its Library and the Art Gallery) because it was seen as a bourgeois symbol. It was rebuilt after the Civil War (19361939).The number of faculties has multiplied in modern university, both through subdivisions of the traditional four faculties, and through the absorption of academic disciplines which have developed within originally vocational schools, in areas such as engineering or nursing.Nowadays, the university has 31 faculties and professional schools, offering degrees and diplomas in over 150 fields of study.Schools and collegesSchool of Law (since 1608), Teaching and Education (1845), Chemistry (1848), Polytechnic School of Mieres (1855), School of Trade, Tourism and Social Sciences Jovellanos (1866), Polytechnic School of Engineering (1888), Philosophy and Letters (1892), Economy and Business (1908), Teaching and  Geology (1958), Mining Engineering (1959), Biology (1961), Medicine and Health Sciences (1968), Merchant Marine (1979), School of Computer Engineering (1982), Sciences (1990), Psychology (1991)Departments*Experimental Sciences: Analiytic and Physical-Chemistry, Chemical Engineering and Environment Technologies, Mathematics, Organic and Inorganic Chemistry, Physics, Statistics and Operations Research and Mathematical Teaching*Health Sciences: Biochemistry and Functional Biology, Biology of Organisms and Systems, Functional Biology, Medicine, Morphology and Cellular Biology, Surgery and Medical-Surgical Specialities*Engineering: Computer Sciences, Construction and Manufacturing Engineering, Electrical, Electronical, Computers and Systems Engineering, Energy, Materials Science and Metallurgical Engineering, Mining Working and Prospecting, Nautical Science and Technologies*Social Sciences and Law: Accounting, Applied Economy, Basic Legal Sciences, Business Administration, Education Sciences, Economy, Private and Companies Law, Psicology, Public Law, Quantitative Economy, Sociology, Education Sciences.*Humanities: Anglo-German and French Philology, Art and Music History, Classical and Romance Philology, Geography, History, Philosophy, Spanish PhilologyFacilities The school has a large number of places in different classrooms, total counted 6 classrooms in the building, with spaces ranging from the 171 seats in the classroom with greater capacity, up to 75 seats in the lower-capacity classroom. In addition to these classrooms, there is a room hold up to 112 places, which are usually done lectures and presentations both subjects, as final projects. Special mention also the different laboratories that school has a total of 15 laboratories. Included in this equipment of various kinds, both PC and MAC.Staff:Rector: Vicente Gotor Santamara (since May 2008):General Secretary: Ignacio Gonzlez del Rey:General Manager: Eusebio Gonzlez:Vice-chancellors::*Vice-chancellor for International Campus of Excellence: M Paz Surez Rendueles:*Vice-chancellor for Studies and New Degrees: Covadonga Betegn Biempica:*Vice-chancellor for Professors, Centres and Departments: Julio Antonio Gonzlez:*Vice-chancellor for University Extension, Culture and Sports: Vicente Domnguez:*Vice-chancellor for Research: Santiago Garca Granda:*Vice-chancellor for Students and Employment: Luis Rodrguez Muiz:*Vice-chancellor for Campus, Infrastructures and Sustainability: Jos Carlos Rico:*Vice-chancellor for International Affairs and Development Cooperation: Ana M Fernndez:*Vice-chancellor for Informatics and Communications: Vctor Garca:*Vice-chancellor for Economical Planning: Santiago lvarez:Social Council: Rafael Sariego (President), representatives of political parties, trade-unions, employers, etc.:Council of Government : Rectoral Council and Representatives from University Staff, Faculties, Schools and Departments:University Staff: Representatives of Professors, Administration Staff and Students:Rectoral Council: Rector together with the Vice-ChancellorsNotable alumni*de Marirreguera, Asturian-language writer*de Navarra y Rocafull, viceroy of Peru*Melchor de Jovellanos, Enlightenment statesman, author and philosopher*Argelles, politic*del Riego, general and liberal politician*Leopoldo Alas Clarn, journalist and writer*Palacio Valds, novelist and critic*lvarez, politic*Flores de Lemus, economist and politic*Prez de Ayala, novelist*Casona, poet and playwright*Torrente Ballester, novelist*Surez Fernndez, historian*Bousoo, poet*ngel Gonzlez, poet*Manuel Castan, writer*Vera-Rivera, composer*Carlos Rodrguez Iglesias, former judge at the Court of Justice*Garca Valds, poet and essayist*Martnez Noval, Minister of Labour and Social Security (19901993)*Surez Pertierra, minister of Education and Science (19931995) and Defence (19951996)*Llamazares, leader of United Left Coalition (Izquierda Unida) (20002008)*lvarez-Fernndez, musician*Surez Gonzlez, Minister of Labour (19741975)*Garca de la Concha, Director of Royal Spanish Academy*Gutirrez Ordez, linguist and generally a stand up guy*Fernndez Sordo, lawyer and politic*Olivares, lawyer. Prominent Miami-based sports agent.Notable Professors*Alfonso de Carvallo, historian, rector of San Gregorio College*Leopoldo Alas Clarn, journalist and writer*Benito Jernimo Feijoo, Enlightenment monk and scholar*Altamira y Crevea, historian and lawyer*de Aramburu y Zuloaga, lawyer and poet*Canella Secades, historian*Salmern y Alonso, politician, President of the Spanish Republic (1873)*Sela Sampil, lawyer*Arias de Velasco, lawyer*Mara Gil-Robles, politician, leader of the Right Wing under the II Republic*Fernndez-Miranda, politician, president of the Spanish Cortes (19751977), interim prime minister (1974), vice-prime minister (19731974), General Secretary of the National Movement (Nacional) (19691974)*Alberto lvarez Areces, serving president of the Principality of Asturias (since 1999)*Martnez Noval, minister of Labour and Social Security (19901993)*Oli Creus, economist. President and CEO of Banco Sabadell*Bueno, notable philosopher*Benito Ruano, historian*Ignacio Ruiz de la Pea Solar, historian*Alarcos Llorach, poet and linguist*Miguel Gotor Santamara, chemist*Novelli, neuroscientist*Andrs Senz de Santamara, lawyer*Luis Garca Delgado, economist*Teresa Fernndez Snchez, biochemist*Joaqun Barluenga Mur, chemist*Lpez Otn, biochemistSome Honorary Doctors* 1967 Ochoa* 1968 Hallstein* 1976 Snchez Albornoz* 1982 Areces* 1982 Wilke* 1985 Lapesa* 1988 Arias Snchez, presidente de Rica* 1991 Mayor Zaragoza* 1992 Golding* 1995 A. Zadeh* 1998 Sherlock* 2001 Carlos Rodrguez Iglesias* 2007 ngel Gonzlez* 2007 Jos Mills* 2008 Alvarez* 2008 Zelmanov See also * of early modern universities in EuropeExternal links* Official Website: Spanish version by default, English version available inside* Graduate Computer Engineering School: Spanish VersiondUviudOviedoOviedode OviedodOviedode Oviedoja:
972800
Abyssal_plain
Image:Oceanic basin.svg|thumb|right|Diagrammatic cross-section of an basin, showing the relationship of the abyssal plain to a continental rise and an trenchImage:Oceanic divisions.svg|thumb|right|Depiction of the zone in relation to other major zonesAn abyssal plain is an underwater plain on the deep floor, usually found at depths between 3000 and 6000 metres. Lying generally between the foot of a continental rise and a ridge, abyssal plains cover more than 50% of the Earths surface.()() They are among the flattest, smoothest and least explored regions on Earth.() Abyssal plains are key geologic elements of basins (the other elements being an elevated mid-ocean ridge and flanking hills). In addition to these elements, active oceanic basins (those that are associated with a moving plate tectonic boundary) also typically include an trench and a subduction zone.Abyssal plains were not recognized as distinct physiographic features of the sea floor until the late 1940s and, until very recently, none had been studied on a systematic basis. They are poorly preserved in the sedimentary record, because they tend to be consumed by the subduction process.( The creation of the abyssal plain is the end result of spreading of the seafloor (plate tectonics) and melting of the lower crust. Magma rises from above the asthenosphere (a layer of the upper mantle) and as this basaltic material reaches the surface at mid-ocean ridges it forms new oceanic crust. This is constantly pulled sideways by spreading of the seafloor. Abyssal plains result from the blanketing of an originally uneven surface of oceanic crust by fine-grained sediments, mainly clay and silt. Much of this sediment is deposited fby currents that have been channelled from the margins along canyons down into deeper water. The remainder of the sediment is composed chiefly of sediments. Metallic nodules are common in some areas of the plains, with varying concentrations of metals, including manganese, iron, nickel, cobalt and copper. These nodules may provide a significant resource for future mining ventures.Owing in part to their vast size, abyssal plains are currently believed to be a major reservoir of biodiversity. The abyss also exerts significant influence upon ocean carbon cycling, dissolution of carbonate and atmospheric CO2 concentrations over timescales of 1001000 years. The structure and function of abyssal ecosystems are strongly influenced by the rate of flux of food to the seafloor and the compostion of the material that settles. Factors such as change, fishing practices and ocean fertilization are expected to have a substantial effect on patterns of production in the euphotic zone. This will undoubtedly impact the flux of organic material to the abyss in a similar mannerand thus have a profound efefct on the structure, function and diversity of abyssal ecosystems.(()Oceanic zonesthumb|Pelagic zonesThe ocean can be conceptualized as being divided into various zones, depending on depth, and presence or absence of sunlight. Nearly all life forms in the ocean depend on the photosynthetic activities of phytoplankton and other marine plants to convert dioxide into organic carbon, which is the basic building block of matter. Photosynthesis in turn requires energy from sunlight to drive the chemical reactions that produce organic carbon.()The stratum of the column nearest the surface of the ocean (level) is referred to as the zone. The photic zone can be subdivided into two different vertical regions. The uppermost portion of the photic zone, where there is adequate light to support photosynthesis by phytoplankton and plants, is referred to as the zone (also referred to as the epipelagic zone, or surface zone).() The lower portion of the photic zone, where the light intensity is insufficient for photosynthesis, is called the dysphotic zone (dysphotic means poorly lit in Greek).() The dysphotic zone is also referred to as the mesopelagic zone, or the twilight zone.() Its lowermost boundary is at a thermocline of , which, in the tropics generally lies between 200 and 1000 metres.()The euphotic zone is somewhat arbitrarily defined as extending from the surface to the depth where the light intensity is approximately 0.11% of surface sunlight irradiance, depending on season, latitude and degree of water turbidity.(( In the clearest ocean water, the euphotic zone may extend to a depth of about 150 metres,( or rarely, up to 200 metres.( Dissolved substances and solid particles absorb and scatter light, and in coastal regions the high concentration of these substances causes light to be attenuated rapidly with depth. In such areas the euphotic zone may be only a few tens of metres deep or less.(( The dysphotic zone, where light intensity is considerably less than 1% of surface irradiance, extends from the base of the euphotic zone to about 1000 metres.( Extending from the bottom of the photic zone down to the seabed is the zone, a region of perpetual darkness.((Since the average depth of the ocean is about 4300 metres,() the photic zone represents only a tiny fraction of the oceans total volume. However, due to its capacity for photosynthesis, the photic zone has the greatest biodiversity and biomass of all oceanic zones. Nearly all primary production in the ocean occurs here. Any life forms present in the aphotic zone must either be capable of movement upwards through the water column into the photic zone for feeding, or must rely on material sinking from above,( or must find another source of energy and nutrition, such as occurs in chemosynthetic archaea found near vents and seeps.The aphotic zone can be subdivided into three different vertical regions, based on depth and temperature. First is the zone, extending from a depth of 1000 metres down to 3000 metres, with water temperature decreasing from 12C-4C as depth increases.() Next is the zone, extending from a depth of 3000 metres down to 6000 metres.( The final zone includes the deep oceanic trenches, and is known as the zone. This, the deepest oceanic zone, extends from a depth of 6000 metres down to approximately 11000 metres.(( Abyssal plains are typically located in the abyssal zone, at depths ranging from 3000 and 6000 meters.(The table below illustrates the classification of oceanic zones:FormationFile:Tectonic plate boundaries.png|thumb|crust is formed at a ridge, while the lithosphere is subducted back into the asthenosphere at trenchesthumb|Age of oceanic crust (red is youngest, and blue is oldest)Oceanic crust, which forms the bedrock of abyssal plains, is continuously being created at mid-ocean ridges (a type of boundary) by a process known as decompression melting.() Plume-related decompression melting of solid mantle is responsible for creating ocean islands like the islands, as well as the ocean crust at mid-ocean ridges. This phenomenon is also the most common explanation for basalts and plateaus (two types of igneous provinces). Decompression melting occurs when the upper mantle is partially melted into magma as it moves upwards under mid-ocean ridges.()() This upwelling magma then cools and solidifies by conduction and convection of heat to form new crust. Accretion occurs as mantle is added to the growing edges of a tectonic plate, usually associated with spreading. The age of oceanic crust is therefore a function of distance from the mid-ocean ridge.() The youngest oceanic crust is at the mid-ocean ridges, and it becomes progressively older, cooler and denser as it migrates outwards from the mid-ocean ridges as part of the process called convection.(Kobes, Randy and Kunstatter, Gabor.Mantle Convection. Physics Department, University of Winnipeg. Retrieved 23 June 2010.)The lithosphere, which rides atop the asthenosphere, is divided into a number of tectonic plates that are continuously being created and consumed at their opposite plate boundaries. Oceanic crust and tectonic plates are formed and move apart at mid-ocean ridges. Abyssal hills are formed by stretching of the oceanic lithosphere.() Consumption or destruction of the oceanic lithosphere occurs at trenches (a type of boundary, also known as a destructive plate boundary) by a process known as subduction. Oceanic trenches are found at places where the oceanic lithospheric slabs of two different plates meet, and the denser (older) slab begins to descend back into the mantle.() At the consumption edge of the plate (the oceanic trench), the oceanic lithosphere has thermally contracted to become quite dense, and it sinks under its own weight in the process of subduction.() The subduction process consumes older oceanic lithosphere, so oceanic crust is seldom more than 200 million years old.() The overall process of repeated cycles of creation and destruction of oceanic crust is known as the cycle, first proposed by Canadian geophysicist and geologist Tuzo Wilson.New oceanic crust, closest to the mid-oceanic ridges, is mostly basalt at shallow levels and has a rugged topography. The roughness of this topography is a function of the rate at which the mid-ocean ridge is spreading (the spreading rate).() Magnitudes of spreading rates vary quite significantly. Typical values for fast-spreading ridges are greater than 100 mm/yr, while slow-spreading ridges are typically less than 20 mm/yr.( Studies have shown that the slower the spreading rate, the rougher the new oceanic crust will be, and vice versa.( It is thought this phenomenon is due to faulting at the mid-ocean ridge when the new oceanic crust was formed.() These faults pervading the oceanic crust, along with their bounding abyssal hills, are the most common tectonic and topographic features on the surface of the Earth.(( The process of seafloor spreading helps to explain the concept of drift in the theory of plate tectonics.The flat appearance of mature abyssal plains results from the blanketing of this originally uneven surface of oceanic crust by fine-grained sediments, mainly clay and silt. Much of this sediment is deposited from turbidity currents that have been channeled from the continental margins along submarine canyons down into deeper water. The remainder of the sediment comprises chiefly dust (clay particles) blown out to sea from land, and the remains of small marine plants and animals which sink from the upper layer of the ocean, known as sediments. The total sediment deposition rate in remote areas is estimated at two to three centimeters per thousand years.()() Sediment-covered abyssal plains are less common in the Pacific Ocean than in other major ocean basins because sediments from turbidity currents are trapped in oceanic trenches that border the Pacific Ocean.()During parts of the salinity crisis much of the Seas abyssal plain was an empty hot dry salt-floored sink.()()()()DiscoveryFile:Marianatrenchmap.png|thumb|right|Location of the Deep in the TrenchThe landmark scientific expedition (December 1872  May 1876) of the British Navy survey ship HMS Challenger yielded a tremendous amount of bathymetric data, much of which has been confirmed by subsequent researchers. Bathymetric data obtained during the course of the Challenger expedition enabled scientists to draw maps,() which provided a rough outline of certain major submarine terrain features, such as the edge of the continental shelves and the Ridge. This discontinuous set of data points was obtained by the simple technique of taking soundings by lowering long lines from the ship to the seabed.()The Challenger expedition was followed by the 1879-1881 expedition of the Jeannette, led by States Navy Lieutenant George Washington DeLong. The team sailed across the Sea and recorded meteorological and astronomical data in addition to taking soundings of the seabed. The ship became trapped in the ice pack near Island in September 1879, and was ultimately crushed and sunk in June 1881.()The Jeannette expedition was followed by the 18931896 Arctic expedition of Norwegian explorer Nansen aboard the Fram, which proved that the Ocean was a deep oceanic basin, uninterrupted by any significant land masses north of the Eurasian continent.()()Beginning in 1916, Canadian physicist William Boyle and other scientists of the Anti-Submarine Detection Investigation Committee (ASDIC) undertook research which ultimately led to the development of sonar technology. Acoustic sounding equipment was developed which could be operated much more rapidly than the sounding lines, thus enabling the Meteor expedition aboard the German research vessel Meteor (192527) to take frequent soundings on east-west Atlantic transects. Maps produced from these techniques show the major Atlantic basins, but the depth precision of these early instruments was not sufficient to reveal the flat featureless abyssal plains.()()As technology improved, measurement of depth, latitude and longitude became more precise and it became possible to collect more or less continuous sets of data points. This allowed researchers to draw accurate and detailed maps of large areas of the ocean floor. Use of a continuously recording fathometer enabled Tolstoy & Ewing in the summer of 1947 to identify and describe the first abyssal plain. This plain, located to the south of Newfoundland, is now known as the Abyssal Plain.() Following this discovery many other examples were found in all the oceans.()()()()()The Deep is the deepest surveyed point of all of Earths oceans; it is located at the southern end of the Trench near the Islands group. The depression is named after HMS Challenger, whose researchers made the first recordings of its depth on 23 March 1875 at station 225. The reported depth was 4,475 fathoms (8184 meters) based on two separate soundings. On 1 June 2009, sonar mapping of the Challenger Deep by the Simrad EM120 multibeam sonar bathymetry system aboard the R/V Kilo Moana indicated a maximum depth of 10971 meters (6.82 miles). The sonar system uses phase and amplitude bottom detection, with an accuracy of better than 0.2% of water depth (this is an error of about 22 meters at this depth).()()Terrain featuresHydrothermal ventsImage:Phase-diag2.svg|thumb|In this diagram, the green dotted line illustrates the anomalous behavior of water. The solid green line marks the point and the blue line the point, showing how they vary with pressure.A rare but important terrain feature found in the abyssal and hadal zones is the hydrothermal vent. In contrast to the approximately 2C ambient water temperature at these depths, water emerges from these vents at temperatures ranging from 60C up to as high as 464C.((((( Due to the high barometric pressure at these depths, water may exist in either its liquid form or as a fluid at such temperatures.At a barometric pressure of 218 atmospheres, the critical point of water is 375C. At a depth of 3,000 meters, the barometric pressure of sea water is more than 300 atmospheres (as salt water is denser than fresh water). At this depth and pressure, seawater becomes supercritical at a temperature of 407C (see image). However the increase in salinity at this depth pushes the water closer to its critical point. Thus, water emerging from the hottest parts of some hydrothermal vents, smokers and volcanoes can be a supercritical fluid, possessing physical properties between those of a gas and those of a liquid.(((((Sister Peak (Comfortless Cove Hydrothermal Field, , elevation -2996 m), Shrimp Farm and Mephisto (Red Lion Hydrothermal Field, , elevation -3047 m), are three hydrothermal vents of the black smoker category, located on the Mid-Atlantic Ridge near Island. They are presumed to have been active since an earthquake shook the region in 2002.((((( These vents have been observed to vent phase-separated, vapor-type fluids. In 2008, sustained exit temperatures of up to 407C were recorded at one of these vents, with a peak recorded temperature of up to 464C. These thermodynamic conditions exceed the critical point of seawater, and are the highest temperatures recorded to date from the seafloor. This is the first reported evidence for direct magmatic-hydrothermal interaction on a slow-spreading mid-ocean ridge.(((((Cold seepsFile:cold seep community.jpg|right|thumb|Tubeworms and soft corals at a seep located at 3000 meters depth on the Florida Escarpment. Eelpouts, a galatheid crab, and an alvinocarid shrimp are feeding on chemosynthetic mytilid mussels.Another unusual feature found in the abyssal and hadal zones is the seep, sometimes called a cold vent. This is an area of the seabed where seepage of sulfide, methane and other hydrocarbon-rich fluid occurs, often in the form of a deep-sea pool. The first cold seeps were discovered in 1983, at a depth of 3200 meters in the of Mexico.() Since then, cold seeps have been discovered in many other areas of the Ocean, including the Monterey Submarine Canyon just off Bay, California, the of Japan, off the Pacific coast of Rica, off the Atlantic coast of Africa, off the coast of Alaska, and under an shelf in Antarctica.()BiodiversityThough the plains were once assumed to be vast, desert-like habitats, research over the past decade or so shows that they teem with a wide variety of microbial life.()() However, ecosystem structure and function at the deep seafloor have historically been very poorly studied because of the size and remoteness of the abyss. Recent oceanographic expeditions conducted by an international group of scientists from the Census of Diversity of Abyssal Marine Life (CeDAMar) have found an extremely high level of biodiversity on abyssal plains, with up to 2000 species of bacteria, 250 species of protozoans, and 500 species of invertebrates (worms, crustaceans and molluscs) typically found at single abyssal sites.() New species make up more than 80% of the thousands of seafloor invertebrate species collected at any abyssal station, highlighting our heretofore poor understanding of abyssal diversity and evolution.(()()() Richer biodiversity is associated with areas of known phytodetritus input and higher organic carbon flux.(galatheae, a species of cusk eel in the family Ophidiidae, is among the deepest-living species of fish. In 1970, one specimen was trawled from a depth of 8370 meters in the Rico Trench.()()() The animal was dead however, upon arrival at the surface. In 2008, the snailfish (Pseudoliparis amblystomopsis)() was observed and recorded at a depth of 7700 meters in the Trench. These are, to date, the deepest living fish ever recorded.(() Other fish of the abyssal zone include the fishes of the Ipnopidae family, which includes the spiderfish (Bathypterois longipes), fish (Bathypterois grallator), fish (Bathypterois longifilis), and the lizardfish (Bathysauropsis gracilis). Some members of this family have been recorded from depths of more than 6000 meters.()CeDAMar scientists have demonstrated that some abyssal and hadal species have a cosmopolitan distribution. One example of this would be protozoan foraminiferans,() certain species of which are distributed from the Arctic to the Antarctic. Other faunal groups, such as the polychaete worms and isopod crustaceans, appear to be endemic to certain specific plains and basins.( Many apparently unique taxa of nematode worms have also been recently discovered on abyssal plains. This suggests that the very deep ocean has fostered radiations.( The taxonomic composition of the nematode fauna in the abyssal Pacific is similar, but not identical to, that of the North Atlantic.( Click here to see a list of some of the species that have been discovered or redescribed by CeDAMar.Eleven of the 31 described species of Monoplacophora (a class of mollusks) live below 2000 meters. Of these 11 species, two live exclusively in the hadal zone.() The greatest number of monoplacophorans are from the eastern Pacific Ocean along the oceanic trenches. However, no abyssal monoplacophorans have yet been found in the Western Pacific and only one abyssal species has been identified in the Indian Ocean.( Of the 922 known Polyplacophora class of mollusks, 22 species (2.4%) are reported to live below 2000 meters and two of them are restricted to the abyssal plain.( Although genetic studies are lacking, at least six of these species are thought to be eurybathic (capable of living in a wide range of depths), having been reported as occurring from the sublittoral to abyssal depths. A large number of the polyplacophorans from great depths are herbivorous or xylophagous, which could explain the difference between the distribution of monoplacophorans and polyplacophorans in the worlds oceans.()Peracarid crustaceans, including isopods, are known to form a significant part of the macrobenthic community that is responsible for scavenging on large food falls onto the sea floor.(() In 2000, scientists of the Diversity of the deep Atlantic benthos (DIVA 1) expedition (cruise M48/1 of the German research vessel RV Meteor III) discovered and collected three new species of the Asellota suborder of benthic isopods from the abyssal plains of the Basin in the South Ocean.()()() In 2003, De Broyer et al. collected some 68,000 peracarid crustaceans from 62 species from baited traps deployed in the Sea, Sea, and off the Shetland Islands. They found that about 98% of the specimens belonged to the amphipod superfamily Lysianassoidea, and 2% to the isopod family Cirolanidae. Half of these species were collected from depths of greater than 1000 meters.(In 2005, the Agency for Marine-Earth Science and Technology (JAMSTEC) remotely operated vehicle, KAIKO, collected sediment core from the Challenger Deep. 432 living specimens of soft-walled foraminifera were identified in the sediment samples.()() Foraminifera are single-celled protists that construct shells. There are an estimated 4,000 species of living foraminifera. Out of the 432 organisms collected, the overwhelming majority of the sample consisted of simple, soft-shelled foraminifera, with others representing species of the complex, multi-chambered genera Leptohalysis and Reophax. Overall, 85% of the specimens consisted of soft-shelled allogromids. This is unusual compared to samples of sediment-dwelling organisms from other deep-sea environments, where the percentage of organic-walled foraminifera ranges from 5% to 20% of the total. Small organisms with hard calcated shells have trouble growing at extreme depths because the water at that depth is severely lacking in calcium carbonate.()While similar lifeforms have been known to exist in shallower oceanic trenches (>7,000 m) and on the abyssal plain, the lifeforms discovered in the Challenger Deep may represent independent taxa from those shallower ecosystems. This preponderance of soft-shelled organisms at the Challenger Deep may be a result of selection pressure. Millions of years ago, the Challenger Deep was shallower than it is now. Over the past six to nine million years, as the Challenger Deep grew to its present depth, many of the species present in the sediment of that ancient biosphere were unable to adapt to the increasing water pressure and changing environment. Those species that were able to adapt may have been the ancestors of the organisms currently endemic to the Challenger Deep.(Polychaetes occur throughout the Earths oceans at all depths, from forms that live as plankton near the surface, to the deepest oceanic trenches. The robot ocean probe Nereus observed a 23 cm specimen (still unclassified) of polychaete at the bottom of the Challenger Deep on 31 May 2009.(()()() There are more than 10,000 described species of polychaetes; they can be found in nearly every marine environment. Some species live in the coldest ocean temperatures of the hadal zone, while others can be found in the extremely hot waters adjacent to hydrothermal vents.Within the abyssal and hadal zones, the areas around submarine hydrothermal vents and cold seeps have by far the greatest biomass and biodiversity per unit area. Fueled by the chemicals dissolved in the vent fluids, these areas are often home to large and diverse communities of thermophilic, halophilic and other extremophilic prokaryotic microorganisms (such as those of the sulfide-oxidizing Beggiatoa genus), often arranged in large bacterial mats near cold seeps). In these locations, chemosynthetic archaea and bacteria typically form the base of the food chain. Although the process of chemosynthesis is entirely microbial, these chemosynthetic microorganisms often support vast ecosystems consisting of complex multicellular organisms through symbiosis.() These communities are characterized by species such as vesicomyid clams, mytilid mussels, limpets, isopods, tube worms, soft corals, eelpouts, galatheid crabs, and alvinocarid shrimp. The deepest seep community discovered thus far is located in the Trench, at a depth of 7700 meters.(Probably the most important ecological characteristic of abyssal ecosystems is energy limitation. Abyssal seafloor communities are considered to be food limited because benthic production depends on the input of detrital organic material produced in the euphotic zone, thousands of meters above.(Smith, C.R. and Demoupolos, A.W.J. (2003) Ecology of the Pacific ocean floor. In Ecosystems of the World (Tyler, P.A., ed.), pp. 179218, Elsevier) Most of the organic flux arrives as an attenuated rain of small particles (typically, only 0.52% of net primary production in the euphotic zone), which decreases inversely with water depth.( The small particle flux can be augmented by the fall of larger carcasses and downslope transport of organic material near continental margins.(Exploitation of resourcesIn addition to their high biodiversity, abyssal plains are of great current and future commercial and strategic interest. For example, they may be used for the legal and illegal disposal of large structures such as ships and oil rigs, waste and other waste, such as munitions. They may also be attractive sites for deep-sea fishing, and extraction of oil and gas and other minerals. Future deep-sea waste disposal activities that could be significant by 2025 include emplacement of sewage and sludge, carbon-dioxide sequestration, and disposal of dredge spoils.()As stocks dwindle in the upper ocean, deep-sea fisheries are increasingly being targeted for exploitation. Because sea fish are long-lived and slow growing, these deep-sea fisheries are not thought to be sustainable in the long term given current management practices.( Changes in primary production in the photic zone are expected to alter the standing stocks in the food-limited aphotic zone.Hydrocarbon exploration in deep water occasionally results in significant degradation resulting mainly from accumulation of contaminated cuttings, but also from spills. While the oil gusher involved in the Horizon oil spill in the of Mexico originates from a wellhead only 1500 meters below the ocean surface,() it nevertheless illustrates the kind of disaster that can result from mishaps related to drilling for oil and gas.Sediments of certain abyssal plains contain abundant mineral resources, notably polymetallic nodules. These potato-sized concretions of manganese, iron, nickel, cobalt, and copper, distributed on the seafloor at depths of greater than 4000 meters,( are of significant commercial interest. The area of maximum commercial interest for polymetallic nodule mining (called the nodule province) lies in waters of the Pacific Ocean, stretching from 118157, and from 916N, an area of more than 3 million km.() The abyssal Fracture Zone (CCFZ) is an area within the Pacific nodule province that is currently under exploration for its mineral potential.()Eight commercial contractors are currently licensed by the Seabed Authority (an organization established to organize and control all mineral-related activities in the international seabed area beyond the limits of national jurisdiction) to explore nodule resources and to test mining techniques in eight claim areas, each covering 150,000 km.( When mining ultimately begins, each mining operation is projected to directly disrupt 300800 km of seafloor per year and disturb the benthic fauna over an area 5-10 times that size due to redeposition of suspended sediments. Thus, over the 15-year projected duration of a single mining operation, nodule mining might severely damage abyssal seafloor communities over areas of 20,000 to 45,000 km (a zone at least the size of Massachusetts).(Limited knowledge of the taxonomy, biogeography and history of sea communities prevents accurate assessment of the risk of species extinctions from large-scale mining. Data acquired from the abyssal North Pacific and North Atlantic suggest that deep-sea ecosystems may be adversely affected by mining operations on decadal time scales.( In 1978, a dredge aboard the Hughes Glomar Explorer, operated by the American mining consortium Ocean Minerals Company (OMCO), made a mining track at a depth of 5000 meters in the nodule fields of the CCFZ. In 2004, the French Research Institute for Exploitation of the Sea (IFREMER) conducted the Nodinaut expedition to this mining track (which is still visible on the seabed) to study the long-term effects of this physical disturbance on the sediment and its benthic fauna. Samples taken of the superficial sediment revealed that its physical and chemical properties had not shown any recovery since the disturbance made 26 years earlier. On the other hand, the biological activity measured in the track by instruments aboard the manned submersible bathyscaphe Nautile did not differ from a nearby unperturbed site. This data suggests that the benthic fauna and nutrient fluxes at the watersediment interface has fully recovered.()List of abyssal plainsSee also*List of oceanic landforms*of submarine topographical features*basin*plateau*Oceanic ridge*trench*oceanographyReferencesBibliography************************External links*abissalploinatasandikabisalabisalabyssaleabisalabissaleabisalvlakteja:abisalnaabissalscn:Subbissuravninasv:Djuphavsslttdzlkzh:
976548
Belitung
ethnic groups thumbnail|300px|right|Part of the plant of NV Billiton Maatschappij company in Belitung island (ca. 1939)Belitung, (or in English, Billiton), is an island on the east coast of Sumatra, Indonesia in the Sea.  The island is known for its pepper and for its tin.  It was in the possession of the British from 1812 until the British ceded control of the island to the Dutch in the Treaty of 1824. Its main town is Pandan.GeographyIt is a medium sized island of about , it consists of moderately rugged terrain with several hills. The highest one is Tajam with the height of only less than . Belitung is bordered by the Strait, the China Sea and the Sea. Its turquoise blue sea is moderately calm and shallow, making for great sailing, snorkeling and swimming. Belitung is popular for its abstract granite boulders and brilliant white sand beaches in Tanjung Tinggi, Tanjung Kelayang, Tanjung Binga and Lengkuas island.DemographyThe population is centered in several small towns, populated by approximately 200,000 inhabitants.  The largest is Tanjung Pandan in the west and Mangar in the east.  While ethnic Malay people make up the largest percentage, Belitung has large populations of Bugis, Sundanese, and ethnic Chinese people who formerly worked for the Dutch, mining tin.  There are also sizeable populations of Balinese and Maduranese who were settled there in the Suharto era transmigration.EconomyBelitung is a source of tin, clay, iron ore and silica sands. The Dutch mining company NV Billiton Maatschappij derives its name from the islands name. Billiton merged with BHP in 2001 to form the largest diversified resources company, Billiton. The island is also a producer of fishery products, pepper, coconut, and palm oil. People work as farmers, fishermen and miners. The island is easily accessible with 4 daily 50-minute flights from Jakarta.  Due to the fantastic white sand beaches and picturesque offshore islands, tourism is starting to become a larger part of the local economy.Tourist destinationsThe mainly tourist destinations are beaches and islands/islets. The beaches are Tinggi Beach and Kelayang Beach which both have blue clear water, sand and rocky beaches. The islands/islets are Berlayar Island which full of granite, Island which is made of sand ( pasir in Indonesian language) and submerged during high tide, Island,  Island which is a home of 129-year-old lighthouse and a good place for snorkeling, Island and Islet.(http://www.thejakartapost.com/news/2011/05/29/the-beauty-belitung.html)Referencescs:Belitungda:Belitungde:Belitunget:Belitungde Belitungfr:Belitunggl:BelitungBelitungit:BelitungBelitunglt:BelitungasBelitung(eiland)ja:no:Belitungpl:Belitungpt:Belitungru:stq:Belitungfi:Belitungsv:Belitunguk:vi:Belitungwar:Belitungzh:
979332
Carpathian_Germans
Carpathian Germans (, , ), sometimes simply called Slovak Germans (German: Slowakeideutsche), are a group of language speakers on the territory of  present-day Slovakia.  The term was coined by the historian Friedrich Kaindl, and is also sometimes used to refer to Germans in the Ruthenia.HistoryDuring the Kingdom of HungaryGermans settled in the northern territory of the of Hungary (territory of present day Slovakia) from the 12th to 15th centuries (see Ostsiedlung), mostly after the Mongol invasion of 1241. There were probably some isolated settlers in the area of Pressburg earlier. The Germans were usually attracted by kings seeking specialists in various trades, such as craftsmen and miners. They usually settled in older Slavic market and mining settlements. The main settlement areas were in the vicinity of Pressburg and some language islands in the Spi (Hungarian: Szepessg; German: Zips; ) and the Hauerland regions.() The settlers in the Spi region were known as Zipser Sachsen (Scepusian Saxons). Until approximately the 15th century, the ruling classes of most cities in present day Slovakia consisted almost exclusively of Germans.thumb|left|200px|Westungarischer Grenzbote, 1891thumb|200px|Pressburger Zeitung, 1869The Carpathian Germans, like the Slovaks, were subjected to Magyarization policies in the latter half of the 19th and the beginning of the 20th century. However, many Carpathian Germans voluntarily magyarized their names to climb the social and economic ladder.(Policy.hu)On 28 October 1918, the National Council of Carpathian Germans in Kemarok declared their loyalty to the Kingdom of Hungary, but a Slovak group declared Slovakia part of Czechoslovakia two days later. Slovakia was occupied by Czech troops in December 1918, despite a Hungarian counter-offensive in Summer 1919.During the First Czechoslovak RepublicDuring the First Czechoslovak Republic (19181938), Carpathian Germans had a specific political party, the Zipser deutsche Partei (19201938) of Andor Nitsch, who was elected from 1925 to 1935 on a common Hungarian-German list for parliamentary elections. In 1929, another party, more nationalist-oriented, was formed in Bratislava, the Karpathendeutschen Partei, which made a common list at the 1935 parliamentary elections with the German Party, whose leader Henlein became its head in 1937 with Franz Karmasin as deputy. In 1935, both parties obtained a seat in both parliamentary assemblies. In 1939, the KdP was renamed Deutsche Partei with as fhrer Franz Karmasin, who had become in October 1938 state secretary for German Affairs in the Tiso government.(Herta Brydon, Limbach - Geschichte und Brauchtum eines deutschsprachigen Dorfes in der Slowakei bis 1945, 1991)(Dr. Thomas Reimer, Carpathian Germans history, on carpathiangerman.com)(Ondrej Pss, Geschichte und Kultur der Karpatendeutschen, Slowakisches Nationalmuseum  Museum der Kultur der Karpatendeutschen, Bratislava, Bratislava/Pressburg, 2005)The status of Slovak Republic as a client state of Germany during War II made life difficult for Carpathian Germans at the wars end. Nearly all remaining Germans fled or were evacuated by the German authorities before the end of the war. Most Germans from Spi evacuated to Germany or the Sudetenland before the arrival of the Army. This evacuation was mostly due to the initiative of Wanhoff and the preparations of the diocese of the German Evangelical Church, between mid-November 1944 and 21 January 1945. The Germans from Bratislava were evacuated in January and February 1945 after long delays, and those of the Hauerland fled at the end of March 1945. The Red Army reached Bratislava on 4 April 1945.After WWIIAfter the end of the war, one third of the evacuated or fugitive Germans returned home to Slovakia. However, on 2 August 1945, they lost the rights of citizenship,(Sudeten Germans in the border regions of Czechia and the Hungarians in the south of Slovakia also lost their citizenship) by Bene decree no. 33, and they were interned in camps such as in Bratislava-Petralka, Novky, and in Krickerhau Handlov. In 1946 and 1947, about 33,000 people were expelled from Slovakia under the Agreement, while around 20,000 persons were allowed/forced to remain in Slovakia because they were able, on petition, to use the Slovakisation process,( which meant that they declared themselves as Slovaks and changed their names into their Slovak equivalent or simply Slovakized them. (, while others were simply forced to do so because their skills were needed. Out of approximately 128,000 Germans in Slovakia in 1938, by 1947 only some 20,000 (15.6% of the pre-war total) remained. The citizenship consequences of the Benes decrees were revoked in 1948, but not the expropriation. There were many massacres in 1944-45, such as that of 270 civilians from the Uppser Zips and Dobin, Carpathian Germans who had fled to Bohemia as refugees and intended to return home after the war. Czechoslovakian soldiers under Karol Pazura forced them off the train at the train station of Perov in Moravia and ordered them to dig their own graves before butchering all of them including small children. When Communists took power in 1948 they made research of the site and investigation of the massacre impossible.TodayAccording to national censuses, there were 6,108 (0.11%) Germans in Slovakia in 2007, 5,405 in 2001, 5,414 in 1991 and 2,918 in 1980. A Carpathian German Homeland Association has been created to maintain traditions, and since 2005 there is also a museum of the culture of Carpathian Germans in Bratislava.(Museum of Carpathian German Culture) There are two German-language media financially helped by the Slovak governement, Karpatenblatt (monthly) and IKEJA news (Internet), plus minority broadcasting in German on the Slovak radio.() ()The most prominent member ethnic German in post WWII Slovakia is Schuster, the second President of Slovakia (19992004).See also* Germans* in Czechoslovakia (19181938)* Jews* Hungary* Volksdeutsche* WalddeutscheReferencesNmcide:Karpatendeutschede los Crpatosgermanojdes Carpatesdei CarpazikarpaccyNemcisv:Karpattyskar
981314
Jim_Gordon_(politician)
James K. (Jim) Gordon (born March 6, 1937 in Noranda, Quebec) is a Canadian politician, who served as mayor of Sudbury, Ontario for seventeen years, and as the citys Member of Provincial Parliament for six years.Gordon served on the town council of Espanola in the 1960s before moving to Sudbury. He was elected to city council there in 1971, and became mayor in 1976. He served until 1981, and ran in that years provincial election as the Progressive Conservative candidate in the Sudbury constituency. He won that election, and served as a backbench supporter of Daviss government.  Gordon supported Grossman at the Progressive Conservative Partys convention of February 1985.Gordon was a minister in the short-lived government of Frank Miller, serving as Minister of Government Services from May 17 to June 26, 1985. He was not able to accomplish anything of significance before Millers government was defeated in the house.He served in the legislature until 1987, when he was defeated by Sterling Campbell in the Liberal sweep of Peterson.In 1991, Gordon ran again as mayor of Sudbury, and defeated incumbent mayor Peter Wong. He served as the citys mayor until 2000, when the city and the Municipality of Sudbury were amalgamated into the new city of Sudbury. He ran for mayor of the new amalgamated city in the 2000 municipal election, and won that election as well.Gordons tenure as mayor of Sudbury was marked by efforts to diversify the citys mining-based economy.  As the citys provincial representative in the early 1980s, he was also a key supporter of the North project, which has since become the citys and Ontarios most successful tourist attraction.In Gordons single term as mayor of the amalgamated Greater Sudbury, however, the city council was somewhat undermined by voter doubts about the effectiveness and the appropriateness of the amalgamation project. Gordon announced his retirement from politics in 2003, and in that falls municipal election, he was succeeded by Courtemanche.External links* 
985178
The_Salt_Lake_Tribune
website            sltrib.comThe Salt Lake Tribune is the largest-circulated daily newspaper in the U.S. city of Salt Lake City. It is distributed by Agency Corporation, which also distributes the News. The Tribune  or Trib, as it is locally known  is currently owned by the Denver-based Group. For almost 100 years it was a family-owned newspaper held by the heirs of U.S. Senator Kearns. After Thomas Kearns died in 1918 the company was controlled by his widow, Jennie Judge Kearns and son Thomas F. Kearns. The newspapers long-time publisher was John F. Fitzpatrick, who started his career as Senator Kearns secretary in 1913.HistoryA successor to Utah Magazine (1868),(Leaders of the LDS Church had urged its members to eschew the Utah Magazine; its owners formed the Mormon Tribune in retaliation.) the publication was founded in 1870(www.media.utah.edu Accessed 29 August 2011) as the Mormon Tribune by a group of businessmen led by former LDS Church members Godbe, Elias L.T. Harrison and John Tullidge who disagreed with Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints economic and political positions. After a year its name was changed to the Salt Lake Daily Tribune and Utah Mining Gazette, but soon after that, the name was shortened to The Salt Lake Tribune.In 1873 three Kansas businessmen, Frederic Lockley, George F. Prescott and A.M. Hamilton, purchased the paper and turned the newspaper into an anti-Mormon organ which consistently backed the local Liberal Party. Sometimes vitriolic, the Tribune held particular antipathy for Church President Young. In the edition announcing Youngs death, the Tribune wrote,:He was illiterate and he has made frequent boast that he never saw the inside of a school house. His habit of mind was singularly illogical and his public addresses the greatest farrago of nonsense that ever was put in print. He prided himself on being a great financer, and yet all of his commercial speculations have been conspicuous failures. He was blarophant, and pretended to be in daily communion with the Almighty, and yet he was groveling in his ideas, and the system of religion he formulated was well nigh Satanic. &mdash; The Salt Lake Tribune, August 30, 1877In 1901 newly-elected Catholic United States Senator Kearns, and his business partner David Keith, secretly bought the Tribune. Kearns made strides to eliminate the papers anti-Mormon overtones, and succeeded in maintaining good relationships with the mostly-LDS state legislature which had elected him to the Senate. Upon Keiths death in 1918 the Kearns family bought out Keiths share of the Salt Lake Tribune Publishing Company. In 1902 the company started up an evening edition, known as The Salt Lake Telegram. The Telegram was from the beginning a money loser, and was sold in 1914 and reacquired by the Tribune in 1930 only to be sold to and merged into the News in 1952.(Malmquist, O.N.:The First 100 Years, pp. 323-324)John F. Fitzpatrick became publisher in 1924. In 1952 the Tribune entered into a joint operating agreement with the News, Salt Lakes daily newspaper (which was owned by the Church), creating the Agency Corporation.(O. N. Malmquist, The First 100 Years: A History of the Salt Lake Tribune, Utah State Historical Society, 1971)  Fitzpatrick was the architect of NAC and the Kearns-Tribunes investment into the cable business. In 1960 Fitzpatrick died of a heart attack. He had no appointed successor. An emergency session of the Kearns-Tribune Corp. board selected W. Gallivan as the next publisher. He remained in that position until 1984 and chairman of the board until 1997.(Malmquist, O.N.:The First 100 Years, pp. 373-376)The Kearns family owned a majority share of the newspaper until 1997 when they merged with Inc., a multimedia corporation, which was later acquired by AT&T. The Tribune was subsequently sold to Colorado-based Group.Lake Tribune marquis.jpg|thumb|left|250px|Marquee of The Salt Lake Tribune on the Tribune Building in Downtown Salt Lake CityIn 2002 the Tribune was mired in controversy after employees sold information related to the Smart kidnapping case to The National Enquirer. Tribune editor James Jay Shelledy resigned from his job at the paper amidst the fallout of the scandal. Two staffers also were removed from their positions as Tribune reporters.In 2004 the paper decided to move from its historic location at the downtown Tribune building, to the Gateway Mall. Many people, including several Tribune employees, opposed the move, stating that it would harm the economy of Salt Lakes downtown. The move was completed in May 2005 and Tribune employees were told by Editor Nancy Conway, It is just a building.ReferencesExternal materialBooks**The First 100 Years, A History of the Salt Lake Tribune 1871-1971, O. N. Malmquist, Utah State Historical Society, Salt Lake City, Utah  1971External links*The Salt Lake Tribune website*The Salt Lake Tribune mobile website*The Salt Lake Tribune &mdash; Utah History EncyclopediaSalt Lake TribuneSalt Lake TribuneSalt Lake TribuneSalt Lake Tribune
988623
Bristol_Bay
thumb|250px|Map of Bristol BayImage:BristolBay2.jpg|thumb|Packrafts on Nushagak BayBristol Bay (Iilgayaq in Central Yupik) is the eastern-most arm of the Sea, at 57 to 59 North 157 to 162 West in Alaska. Bristol Bay is 400 km (250 mi) long and 290 km, (180 mi) wide at its mouth.  A number of rivers flow into the bay, including the Cinder, Egegik, Igushik, Kvichak, Meshik, Nushagak, Naknek, Togiak, and Ugashik.Upper reaches of Bristol Bay experience some of the highest tides in the world.  One such reach, the Bay near Dillingham and another near Naknek in Bay have tidal extremes in excess of 10 m (30 ft), ranking them &mdash; and the area &mdash; as eighth highest in the world.  This, coupled with the extreme number of shoals, sandbars and shallows, makes navigation troublesome, especially during the areas frequently strong winds. As the shallowest part of the Bering Sea, Bristol Bay is one of the most dangerous areas for large vessels. History thumb|Tundra landscape near Bristol BayIn ancient times, much of Bristol Bay was dry and arable, along with much of the Bering Sea Land Bridge.  More recently, its proximity to mineral, animal and seafood riches provided incentive for human habitation along its shoreline. Early Russian and English exploration provided most of the non-native influences of the area.  During his voyage through the area in 1778, the famed British navigator and explorer, Captain Cook named the area in honor of the Admiral Earl of Bristol in England.thumb|left|upright|Shore of Bristol BayAfter establishing some temporary settlements in the late 1790s, The American Company sent exploratory parties to document the coast and nearby inland areas of Bristol Bay. One of these charted the area between the Kuskokwim and Rivers. Later, in 1819, an Aleut by the name of Andrei Ustiugov drew the first intensive charts of Bristol Bay.  Additionally, ships of the Navy conducted extensive surveys of the Bering Sea coastline into the mid-19th century, naming many of the geographical features commonly used today: Capes Constantine, Chichagof, Menshikof and Greig, Mounts Veniaminof and Pavlof, Lake, etc. Industry thumb|Nushagak River, draining into Bristol BayBristol Bay is home to the worlds largest salmon fishery as well as strong runs of chum salmon, silver salmon and king salmon, each occurring seasonally.  Kings are usually the first to run up the river followed by reds and chums.  Silvers and Pinks are the last to run up the river.Bay shore.jpg|thumb|left|Shore of Bristol Bay near Naknek.Major industries are commercial fishing and the associated canneries, fishing, hunting and tourism.  The number of commercial lodges, hunting- and fishing-resorts and visitors to the nearby National Park and Preserve has grown exponentially in recent years.  The area has also experienced significant interest in oil and mineral development, most notably with the proposed Mine on the north shore of Lake, and auctioning of leases to tracts in the southern Bristol Bay area known as the Aleutians Basin, an area which has been closed to offshore oil and gas development since a moratorium in 1998.  The draft plan by the of Land Management (pending public comments until 2/5/2007), also proposes to open most of the BLMs 3.6 million acres (15,000 km) in the area to hard rock mining and oil and gas drilling. Demographics thumb|upright|Abandoned cabin on Bristol BayThe three largest communities of the Bristol Bay area are Dillingham, King Salmon, and Naknek.  Smaller communities which dot the coastline and rivers of Bristol Bay include: Egegik (), Ekuk (), Igiugig (), Manokotak (), New Stuyahok (), Newhalen, Nondalton, Pilot Point, Port Heiden, and Ugashik ().  All of these communities are primarily inhabited by Natives, except for Dillingham, Alaska and King Salmon, Alaska; the former being influenced early-on by white salmon-cannery employees of European descent and the latter being heavily populated by military personnel stationed, primarily during Cold War years, at the nearby King Salmon Air Force Station and later by visitors and employees of the nearby National Park and Preserve. Proposed Pebble Mine A mineral exploration project investigating a large copper, gold, and molybdenum deposit in the Bristol Bay region has been proposed and may be undertaken by British-Australian Tinto Group and Japanese conglomerate Mitsubishi. Because of the estimated 10 billion tons of mining waste that must be permanently stored in the area, which is an active earthquake zone, and Rio Tintos environmental track record, which is seen as poor by many environmental advocacy groups, fears have been raised about the potential impact on the Bristol Bay area and its wildlife and residents. See also *Bay Borough*and Peninsula Borough*Alaska External links *Lake & Peninsula Borough*Bristol Bay Borough*Lake and Peninsula School District*Bristol Bay Alliance*Bristol Bay Native Association*Save Bristol Bay*Renewable Resources Coalition Technical Reports * Abundance, age, sex, and size statistics for Pacific herring in the Togiak district of Bristol Bay, 2004 / by Chuck Brazil. Hosted by the Alaska State Publications ProgramBaylaht (USA)de Bristolde Bristoldi Bristolnl:Bristolbaaide Bristol ( )fi:Bristolinlahti
990267
Telangana
Telangana  (, ) is a region in the state of Pradesh, India. It is bordered with the states of Maharashtra on the north and north-west, Karnataka on the west, Chattisgarh on the north-east and Orissa to the east. Pradesh State has three main cultural regions of which Telengana is a one part and others includes Andhra region on the east and Rayalaseema region on the south. The Telangana region has an area of , and a population of 35,286,757 (2011 census) which is 41.6% of Andhra Pradesh state population.(Census details for districts in Andhra Pradesh)(Census details for districts in Andhra Pradesh)(Official Govt of India Website, Office of the Registrar general&Census Commissioner India (One may need to Register&Login to get this district-wise data))The Telangana region comprise of 10 districts: Adilabad, Hyderabad, Khammam, Karimnagar, Mahbubnagar, Medak, Nalgonda, Nizamabad, Rangareddy, and Warangal. The Musi River, Krishna and Godavari rivers flow through the region from west to east.History File:SatavahanaMap.jpg|thumb| The Satavahana dynasty had its roots in Kotilingala on the banks of the River, in present day districtFile:Painting of Lord Rama on a temple at Bhadrachalam in Khammam District.jpg|thumb|left|Painting of Lord Rama on a temple at Bhadrachalam in Khammam Districtindia .jpg|thumb|Hyderabad is the largest city of the Telangana region and of Andhra Pradesh statedynasty (230 BCE to 220 CE) originated from the lands between the Godavari and Rivers. Kotilingala in Karimnagar was their first capital, before moving to Dharanikota. Excavations at Kotilingala revealed coinage of Simukha, the first Satavahana emperor. The Satavahana Empire was important in repelling foreign empires from India, such as the Indo-Greeks, and preserving Indian culture.The region experienced its golden age during the reign of the dynasty, a Telugu dynasty that ruled most parts of what is now Andhra Pradesh from 1083 to 1323 AD. Ganapatideva was known as the greatest of the Kakatiyas, and the first after the Satavahanas to bring the entire Telugu area under one rule. He put an end to the rule of the Cholas, who accepted his suzerainty in the year 1210. He established order in his vast dominion that stretched from the Godavari delta in the east to Raichur (in modern day Karnataka) in the west and from Karimnagar and Bastar (in modern day Chattisgarh) in the north to Srisailam and Tripurantakam, near Ongole, in the south. It was during his reign that the Golkonda fort was constructed. Devi and Prataparudra were prominent rulers from the Kakatiya dynasty.Telangana came under the Muslim rule of the Sultanate in the 14th century, followed by Bahmanis, Shahis, and the Mughals. As the Mughal Empire began to disintegrate in the early 18th century, the Muslim Asafjahi dynasty established a separate state known as Hyderabad. Later, Hyderabad entered into a treaty of subsidiary alliance with the Empire, and was the largest and most populous state in India. Telangana never came under direct British rule, unlike the Circars and Rayalaseema regions of Andhra Pradesh, which were part of Indias Presidency.File:India Palace .jpg|thumb|The Telangana region was the heart of numerous dynasties. Palace was home to the Nizams of State.Telangana RebellionThe Telangana Rebellion was a revolt which was later supported by the Communists. It took place in the former princely state of Hyderabad between 1946 and 1951. This was led by the Party of India.()The revolt began in the Nalgonda district and quickly spread to the Warangal and Bidar districts. Peasant farmers and labourers revolted against the local feudal landlords (jagirdars and deshmukhs) and later against the Ali Khan, Asif Jah VII. The initial aims were to do away with illegal and excessive exploitation meted out by these feudal lords in the name of labour (Vetti Chakiri). The most strident demand was for all debts of the peasants to be written off.()()Among the well-known individuals at the forefront of the movement were leaders like Narayan Reddy, Narasimhulu, Arjula, Prabhakar Rao, Sundaraiah, Rajeswara Rao, Hanumanthu, the Urdu poet Mohiuddin, Nasir, Narasimha Reddy, Venkata Narasimha Reddy, Swarajyam.(()()The violent phase of the movement ended after the central government sent in the army. Starting in 1951, the CPI shifted to a more moderate strategy of seeking to bring communism to India within the constraints of Indian democracy.(History of Communist party in India)Post-independenceWhen India became independent from the British Empire in 1947, the of Hyderabad did not want to merge with Indian Union and wanted to remain independent under the special provisions given to princely states. He even asked for a corridor, a passage from India. Rebellion had started throughout the state against the Nizams rule and his army, known as the Razakars. The of India annexed Hyderabad State on 17 September 1948, in an operation by the Army called Polo. When India became independent, Telugu-speaking people were distributed in about 22 districts, 9 of them in the former Nizams dominions of the princely state of Hyderabad, 12 in the Madras Presidency (Northern Circars), and one in French-controlled Yanam.The Central Government appointed a civil servant, K. Vellodi, as First Chief Minister of State on 26 January 1950. He administered the state with the help of bureaucrats from State and State. In 1952, Dr. Ramakrishna Rao was elected Chief minister of Hyderabad State in the first democratic election. During this time there were violent agitations by some Telanganites to send back bureaucrats from Madras state, and to strictly implement rule by natives of Hyderabad.(Mulki agitation in Hyderabad State)Meanwhile, Telugu-speaking areas in the Circars and Rayalaseema regions were carved out of the erstwhile Madras state on the fast unto death by Sri Ramulu to create Andhra State in 1953, with Kurnool as its capital.()(After Sriramulu, Andhra State)(Andhra State formed)Merger of Telangana and AndhraIn December 1953, the Reorganization Commission was appointed to study the creation of states on linguistic basis.(SRC submits report) The States Reorganisation Commission (SRC) was not in favour of an immediate merger of Telangana region of with Andhra state, despite their common language.Paragraph 382 of the States Reorganisation Commission Report (SRC) said opinion in Andhra is overwhelmingly in favour of the larger unit; public opinion in Telangana has still to crystallize itself. Important leaders of public opinion in Andhra themselves seem to appreciate that the unification of Telangana with Andhra, though desirable, should be based on a voluntary and willing association of the people and that it is primarily for the people of Telangana to take a decision about their future. The people of Telangana had several concerns. The region had a less-developed economy than Andhra, but with a larger revenue base (mostly because it taxed rather than prohibited alcoholic beverages), which people of Telangana feared might be diverted for use in Andhra. They feared that planned irrigation projects on the Krishna and Godavari rivers would not benefit Telangana proportionately, even though people of Telangana controlled the headwaters of the rivers. It was feared that the people of Andhra, who had access to higher standards of education under the British rule, would have an unfair advantage in seeking government and educational jobs.The commission proposed that the Telangana region be constituted as a separate state with a provision for unification with Andhra state, after the 1961 general elections, if a resolution could be passed in the Telangana state assembly with a two-thirds majority.The Minister of Hyderabad State, Burgula Ramakrishna Rao, expressed his view that a majority of Telangana people were against the merger.(Hyderabad CMs Views on merger (Wikisource)) He supported the Congress partys central leadership decision to merge Telangana and Andhra despite opposition in Telangana.(Pro-Telangana crowd mob Andhra ex-minister at airport; Hyderabad CM appeal to people: Abide by High command decision - Page 8 of Nov 16, 1955 Indian Express) Andhra state assembly passed a resolution on 25 November 1955 to provide safeguards to Telangana. The resolution said, Assembly would further like to assure the people in Telangana that the development of that area would be deemed to be special charge, and that certain priorities and special protection will be given for the improvement of that area, such as reservation in services and educational institutions on the basis of population and irrigational development.(Vishandhra here and now. Special safeguards for Telangana. -Govt motion in Andhra Assembly - Page 5 of Nov 26, 1955 Indian Express ) Telangana leaders did not believe the safeguards would work.(No belief in Safeguards: Hyderabad PCC chief. - Page 4 of Nov 21, 1955 Indian Express )(Telangana Leaders must Adhere to Delhi Resolution - High command advise; High command has open mind, Claims Chenna Reddi - Plea for Telangana - Page 7 of Nov 27, 1955 Indian Express) With lobbying from Andhra Congress leaders and with pressure from the Central leadership of Congress party, an agreement was reached between Telangana leaders and Andhra leaders on 20 February 1956 to merge Telangana and Andhra with promises to safeguard Telanganas interests.(SRC sub committee said no decision on Visalandhra taken.- Page 1 of Feb 1, 1956 Indian Express)(New Telugu state to be called Hyderabad. Regional council for Telangana. - Page 1 of Feb 21, 1956 Indian Express)minister Nehru initially was skeptical of merging Telangana with Andhra State, fearing a tint of expansionist imperialism in it.(Visalandhra demand was bearing a taint of expansive imperialism: Nehru - page8 of Indian express Oct 2, 1953)(Visalandhra demand was bearing a taint of expansive imperialism: Nehru - page8 of Indian express Oct 2, 1953) He compared the merger to a matrimonial alliance having provisions for divorce if the partners in the alliance cannot get on well.(Reorganisation, then and now)(Nehru compares merger with Matrimonial alliance with provision for divorce)Following the Gentlemens agreement, the central government established a unified Andhra Pradesh on November 1, 1956.((Andhra Pradesh to be formed with safeguards to Telangana)(Andhra Pradesh formed) The agreement provided reassurances to Telangana in terms of power-sharing as well as administrative domicile rules and distribution of expenses of various regions.Anti-Nehru politics emerged with the repression of the Telengana movement; many within the Congress Party extended their hands to leftist causes. Gandhi was among them.()Revenue Division a part of Godavari District up to 1959, was merged into Khammam district for geographical contiguity and administrative ease. Same was the case with Ashwaraopet also a part of Godavari District up to 1959.Separate Telangana state movementHistory of the movementIn December 1968 University students organised a rally to protest against discrimination in government jobs against Telangana people. Keshav Rao Jadhav and Sudershan Singh both teachers supported the students. Discontent intensified when some of the guarantees agreed upon were supposed to lapse in January, 1969. Student agitation for the proper implementation of the guarantees began at University in Hyderabad and spread to other parts of the region.() This agitation came to an end in September 1972 with the merger of Telangana Praja Samithi with Congress and people realised that the Prime Minister was not inclined towards a separate state of Telangana.()Due to Jai Andhra agitation in the Seema-Andra region in 1973, protesting against the protections (mulki rules) given for Telangana region, the Government of India diluted the protections in Gentlemens agreement by initiating the Six point formula.Various political parties were formed on a platform of pursuing for separate statehood for Telangana region, including the Praja Samithi party in 1969, which won 11 out of 13 Parliamentory seats in 1971.()()In the 1990s, the Janata Party (BJP) promised a separate Telangana state if they came to power.()A new party called Rashtra Samithi (TRS), led by Chandrashekar Rao (KCR), was formed in 2001 with the single-point agenda of creating a separate Telangana State with Hyderabad as its capital.()In the 2004 Assembly and Parliament elections, the Congress party promised a separate Telangana State and the TRS had an electoral alliance in the Telangana region.() Congress came to power in the state and formed a coalition government at the centre. TRS joined the coalition government in 2004 and was successful in making a separate Telangana state a part of the minimum programme of the coalition government.()In September 2006, TRS withdrew support from the Congress-led coalition government because of the failure of fulfilling the promise to create a separate Telangana state.()()()In July 2008, Devender Goud and E. Peddi Reddy resigned from Desam Party(TDP) and formed a new party called Telangana Praja Party (NTPP) with Telangana formation as its main goal.(Devendra Gouds outfit is Nava Telangana Praja Party)After extensive internal discussions, the TDP, the main opposition party in the state, announced its support for the creation of separate Telangana state on 9 October 2008.(TDP announces support to creation of Telangana state) The Telugu Desam Party promised to work towards creation of separate Telangana state.The Rajyam Party (PRP), founded by Telugu Matinee cinema actor Chiranjeevi, supported Telangana statehood.(BBC News) The Nava Telangana Praja Party announced that it would merge with PRP after it concluded that there was not enough political space for two sub-regional Telangana parties that had Telananga statehood as their main agenda.(NTP merges with PRP)(PRP for T-state)On 29 November 2009, TRS president Chandrashekar Rao (KCR) started a fast-unto-death, demanding that the Congress party introduce a Telangana bill in Parliament. He was arrested by the government of Andhra Pradesh.(KCR to launch fast on Nov. 29 )(KCR arrest ahead of his proposed indefinite hunger strike)(TRS activist attempts self- immolation, critical )(Government forcibly administers saline to end KCRs fast)(KCR protest confuses miners) Student organizations, employee unions, and various organizations joined the movement.(OU turns hotspot of students angst)(Colleges in Telangana closed for 15 days )(Constable shoots himself, dies) General strikes shut down Telangana on 6 and 7 December.(Telangana bandh total on first day) Student organizations planned a massive rally at the state Assembly on 10 December. The government warned that the rally did not have permission and deployed police troops throughout Telangana.(Thousands of Indian police deployed for Hyderabad rally ) All opposition parties in the state favoured creation of Telangana state at an all-party meet held on 7 December.(Oppn parties ask AP Govt to move resolution on Telangana)On 9 December 2009, Union Minister of Home Affairs Chidambaram announced that the Indian government would start the process of forming a separate Telangana state, pending the introduction and passage of a separation resolution in the Andhra Pradesh assembly.() KCR ended his 11-day fast, saying from his hospital bed that this was a true victory of the people of Telangana.Pro-Telangana supporters celebrated the central government decision, while those from the Coastal Andhra and Rayalaseema regions (Andhra region) protested.(It is freedom at midnight)(AP: Non-Telangana areas erupt in protests) Due to protests in the Seema-Andhra region, On 23 December, the Government of India announced that no action on Telangana would be taken until a consensus was reached by all parties.(Wide-ranging consultations needed on Telangana: Centre) Rallies, hunger strikes, and suicides continued throughout Telangana to protest against the delay in bifurcating the State.(Students, police clash in Osmania University) The all-party Telangana Joint Action Committee (JAC) started relay hunger strikes and threatened the resignations of all legislators on 28 January, demanding that the Centre spell out its intentions and create a timetable for change.(Stick to Jan. 28 deadline to quit: Telangana JAC tells legislators) On 3 February the government announced the five-member committee on Telangana that would look into the issue,() with a deadline of 31 December 2010.Srikrishna Committee reportThe Srikrishna committee on Telangana submitted its report in two volumes to the Home Ministry of India on 30 December 2010.(Telangana report on PC table, talks on Jan 6) In an all-party meeting on 6 January 2011, the Home ministry made the 505-page Srikrishna committee report public. Section 9-3 (page 440) of the report() discusses six solutions.(Srikrishna Committee Report  Vol I (Main Report))(Srikrishna Committee Report  Vol II (Appendix to the report))The Committee announced that they were recommending keeping the State united(one of option- which they testified is not possible in present situation), and advised constitutional and statutory measures for socio-economic development and political empowerment of Telangana region through the creation of a statutorily empowered Telangana Regional Council.Telangana leaders say the best option from the Sri Krishna committee report is the formation of separate Telangana state with Hyderabad as its capital. They plan to pressure the Central government to zero in on this option as the only workable one.(Separate Telangana state only solution: KCR)(Clashes continue in Osmania University, protests rock Telangana)(Telangana Cong MPs ultimatum to Sonia)(TDP to launch agitations across T from next week)On March 23, 2011, Justice L Narasimha Reddy of Andhra Pradesh high court ordered central government to make contents of 8th chapter of Sri Krishna Committee, so called secret report. Justice in his 60 page judgement said The Committee travelled beyond the terms of reference in its endeavour to persuade the Union of India not to accede to the demand for Telangana. The judgement (in para 75, 80 94) also quoted the SKC reports 8th chapter which advised central govt on how to manage Telangana political parties, how to manage Telangana public opinion using local media virtually owned by Seema-Andhra industrialists and what kind of law and order methods to be used. The justice further said(in para 103) The maneuver suggested by the Committee in its secret supplementary note poses an open challenge, if not threat, to the very system of democracy.After the SKC ReportOn February 17, 2011 noncooperation movement was started and it last for 16 days which was participated by 300,000 government employees and caused a loss of Rs 8 billion per day in revenue to government.(Telangana fury is costing AP Rs 800 cr a day) (Telangana issue disrupts Parliament proceedings)In February and March, Assembly session was boycotted for weeks and Parliament session was disrupted for several days by Telangana representatives.(Pro-Telangana MLAs to boycott AP Assembly budget session)()(Congress Telangana MPs sport black bands in Lok Sabha)Million March was organized by Telangana JAC in Hyderabad on March 10, 2011. In a move to disrupt the march, police shutdown and arrested over hundred thousand activists  through out the region and closed down entry to Hyderabad city, stopped transportation services, traffic was diverted and no one was allowed to areas close to the venue (1 lakh arrested across Telangana: TJAC)(Cops block all roads to capital )(Thousands defy government, march for Telangana) 50 to 100 thousand people reached venue by hoodwinking police and organized the march. .(http://www.deccanchronicle.com/hyderabad/t-men-fool-cops-wedding-350) Some Telangana activists damaged 16 statues of personalties hailed form Seema-Andhra representing Telugu culture language on Tank Bund, the venue. They threw some of the remnants into the lake.(http://www.fullhyderabad.com/hyderabad-news/million-march-intensifies-in-hyderabad-statues-on-tank-bund-damaged-3823#tabs) Top leaders of all political parties in the state including KCR and various organizations condemned the vandalism.(Desecration of statues in AP sparks controversy) On July 4 and 5, 2011, 100 out of 118(1 vacant) Telangana MLAs in the state, 12 out of 15 Telangana ministers, 13 out of 17 Telangana MPs in Lok Sabha, 1 Rajyasabha MP(Congress), 20 MLCs resigned protesting delay in the formation of Telangana. Resigned included 44 out of 53 ruling Congress partys MLAs from Telangana, 9 out of 12 ruling Congress party MPs in Lok Sabha from Telangana. (BBC: India lawmakers mass resignation for Telangana state)(Crisis looms as 81 Telangana MLAs, some MPs submit resignations)(42 Cong MLAs, 10 MPs quit over Telangana)Except 18 MLAs; MIM(7), Congress(9) (including two ministers, Deputy speaker and Deputy CM)  CPM(1), Lok Satta(1); the rest of the Telangana MLAs have resigned.(TRS takes quitters list to 100)Starting September 13, as part of strike by all section of people supporting Telangana state formation, government employees, lawyers, coal miners, health workers started indefenite strike.  (Telangana: Administrative work affected) Within days, they were joined by teachers, state transport corportion employees, electricity board employees, sanitation employees, temples employees etc. Due to the strike, administration collapsed in Telangana, caused power cuts through out South India. Mean while Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh, Kiran Kumar Reddy, who is believed to be strongly against telangana is looking for various options to suppress the movement. (No school, no power, no hygiene as Telangana shuts down for statehood)GeographyTelangana is situated in the central stretch of the eastern seaboard of the Indian Peninsula. Of the three regions of the state of Andhra Pradesh,(Andhra Pradesh District Map) Telangana has the largest area, with . The plateau is drained by two major rivers, the Godavari and the Krishna. 69% of the Krishna River and 79% of the Godavari River catchment area is in Telangana region. Telangana is also drained by other minor rivers such as Manair, Bhima, Dindi, Kinnerasani, Manjeera, Munneru, Moosi, Penganga, Praanahita, and Peddavagu and Taliperu.The area is divided into two main regions, the Ghats and the plains. The surface is dotted with low depressions.Natural resourcesThe Telangana region has rich natural resources. 45% of the forest area in Andhra Pradesh state is in Telangana region, spread across five districts. 20% of the coal deposits in the country are in Telangana region. The Collieries Company excavates coal for industrial purposes and for thermal power stations. The power generated is supplied to the entire of South India. There are limestone deposits in the region, which cater to cement factories. Telangana has other resources such as bauxite and mica.Demography and languageAccording to the Backward Regions Grant Fund 200910, 13 backward districts are located in Andhra Pradesh; 9 (Except Hyderabad) are from Telangana region and the rest are from other regions.()(Screen shot for http://panchayat.gov.in/brgf/Report.do?methodBRGFdistrict)(Screen shot for Backward Region grant fund(BRGF) by Govt of India)Telangana (including Hyderabad) has 86% Hindu, 12.4% Muslim, and 1.2% Christian population. Hyderabad city(district) has 55.4% Hindu, 41.2% Muslim, 2.4% Christian population. Other districts in Telangana region (outside of Hyderabad district) have 8.4% of the Muslim population.()(Region-wise distribution of religious groups 2001 - Table 7.2 in page 381 of SKC report)About 11% of Telangana people speak Urduhttp://www.languageinindia.com/april2003/urduinap.html. Urdu speakers are mostly Muslims, though people of other ethnicities also use Urdu for day-to-day life. Most non-Muslims in Hyderabad also use Urdu/Hindi in day to day conversations. Most people outside Hyderabad speak Telugu. Hindi is spoken by people from other states of North and Central India. The people boardering other states speak Kannada and Marathi.()Culture and identityFile:India food.jpg|thumb|150px|biryaniThe Hyderabads as Deccani or Dakkini culture is evolved on its own as a distinctive culture due to confluence of different people who came from different places to serve under the Golkonda rulers.(Hyderabadi Culture)(Hyderabadi Cultural Spirit)FestivalsBonalu, Bathukamma, Diwali, Dassera, Eid-ul-Fitr, al-Adha, un Nabi, Christmas and Ugadi are prominent festivals in Telangana. Other festivals of Hindus and Muslims such as Holi, Bandhan, Eid-ul-Fitr and Milad un Nabi are also celebrated with equal enthusiasm as in rest of India. The Sankranti festival is celebrated at the beginning of harvest season, generally, on January 14 every year. Bathukamma and Bonalu are regional festivals of Telangana.LiteratureBammeraPothana, the poet who composed the classic SriMad Maha Bhagavatamu, a Telugu translation of Sri Bhagavatham, authored by Veda Vyasa in Sanskrit, belongs to Telangana region. Golkonda Nawab Quli Qutub Shah had the distinction of being the first Saheb-e-dewan Urdu poet and is credited with introducing a new sensibility into prevailing genres of Persian/Urdu poetry . Other prominent poets of the Telangana region in the early era include Gopanna or Bhakta Ramadasu, Budda Reddy, Somanatha, Sri, Hulukki Bhaskara and in modern era poets include Vibhushan Narayana Rao, Akademy award recipient Krishnamacharya and Jnanpith award recipient Dr. Narayana Reddy, Venkata Narasimha Rao the 9th Minister of India.See also* Reorganization Act* Circars* Andhra* Rayalaseema* Uttarandhra* Andhra* of notable Telangana peopleReferencesExternal links* Demand for Telangana State: genuine and justified., Vijaya Bhaskar, 2010* Official history of AP on AP Government website* Telangana movement article in US Library of Congress* Committee on Telangana surpluses  1969 Report by Justice Bhargava* Telangana Information Task Force  by rashu.* Subregionalism in India  A case of Telangana by Duncan B. Forrester. Alternate link* Planning Commission Document: Regional Balances in AP* The Historical Context of Andhra and Telangana, 194956  Economic & Political Weekly, February 20, 2010 vol xlv no 8* State reorganization committee reports at Wiki Source* Fasting, Mining, Politicking? Telangana and the Burdens of History, D. Parthasarathy* Modern Hyderabad(Deccan) by John Law, 1914* The Hyderabad Political System and its Participants by KAREN LEONARD ; Source: The Journal of Asian Studies, Vol. 30, No. 3 (May, 1971), pp. 569582 Stable URL: http://www.jstor.org/stable/2052461* Nizam  British Relations 17241857 by Sarojini Regani published 1963* Srikrishna Committee Report  Vol I (Main Report)* Sri Krishna Committee Report  Vol II (Appendix to the report)* Srikrishna Committee on Telangana: Recommendations at Variance with the Analysis - C.H Hanumanth Raobn:zh-min-nan:Telanganaca:Telanganade:Telanganaet:Telanganaes:Telinganafr:Tlanganahi:kn:ml:mr:nl:Telanganaja:pl:Telanganaru:fi:Telanganasv:Telanganata:te:ur:zh:
992676
Dugout_(shelter)
File:Dugout home2.jpg|right|thumb|300px|Dugout home near Town, New Mexico, 1940.A dugout or dug-out, also known as a pithouse, pit-house, lodge, mud hut, is a shelter for humans or domesticated animals and livestock based on a hole or depression dug into the ground. These structures are one of the most ancient types of human housing known to archeologists. Dugouts can be fully recessed into the earth, with a flat roof covered by ground, or dug into a hillside.  They can also be semi-recessed, with a constructed wood or sod roof standing out. The same methods have evolved into modern earth shelter technology.Dugouts may also be temporary shelters constructed as an aid to specific activities, e.g., during warfare or in hunting. Also, due to the potential for concealment, they may serve as a hiding place for an ambush.Africa Tunisia First driven underground by enemies who invaded their country, the Berbers of Matmta found underground homes the best defense against summer heat.Asia and the PacificAustraliaCoober Pedy is a small town in northern Australia, 846 kilometres north of Adelaide on the Stuart Highway. Located in the Australian outback, the harsh summer temperatures and the dominant industry mean that most residents live in caves excavated() into the hillsides and work underground in mine shafts. Cliffs, New South Wales is similar, both in terms of climate and mining operations. China In north China, especially on the Plateau, caves called yaodongs dug into hillsides have been the traditional dwellings from early times. The advantage of a yaodong over an ordinary house is that it needs little heating in winter and no cooling at all in summer. An estimated 40 million people in northern China live in a yaodong. Many people live in semi-recessed dugout houses in north-western China where hot summer and cold winters prevail. (Chinese Earth Shelter Dwellings: By Paul Long.)Europe and the Middle East Crimea The well-preserved cave towns of Crimea are Mangup-Kale, Eski-Kermen, Inkerman and Chufut-Kale. The settlement of Mangup-Kale dates back to the third century AD and was fortified by I in the mid 500s. It was inhabited and governed primarily by Goths, and became the center of their autonomous principality. The last inhabitants, a small community of Karaims, abandoned the site in the 1790s. Italy Matera has gained international fame for its ancient town, the Sassi di Matera (meaning stones of Matera). The Sassi are houses dug into the rock itself, known locally as Tufo, which is characteristic of Basilicata and Puglia. Scotland In ancient Scotland, earth houses, also known as yird, Weems and Picts houses, were underground dwellings, extant even after the Roman evacuation of Britain. Entry was effected by a passage not much wider than a fox burrow, which sloped downwards 10 or 12 ft. to the floor of the house; the inside was oval in shape, and was walled with overlapping rough stone slabs; the roof frequently reached to within a foot of the Earths surface; they probably served as storehouses, winter quarters, and as places of refuge in times of war. Similar dwellings are found in Ireland. Spain The most famous feature of the town of Guadix is the cave dwellings in the Barrio Turkey Cappadocia contains at least 36 historical underground cities, carved out of unusual geological formations formed via the eruptions of ancient volcanoes.(Underground Cities) The cities were initially inhabited by the Hittites, then later by early Christians as hiding places. They are now archeological and tourist sites, but are not generally occupied (see Underground City).  The latest large Turkish underground city was discovered in 2007 in Gaziemir, Gzelyurt.  This city was a stopover on the Silk Road, allowing travelers and their camels to rest in safety, underground, in a fortress hotel equivalent to a modern hotel. World War I of George Dennistons dug-out, Gallipoli, Turkey, 1915.jpg|thumb|upright|Interior of dugout, Gallipoli, 1915Dugouts were used extensively as protection from shelling during War I in the Western Front. They were an important part of the warfare as they were used as an area to rest and carry out other activities such as eating. They would usually range in size from dugouts that could hold several men to dugouts that could hold thousands of soldiers. Dugouts such as the dugout would usually be placed at least  underground, lined with concrete, wood and/or steel to withstand the shock of artillery, accessed via a set of wooden stairs. World War II Image:Zemljamka nedaleko Nrova.JPG|thumb|right|Zemlyanka used by partisans near Nrov, Republic, preserved as a WWII memorialIn War II, partisans, or armed resistance fighters in Europe sometimes lived in dugouts called zemlyankas (Russian or ) which were used as underground bunkers to provide shelter and a hiding place from enemies.(Virtual Zemlyanka Jewish Partisan Educational Foundation) In Poland they were called ziemianki.North and South AmericaMany of the ancient peoples of the American continents built semi-permanent houses of poles and brush plastered with mud over a shallow pit in the earth.  As these pithouses were very similar to those first built in northeastern Europe 25,000 years ago, pithouse technology may have been carried to the Americas by early nomadic settlers, traveling first through Siberia, and then across the ice bridge between Asia and North America about 12,000 to 14,000 years ago.An individual pithouse was occupied for an average of about 15 years. By more modern standards, these dwellings were cramped and dark.  The centralized hearth created a smoky, cold environment during the winter.  Most pithouses are associated with an open air plaza or rooftop where inhabitants carried out most of their daily activities during good weather.  In areas suitable for intensive agriculture, groups of pithouses clustered to create communities of varying sizes.American NorthwestIn the Plateau of the Columbia and in the Plateau of the Northwest the remains of a form of pit-house called a hole or kekuli are common, and come in large groups named quiggly towns, which are correspondingly the remains of ancient villages.American SouthwestPithouses were very common structures in the American Southwest during the early and middle periods of the Anasazi, Mogollon and Hohokam cultures, and were also found in cultures extending north and west of the Colorado plateau.  The emergence of the pithouse marks the transition between a nomadic hunting-and-gathering livelihood and a settled agricultural way of life which also relied on wild plants and animals for food.  Pithouse structures were probably the forerunners of the kivas built later in the Pueblo periods, and share many characteristics with them.  Although the architectural styles used by these people evolved throughout their history, the pithouse remained a basic residential structure.  Pithouses are found in isolated rural settings, in conjunction with above ground dwellings and adjacent to the large multi-room cliff dwellings characteristic of the region.  Historian Linda Cordell notes that ...the late pithouses are often clues to relatively short-term changes in settlement location and adjustment to climatic fluctuations. (Cordell, p. 164)  This appears to be true among the modern Pueblo peoples as well.  When the Hopi village of Bacavi was founded in 1909, some groups of people arrived in the late autumn.  As there was a limited window of time for building, the new arrivals built pithouses as warm shelters for the winter.  Some of these homes remained occupied until the 1970s.  Pithouses were built by excavating a well defined hole into the ground, usually around 6 to 18 deep but occasionally as deep as four to five feet, and creating walls and roof using a pole and adobe technology.  The sunken floor of the dwelling is below the frost line and helps moderate both winter and summer temperatures, with the mass of the ground serving as an insulator.  In addition, adobe walls gather heat during the day and release it when temperatures drop.  The earliest pithouses were round, and varied in size between nine and twenty-five feet in diameter.  Around AD 700, pithouse designs became more individualized.  Excavations reveal examples based on squares, rectangles and shapes similar to the letter D.   Image:Pithouse at Step House Mesa Verde 1.jpg|thumbnail|right|250px|A reconstruction shows the pit dug below ground, four supporting posts, roof structure as a layers of wood and mud, and entry through the roof; Step House ruins at Verde National Park.These homes were also warmed by a centralized hearth, a fire pit with an air deflector, and side vents and a hole in the roof provided fresh air and evacuated smoke.  The placement of the homes entrance varied by locality and archaeological period.  Early homes utilized the ventilation stack as an egress by means of a ladder.  Later homes expanded the pit into a keyhole shape to create a low sheltered entrance.  Interior space was often loosely divided into two rooms, one for storing personal and dry goods and the other as living quarters.  Many pithouses included an antechamber, containing storage bins or pits.    Pithouse construction was usually based on four corner posts positioned upright in the pit.  These posts were carefully chosen and trimmed to create a branch or fork at the top as a structural support.  They were joined by horizontal beams and crossed with ceiling joists.  The interior sides of the pit were plastered with clay or lined with stone  either large slabs wedged upright in the soil or courses of smaller stones.  The exterior of the pithouse was formed of branches, packed tree bark, or brush and grass. A thick layer of mud on the outside of the roof and walls protected the shelter from the weather.  Often the initial mud layer was carefully plastered with a lighter colored clay.  A large number of pithouses have been archaeologically excavated throughout the American Southwest.  Reproductions of these basic family structures exist in museums and tourist information sites, such as the structure at the Cliff Dwellings.  National and state parks and monuments showcase pithouse ruins and may include authentic reconstructions such as the Ancient Pueblo structure at Step House ruin, Verde National Park, Fremont Indian State Park in Utah, and a Hohokam structure at the Hardy Site in Tucson, Arizona.Sod HousesDuring the Civil War, the federal United States government passed the Act offering free land for those who could prove up their claims by living on the land and farming it for a prescribed number of years.  Settlers on the newly opened Plains found there were not enough trees to build familiar cabins.  As shelter was essential, the frontier farmer utilized ribbons of the thick prairie sod cut as they plowed their virgin land. The strip could be cut into two foot sections, four to six inches deep, to make an almost perfect building block with good insulating properties. These first homes, often called soddies, were simply small rooms dug into the side of a low rolling hill. The walls were built up with sod blocks to a height of seven or eight feet. Holes were left for purchased doors and windows hauled from the nearest town or railroad point. Cottonwood poles were laid side by side to form a support for a roof made of a thick layer of coarse prairie grass. Over this was carefully fitted a double layer of the sod building blocks. Rain helped the sod to grow and soon the dugout roof was covered with waving grass.  Some frontier families found that their cows grazed on their roof, and occasionally had them drop in for dinner.The floor of the dugout home was of dirt or rough wooden planks. Walls were lined with newspapers pasted or pinned up with small, sharpened sticks to keep dirt from flaking into the homes interior. Some families used fabric on their walls while others created a plaster coating from local limestone and sand. Some were carpeted and other variations included building on a second room for school teachers or guests. Heating could be provided by burning buffalo chips or cow chips.(Pioneer Dugout - Texas Historical Marker.) The homes comfort and structural stability were maximized when the structure was located on the south side of a low hill, with adequate drainage to provide run-off for rain and melting snow.  Most pioneer dugouts had a very short life, being replaced by plank or rock homes when farmers had both time and money to create larger, more traditional homes.  However, even when a family did build a house of logs or boards, their domestic animals would often continue to be sheltered in a sod dugout.In frontier Canada, dugout style shelters were also used by pioneers and settlers.  In these cases, the shelters construction closely reflected the cultures of the various settlers.  They ranged from the French-Canadianstyle caveaux to the Ukrainian burdei.See also* sheltering* Pit-house* Grubenhaus* lodge* house* house Notes  References * Cordell, Linda S. Ancient Pueblo Peoples. St. Remy Press, Montreal and Smithsonian Institution, Washington D.C., 1994. ISBN 0-89599-038-5* Rohn, Arthur H. and Ferguson, William M, 2006, Puebloan Ruins of the Southwest, University of New Mexico Press, Albuqureque NM, ISBN 0-82663-39070-0 (pbk. : alk. paper).  Pithouse architecture is discussed on pp. 30-33. Animage similar to the above reconstruction appears on p. 32.Further reading* Cass G. Barns, The Sod House (Lincoln: University of Nebraska Press, 1930). * Donald E. Green, ed., Rural Oklahoma (Oklahoma City: Oklahoma Historical Society, 1977). * Everett Dick, Conquering the Great American Desert (Lincoln: Nebraska State Historical Society,1975). * Grant Foreman, A History of Oklahoma (Norman: University of Oklahoma Press, 1945). * LeRoy R. Hafen and Carl Coke Rister, Western America: The Exploration, Settlement, and Development of the Region Beyond the Mississippi (New York: * Prentice-Hall, 1941). * Veda Giezentanner, In Dugouts and Sod Houses, The Chronicles of Oklahoma 39 (Summer 1961). *English LiteratureExternal links* 3-D Representation of a Hohokam pithouse* Little guide for the dugout of a subterranean root cellar* Encyclopedia of Oklahoma History and Culture - Dugoutevbg:cs:Zemnicede:Wohnhhlesubterrnea(maison)hr:Zemunicalt:eminbouwenja:pl:Ziemiankaru:sk:Zemankasr:sh:Zemunicefi:Korsuuk:
995969
Consolidated_Mine
 refnum  80001111()The Consolidated Mine was a gold mine in County, Georgia, United States, just east of Dahlonega. Like most of the area around Dahlonega, the mining on the land on which the mine is located probably started during the Gold Rush. By 1880, the placer deposits were exhausted and the land was down to hard rock. Gold was soon discovered in a huge quartz vein system, and mined. The richest acre was mined deep into the ground - and the resulting shaft became known as the Glory Hole.After an interruption of operations at the mine, a group of investors purchased about 7,000 acres (28 km) of land around the discovery sight and formed the Dahlonega Consolidated Gold Mining Co. in 1895. After constructing the largest mill east of the River at the Consolidated Mine property, the Mining Co. folded in 1906. The mines lower workings became flooded and lay dormant until seventy-five years later, when the site came under new ownership.There is still gold to be mined here - but the cost of extracting the gold from the mine exceeds the value of the gold, at least for the time being. Today, a part of the upper level of the mine remains open for tourists, who can tour portions of the Glory Hole underground and pan for gold. Original cart rails, electrical lines and even an operational pneumatic drill recovered from the mine may be viewed. This mine and Crisson Mine are the two mines in the Dahlonega area that remain open for tourists. The Consolidated Mine remains the only mine in the area safe enough to take tourists into.ReferencesExternal links*Georgia Division of Archives and History Photo - Beginning construction of Consolidated Mine Company, 1899*Georgia Division of Archives and History Photo - Inside of the stamp mill, 1899-1906
1001550
Greenvale
Greenvale may refer toIn Australia*Victoria, a suburb of Melbourne, Australia**Football Club*New South Wales, a rural community in the Riverina*Queensland, town and former nickel mining community, located on the Lynd Highway north of Charters Towers, QueenslandIn the United States*New York, on Long Island**(LIRR station)*Township, Dakota County, Minnesotade:Greenvalepl:Greenvale
1008164
Saint-Rmy,_Calvados
Saint Rmy is a commune in the Calvados department in the Basse-Normandie region in northwestern France.PopulationSee also*mining*of the Calvados departmentReferences*INSEE(Calvados)Calvados(Calvados)(Calvados)(Calvados)(Calvados)(Calvados)Calvados(Calvados)(Calvados)(Calvados)(Calvados)ru:-Calvados()Calvados(Calvados)Calvados
1013168
95th_United_States_Congress
The Ninety-fifth United States Congress was a meeting of the legislative branch of the United States federal government, composed of the States Senate and the States House of Representatives. It met in DC from January 3, 1977 to January 3, 1979, during the first two years of the administration of U.S. President Carter.The apportionment of seats in this House of Representatives was based on the Nineteenth Census of the United States in 1970. Both chambers had a Democratic majority. It was the last time either party held a filibuster-proof (60 member) majority in the Senate, until the United States Congress in 2009 (in which both chambers once again held a Democratic majority).()Major events* January 20, 1977  Inauguration of President Carter and Vice President Mondale* July 13, 1977  York City blackout of 1977* August 4, 1977  States Department of Energy created* January 1, 1978- The Mariana Islands left the Territory of the Pacific Islands to become a Commonwealth of the United States, making it unincorporated and organized.* February 8, 1978  Senate proceedings are broadcast on radio for the first time.* August 7, 1978  Emergency declared at Canal* September 17, 1978  David Accords* December 10, 1978 - with ChinaHearings* MKULTRA  (Committee, Senate Select Committee on Intelligence, Senate Human Resources subcommittee on Health and Scientific Research)Major legislation* 1977-08-03  Mining Control and Reclamation Act, , * 1977-10-12  Reinvestment Act, , title VIII, * 1977-12-19  Corporate Payments Act of 1977, , including title I: Corrupt Practices Act, * 1977-12-27  Water Act, , * 1977-12-28  Emergency Economic Powers Act, , title II, * 1978-02-25  of Energy Organization Act, , * 1978-03-10  Non-Proliferation Act, , * 1978-10-10  B. Anthony dollar authorized* 1978-10-13  Service Reform Act, , * 1978-10-14  Abuse Prevention, Treatment, and Rehabilitation Act, , * 1978-10-24  Deregulation Act, , * 1978-10-25  Intelligence Surveillance Act, , * 1978-10-26  in Government Act, , * 1978-10-27  Full Employment Act, , * 1978-10-31  Discrimination Act, , * 1978-11-01  Disputes Act, , * 1978-11-06  Act of 1978, , * 1978-11-09  Energy Conservation Policy Act, , Treaties ratified * March 16, 1978 First of the Treaties (Panama Canal) treaty: The Treaty Concerning the Permanent Neutrality and Operation of the Panama Canal, commonly known as the Neutrality Treaty* April 19, 1978  Second of the Treaties treaty, commonly known as The Panama Canal TreatyParty summary Senate thumb|Party standings on the opening day of the 95th Congress*Democratic (D): 61 (majority)*Republican (R): 39TOTAL members: 100 House of Representatives *Democratic (D): 292 (majority)*Republican (R): 143TOTAL members: 435 Leadership  Senate * President of the Senate: Rockefeller (R), until January 20, 1977** Mondale (D), from January 20, 1977* President pro tempore: Eastland (D) Majority (Democratic) leadership * Majority Leader: Byrd* Majority Whip: Cranston Minority (Republican) leadership * Minority Leader: Baker* Minority Whip: Stevens House of Representatives * Speaker: ONeill (D) Majority (Democratic) leadership * Majority Leader: Wright* Majority Whip: Brademas Minority (Republican) leadership * Minority Leader: Jacob Rhodes* Minority Whip: H. MichelMembersSenateSenators are popularly elected statewide every two years, with one-third beginning new six year terms with each Congress.Alabama*2. J. Sparkman (D)*3. James B. Allen (D), until June 1, 1978** Pittman Allen (D), from June 8, 1978 until November 7, 1978** W. Stewart (D), from November 7, 1978Alaska*2. Stevens (R)*3. Gravel (D)Arizona*1. DeConcini (D)*3. Goldwater (R)Arkansas*2. L. McClellan (D), until November 28, 1977** Hodges, Jr. (D), from December 10, 1977*3. L. Bumpers (D)California*3. MacGregor Cranston (D)*1. I. Hayakawa (R)Colorado*2. K. Haskell (D)*3. Hart (D)Connecticut*3. A. Ribicoff (D)*1. P. Weicker, Jr. (R)Delaware*1. V. Roth, Jr. (R)*2. R. Biden, Jr. (D)Florida*1. Chiles (D)*3. Richard Stone (D)Georgia*3. E. Talmadge (D)*2. Nunn (D)Hawaii*1. Masayuki Matsunaga (D)*3. K. Inouye (D)Idaho*3. Church (D)*2. A. McClure (R)Illinois*2. H. Percy (R)*3. Stevenson III (D)Indiana*1. G. Lugar (R)*3. E. Bayh II (D)Iowa*2. C. Clark (D)*3. C. Culver (D)Kansas*2. B. Pearson (R), until December 23, 1978** Landon Kassebaum (R), from December 23, 1978*3. Dole (R)Kentucky*2. D. Huddleston (D)*3. H. Ford (D)Louisiana*3. B. Long (D)*2. Bennett Johnston (D)Maine*1. S. Muskie (D)*2. D. Hathaway (D)Maryland*3. Mathias, Jr. (R)*1. Sarbanes (D)Massachusetts*1. Edward Kennedy (D)*2. Brooke (R)Michigan*2. P. Griffin (R)*1. W. Riegle, Jr. (D)Minnesota*2. Anderson, (DFL), until December 29, 1978** Boschwitz (R), from December 30, 1978*1. Humphrey, (DFL), until January 13, 1978** Humphrey, (DFL), from January 25, 1978 until November 7, 1978** Durenberger (R), from November 8, 1978Mississippi*2. O. Eastland (D), until December 27, 1978** Cochran (R), from December 27, 1978*1. C. Stennis (D)Missouri*1. C. Danforth (R)*3. F. Eagleton (D)Montana*1. Melcher (D)*2. Metcalf (D), until January 12, 1978** G. Hatfield (D), from January 22, 1978 until December 12, 1978** Baucus (D), from December 15, 1978Nebraska*1. Zorinsky (D)*2. T. Curtis (R)Nevada*1. W. Cannon (D)*3. Laxalt (R)New Hampshire*2. J. McIntyre (D)*3. A. Durkin (D)New Jersey*2. P. Case (R)*1. A. Williams (D)New Mexico*1. Schmitt (R)*2. V. Domenici (R)New York*3. K. Javits (R)*1. Patrick Moynihan (D)North Carolina*2. Helms (R)*3. B. Morgan (D)North Dakota*3. R. Young (R)*1. N. Burdick (D)Ohio*3. H. Glenn Jr. (D)*1. Metzenbaum (D)Oklahoma*3. Bellmon (R)*2. F. Bartlett (R)Oregon*2. O. Hatfield (R)*3. W. Packwood (R)Pennsylvania*1. John Heinz III (R)*3. S. Schweiker (R)Rhode Island*2. Pell (D)*1. H. Chafee (R)South Carolina*2. Thurmond (R)*3. F. Hollings (D)South Dakota*3. S. McGovern (D)*2. Abourezk (D)Tennessee*2. Baker (R)*1. R. Sasser (D)Texas*2. Tower (R)*1. Bentsen (D)Utah*1. Hatch (R)*3. Garn (R)Vermont*1. T. Stafford (R)*3. Leahy (D)Virginia*1. F. Byrd, Jr. (I)*2. L. Scott (R), until January 1, 1979** Warner (R), from January 2, 1979Washington*3. G. Magnuson (D)*1. M. Jackson (D)West Virginia*2. Randolph (D)*1. Byrd (D)Wisconsin*1. Proxmire (D)*3. A. Nelson (D)Wyoming*1. Wallop (R)*2. P. Hansen (R), until December 31, 1978** K. Simpson (R), from January 1, 1979House of RepresentativesMembers of the House of Representatives elected statewide at-large, are preceded by At-large, and the names of those elected from districts, are preceded by their district numbers.Many of the congressional district numbers are linked to articles describing the district itself. Since the boundaries of the districts have changed often and substantially, the linked article may only describe the district as it exists today, and not as it was at the time of this Congress.Alabama* . Jack Edwards, (R)* . Louis Dickinson, (R)* . Bill Nichols, (D)* . Bevill, (D)* . Flippo, (D)* . Hall Buchanan, Jr., (R)* . Flowers, (D)Alaska* . Young, (R)Arizona* . Jacob Rhodes, (R)* . Udall, (D)* . Stump, (D)* . D. Rudd, (R)Arkansas* . Alexander, Jr., (D)* . Guy Tucker, (D)* . Paul Hammerschmidt, (R)* . Thornton, (D)California* . T. Johnson, (D)* . H. Clausen, (R)* . E. Moss, (D), until December 31, 1978* . L. Leggett, (D)* . L. Burton, (D)* . Burton, (D)* . George Miller, (D)* . V. Dellums, (D)* . Stark, (D)* . Edwards, (D)* . Ryan, (D), until November 18, 1978* . N. McCloskey, Jr., (R)* . Mineta, (D)* . J. McFall, (D), until December 31, 1978* . F. Sisk, (D)* . Panetta, (D)* . Hans Krebs, (D)* . M. Ketchum, (R), until June 24, 1978* . J. Lagomarsino, (R)* . Goldwater, Jr., (R)* . C. Corman, (D)* . J. Moorhead, (R)* . C. Beilenson, (D)* . Waxman, (D)* . R. Roybal, (D)* . H. Rousselot, (R)* . K. Dornan, (R)* . B. Burke, (D)* . F. Hawkins, (D)* . E. Danielson, (D)* . H. Wilson, (D)* . M. Anderson, (D)* . M. Clawson, (R), until December 31, 1978* . W. Hannaford, (D)* . F. Lloyd, (D)* . Brown, Jr., (D)* . Neil Pettis, (R)* . M. Patterson, (D)* . E. Wiggins, (R)* . E. Badham, (R)* . Bob Wilson, (R)* . Van Deerlin, (D)* . W. Burgener, (R)Colorado* . Schroeder, (D)* . Wirth, (D)* . E. Evans, (D)* . Paul Johnson, (R)* . L. Armstrong, (R)Connecticut* . Ross Cotter, (D)* . John Dodd, (D)* . Nicholas Giaimo, (D)* . Brett McKinney, (R)* . A. Sarasin, (R)* . Moffett, (D)Delaware* . B. Evans, Jr., (R)Florida* . L.F. Sikes, (D)* . Fuqua, (D)* . Edward Bennett, (D)* . V. Chappell, Jr., (D)* . Richard Kelly, (R)* . Young, (R)* . M. Gibbons, (D)* . Ireland, (D)* . Frey, Jr., (R)* . A. Bafalis, (R)* . G. Rogers, (D)* . Herbert Burke, (R)* . William Lehman, (D)* . Pepper, (D)* . B. Fascell, (D)Georgia* . B. Ginn, (D)* . Mathis, (D)* . T. Brinkley, (D)* . H. Levitas, (D)* . Young, (D), until January 29, 1977** Fowler, (D), from April 6, 1977* . J. Flynt, Jr., (D)* . P. McDonald, (D)* . Lee Evans, (D)* . L. Jenkins, (D)* . Barnard, Jr., (D)Hawaii* . Heftel, (D)* . Akaka, (D)Idaho* . Symms, (R)* . V. Hansen, (R)Illinois* . Metcalfe (D), until October 10, 1978* . F. Murphy (D)* . Russo (D)* . Edward J. Derwinski (R)* . G. Fary (D)* . J. Hyde (R)* . Collins (D)* . Daniel D. Rostenkowski (D)* . R. Yates (D)* . J. Mikva (D)* . Annunzio (D)* . M. Crane (R)* . McClory (R)* . N. Erlenborn (R)* . Tom Corcoran (R)* . B. Anderson (R)* . M. OBrien (R)* . H. Michel (R)* . Thomas F. Railsback (R)* . Findley (R)* . Rell Madigan (R)* . E. Shipley (D)* . Price (D)* . Paul M. Simon (D)Indiana* . Benjamin (D)* . Fithian (D)* . Brademas (D)* . Danforth Quayle III (R)* . Hillis (R)* . W. Evans (D)* . John T. Myers (R)* . L. Cornwell (D)* . H. Hamilton (D)* . R. Sharp (D)* . Jacobs, Jr. (D)Iowa* . Leach (R)* . T. Blouin (D)* . E. Grassley (R)* . Neal Smith (D)* . Harkin (D)* . Bedell (D)Kansas* . Sebelius (R)* . Elizabeth Keys (D)* . E. Lawrence Winn, Jr. (R)* . Glickman (D)* . Skubitz, Jr. (R), until December 31, 1978Kentucky* . Hubbard, Jr. (D)* . William H. Natcher (D)* . L. Mazzoli (D)* . M. Gene Snyder (R)* . Lee Carter (R)* . B. Breckinridge (D)* . D. Perkins (D)Louisiana* . A. Tonry (D), until May 4, 1977** Livingston (R), from August 27, 1977* . Boggs (D)* . C. Treen (R)* . Joseph D. Waggonner, Jr. (D)* . Huckaby (D)* . Moore (R)* . B. Breaux (D)* . W. Long (D)Maine* . F. Emery (R)* . Cohen (R)Maryland* . Bauman (R)* . Clarence D. Long (D)* . Mikulski (D)* . Holt (R)* . Spellman (D)* . Byron (D), until October 11, 1978* . Mitchell (D)* . Steers (R)Massachusetts* . O. Conte (R)* . Edward P. Boland (D)* . Early (D)* . Drinan (D)* . Tsongas (D)* . J. Harrington (D)* . Markey (D)* . Thomas P. (Tip) ONeill, Jr. (D)* . Moakley (D)* . Margaret M. Heckler (R)* . A. Burke (D)* . Studds (D)Michigan* . John Conyers, Jr. (D)* . Pursell (R)* . Garry E. Brown (R)* . Stockman (R)* . S. Sawyer (R)* . Bob Carr (D)* . Kildee (D)* . Traxler (D)* . Guy A. Vander Jagt (R)* . Elford A. Cederberg (R), until December 31, 1978* . E. Ruppe (R)* . Bonior (D)* . Charles C. Diggs, Jr. (D)* . N. Nedzi (D)* . D. Ford (D)* . John D. Dingell, Jr. (D)* . M. Brodhead (D)* . J. Blanchard (D)* . S. Broomfield (R)Minnesota* . Quie (R)* . Hagedorn (R)* . Frenzel (R)* . Vento (DFL)* . M. Fraser (DFL)* . Nolan (DFL)* . Bergland (DFL), until January 22, 1977** Stangeland (R), from February 22, 1977* . Oberstar, (DFL)Mississippi* . L. Whitten (D)* . R. Bowen (D)* . V. Montgomery (D)* . Cochran (R), until December 26, 1978* . Lott (R)Missouri* . L. Clay, Sr. (D)* . A. Young (D)* . Gephardt (D)* . Skelton (D)* . W. Bolling (D)* . Coleman (R)* . Gene Taylor (R)* . Richard H. Ichord, II (D)* . L. Volkmer (D)* . Dean Burlison (D)Montana* . Baucus (D), until December 14, 1978* . Marlenee (R)Nebraska* . Thone (R)* . Joseph Cavanaugh III (D)* . Virginia Smith (R)Nevada* . David Santini (D)New Hampshire* . DAmours (D)* . James C. Cleveland (R)New Jersey* . J. Florio (D)* . J. Hughes (D)* . J. Howard (D)* . Frank Thompson, Jr. (D)* . Fenwick (R)* . B. Forsythe (R)* . Maguire (D)* . A. Roe (D)* . C. Hollenbeck (R)* . Peter W. Rodino, Jr. (D)* . Joseph G. Minish (D)* . J. Rinaldo (R)* . Stevenson Meyner (D)* . A. LeFante (D), until December 14, 1978* . J. Patten (D)New Mexico* . Lujan, Jr. (R)* . L. Runnels (D)New York* . G. Pike (D)* . J. Downey (D)* . A. Ambro, Jr. (D)* . F. Lent (R)* . W. Wydler (R)* . L. Wolff (D)* . Joseph P. Addabbo (D)* . Benjamin S. Rosenthal (D)* . James J. Delaney (D), until December 31, 1978* . Biaggi (D)* . H. Scheuer (D)* . Chisholm (D)* . J. Solarz (D)* . W. Richmond (D)* . C. Zeferetti (D)* . Holtzman (D)* . M. Murphy (D)* . I. Koch (D), until December 31, 1977** William Green (R), from February 14, 1978* . B. Rangel (D)* . S. Weiss (D)* . Badillo (D-L), until December 31, 1977** Robert Garcia (R-L, then D), from February 14, 1978, changed parties February 21, 1978* . Brewster Bingham (D)* . Faulkner Caputo (R)* . Ottinger (D)* . Fish IV (R)* . A. Gilman (R)* . F. McHugh (D)* . S. Stratton (D)* . W. Pattison (D)* . C. McEwen (R)* . J. Mitchell (R)* . M. Hanley (D)* . F. Walsh (R)* . Frank Horton (R)* . B. Conable, Jr. (R)* . J. LaFalce (D)* . J. Nowak (D)* . Kemp (R)* . N. Lundine (D)North Carolina* . B. Jones, Sr. (D)* . H. Fountain (D)* . O. Whitley (D)* . F. Andrews (D)* . L. Neal (D)* . Richardson Preyer (D)* . Rose (congressman) (D)* . Hefner (D)* . G. Martin (R)* . T. Broyhill (R)* . Lamar Gudger (D)North Dakota* . Mark Andrews (R)Ohio* . D. Gradison Jr. (R)* . A. Luken (D)* . W. Whalen, Jr. (R)* . Guyer (R)* . Delbert L. Latta (R)* . William H. Harsha (R)* . Clarence J. Brown, Jr. (R)* . N. Kindness (R)* . W. L. Ashley (D)* . E. Miller (R)* . William Stanton (R)* . L. Devine (R)* . J. Pease (D)* . F. Seiberling (D)* . Chalmers P. Wylie (R)* . S. Regula (R)* . M. Ashbrook (R)* . Applegate (D)* . J. Carney (D)* . Rose Oakar (D)* . Stokes (D)* . A. Vanik (D)* . M. Mottl (D)Oklahoma* . Robert Jones (D)* . Marshall Risenhoover (D)* . Watkins (D)* . Thomas J. Steed (D)* . Edwards (R)* . English (D)Oregon* . AuCoin (D)* . Albert C. Ullman (D)* . B. Duncan (D)* . H. Weaver (D)Pennsylvania* . J. Myers (D)* . N.C. Nix, Sr. (D)* . F. Lederer (D)* . Eilberg (D)* . T. Schulze (R)* . Yatron (D)* . W. Edgar (D)* . H. Kostmayer (D)* . Shuster (R)* . M. McDade (R)* . J. Flood (D)* . P. Murtha (D)* . Lawrence Coughlin (R)* . S. Moorhead (D)* . Frederick B. Rooney (D)* . S. Walker (R)* . E. Ertel (D)* . Walgren (D)* . F. Goodling (R)* . M. Gaydos (D)* . John H. Dent (D)* . J. Murphy (D)* . S. Ammerman (D)* . L. Marks (R)* . A. Myers (R)Rhode Island* . St. Germain (D)* . Beard (D)South Carolina* . J. Davis (D)* . Spence (R)* . Derrick (D)* . James R. Mann (D)* . Lamar Holland (D)* . Jenrette (D)South Dakota* . Pressler (R)* . Abdnor (R)Tennessee* . James H. Quillen (R)* . John J. Duncan, Sr. (R)* . Lloyd (D)* . A. Gore Jr. (D)* . Allen (D), until June 18, 1978* . L. Beard, Jr. (R)* . Ed Jones (D)* . Ford, Sr. (D)Texas* . B. Hall (D)* . Charles Wilson (D)* . M. Collins (R)* . H. Ray Roberts (D)* . Mattox (D)* . E. Teague (D), until December 31, 1978* . Reynolds Archer, Jr. (R)* . C. Eckhardt (D)* . Jack B. Brooks (D)* . James J. (Jake) Pickle (D)* . R. Poage (D), until December 31, 1978* . James C. Wright, Jr. (D)* . Hightower (D)* . John A. Young (D)* . Eligio (Kika) de la Garza, II (D)* . C. White (D)* . T. Burleson (D), until December 31, 1978* . Jordan (D)* . H. Mahon (D)* . Henry B. Gonzlez (D)* . Krueger (D)* . Gammage (D)* . Abraham Kazen, Jr. (D)* . Milford (D)Utah* . Gunn McKay (D)* . Daniel Marriott (R)Vermont* . Jeffords (R)Virginia* . S. Trible, Jr. (R)* . William Whitehurst (R)* . E. Satterfield III (D)* . Williams Daniel, Jr. (R)* . Dan Daniel (D)* . Caldwell Butler (R)* . Kenneth Robinson (R)* . Eugene Harris II (D)* . C. Wampler (R)* . L. Fisher (D)Washington* . Pritchard (R)* . E. Lloyd Meeds (D)* . Bonker (D)* . Mike McCormack (D)* . Thomas S. Foley (D)* . Dicks (D)* . Brockman Adams (D), until January 22, 1977** E. Cunningham (R)from May 17, 1977West Virginia* . H. Mollohan (D)* . Harley O. Staggers (D)* . M. Slack (D)* . Rahall (D)Wisconsin* . Aspin (D)* . Robert W. Kastenmeier (D)* . Baldus (D)* . J. Zablocki (D)* . S. Reuss (D)* . A. Steiger (R), until December 4, 1978* . Obey (D)* . John Cornell (D)* . W. Kasten, Jr. (R)Wyoming* . Roncalio (D), until December 30, 1978Non-voting members* . E. Fauntroy (D)* . Borja Won Pat (D)* . Corrada del Ro (PNP)* . de Lugo (D) Changes in Membership The count below reflects changes from the beginning of the first session of this Congress. Senate *replacements: 11** Democratic: 3 seat net loss** Republican: 3 seat net gain*deaths: 4*resignations: 5*vacancy:*Total seats with changes: 9|-| nowrap | Arkansas(2)|  nowrap | John L. McClellan(D)| stylefont-size:80% | Died November 28, 1977|  nowrap | Hodges, Jr.(D)| December 10, 1977|-| nowrap | Montana(2)|  nowrap | Metcalf(D)| stylefont-size:80% | Died January 12, 1978|  nowrap | G. Hatfield(D)| January 22, 1978|-| nowrap | Minnesota(1)|  nowrap | Humphrey(DFL)| stylefont-size:80% | Died January 13, 1978|  nowrap | Muriel Humphrey(D)| January 25, 1978|-| nowrap | Alabama(3)|  nowrap | James Allen(D)| stylefont-size:80% | Died June 1, 1978|  nowrap | Pittman Allen(D)| June 8, 1978|-| nowrap | Alabama(3)|  nowrap | Pittman Allen(D)| stylefont-size:80% | Successor elected November 7, 1978|  nowrap | Donald Stewart(D)| November 7, 1978|-| nowrap | Minnesota(1)|  nowrap | Muriel Humphrey(DFL)| stylefont-size:80% | Successor elected November 7, 1978|  nowrap | Durenberger(R)| November 8, 1978|-| nowrap | Montana(2)|  nowrap | G. Hatfield(D)| stylefont-size:80% | Successor elected and resigned early December 12, 1978|  nowrap | Baucus(D)| December 15, 1978|-| nowrap | Kansas(2)|  nowrap | B. Pearson(R)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 23, 1978|  nowrap | Nancy Kassebaum(R)| December 23, 1978|-| nowrap | Mississippi(2)|  nowrap | Eastland(D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 27, 1978|  nowrap | Cochran(R)| December 27, 1978|-| nowrap | Minnesota(2)|  nowrap | Anderson(DFL)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 29, 1978|  nowrap | Boschwitz(R)| December 30, 1978|-| nowrap | Wyoming(2)|  nowrap | Hansen(R)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978|  nowrap | K. Simpson(R)| January 1, 1979|-| nowrap | Virginia(2)|  nowrap | L. Scott(R)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned January 1, 1979|  nowrap | Warner(R)| January 2, 1979|} House of Representatives *replacements: 6** Democratic: 4 seat net loss** Republican: 4 seat net gain*deaths: 6*resignations: 21*contested election: *Total seats with changes: 25|-| |  nowrap | Bergland (DFL)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned January 22, 1977 after being appointed States Secretary of Agriculture|  nowrap | Stangeland (R)| February 22, 1977|-| |  nowrap | Adams (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned January 22, 1977 after being appointed States Secretary of Transportation |  nowrap | E. Cunningham (R)| May 17, 1977|-| |  nowrap | Young (D)| stylefont-size:80% |  Resigned January 29, 1977 after being appointed States Ambassador to the United Nations |  nowrap | Fowler (D)| April 6, 1977|-| |  nowrap | Richard A. Tonry (D)| stylefont-size:80% |  Forced to resign May 4, 1977 |  nowrap | Livingston (R)| August 27, 1977|-| |  nowrap | Koch (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned January 31, 1977 after being elected of New York City |  nowrap | William Green (R)| February 14, 1978|-| |  nowrap | Badillo (D-L)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned January 31, 1977 after becoming Deputy Mayor of New York City |  nowrap | Garca (R-L)| February 14, 1978|-| |  nowrap | Garca (R-L)| stylefont-size:80% | Changed parties February 21, 1978|  nowrap | Garca (D)| February 21, 1978|-| |  nowrap | Allen (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Died June 18, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | M. Ketchum (R)| stylefont-size:80% | Died June 24, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Metcalfe (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Died October 10, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Byron (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Died October 11, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Ryan (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Murdered by members of the Temple at the Guyana Airport November 18, 1978 shortly before the Jonestown Massacre| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | A. Steiger (R)| stylefont-size:80% | Died December 4, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Baucus (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 14, 1978 after being appointed to the Senate| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Cochran (R)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 26, 1978 after being appointed to the Senate| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Roncalio (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 30, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | E. Moss (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | J. McFall (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | M. Clawson (R)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Skubitz (R)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Elford A. Cederberg (R)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | A. LeFante (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Delaney (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | E. Teague (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | R. Poage (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|-| |  nowrap | Burleson (D)| stylefont-size:80% | Resigned December 31, 1978| Vacant| Not filled this term|} Employees Senate  House of Representatives References**External links* Biographical Directory of the U.S. Congress* U.S. House of Representatives: Congressional History* U.S. Senate: Statistics and Lists
1015867
History_of_the_west_coast_of_North_America
thumb|right|250px|West coast of North America.The human history of the west coast of North America(The term North America has a variety of meanings, including just the United States and Canada, those two countries plus Mexico, or all of the continent from Panama north; this article uses this most expansive definition.) is believed to stretch back to the arrival of the earliest people over the Strait, or alternately along a now-submerged coastal plain, through the development of significant pre-Columbian cultures and population densities, to the arrival of the European explorers and colonizers.  The west coast of America today is home to some of the largest and most important companies in the world,(Ranked by 2007 market valuation, nearly 10% of the 200 largest publicly-traded companies in the world are based on the west coast of North America: Microsoft, Chevron, Cisco Systems, Intel, Wells Fargo, Google, Amgen, Hewlett-Packard, Qualcomm, Oracle, Apple Computer, Ebay, Walt Disney, Yahoo, Washington Mutual, and Occidental Petroleum. (See Top ranked publicly-traded companies. Accessed 2008-02-01.)  Of the 200 largest privately-held companies in the United States (ranked by 2006 revenue), over 20% are based on the west coast of North America, including brand names Levi Strauss & Co. and E&J Gallo Winery, and global firms Bechtel and Parsons.  (See Top ranked privately held companies. Accessed 2007-01-02.) Finally, of the nearly 800 billionaires in the world (as ranked by Forbes magazine in 2006) nearly 100 (or over 10%) live on the west coast of North America, including Bill Gates, listed as the wealthiest individual in the world. (See List of billionaires. Accessed 2007-01-02.)) as well as being a center of world culture.  GeographyAs used in this article, the term west coast of North America means a contiguous region of that continent bordering the Ocean: all or parts of the states of Alaska, Washington, Oregon, and California; all or parts of Columbia and the Yukon in Canada; all or part of the Mexican states of California, California Sur, Sonora, Sinaloa, Nayarit, Jalisco, Colima, Michoacan, Guerrero, Oaxaca and Chiapas; and the central american countries of Guatemala, Salvador, Honduras, Nicaragua, Rica and Panama.  The eastern Islands of the Pacific Ocean off the west coast, such as the islands of the Californias, are also important.First peoplesThis region of North America likely saw the first sustained arrival of people to the continent.  Although there are other theories, most scientists believe that the first significant groups of people came from Asia, through todays Strait area, then through modern Alaska, and from there spread throughout North America and to America.Although the cultures on the west coast of todays Canada and United States are not known to have developed substantial urban centers and sophisticated writing or scientific systems, it is likely that, before European contact, the population density along the west coast of todays Canada and United States was significantly higher than in the rest of the northern part of the continent.  For example, it has been estimated that in 1492, one-third of all Americans in the United States were living in California.(Starr, Kevin. California: a history, New York, Modern Library (2005), p. 13)left|thumb|350px|The cultural areas of MesoamericaIn the western half of Mesoamerica (that is, western portions of todays Mexico and northern America), the oldest settlements date to approximately 2000 BCE.(See Matanchn Complex: New Radiocarbon Dates on Early Coastal Adaptation in West Mexico. Joseph B. Mountjoy, R. E. Taylor, and Lawrence H. Feldman. Science 17 March 1972: Vol. 175. no. 4027, pp. 12421243.  Abstract: Samples of marine shell from archaeological context on the coast of Nayarit, Mexico, have given radiocarbon determinations of 1810  80 B.C., 2000  100 B.C., and 2100  100 B.C. Even with maximum correction for upwelling these are the earliest dates for coastal occupation in West Mexico north of Acapulco, Guerrero. Analysis of the midden contents has provided new insights regarding early coastal adaptation.) A succession of cultures started with the very early Capacha culture, which appeared on the Pacific coast of modern Mexico about 1450 BC and spread into the interior.(Discussion of the Chapaca culture)  The following cultures developed into high civilizations in Mesoamerica, with extensive urban areas, writing, astronomy and fine arts: *Olmec (beginning about 1150 BC)*Mixtec (beginning perhaps 1000 BC)*Maya (settled villages along the Pacific coast appear from 1800 BC, and ceremonial architecture by approximately 1000 BC) and*Aztec (from the 14th century AD)Farther south, Panama was home to some of the earliest pottery-making, such as the Monagrillo culture dating to about 25001700 BC; this culture evolved into significant populations best known for spectacular burial sites (dating to c. 500900 AD) and polychrome pottery of the Cocl style. Each of these cultures rose, flourished, and was then conquered by a more militarily-developed culture.  While not all of these civilizations had large settlements along the coast of the Pacific Ocean, their influence extended to the Pacific coast.thumb|right|250px|Vasco Nez de Balboa claiming possession of the Pacific Ocean and the lands that touch it.European arrival (15131750) In 1513, Spanish explorers were the first Europeans to reach the west coast of North America, on the Pacific coast of the Panama isthmus.  From the point of view of European powers in the age of sailing ships, the west coast of North America was among the most distant places in the world.  The arduous journey around Horn at the tip of South America and then north meant nine to twelve months of dangerous sailing.  These practical difficulties discouraged all but the Empire from making regular visits and establishing settlements and ports until the second half of the 18th centurysome 200 years after Europeans first reached the east coast of North America.Spanish explorers and conquistadorsExplorers flying the flag of Spain reached the World beginning on 1492 with the of America by Columbus.  Spanish expeditions colonized and explored vast areas in North and South America following the grants of the Pope (contained in the 1493 papal bull caetera) and rights contained in the 1494 of Tordesillas and 1529 of Zaragoza. These formal acts gave Spain the exclusive rights to colonize the entire Western Hemisphere (excluding eastern Brazil), including all of the west coast of North America. The first European expedition to actually reach the west coast was led by the Spaniard Nez de Balboa, who reached the Pacific coast of Panama in 1513.  In an act of enduring historical importance, Balboa claimed the Pacific Ocean for the Spanish Crown, as well as all adjoining land and islands. This act gave Spain exclusive sovereignty and navigation rights over the entire west coast of North America.thumb|left|350px|Map of the New World published in 1540, showing Japan and China very near North America, and Strait of Anin.The commonly held belief at the time was that the west coast of North America was in modest sailing distance of Asia, or the two might actually physically connect, or perhaps separated only by an imagined narrow Passage, known as the of Anin, which some believed reached the Pacific Ocean at 42 north latitude (the latitude of todays border between Oregon and California) and connected to the Ocean at the of St. Lawrence.  Confirmation of the land connection, and discovery of this Strait of Anin, were key elements in Spains efforts to establish direct trade routes with China and other countries in Asia.The Pacific Coast of Mexico and Central America was not especially conducive to economic development during this era. The northern Mexican coast (including the California Peninsula) was generally too dry for substantial agriculture or ranching that would support settlements. South of the deserts, the jungles of the Pacific Coast in Mexico and Central America, and the tropical diseases found there,  were major obstacles to large-scale development.  Important exceptions were the development of important Spanish ports at Puerto de Navidad and Acapulco in todays Mexico. While Navidad faded in importance, Acapulco became the primary port of the Empire on the west coast of North America, and was used as a base for exploratory expeditions north and trade routes with the Far East.(Development of Spanish ports and fleets on west coast) right|thumb|350px|Sites mentioned as sites of likely visits by early European explorers to the west coast of North America.From 15331535, Spanish conquistador Corts personally sponsored and financed exploratory sailing voyages north from Acapulco, in a search for legendary riches reported to be in the site of todays California.  In the third of these voyages, Corts accompanied the voyage, and likely reached the site of todays La Paz on the Baja California peninsula.(Text of Baja California history)In 1539, another voyage financed and sponsored by Corts, and led by de Ulloa, embarked on an expedition in three small vessels, sailing north from Acapulco to explore the Pacific Coast, and to seek the Strait of Anin.  The expedition sailed northwards along the west coast of the Mexican mainland, and reached the of California six weeks later. Ulloa named the Gulf the Sea of Corts in honor of his patron. When one of his ships was lost in a storm, Ulloa paused to repair the other two ships, and then resumed his voyage, eventually reaching the northern end of the Gulf.  Unable to find the Strait of Anin, Ulloa turned south and sailed along the eastern coast of the California peninsula, landing at the Bay of La Paz. After taking on supplies of wood and water, Ulloa rounded the tip of the peninsula with great difficulty and sailed northward along the western shore of the peninsula, in the Pacific Ocean. The progress of his small ships was hampered by the fierce winds and high seas he encountered, eventually forcing him to turn back to Acapulco. The voyage eventually reached 28 north latitude (near the de Cedros). Voyages in 1540 and 1541 to Baja California were sponsored by Cortss rival, the Viceroy of Spain.  These voyages were led by de Alarcn (1540) and by de Bolanos (1541).  The voyage by Alarcn was meant to be coordinated with Vsquez de Coronados overland expedition; Alarcn penetrated the lower Colorado River, perhaps as far as the modern California-Arizona boundary (but did not meet up with Coronados expedition). The voyage of Bolanos provided little new information not already known in New Spain.  Application of the name California to this part of the west coast of North America is attributed by some to Bolanos,(Spate, O. H. K., The Spanish Lake on-line text)(History of Cerritos.) however other insist that the name first appears in work written by Alarcn.(Descubrimientos y Exploraciones en las Costas de California (Discoveries and Explorations on the Coasts of California 15321650, Madrid, 1947; 2 edicin 1982, pp. 113141): relevant passage quoted and cited at Etimologa de California on etimologias.dechile.net. Accessed 1 April.)The governor of Guatemala also determined to build a Pacific fleet on the west coast of Guatemala, for use in an attempt to cross the Pacific to Asia.  Magellan, the Portuguese explorer sailing for Spain, had shown in 1521 that the Pacific Ocean could be crossed from South America.  Hence, beginning in 1536, using hardware from Spain (such as anchors) hauled across the isthmus of Central America, and local hardwoods, a flotilla of some thirteen ships was built over the next four years.  After much difficulty, the larger number of these ships (under the command of Lpez de Villalobos) was ordered to make the first crossing of the Pacific Ocean from North America to the Philippines.  A smaller number was placed under the command of Rodrguez Cabrillo, a Portuguese navigator sailing for the Spanish Crown.  Cabrillo was ordered north along the west coast of North America to explore the expected coastal route to reach the Asian mainland, as well as attempt to find the Strait of Anin.((Information about Cabrillos voyages.) In 1542, Cabrillo became the first European to explore the west coast of todays United States, leading the expedition that landed at Diego Bay, and continued north. But Cabrillo died during this voyage, and the remainder of the exploration was led by Ferrelo, who sailed perhaps as far north as the Rogue River in todays western coast of Oregon.(U.S. National Park Service Juan Cabrillo website)(U.S. National Park Service Juan Cabrillo website)Importantly beginning in 1565, Acapulco was a home of the vital Galleons.  The Manila Galleons crossed the Pacific Ocean to the Spanish possession of the Philippines, laden with silver and gemstones from Mexico.  There, the wealth was used to purchase Asian trade goods such as spices, silk, and porcelain.  These goods were then carried across the Pacific by the Manila Galleons to Acapulco; from there, the goods were transshipped across Mexico, for delivery to the treasure fleet, for shipment to Spain.  The income provided to Spain by the Manila Galleons was essential to the Spanish Crown and to the Spanish economy of the era.(It is estimated that one-third of the silver from Mexico was used to purchase trade goods in Manila.)(Summary of Spanish North Pacific history)When Lpez de Legazpi completed the conquest of the Philippines in 1565, he sent his flagship, the San Pedro, back to New Spain, with orders to survey and chart a practicable route for ships returning from the Islands. The San Pedro sailed from Cebu, headed roughly northeast, followed the Current (also known as the Japan Current), and made landfall on the coast of California about the latitude of Mendocino. A sail of two thousand five hundred miles down the coasts of California and New Spain brought the voyagers to the port of Acapulco. This route was charted by the Basque navigator and friar de Urdaneta,(Information about de Urdaneta) on board the San Pedro, and for nearly three centuries was the one followed by the galleons of Spain sailing from Manila to Acapulco. This return voyage across the Pacific could take up to seven months. A harbor on the coast of California where ships could find shelter and repair damage was greatly desired. A survey of the unknown northern Pacific coast of North America was ordered, and it was also suggested that the explorations be extended north of 42 north latitude.((Etext of Spanish exploration of west coast, including diaries)(History of Spanish explorers of west coast, retrieved)In 1585, Captain Francisco de Gali, on the return voyage from the Philippines, was directed to sail as far north as the weather would permit, and then east, and upon reaching the coast of California to make maps on his journey south. However, Gali accomplished only limited chart-making. He reached the California coast at latitude 37 30 (Pointjust south of todays San Francisco), and noted that the land was high and fair; that the mountains were without snow, and that there were many indications of rivers, bays, and havens along the coast.((In 1594, Captain Sebastian Cermeon, a Portuguese sailor in the service of Spain, sailed from the Philippines in the San Agustin with orders similar to those of Gali. In this attempt, Cermeons ship became wrecked and was beached in Bay, north of San Francisco. Using salvaged and local materials, the crew constructed an open boat, and the ships company of more than seventy persons continued the homeward voyage. This open vessel reached Acapulco in early 1596a  remarkable voyage of nearly twenty-five hundred miles in an open boat. With the loss of the San Agustin, exploration of the California coast by ships loaded with cargo from the Philippines came to an end.((In 1602, the Basque captain Vizcano, sailing for Spain, explored the coastline from Mexico as far north as Bay in todays California, where he went ashore. He ventured inland south along the coast, and recorded a visit to what is likely Carmel Bay. His major contributions were the glowing reports of the Monterey area as an anchorage and as land suitable for settlement, as well as the detailed charts he made of the coastal waters (which were used for nearly 200 years); however no settlements in todays California were established for the next 150 years.(Information from Monterey County Museum about Vizcainos voyage and Monterey landing retrieved; Summary of Vizcaino expedition diary retrieved)In the late 17th century, Spain sent the first missionaries into todays Baja California, founding the first mission there in 1683 at San Bruno on the east coast of the Baja peninsula (San Bruno was abandoned as unsuccessful after two years).  In 1697, the first permanent mission was established at Loreto, about  away from San Bruno, also on the east coast of the peninsula.  During this period (until 1750), some 16 missions were established on the peninsulamostly on the east coast of the peninsula, with a handful on the Pacific coast, in the northwestern part of the peninsula.(Other explorers who visited Baja California include: Tomas Cardova, in 1610; Francisco de Ortega, in 1632, and again in 1636; Luigi Cestin de Caas in 1642; Porter y Casanate in 1644; Bernal de Pinadero in 1667: Ysidro Otondo (who founded at La Paz a colony that endured about two years, and was then abandoned) in 1683.  See On-line text of Baja California history)English interestAlthough it wasnt until 1579 that the west coast of North America was visited by an English explorer, the privateer Francis Drake who landed north of todays Francisco and claimed the area for England, calling it Albion or New England, the English claim to this territory  dates back to Cabots landing on  Americas. The exact location of Drakes landing has never been determined, and the extent of Drakes claim is unknown.  The most commonly accepted location is at Estero (also known as Drakes Bay, just north of San Francisco, in County). However, other candidates include Bay and Campbell Cove at the entrance of Harbor in California, as well as sites in Oregon and British Columbia.  Despite the facts that no permanent settlements were ever established by Drake, and that the next official visit by the British would be some two hundred years later, Drakes action and Cabots original claim in 1497 were the foundations of British claims to portions of the west coast of North America in the late 18th century.Settlements and conflicts (17501846)While the Spanish had dominated development on the west coast of North America for over 200 years since the early 16th century, beginning in the mid-18th century, this period saw the advent of British and Russian rivals, and the establishment of the missions, followed by the independence of Mexico and the Central American countries.  Much later in this period, the States started on its path to become the dominant power on the west coast of North America.Spanish settlements in coastal New SpainIn the 1760s, a decision was made to create a harbor at San Blas (in todays Mexican state of Nayarit), for the purpose of building ships, supplying them, and being the expeditionary base for voyages north along the west coast of North America, from Baja California to Alaska.  Today it remains unclear exactly why the Viceroy of Spain decided to create an entirely new shipbuilding port along the west coast of Mexico, when the port at Acapulco already existed.  It has been speculated that the reasons San Blas was chosen included that it was a weeks sailing closer than Acapulco to the intended destination sites in California, that it was not far from the capital of New Spain, and perhaps more importantly, it had ready access to tropical hardwoods that would be needed to build the ships for the strenuous voyages as far north as todays Alaska.  San Blas built the ships and was the home port for these exploration and supply voyages beginning in 1769 and continuing to 1820.(History of creation of San Blas harbor)Spanish missionsIt was not until 1769, that the first missions were established in todays California (then called Californias), including the first mission, at Diego in 1769, the mission at Monterey in 1770, and the mission at San Francisco in 1776.  These missions eventually stretched from the southern tip of the Baja California peninsula to California, north of San Francisco.  The purpose of the missions, which typically had an accompanying pueblo (town) and presidio (military outpost), was to solidify the 250-year old Spanish claim to the region.  This need became more urgent as the Russians and British were encroaching on the far northern part of the west coast of North America.  In addition, there continued the long-standing interest in creating a safe anchorage for seaworn Galleons on their return to Acapulco.Russian settlementsExplorers and fur trappers from the Empire (beginning with the Bering expedition of 1741) arrived on the Pacific coast of todays Alaska, and after establishing settlements there (beginning in 1784), expanded hunting and trading down the west coast of North America. In the early 19th century, fur trappers of the Russian Empire explored the west coast of North America, hunting for sea otter pelts as far south as San Diego. In 1812, the Company set up a fortified trading post at Ross, near present day Bay some sixty miles north of Francisco.Spanish explorationIn the late 18th century, Spain reacted to the expanding Russian and British presence in the Northwest by sending exploratory expeditions along the coast as far north as Alaska. In 1775, a two-ship exploration expedition led by Spanish Captain Bruno de Heceta landed on the coast of todays Washingtonthe first European to have sailed this far north along the coast. The expedition re-asserted Spanish claims to all the coastal lands, including to the Russian settlements in the north.  The two ships sailed together as far north as Grenville, named Punta de los Martires (or Point of the Martyrs) by Heceta in response to an attack by the local Quinault Indians. He was the first European to sight the mouth of the Columbia River. By design, the two vessels separated with one continuing to what is today the border between Washington state and Canada. The other (now with second officer Francisco de la Bodega y Quadra at the helm) moved up the coast according to its orders, ultimately reaching a position at 59 north latitude on August 15, 1775, entering Sound near the present-day town of Alaska. It is there that the Spaniards performed numerous acts of sovereignty, naming and claiming Puerto de Bucareli (Sound), Puerto de los Remedios, and Mount San Jacinto (renamed Mount Edgecumbe by British explorer James Cook three years later).  In 1790, Spanish explorer Fidalgo led an expedition that included visits to the sites of todays Cordova, Alaska and Valdez, Alaska, where acts of sovereignty were performed.  Fidalgo went as far as todays Island, visiting the small Russian settlement there.  Fidalgo then went to the Russian settlement at Alexandrovsk (todays English Bay or Alaska), southwest of todays Anchorage on the Peninsula, where again, Fidalgo re-asserted the Spanish claim to the area by conducting a formal ceremony of sovereignty.thumb|left|400px|Spanish contact in British Columbia and Alaska.In 1791, the Expedition undertook a search for the Passage, surveying the Alaska coast from Bay to William Sound. At Yakutat Bay, the expedition made contact with the Tlingit. The expeditions scientists made a study of the tribe, recording information on social mores, language, economy, warfare methods, and burial practices. Artists with the expedition, de Suria and Cardero, produced portraits of tribal members and scenes of Tlingit daily life. A glacier between Yakutat Bay and Icy Bay was subsequently named after Malaspina. The botanist Ne also accompanied the expedition, during which he collected and described numerous new plants.During the return to Mexico, Malaspinas expedition spent a month at the Spanish outpost in Sound on Island (see below). The expedition made a study of the Nootka. The two ships then sailed south to Mexico, stopping at the Spanish settlement and mission at Monterey, California on the way. Simultaneously an expedition under de Eliza, exploring the of Juan de Fuca, discovered an entrance to the of Georgia, which prompted further investigation. In Acapulco, Malaspina took over two schooners, the Sutil and Mexicana, placed them under the command of one of his officers, Alcal Galiano, and had them sail north to explore the Strait of Georgia. Galianos expedition took place in 1792 at the same time as that of Vancouver. The two expeditions met in the Strait of Georgia and worked together to map the waters and establish the insularity of Vancouver Island.(Alcal-Galiano, Dionisio, Dictionary of Canadian Biography Online)Today, Spains legacy endures as dozens of Spanish place names.  In Alaska these include the Glacier and Cordova Glacier, the towns of Valdez, Cordova and Port Gravina, as well as Orca Bay , Cordova Peak, and Island.(Collection and discussion of Spanish placenames in todays Alaska.)  In British Columbia some of the better-known Spanish names (of many) include Island, Island, Island and Strait.British North AmericaIn 1778, the British seafaring Captain Cook, midway through his third and final voyage of exploration, sailed along the west coast of North America, mapping the coast from California all the way to the Bering Strait.  The northern stretch of the west coast of North America was claimed by the British, but the region was not occupied by any British subject until 1788, when Meares first small trading post in Sound in todays British Columbia. His post was torn down at the end of 1788 although he claimed otherwise.Conflict between Spain and Great BritainSpain established its own competing fortified trading post at Sound (Santa Cruz de Nutka, maintained between 1789 and 1795(History of Nootka)) on Island, in todays British Columbia, and sought forcibly to remove British traders by seizing ships, triggering the Crisis. War between Spain and Great Britain over control of the Pacific Northwest was averted by the three Conventions, signed in 1790, 1793, and 1794. Spain gave up its claim that it alone could establish settlements in the Pacific Northwest (a claim that dated back to the 1493 papal bull and Balboas actions in 1513), and conceded the British right to establish settlements in any area nominally claimed by Spain but never occupied. This agreement effectively allowed a greatly expanded British presence in the Northwest, including todays British Columbia, Oregon, and Washington.The primary beneficiary of this agreement was the Bay Company, which, in 1825, established a major trading post at Vancouver across the Columbia River just north of todays Oregon.  From this headquarters, British-employed fur trappers spread throughout the Pacific Northwest, extending as far east as the Mountains and, by using the Trail, as far south as Californias Central Valley.Mexican independenceAfter the Spanish possession now known as Mexico (first known as Amrica Septentrional or Northern America) won its War of Independence from Spain in 1821, Mexico initially retained Spains missions and settlements along the Pacific coast, and continued Spains claims to territory as far north as todays border between California and Oregon.  In the 1830s, Mexico ended Church control of the missions in California and opened the land to secular development, particularly ranching.  By the 1840s, there were small Mexican settlements at San Diego, Angeles, San Francisco, and the territorial capital at Monterey.  These settlements primarily traded cattle hides and tallow with American and European merchant vessels.  This period is vividly portrayed in Bostonian Henry Dana, Jr.s famous seafaring memoir, Years Before the Mast and the culture of the great Mexican landowners of this period is often harked back to as exemplifying the height of Californias romantic pastoral era. Mexican control of the territory ended after only 25 years, when attempts by local Mexican officials to expropriate the property of American ranchers  and drive them out of California in the winter lead to the successful uprising known as the bear flag revolt.Central American independenceDuring the 1820s, the Central American possessions of Spain gained their independence, and the boundaries of the young nations shifted in alliances and configurations. For example, what was to became the nation of Panama was simply a province of Colombia, and Guatemala was variously part of a confederation with Mexico, and part of the Provinces of Central America, before becoming a separate nation in 1838.  Almost all of these Central American nations saw continuing political strife throughout this period (and into the 20th century), as struggles continued between indigenous peoples and elites, and among factions of the elites.French interestIn 1786, de Galaup, comte de La Prouse led a group of French scientists and artists on a voyage of exploration ordered by Louis XVI and were welcomed in California. They compiled an account of the California mission system, the land and the people. The leader of a further French scientific expedition to California, Eugne Duflot de Mofras, wrote in 1840 it is evident that California will belong to whatever nation chooses to send there a man-of-war and two hundred men.(Bancroft, Hubert Howe (18841890) History of California, v.4 , The works of Hubert Howe Bancroft, complete text online, p.260) In 1841, the Mexican military commander in Northern California, General Vallejo, wrote there is no doubt that France is intriguing to become mistress of California.U.S. expansionIn 1805, the first official party of Americans to arrive on the west coast of North America, the fabled expedition of and Clark, came down the River to the rivers mouth on the border between todays Oregon and Washington.  In 1819, the United States acquired the Spanish claims to the Pacific Northwest (as negotiated in the Nootka Convention) in the Treaty. The United States argued that it acquired the Spanish rights to exclusive ownership of the Pacific Northwest as far north as Alaska, even though Spain had in fact relinquished any claim to exclusive rights as a result of the Conventions.  This position led to a dispute with Britain known as the boundary dispute, remembered for the slogan 54-40 or fight!  The two countries agreed to defer resolution of the dispute, and to allow settlement by both British and American immigrants in what became known in the United States as the Country (todays Oregon, Washington, and Idaho; much of todays British Columbia; and parts of Montana and Wyoming). In 1841, the States Exploring Expedition visited the west coast of North America by ship, and sent an overland party down the Trail, from the site of todays Portland, Oregon, to Francisco. Americans continued arriving on the west coast of North America in significant numbers in the mid-1830s.  They first came overland along the Trail, settling primarily in the rich Valley south of todays Portland.  By 1841, the first overland party of American settlers reached California along what became the Trail, and by the mid-1840s significant numbers of Americans were arriving in California.In addition, the long-standing dispute between the United States and Great Britain over the Oregon Country was resolved in 1846, with the signing of the Treaty; the Oregon Treaty divided the disputed territory along what later became the current international boundary between Canada and the United States.Rapid growth (18461945)In this era, much of the west coast of North America transformed from an area still largely populated by indigenous peoples to widespread population of non-natives.  In particular, the west coast of the United States showed the most dramatic change, beginning with the Gold Rush and the subsequent opening of the transcontinental railroads, through the development of Hollywood in California, and increased industry and agriculture in the U.S. Pacific Northwest.  Canadian and Mexican development also proceeded during this time, but at a slower pace.(Sailing With the Winds of History: A Pacific Coast Chronicle.  Jevne Haugan, Author (Authorhouse; 1999))United StatesAmericans in California rebelled against Mexico, and in 1846 established the short-lived Republic.  However, the War had already been declared, and the American military quickly took control of California.  At the end of the war, Mexico ceded control of California to the United States.  Things began to change dramatically in 1848 with the Gold Rush which brought an influx of immigrants from around the world.  While few found much gold, many stayed, founding communities and turning to farming and other practices.  Despite these increases in population the west coast was still on the periphery.  The Civil War had little effect.  This began to change as the first railroads (completed in 1869) stretched across the United States.  For the first time, it was relatively cheap and easy to move to the west coast. In 1867, the United States acquired Alaska from the Russian Empire, capping American westward expansion on the North American continent. The next 75 years saw monumental change on the west coast of the United States.  Successive booms of agriculture, oil, entertainment, and industry greatly increased Californias population.  Logging, fishing, and industry drove the economies of California north of the Francisco Bay Area, and Oregon and Washington.CanadaThe gold rush fever spread progressively north; in 1858, the Canyon Gold Rush began in British Columbia, and at the end of the century, the Gold Rush saw the Yukon hit by masses of prospectors.The formal delineation of the international border had not completely allayed Britains fears of losing its Pacific territories, especially as it continued to lag behind the western United States in population and development.  As a condition of British Columbias joining Confederation in 1871, the Canadian government promised British Columbia a railway, though due to the Scandal and controversies over the location of the Pacific port and railhead and the use of importing Chinese rather than British labour, the Pacific Railway was not completed until 1885.  The new line became an important link in what was known as the Red Route around the world, linking global travel through territories exclusively British.MexicoWhile the Pacific Coast of Mexico remained relatively undeveloped economically, exceptions were tobacco cultivation in the coastal territory of Nayarit, tourism at Acapulco, and local-scale fishing all along the coast.Central AmericaThe countries of Central America continued to struggle politically during this time (with perhaps the notable exception of Rica), and began to expand agriculture, particularly in coffee and bananas with investment and substantial control by the United States.  The establishment in 1903 of the newly-independent nation of Panama (under pressure from the United States) led to the creation of the Canal Zone and opening of the Canal in 1914.  The opening of the Canal benefited the region economically as trade with the Eastern United States and Europe became far easier.ImmigrationBoth the gold rushes and the building of the railroads required vast amounts of labor.  One available source that was used on both sides of the border were immigrants from Asia, largely from China and Japan.  These immigrants were willing to work for very little and played a crucial role in building the infrastructure of the west coast.  However, they faced constant discrimination.  Asians were deprived of their rights in both the United States and Canada. There was also pressure to restrict Asian immigration, opinions that were acted on with quotas, taxes, and finally a complete ban in both nations in the 1920s. Because of discrimination, and also a desire to remain a community, Chinatowns developed in all the major cities along the west coast.Increased trade and World War IIThe rise of the Japanese economy also benefited the region as the ability to trade across the Pacific continued to show its great potential.However, only a few decades later, Japan would become a major threat.   During War II, there were few attacks against North America, but the occasional Japanese submarine lurked off the shores. Japan tried to damage the region by sending over hundreds of bombs in an attempt to light forest fires.  These were generally ineffective; a few landed in either Canada or the United States but they caused no great destruction.  More destructive was the internment of Japanese, who were expropriated and sent into internal exile merely for their descent.Post-war period (1945present)The post-war years would be ones of great prosperity and growth on the west coast of North America.  The quick reemergence of Japan and its stunning growth over the next decades meant great wealth for the west coast ports.  Japan became the second largest trading partner of both Canada and the United States, and this trade was almost entirely based in the west coast (the US and Canada are each others largest trading partners).  Later the other Asian economies would add to this trade.  Throughout the northwest the primary extractive activities of logging, mining, and fishing remained the central industries. California, however, became a cultural centre to rival the northeast due to the film industry as well as becoming a centre of music, literature, and cooking.  The area became home to some of the continents greatest universities.  Unlike the east, the western economies were not based upon manufacturing and the great deindustrialization of the 1970s and 1980s did little to hurt the regioncreating an imbalance between rapid growth in the west and stagnation or decline in the east.  During this period, the west coast became the bastion of conservatism with the population favouring low taxes and small government.  In the United States, this manifested itself in support for the Republican Party, especially for the two Republican California-based presidents Nixon and Reagan.  In British Columbia, the right wing Social Credit Party governed for over thirty years.  Nonetheless, the great port cities of San Francisco and Vancouver both fostered alternative views, acting as centres for environmentalism, unions, feminism, and gay rights.The general economic revival of North America in the late 1990s brought the East back to health, but even greater growth in Northern California due to the high-tech industry.  The region was hurt, however, by the decade-long economic slump of Japan beginning at the same time.  This was made up for by the rapid growth of Southeast Asia, Korea, and especially China.  The entire region shifted quite dramatically politically, however.  Westerners diverged from conservatism over social issues such as rights, abortion, and the legalization of drugs.  In 1991, British Columbia threw out Social Credit electing the social democratic Columbia New Democratic Party.  California, Washington, and Oregon were pivotal in Clintons two victories and Gore and Kerrys near wins in 2000 and 2004.  This change was mainly in the urban coastal areas.  Inland, rural regions of California remained staunchly Republican, and although once full of labour strongholds, the of British Columbia has voted solidly for the Reform Party and its successors.See also*peoples of the Americas*peoples of California*of migration to the New World					*Americans in the United States*of indigenous peoples of the Americas*Paleo-Indians*of Alaska*of British Columbia*of California*of Oregon*History of Washington*of Mexico*of Guatemala*of El Salvador*of Costa Rica*of Panama*of the name California*expeditions to the Pacific Northwest*Yukon*West Coast Longshore Strike*StikineNotes
1017726
Tatabnya
longd                   18.39485Tatabnya () is a city of 69,988 inhabitants in north-western Hungary, in the Transdanubian region. It is the capital of County.File:Turul-Tb-front.jpg|thumb|left|250px|The Turul monument, which towers over the town from Gerecse mountain Location The city is located in the valley between the Gerecse and Mountains, some  from the capital. By virtue of its location, the city is a railway and road junction. The M1 (also routes E60, E75) motorway from Vienna to Budapest passes through the outer city limits, and the Vienna-Budapest railway line also passes through the city.HistoryArchaeological findings prove that humans have been living here since the Age. The three historic predecessor settlements of Tatabnya are Alsgalla, Felsgalla and Bnhida. Bnhida is the earliest settlement, it was first mentioned in 1288.In the 16th century the Ottomans occupied the area. Around this time the inhabitants became Protestants. Later its feudal lords, the Esterhzys populated the area with Roman Catholic German and Slovak settlers.According to the 1787 census Alsgalla had 580, Felsgalla had 842 inhabitants. The coal resources of the area were discovered around this time. Population began to grow, and a new mining colony was formed, later developing into the village of Tatabnya. During the industrialization wave which took over the country after World War II several Hungarian towns were developed into large industrial cities.  The four villages were united on October 1, 1947 under the name Tatabnya and it was elevated to town status.  In 1950 it became the county capital of Komrom-Esztergom county (then called Komrom county.)  In the 1980s it already had more than 80.000 inhabitants. The industrial character of the city was significant until the fall of the Socialist government and the following political changes of 1989.  After that the importance of industry and mining decreased and the economic structure of the city has changed remarkably. InfrastructureAccording to the 2001 census Tatabnya had 28.912(KSH.hu) households and 60% of them had central heating and telephone access. Almost all households have access to the cable TV network. 98% of the city roads are paved, mass transport is well organized.Vrtes Voln provides local and nearby coach services (http://www.vertesvolan.hu/).EducationUntil the mid-20th century, educational standards in the city were average, but in the second half of the century they deteriorated to below average, mostly because the local mines did not require their employees to have a high level of education. By the end of the 20th century though, this trend had reversed again. The city currently has 2 colleges, 10 secondary schools, 16 primary schools, 18 kindergartens and 5 creches.Culture and sportsThe most important cultural institution is the Mari Jszai Theatre. The city has several other institutions (museums, libraries.)Tatabnya has a football team called TBSC, founded in 1910. The town also has a successful handball team, Tatabnya Carbonex KC.One of Tatabnyas most prominent residents is Jzsef Kiprich, formally known as the Wizard from Tatabnya. He became top goalscorer in the Hungarian League in 1985, scoring 18 goals in 26 matches. In total he played nine seasons at Tatabnya before making his move to the Netherlands.He had just played his first match in his 10th season at Tatabnya when Feyenoord Rotterdam got interested in signing him. Kiprich didnt hesitate and signed a contract and left Tatabnya for Rotterdam. He also is one of Hungarys top goal scorers. In 11 seasons of football with the Hungarian national team The Wizard managed to score 28 goals in 70 appearances.Tourist sights* The Turul monument, above the city on the top of Gerecse Mountain, is the largest bird statue in Europe.* The cave and the forest park of Gerecse Mountain are popular tourist attractions.* Nearby mountains (Vrtes, Gerecse) and villages are a great place to spend time; neighbouring Tata has a beautiful lake and a medieval castle.File:Szelim-bg-upper-Cave.jpg|Szelim cave, view from aboveFile:Szelim-bg-north-Cave.jpg|Szelim cave, northern entranceFile:Szelim-barlang-Cave.jpg|Szelim cave, view from insideFile:Szelim-bg-west-Cave.jpg|Szelim cave, western entranceFile:Tatabnya lgifot3.jpg|File:Tatabnya lgifot2.jpg| Town districts Tatabnya is currently divided into the following 6 districts:*Alsgalla*jvros*Bnhida*Kertvros*Dzsakert*Felsgalla Nearby villages *Gyermely*Hreg*Krnye*Szrliget*Szomor*Tarjn*Tardos*Vrgesztes*Vrtessoml*VrtesszlsInternational relationsTwin towns  Sister citiesTatabnya is twinned with: Town partnerships Tatabnya also maintains partnerships with the following towns:ReferencesExternal links*Tatabanya.hu, Municipal website*Civertan.hu, Aerial photography: Tatabnyabg:ca:Tatabnyacs:Tatabnyada:Tatabnyade:Tatabnyaet:Tatabnyaes:Tatabnyaeo:Tatabnyafa:fr:Tatabnyagl:Tatabnyaid:Tatabnyait:Tatabnyahe:sw:Tatabnyalt:Tatabaniahu:Tatabnyamk:ms:Tatabnyanl:Tatabnyaja:nn:Tatabnyapnb:pl:Tatabnyapt:Tatabnyaro:Tatabnyaqu:Tatabnyaru:sk:Tatabnyasl:Tatabnyasr:sv:Tatabnyavi:Tatabnyavo:Tatabnyazh:
1019405
The_Motorcycle_Diaries_(book)
The Motorcycle Diaries is a memoir that traces the early travels of Marxist revolutionary Che Guevara, then a 23-year-old medical student, and his friend Granado, a 29-year-old biochemist. Leaving Aires, Argentina, in January 1952 on the back of a sputtering single cylinder 1939 Norton 500cc dubbed La Poderosa (The Mighty One), they desired to explore the America they only knew from books.(On the Trail of the Young Che Guevara by Rachel Dodes, The New York Times, December 19, 2004) During the formative odyssey Guevara is transformed by witnessing the social injustices of exploited mine workers, persecuted communists, ostracized lepers, and the tattered descendants of a once-great civilization. By journeys end they travel for a symbolic nine months by motorcycle, steamship, raft, horse, bus, and hitchhiking, covering more than  across places such as the Andes, Desert, and the River Basin. The book ends with a declaration by Guevara, born into an upper middle class family, displaying his willingness to fight and die for the cause of the poor, and his dream of seeing a united America.The book was originally marketed by Verso as Kapital meets Rider,() and has been a York Times bestseller several times.(NYT bestseller list: #38 Paperback Nonfiction on 2005-02-20, #9 Nonfiction on 2004-10-07 and on more occasions)Pre-expeditionFile:CheOnBike1950.jpg|thumb|right|150px|Guevara setting out on a 2,800 mile solo motorbike trip through the Northwest in 1950.File:CheMotorcycle.jpg|thumb|left|The motorized bicycle now at a Che museum in Gracia, Argentina.Ernesto Guevara spent long periods traveling around America during his studies of medicine, beginning in 1948, at the of Buenos Aires. In January 1950, Guevara attempted his first voyage. He traversed 4,500 kilometres (2,800 mi) through the northern provinces of Argentina on a bicycle on which he installed a small motor. He arrived at San Francisco del Chahar, near Crdoba, where his friend Alberto Granado ran the dispensary of the leper-centre. This experience allowed Guevara to have long conversations with the patients about their disease.Upon completion of his bicycle journey, Grafico, a sports magazine in Argentina, published a picture of Guevara on the motorbike he used for the journey. The company that manufactured the engine Ernesto adapted to his bicycle, tried to use it for advertising claiming it was very strong since Guevara had gone on such a long tour using its power.(Ernesto Che Guevara: 1950-1953)While he continued studying, he also worked as a nurse on trading and petroleum ships of the Argentine national shipping-company. This allowed Guevara to travel from the south of Argentina to Brazil, Venezuela and Trinidad.ExpeditionIn January 1952 Guevaras older friend, Granado, a biochemist, and Guevara, decided to take a year off from their medical studies to embark on a trip they had spoken of making for years: traversing South America on an motorcycle, which has metaphorically been compared to carbureted version of Don Quixotes Rocinante. Guevara and the 29-year-old Granado soon set off from Aires, Argentina, astride a 1939 Norton 500 cc motorcycle they named La Poderosa II (The Mighty One) with the idea of eventually spending a few weeks volunteering at the San Pablo Leper colony in Peru on the banks of the River. In total, the journey took Guevara through Argentina, Chile, Peru, Ecuador, Colombia, Venezuela, Panama, and to Miami, before returning home to Aires.Image:Che Guevara-Granado - Mapa 1er viaje - 1952.jpg|thumb|240px|right|Map of Guevaras trip with Granado. The red arrows correspond to trips by airplane, the last two of which Guevara took alone.The trip was carried out in the face of some opposition by Guevaras parents, who knew that their son was both a severe asthmatic and a medical student close to completing his studies. However, Granado, himself a doctor, assuaged their concerns by guaranteeing that Guevara would return to finish his degree (which he ultimately did).(He Rode with Che by Daily Telegraph, March 13, 2011)The first stop: Miramar, Argentina, a small resort where Guevaras girlfriend, Chichina, was spending the summer with her upper-class family. Two days stretched into eight, and upon leaving, Chichina gave Guevara a gold bracelet.  (In the film version, Chichina gives him $15 to buy her a swimsuit if they make it to the U.S.. Guevara swears to her that he will starve rather than spend the money on anything else; however, he later gives it away to a poor peasant couple in need of it. This episode does not appear in the memoir.)  The two men crossed into Chile on February 14. At one point they introduced themselves as internationally renowned leprosy experts to a local newspaper, which wrote a glowing story about them. The travelers later used the press clipping as a way to score meals and other favors with locals along the way.In reference to his experience in Chile, Guevara also writes: The most important effort that needs to be done is to get rid of the uncomfortable Yankee-friend. It is especially at this moment an immense task, because of the great amount of dollars they have invested here and the convenience of using economical pressure whenever they believe their interests are being threatened.Unable to get a boat to Island as they intended, they headed north, where Guevaras political consciousness began to stir as he and Granado moved into mining country.(Che Guevara: Symbol of Struggle, by Tony Saunois, CWI, 2005, ISBN 1870958349 pg 9) They visited Chuquicamata copper mine, the worlds largest open-pit mine and the primary source of Chiles wealth. While getting a tour of the mine he asked how many men died in its creation. At the time it was run by U.S. mining monopolies of Anaconda and Kennecott and thus was viewed by many as a symbol of imperialist gringo domination.( A meeting with a homeless communist couple in search of mining work made a particularly strong impression on Guevara, who wrote: By the light of the single candle ... the contracted features of the worker gave off a mysterious and tragic air ... the couple, frozen stiff in the desert night, hugging one another, were a live representation of the proletariat of any part of the world,In reference to the oppression against the Communist party in Chile, which at the time was outlawed, Guevara said: Its a great pity, that they repress people like this. Apart from whether collectivism, the communist vermin, is a danger to decent life, the communism gnawing at his entrails was no more than a natural longing for something better, a protest against persistent hunger transformed into a love for this strange doctrine, whose essence he could never grasp but whose translation, bread for the poor, was something he understood and, more importantly, that filled him with hope. Needless to say, workers at Chuquicamata were in a living Hell.In Peru, Guevara was impressed by the old civilization, forced to ride in trucks with Indians and animals after The Mighty One broke down. As a result he begins to develop a fraternity with the indigenous campesinos. In March 1952 they both arrived at the Peruvian Tacna. After a discussion about the poverty in the region, Guevara refers in his notes to the words of Cuban poet Marti: I want to link my destiny to that of the poor of this world. In May they arrived in Lima, Peru and during this time Guevara met doctor Hugo Pesce, a Peruvian scientist, director of the national leprosy program, and an important local Marxist. They discuss several nights until the early morning and years later Che identified these conversations as being very important for his evolution in attitude towards life and society.In May, Guevara and Granado leave for the colony of San Pablo in the Peruvian Rainforest, arriving there in June. During his stay Guevara complains about the miserable way the people and sick of that region have to live. Guevara also swam once from the side of the River where the doctors stayed, to the other side of the river where the leper patients lived, a considerable distance of two and a half miles. He describes how there were no clothes, almost no food, and no medication. However, Guevara was moved by his time with the lepers, remarking thatFile:CheOnRaft1952.jpg|thumb|left|220px|Guevara (right) with Granado (left) aboard their Mambo-Tango wooden raft on the River in June of 1952. The raft was a gift from the lepers whom they had treated.After giving consultations and treating patients for a few weeks, Guevara and Granado leave abord the Mambo-Tango raft (shown) for Colombia via the River.While visiting Bogot, Colombia, he wrote a letter to his mother on July 6, 1952. In the letter he describes the conditions under the right-wing government of Conservative Gmez as the following: There is more repression of individual freedom here than in any country weve been to, the police patrol the streets carrying rifles and demand your papers every few minutes. He also goes on to describe the atmosphere as tense and suffocating even hypothesizing that a revolution may be brewing. Guevara was correct in his prognostication, as a military coup in 1953 would take place, bringing General Rojas to power.Later that month Guevara arrived in Caracas, Venezuela and from there decides to return back to Aires to finish his studies in medical science. However, prior to his return, he travels by cargo-plane to Miami, where the airplanes technical problems delay him one month. To survive, he works as a waiter and washes dishes in a Miami bar.Although he admits throughout that as a Vagabond traveler he can only see things at surface level, he does attempt to delve beneath the sheen of the places he visits. On one occasion he goes to see a woman dying of tuberculosis, leaving appalled by the failings of the public health system. This experience leads him to ruminate the following reflection: How long this present order, based on the absurd idea of caste, will last is not within my means to answer, but its time that those who govern spent less time publicizing their own virtues and more money, much more money, funding socially useful works.Witnessing the widespread endemic poverty, oppression and disenfranchisement throughout America, and influenced by his readings of Marxist literature, Guevara later decided that the only solution for the regions structural inequalities was armed revolution. His travels and readings throughout this journey  also lead him to view Latin America not as a group of separate nations, but as a single entity requiring a continent-wide strategy for liberation from what he viewed as imperialist and neo-colonial domination. His conception of a borderless, united, Hispanic-America sharing a common mestizo bond, was a theme that would prominently recur during his later activities and transformation from Ernesto the traveler, into Guevara the iconic revolutionary.TransformationFile:CheOnBalcony.jpg|thumb|left|150px|A 20 year old Ernesto Guevara lying contemplatively on the balcony of his familys home in Aires.Historians and biographers now agree that the experience had a profound impact on Guevara, who later became one of the most famous guerrilla leaders in history. His political and social awakening has very much to do with this face-to-face contact with poverty, exploitation, illness, and suffering, said Carlos M. Vilas, a history professor at the Universidad Nacional de Lans in Buenos Aires, Argentina.(Motorcycle Diaries Shows Che Guevara at Crossroads, October 14 2004, Natl Geographic)In May 2005, Granado described their journey to the BBC, stating: The most important thing was to realise that we had a common sensibility for the things that were wrong and unjust. According to Granado, their time at the colony of Pablo in the Amazon also proved pivotal. Recalling that they shared everything with the sick people and describing Guevaras wave on departure as follows: I got the impression that Che was saying goodbye to institutional medicine and becoming a doctor of the people.(My best friend Che, May 9, 2005, by Alberto Granado, BBC)According to his daughter Guevara in a 2004 article, throughout the book we can see how Guevara became aware that what poor people needed was not his scientific knowledge as a doctor, but his strength and persistence to bring social change.()EditionsIn 2004, Che Guevaras daughter, Guevara, explained that her father had not intended his diary to be published, and that it had remained as a sheaf of typewritten pages. But in the 1980s, his family worked on his unpublished manuscripts, and a Cuban publishing house brought out The Motorcycle Diaries for the first time in 1993.(The director of Ocean Press insists that the book was published in Cuba and that any rumors of a conspiracy to prohibit its publication there are false. He also points out that the Union of Young Communists brought out an edition, with another to be published by the Che Guevara Studies Center.  Furthermore, he has given an assurance that its publication has the support of many people including Castro.()The Motorcycle Diaries:  Notes on a Latin American Journey was published by Ocean Press and the Che Guevara Studies Center, Havana, in 2003.  The book has a preface by Aleida Guevara March and an introduction by Cintio Vitier.  This edition is edited and translated by Alexandra Keeble.ReviewsFurther reading: * Back on the Road: A Journey Through Latin America, by Ernesto Che Guevara & Alberto Granado, Grove Press, 2002, ISBN 0802139426* Chasing Che: A Motorcycle Journey in Search of the Guevara Legend, by Patrick Symmes, Vintage, 2000, ISBN 0375702652* Ches Chevrolet, Fidels Oldsmobile: On the Road in Cuba, by Richard Schweid, University of North Carolina Press, 2008, ISBN 0807858870* Che Guevara and the Mountain of Silver: By Bicycle and Train through South America, by Mustoe, Virgin Books, 2008, ISBN 0753512742* Looking for Mr. Guevara: A Journey through South America, by Barbara Brodman, iUniverse, 2001 ISBN 0595180698* Roll Over Che Guevara: Travels of a Radical Reporter, by Mark Cooper, Verso, 1996, ISBN 1859840655* The Motorcycle Diaries: A Journey Around South America, by Ernesto Che Guevara & translator Ann Wright, Verso, 1996, ISBN 1857023994* Traveling with Che Guevara: The Making of a Revolutionary, by Alberto Granado, Newmarket Press, 2004, ISBN 1557046395* (Travel Map) --- Ches Route: Ernesto Che Guevara Trip Across South America, by de Dios Editores, 2004, ISBN 9879445295Film* Chasing Che, 2007, developed by National Geographic Adventure, A ten-week series featured on V-me.* Che, 2008, directed by Soderbergh & starring del Toro as Che, (268 min).* The Motorcycle Diaries, 2004, directed by Walter Salles, Focus Features, theatrical release, (126 min).* Travelling with Che Guevara, 2004, directed by Gianni Mina, Documentary, (110 min).ReferencesExternal links*An Interactive Map of Che Guevaras Motorcycle Diaries*Book Review ~ The Motorcycle Diaries: A Journey Around South America*CARE: Che Guevara Trail nominated for Travel Award September 20, 2004*Guardian: My Ride with Che, Interview with Alberto Granado February 13, 2004*Intl Herald Tribune: On the Motorcycle Behind My Father, Che Guevara by Guevara October 12, 2004*LA Times: Che Guevaras Legacy Looms Larger than Ever in Latin America October 8, 2007*NY Times: Letter From the Americas: Che Today? More Easy Rider Than Revolutionary May 2, 2004*Iquitos Welcomes British Bikers Following Che Guevaras Tracks Living Peru, April 13, 2009*The Motorcycle Diaries: A Journey Around South America - from Motorcycle.com et:Mootorrattapevikud  motocycletteMotorcycle Diariesit:Latinoamericana frn en motorcykel (bok)
1021806
Falun
website                 Falun () is a city and the seat of Municipality in County, Sweden, with 36,447 inhabitants in 2005.( It is also the capital of County. Falun forms, together with Borlnge, a area with close to 100,000 inhabitants. Falun was originally famous for its copper mine, and is today an important service and city even though the mine is closed (since 1992). History The town of Falun is known to have existed in the 14th century as a market place for the surrounding lands. Mining for copper had been a local business since the mid-13th century, or possibly as early as 1000,(http://www.dalarna.se/kulturidalarna/eng/falugruva.html) and the organisation for the extracting of copper and gold from the Copper Mountain is believed to be the oldest still-existing enterprise in the world, proved active since 1347, when its charter was granted by King IV of Sweden. The first share in the company is dated as early as 1288. However, an enterprise at that time was nothing more than a cooperation among the owners, each contributing with a share of money for constructions, tools, etc., necessary to run the organisation.  Depending on their contribution they could use the facilities and share the profit according to the relative share they contributed.The city of Falun received its privileges in 1641.  By then Falun was already one of the largest cities in Sweden, with about 6000 inhabitants. Soon, however, the importance of the copper mine began to decrease. In 1687, parts of the mine collapsed in a landslide, creating an 100 m deep pit.() Even though the mine remained in use for the next 300 years, the production gradually diminished, until it closed down in 1992.The mining area of the Copper Mountain has been declared a UNESCO Heritage Site, which also was the name of the mining company of Falun, is today a part of Enso. Today For education, the city holds part of the College of Dalarna (Hgskolan Dalarna). In sports, Falun hosts the annual Ski Games at its skiing arena Falun. The citys most successful sport team is the bandy team Falu BS which has played in the Swedish top division for many years. Also, IBF Falun, the floorball male and female teams have been very successful. FK play in in Division 2 Norra Svealand.Falun Stadion has also hosted the Nordic World Ski Championships three times: 1954, 1974, and most recently in 1993.The city lost out to Calgary, Canada, in 1981 for the Winter Olympics.  Again, Falun applied for the Winter Olympics but lost out to Albertville, France, in 1986.  The city lost despite the best efforts of one of ABBAs singers who recorded a single in support of the bid.Falun is the hometown of The Battle, one of the worlds most famous snowboard competitions.Iron and Copper byproducts from the mine are still used as a paint ingredient, in the production of the nationally well known and culturally important Red paint, particularly used on wooden houses. Notable residents and former residents of Falun * Boberg, architect* Dixgrd, musician* Prime, architect, scientist, mathematician, engineer, inventor, anatomist, geologist, and writer* Flink, mass murderer* Hjorth, golfer* Patrick Johansson, drummer* Jonsson, ice hockey player* Kallur, ice hockey player* Kallur, athlete, World Championships finalist 2005 in 100 m hurdles* Kallur, athlete, had the world indoor record on 60 m hurdles* Leandersson, actress* Ljungqvist, road bicycle racer* Quick, serial murderer* Tures, food and wine expert* Sabaton, metal band* Stenlund, tennis player* Sve-Sderbergh, palaeontologist* Rolf, actor and singer* Skarstedt, actor* Stiernhielm, civil servant, linguist and poet* Wickman, jazz clarinetist* Steiner, ski jumperIn popular cultureThe short story Die Bergwerke zu Falun (The Mines of Falun) was published by T. A. Hoffmann in 1819. See also *World Championships*Falukorv*Copper Mountain*Gruvrisskolan - elementary school*Flink*QuickSportsThe following sports clubs are located in Falun:* FK * IF FK* SK References  External links *Falun - Official siteaf:Falunbe-x-old:bg:ca:Faluncs:Falunda:Falunde:Falunet:Falunes:Faluneo:Falunfa:(Dalcarlie)ko:hr:Falunid:Falunit:Falunkl:Falunka:kw:Falunsw:Falunku:Falunla:Falungalt:Faliunasms:Falun(stad)ja:frr:Falunno:Falunnn:Falunpnb:pl:Falunpt:Falunro:Falunru:se:Falunsq:Falunsk:Falunfi:Falunsv:Faluntr:Falunuk:vi:Falunvo:Falunzh:
1025538
Findability
Findability is a term for the ease with which information contained on a website can be found, both from outside the website (using engines and the like) and by users already on the website. Although findability has relevance outside the Wide Web, it is usually used in the context of the web. The popularization of the term findability for the Web is usually credited to Morville. In 2005 he defined as: the ability of users to identify an appropriate Web site and navigate the pages of the site to discover and retrieve relevant information resources, though it appears to have been first coined in a public context referring to the web and information retrieval by Alkis Papadopoullos in an article entitled Findability: The Key to Enterprise Search. By Papadopoullos, Alkis Publication: KM World Date: Friday, April 1 2005.(Though the word has been used to mean ease of finding information since at least 1943: see Urban A. Avery, The Findability of the Law, Chicago Bar Record 24:272, April 1943, reprinted in the Journal of the American Judicature Society 27:25 http://heinonline.org/HOL/LandingPage?collectionjournals&handlehein.journals/judica27&div12&id&page)Findability encompasses aspects of architecture, interface design, accessibility and engine optimization (SEO), among others.Findability can be evaluated via testing or testing.See also* Annotation* retrieval* mining* representation* web* Usability* interface* indexingReferences* Jacob, Elin K. and Loehrlein, Aaron (Indiana University, Bloomington, USA). Information architecture. In: Annual Review of Information Science and Technology (ARIST), vol 43(2009). Medford, N.J.: Information Today, Inc. * Morville, P. (2005) Ambient findability. Sebastopol, CA: OReilly* Wurman, R.S. (1996). Information architects. New York: Graphis.External links* findability.org: a collection of links to people, software, organizations, and content related to findability* The age of findability (article)* Use Old Words When Writing for Findability (article on the findability impact of a sites choice of words)* Ambient Findability (book)* Building Findable Websites: Web Standards SEO and Beyond (book)* The Findability Formula: The Easy, Non-Technical Guide to Search Engine Marketing by Heather Lutzefa:fr:Reprabilitko:it:Findabilityja:pt:Encontrabilidade
1028030
Holungen
Holungen is a Thuringian municipality in the Eichsfeld in Germany. It lies approximately  from the university town of Gttingen. With a population of around 1,000, it is one of the medium-sized municipalities in the district.Coat of armsOn the of arms, the right half represents the Sonnenstein, a hill very close to the town. On the upper left quarter, the Mainz Wheel represents the of Mainz, and the lower left quarter shows two crossed hammers indicative of potash mining and symbolising the environment. Over many decades, mining was of enormous economic importance.Origin of the nameThe research into the origin of the name traces it back to antiquity. Evidence for the origin comes mostly from documents in the Gerode Monastery. The name Holungen is said to derive from the German word Hold ( a gentle benevolent goddess or woman). However, in speech, this word is indistinguishable from Holt, an older German word for wood. In old title deeds the name also appears as Holdungen, which suggests the name could also derive from Haulungen, meaning pasture in a clearing on sloping ground. This interpretation infers that Holungen was designated as a Waldsiedlung (settlement in a forest). Villages whose names end in -ungen were all founded in an earlier settlement period. Therefore is it possible that Holungens founding could date back as far as the initial colonisation of modern Germany by Germanic peoples. It could have existed as far back as 531, the Second Settlement Period (all placenames ending in -ungen), when the Franks conquered Thuringia. Later on, the northern part of Eichsfeld, including Holungen, belonged to the Saxons. Saxon characteristics and peculiarities were taken up. This also explains why a language border (isogloss) runs through Holungen. Residents speak German, while people of the neighbouring town of Bischofferode speak standard German.LocationHolungen is located at the foot of the Ohm Mountains (Ohmgebirge) at the bottom of the Bode valley, about 35 km from the Harz mountains. It is a so-called Haufendorf (clustered village; denotes an irregular, unplanned and quite closely packed village, built around a central square). To the south lie the Sonder and the Ohmberg with the Wilde Kirche (Wild Church). The Hohenkammer lies to the west, where the Segeltal valley separates it from the Sonder. To the north, the 486-m-high Sonnenstein rises above the village. In addition, the Graseforst is found there. The course of the Bode runs along the valley floor to the east. There is also a large spoil heap from potash mining, which is nearly as big as the adjacent mountains. Holungen lies 350 m above level. It is well protected from the easterly winds and other external influences by mountains. Its soil is formed from crystalline rocks, made of minerals such as quartz, feldspar and mica. The erosion of rocks forms sandy soil from quartz, and clay and loam from potash/feldspar-based rocks.HistoryEarly historyAccording to documents found in the monastery at Gerode, Holungen was founded between 531 and 800. In the following centuries, there was much armed conflict near the village and in the surrounding area. In 933, Henry I beat the Magyars at the Unstrut river. Twenty-two years later, his son Otto the Great did the same at the Lechfelde, bringing peace to the area. Between 1118 and 1120 the Gerode Monastery was founded.In 1247, the Thuringian landgrave Raspe died, bringing conflict back to the area. From 1236 to 1247, he was Landesherr (manorial lord) of part of the march of Tu-der-stede, modern-day Duderstadt. He was also brother-in-law to of Hungary. In 1246 he was elected counter-king to IV, son of Frederick II. Although his forces defeated Conrads at the battle of Nidda, he died shortly afterwards, and after his death fighting broke out over the order of succession for the title Landgrave of Thuringia, during which Holungen was devastated. Many inhabitants fled to Duderstadt. Some evidence for this comes from deeds dating to 1266 and 1299. The documents of 1266 also give us the first mention of Holungen, under the name Haldrungen. Between 1350 and 1370, the village was rebuilt again and belonged to the county of Lohra. In 1370, Holungen became a part of the county of Honstein and in 1431, it became by exchange the monastery village of the monastery at Gerode. In 1525, Holungen was destroyed during the course of the Peasants War.The period until the German EmpireThe Years War arrived and reached Holungen, and in 1626, much devastation was caused by the army of Duke Christian of Brunswick. In 1701, Prussia became a kingdom, but Eichsfeld and Holungen remained subordinate to the Electorate of Mainz. Between 17401786 Eichsfeld took up arms in the service of Austria against Frederick the Great and fought against Prussia. Many inhabitants of Holungen were involved in these wars or were enlisted with the Kurmainzischen Husarencorps (Hussar Corps of the Electorate of Mainz). Thus even today there are still some Holungen surnames in Vienna. In 1802, Eichsfeld was finally annexed to Prussia. This took place on 3 August, the birthday of the King of Prussia Frederick William III.Prussian rule lasted only for four years and ten weeks, up to the years 1806 and 1807, when Prussia was nearly completely destroyed. In addition, half of its constituent states, as well as its status as a great power, were taken from it. In 1806, Prussia lost the of Jena-Auerstedt, with the result that, in December that year, Napoleon took possession of the two Eichsfeld districts, including Holungen. Frederick William III fled with his wife and the princes to Memel. The French required masses of supplies, which the Holungers had to furnish. In 1807, Eichsfeld became part of the of Westphalia with its capital at Kassel. On 1 January  1808 the Code came into effect. Young men had to serve in the French army. During this period, many troops marched through Eichsfeld and settled in Holungen. After the struggle for liberty, Eichsfeld was returned to Prussia. Ordered laws were created, and Worbis received their own city and regional courts. Holungen was assigned to the judicial office (Gerichtsamt) at Gerode. At that time Holungen had 650 inhabitants. In 1841, Holungen received its first Kaplan, literally Chaplain, a term used in German to mean a Roman Catholic priest in the first few years after his ordination. Since 28 January  1844, full Mass has been held every Sunday and Saints Day.In 1848, the year of many attempted revolutions in large parts of Europe, violence in the district of Worbis was widespread, leading to the formation of Brgerwehren (vigilante militia groups), under the control of the mayor in each village. The vigilantes were equipped with pikes, sabres and rifles. One year later the setting up of the Grundbuchamt (lit. land register office) in the district court of Worbis was completed. Cholera came to Worbis district in 1850. Most deaths occurred in neighbouring Weienborn, Holungen was only minimally affected. In September 1855, the king visited many places in the district. During the wars of independence, the Eichsfeld had suffered much, leading to crop failures and widespread illness. Holungen received money from the king for the reconstruction of several burned-down houses. On 2 February  1861, King Frederick William IV died, and his brother William I took his place. In the same year, the shooting club was formed, and the Chaussee (main road) was extended over the Graseforst. The Holungers were dissatisfied with this extension, since they had supported a different route, one which would have been more favourable for the area but had been dropped. In February 1865, this led to a big court case, which the Holungers lost. The Chaussee led from Worbis over the Sonnenstein to Gerode and was half-an-hour further away than the old road, which almost completely cut Holungen off from long-distance traffic.The period of the German EmpireThe years 1870 and 1871 saw the War, and on 30 January  1871, Germany became an empire under the Prussian King William I. The soldiers returned home with the Cross, the Kriegsgedenkmnze (War Service Medal) and other service decorations. Many Kriegskameradschaften (veterans groups) were formed, and later joined by a Kriegerverein (veterans association). In Holungen, support for Kaiser Wilhelm was very high. This was due in large part to the fact that a Holunger (Josef Hildebrandt), was the Kaisers driver from 18611888. At this time, Holungen had approximately 650 inhabitants, two nursery gardens, one Hirtenhaus (lit. shepherds house), one school, one local pub (Am. inn) and one fire pond. It covered roughly 98 acres / 40 hectares (196 cker).On 1 April  1876, rector Friedrich Polak from Nordhausen was appointed out as the school inspector. Holungen received a second teacher and a new school was built. In March 1871 land plots on all the farmland were remeasured. Due to the differing altitudes it was possible that there were differences in the measurements, but in 232 cases the permissible difference was exceeded. In 100 cases it amounted to even twice the limit. The owners gave the land over to the Separationsverfahren (roughly, the process of crop rotation) and had it given back afterwards (uncertain literal translation of und lieen es sich hinterher zurckgeben from German original), as a result of which the total area of farmland was reduced. In 1906, it became apparent that roughly 90 acres / 36 hectares (180 cker) of Holungen, which were actually registered in the land registry, were missing. In 1925, the land was recorded twice, one for the forest treasury and the other for the municipality of Weienborn. Holungen objected, but without any success.In June 1890, a Church-building Society was founded in Holungen, and one year later the building of the church began. The stones were supplied from the nearby quarry at Wehnberg. A teacher from Holungen began rehearsals of stageplays with the young people from the village and put on performances in neighbouring villages to support the construction of the church. On 20 June  1893, Holungen was consecrated by bishop (Weihbischof) Dr. Augustinus Gockel. One year later, the registry office was moved from Bischofferode to Holungen. In 1895, the road to Bischofferode was built, with Holungen receiving support from the Landesbauinspektion (roughly State Construction Inspectorate) at Mhlhausen. In 1896, Holungen received a new church organ. One year later, the church tower was hit by lightning, and repairs were still under way when the new church bell was installed, the old bell having cracked during ringing. In 1899, the Holunger Gesangsverein, a singing association, was created. 1908 saw opening of Potash Shaft 1 at the Mntzer potash mine.Holungen during the two World WarsHolungen was largely unaffected by direct action of the two World Wars. In the First World War, 160 Holungers were conscripted. 36 men did not return home. A memorial was erected in their memory in the church under the tower.In the Second World War, men from Holungen fought in Poland, France and the Union, among other places. In total, 47 men from Holungen died during the Second World War. The village itself only felt the effects of the war just before its end. An aerial mine was dropped nearby, and several aircraft shot down by the Luftwaffe. Holungen remained entirely untouched by enemy air attacks. Several inhabitants had to pay fines for not fully blacking out their windows. In spring 1945, German troops were being pushed back, and on 14 March Holungen found itself billeting many soldiers from both Flak and Infantry units, bringing the parish into the war zone. At around 11 oclock on the night of 9th to 10 April combat erupted. Flak cannon fired at enemy aircraft during a three-hour period, although there were fairly long pauses during that time. Both the inhabitants and buildings of Holungen remained undamaged.On 11 April the American advance reached Holungen, the German troops having fled the previous day. When the news of the American approach became known, the mayor and the parish vicar went out to meet the approaching troops. As the first vehicles neared them, the two men went up to the Americans and asked them to spare Holungen. They explained that there were no more German soldiers left in the village, and that Holungen would offer no resistance. The inhabitants had hoisted a flag with a red cross atop the church tower.American troop movements continued through the area until 18 April, with the tank columns taking the first three days to pass through. The inhabitants could only use the main street between noon and 1 p.m. each day, and all the streets in the village were torn up by tank tracks. On 4 July  1945, Russian soldiers arrived in Holungen, the village lying only  from the border with the British zone (see this page about the GDR for a map of the zones). On 20 August the majority of the Russian troops withdrew and only a small garrison remained.East Germany, Reunificiation and the minesThanks to the strongly held Catholic faith in the Eichsfeld, particularly in Holungen, the SED found it difficult to get a foothold in the area. Nevertheless, the GDR controlled everything. The situation was made worse by the proximity of Holungen to the Grenzsperrgebiet, the closed military exclusion zone that ran along the East German side of the border with the West. The neighbouring villages of Brehme and Jtzenbach were located within this zone. This zone, part of a complex border system which extended several kilometres into the GDR, was intended to catch people trying to escape across the border to the West before they reached the actual border fences. Tourists were not permitted entry. Only those who lived in the zone or were visiting relatives in the zone, and had the necessary permits, could enter, making life additionally difficult for the many Holungers with friends and relatives living in the zone.In the GDR period, the potash mine, now known as the Thomas Mntzer mine, was the largest employer in the region. From 1955 to 1961 the number of employees rose from 25 to nearly 300. Even in 1939, the mine had been the main potash source for the German war effort and was considered to be Rstungsindustriestufe SS (Armaments Industry  SS level). It was the only mine delivering 98 to 99% by weight potassium chloride at the highest purity grade. These salts were used to produce explosives and other compounds important for the war effort. In 1977, the potassium salt was granted the K1 price supplement due to its consistent quality, receiving the Q quality mark two years later. From 1985 onwards the mine was the sole supplier of car seat position adjusters for the Wartburg. The mine also produced skylights and artificial fertiliser. In 1993, the mining company was closed. The closing of mine shafts resulted in nationwide attention for the potash miners, who took part in a lot of industrial action (strikes and a march to Berlin) under the slogan Bischofferode ist berall (Bischofferode is everywhere). Mining was of great importance for the neighbouring villages and created over 1,000 jobs. The economy of the region was slow to recover from this shock. Even though the mine was better-known in connection with Bischofferode, a large part of the operation was located in Holungen.In Holungen after the Wende (Reunification), several streets were renovated. Many households got a telephone connection, mains gas, etc. In 1995 the second Eichfeld Trachtenfest (festival at which traditional costume is worn) was celebrated in Holungen. This festival resulted in various improvements to the village, for example the square around the pond and the fire station was redesigned.PopulationIn 1900, Holungen numbered 671 people in 104 households. Each household had, on average, 5 to 7 people. Up to the start of the First World War, the number of inhabitants rose slowly. After the war, the increase continued as many people sought refuge in Holungen. From 1925 to 1940 the population declined. During the Second World War, many evacuees arrived, and so in 1945 the population exceeded a thousand for the first time, reaching 1,092 residents. In 1947, the population reached 1,332, which still stands as the highest-ever number today. After this time the total population decreased again slowly. In 1964, there were 1,080 people in 315 families. The number of extended families decreased ever more quickly. In 1978, the population was again below a thousand, rising above this again in 1983. In the Reunification year of 1990, it lay at 948, thereafter fluctuating around 1,000. In 2001 the number was 991, and at the start of 2003 only 978.Population DataChanges in population (31 December)::Source: Thuringia State Office for StatisticsPeopleHolungen-born:*Dr. Hermann Iseke (18561907) poet of the Eichsfelder Sang and other works.*Thraen (18431903) gave names to minor planets including Eichsfeldia and PhotographiaAssociationsThe largest associations in Holungen are the Male Singers Society Einigkeit (Unity), the Church Choir Sankt Ccilia (St Cecilia) the Local History Society Dr. Hermann Iseke Holungen, the Thomas-Mntzer-Kaliverein Bischofferode e.V. (Thomas Mntzer Potash Association of Bischofferode Charity) and the Sports Association Blau-Wei Holungen (Holungen Blue-and-White). Several traditions date back to the 19th century.The Sports Association has had some success at faustball, the womens team having been GDR Champions twice, although faustball is no longer played in Holungen. The mens football team plays in Thringen 2. Kreisklassen (Kreis Eichsfeld), Staffel 1 (Thuringia 2nd District classification (Eichsfeld district), group 1). Here, too, past youth teams have had some success (District Champions, District Cup Winners, District Indoor Football Champions). Thanks to several year groups being under-represented in the village, Holungen is currently arranging Spielgemeinschaften (joint teams) with other villages (JSG Bodetal: Bode Valley Youth Joint Team).In 1864 the Holungen Shooting Club was founded, although after the two World Wars a refounding wasnt permitted. In spite of this, Holungen still has its shooting range. A similar situation holds for the amateur dramatics group, which had been known throughout the region  despite putting on a few performances after Reunification, it eventually folded.ReferencesExternal links(in German)*Info about Holungen Young people from Holungen about their home village.*School project A school project from Regelschule Bischofferode about Holungen.de:Holungeneo:Holungenit:Holungennl:Holungenpl:Holungenpt:Holungenro:Holungenru:sr:vo:Holungenwar:Holungen
1032278
Paraguay_River
 footnotes                  The Paraguay River (Ro Paraguay in Spanish, Rio Paraguai in Portuguese, Ysyry Paragui in Guarani) is a major river in south central South America, running through Brazil, Bolivia, Paraguay, and Argentina. It flows about () from its headwaters in the Brazilian state of Grosso to its confluence with the River north of Corrientes.CourseThe Paraguays source is south of Diamantino in the Mato Grosso state of Brazil. It follows a generally southwesterly course, passing through the Brazilian city of Cceres. It then turns in a generally southward direction, flowing through the Pantanal wetlands, the city of Corumb, and then running close to the Brazil-Bolivia border for a short distance in the Brazilian states of Mato Grosso and Grosso do Sul.From the city of Puerto Bahia Negra, Paraguay, the river forms the border between Paraguay and Brazil, flowing almost due south before the confluence with the River.  The Paraguay makes a long, gentle curve to the south-southeast before resuming a more south-southwest course, dividing the country of Paraguay into two distinct halves: the Chaco region to the west, a largely uninhabited semi-arid region; and the eastern forested departments of the country, accounting for some 98% of the countrys inhabitants. As such the river is considered perhaps the key geographical feature to the country with which it shares its name.Some  after flowing through the middle of Paraguay, at the confluence with the River and passing the Paraguayan capital city, Asuncin, the river forms the border with Argentina, flowing generally south-southwesterly for another  before it reaches its end, joining with the Paran River.Usesthumb|250px|Deep water port on the River Paraguay in Asuncin, ParaguayThe Paraguay River is the second major river of the de la Plata Basin, after the Paran River. The Paraguays basin, about ,( covers a vast area that includes major portions of northern Argentina, southern Brazil, parts of Bolivia, and the entire country of Paraguay. Unlike many of the other great rivers of the Rio de la Plata Basin, the Paraguay has not been dammed for hydroelectric power generation, and as such it is navigable for a considerable distance, second to the River only in terms of navigable length on the continent. This makes it an important shipping and trade corridor, providing a much needed link to the Atlantic Ocean for the otherwise landlocked nations of Paraguay and Bolivia.  It serves such important cities as Asuncin and Concepcin in Paraguay and Formosa in Argentina.The river is also a source of commerce in the form of fishing and providing irrigation for agriculture along its route. It also serves as a way of life for a number of poor fishermen who live along its banks and make the majority of their income selling fish in local markets, as well as supplying a major source of sustenance for their families. This has created issues in large cities such as Asuncin, where poverty stricken farmers from the countrys interior have populated the rivers banks in search of an easier lifestyle.  Seasonal flooding of the rivers banks forces many thousands of displaced residents to seek temporary shelter until the waters recede from their homes.  The Paraguayan military has been forced to dedicate land on one of its reserves in the capital to emergency housing for these displaced citizens. The river is a tourist attraction for its beauty.Wetland controversyThe Paraguay River is the primary waterway of the  Pantanal wetlands of southern Brazil, northern Paraguay and parts of Bolivia. The Pantanal is the worlds largest tropical wetland and is largely dependent upon waters provided by the Paraguay River.Owing to its importance as a navigable waterway serving Brazil, Argentina, and Paraguay, the river has been the focus of commercial and industrial development. In 1997 the governments of the nations of the La Plata Basin proposed a bold plan under the Hidrovia Inter Governmental Commission (CIH) agency to develop the rivers into an industrial waterway system to help reduce the costs of exporting goods from the area, in particular the soybean crop that the area has embraced. The plan proposed constructing more hydroelectric dams along some of the waterways, along with a massive effort to restructure the navigable waterwaysmost notably the Paraguay Riverthrough dredging of the waterway, rock removal, and channel restructuring.Studies indicated that the proposed engineering of the Paraguay would have lowered the river levels by several feet and have a devastating impact on the Pantanal wetlands, but the member nations of the CIH were determined to go ahead with the plan. An effort by the Rios Vivos coalition to educate people on the effects of the project was successful in delaying the project, and the nations involved have agreed to reformulate their plan. The final plan is still uncertain, however, along with the final effect it will have on the Pantanal and the ecology of the entire de la Plata basin is currently undetermined. The controversy as to whether or not the project will have a disastrous effect on the ecology, as well as the potential economic gains, continues to this day.The project is considered to have extremely positive effects for Paraguay, Bolivia, western Brazil, and the north of Argentina, which presently rely on expensive overland transport. With this improved waterway system in place, the lower costs of transportation wiould make the regional industry more competitive in world markets, spur economic growth in the region, and create additional employment throughout the area. Paraguays capital city, Asuncin, would become a major inland port benefiting exporters of cattle, cotton, and in particular, the extensive soybean crop. Argentinas cereal producers near the Rosario port on the Paran River would benefit from the lower transportation cost as well. Also, this project could trigger an economic boost to Brazils mining companies and farmers since the central plains are rich in iron, manganese, and precious stones and soybeans, coffee, wheat, rice, and hardwoods flourish. Uruguays aim is to develop Nueva Palmira at the southern end of the Hydrovia and establish it as the main port of the Southern Cone.See also* of the Ro de la PlataReferencesAdditional references*American University Trade and Environment data base (2004). Itaipu Dam.*American University Trade and Environment data base. (1999). Hydrovia Canal Plan and Environment .Available online at http://www.american.edu/TED/hidrovia.htm.*Bascheck, B. and Hegglin, M. (2004). Plata/Paran River Basin, A Case Study . Swiss Federal Insititute for Environmental Science and Technology.*Da Rosa, J. E. (1983). Economics, politics, and hydroelectric power: the Paran River Basin . Latin American Research Review, VXVIII (3), pp. 77107.*Elhance, A. P. (1999). Hydropolitics in the 3rd World, Conflict and Cooperation in International River Basins. Washington, D.C. : United States Institute of Peace.*Gleick, P.H., ed. Water in Crisis. A Guide to the Worlds Fresh Water Resources, New York : Oxford University Press, pp. 1324.*Kulshreshtha, S.N. (1993). World Water Resources and Regional Vulnerability: Impact of Future Changes. RR-93-10, IIASA, Laxenburg, Austria .*Lammers, O., Moore, D. and Preakle, K. (1994). Considering the Hidrovia: a preliminary report on the status of the proposed Paraguay/Parana waterway project. Working Paper 3 . Berkeley, California : International Rivers Network, July.*Transboundary Freshwater Dispute Database (TFDD) (2007). Oregon State University.Available on-line at: http://www.transboundarywaters.orst.edu/*United Nations. (1978). Register of international rivers, Water Supply Management, 2 (1). New York: Pergamon Press. External links * Case Study of Transboundary Dispute Resolution: the La Plata basin, Aaron T. Wolf and Joshua T. Newton*Drainage Plan Will Devastate S. American Rivers, Groups Say   National Geographic News article, July 31, 2003Paragui()()Paraguai(eka)ParaguayParaguayjgiParaguay(rivero)ibaia()Paraguay(rijeka)fluvioParaguay(fiume)()()(mto)la:Paraquarium(up)(rivier)ja:(elv)Paraguai(rzeka)Paraguaimayu()(rieka)(joki)sv:Paraguayflodenth:()zh:
1033732
Rossington
Rossington is a civil parish and former mining village in the Borough of Doncaster in Yorkshire, England and is surrounded by countryside and the market towns of Bawtry and Tickhill.GeographyIt has a population of 13,255.(Office for National Statistics : Census 2001 : Parish Headcounts : Doncaster Retrieved 2009-08-27) Hood Airport Doncaster Sheffield is around two miles to the east. The village is demarcated to the north and west by a line of 400kV pylons, as seen from the M18, to the north. The Finningley and Rossington Relief Road Scheme is proposed to allow access to the airport.To the north-west, the village borders Loversall, with the boundary following the Torne, passing directly next to the western edge of the former Rossington Main Colliery. It briefly crosses the M18 at the point where the motorway crosses the East Coast Main Line. At this point it meets the Borough of Doncaster and follows Mother Drain, then the River Torne, north of Torne Valley Farm. It passes by a Roman fort and crosses the A638 at Rossington Bridge, north of Rossington Bridge Farm. At Wheatcroft Farm it meets Finningley. Nearby at the junction of the A638 and B6463, there is a and ride car park. The boundary passes along the west of Hurst Plantation, and meets the A638, a former Roman road, at Warren House Farm. Following the A638 at Mount Pleasant Hotel, it meets Austerfield. In the south-east of the parish is the Racing College (for horse racing), next to Rossington Hall School. At Bawtry Forest, it meets Bawtry. Crossing the B6463 at New England Cottages, it meets Tickhill. At Stancil Bridge, it meets the River Torne and Wadworth.HistoryThere are remains of both a Roman fort and Roman pottery kilns in the area. The name Rossington translates from the old Anglo-Saxon name of Farm on the Moor.  In later times, Rossington housed a small village and both Rossington Hall and Shooters Hill Hall.Four villages in oneThe area known as Rossington is actually made up of a number of villages and hamlets, namely Hesley, Littleworth, Old Rossington, New Rossington,  Rossington Bridge and Shooters Hill. The New Village began to be built around the time of the sinking of the Colliery. Rossington Bridge, although now only consisting of a few buildings is the oldest of the four settlements; situated on the crossing of the Roman road from Lincoln (Lindvm) to York (Ebvrscvm) via Doncaster (Danvm) it was once the site of a major Roman fort (the largest between Lincoln and York).  Rossington Bridge was also an important staging post on the Great North Road.Collierythumb|180px|left|Rossington Main CollieryIt was, however in the mid-twentieth century that saw the largest expansion of the area. The need for workers in and around the Rossington Main Colliery led to the building of large numbers of housing near to the pit in what was called New Rossington. After the end of British Coal in the early 1990s, the mine was able to keep operating and became one of the last in the area to keep producing coal albeit at a greatly reduced scale. However, with the decline of the mine, the village suffered high levels of unemployment and poverty throughout the 1990s and early 2000s. The Colliery finally closed in 2007.* See List of Yorkshire Pits for other local Yorkshire collieries.Old village expansionthumb|160px|right|View of the colliery from Wadworth Carr, to the west of the villageIn more recent years, Old Rossington has seen the building of large levels of new, private housing raising the villages affluence.  It is claimed that Rossington is the largest village in Britain with a population of 13,248 (9,089 New Rossington, 4,159 Old Rossington) over four times larger than the nearby town of Bawtry (3,198) and making up 4.6% of the total population of the Doncaster Metropolitan Borough( www.doncasterhealth.co.uk/Phiu/communities) The expansion of the Old Village actually makes it newer than the New Village.The railwayThe Old Village and New Village are separated by the Coast Mainline; there are only two crossing points over the railway between the old and new villages.  These are the road bridge on Stripe Road and the crossing at the point where West End Lane becomes Station Road.  As the road name suggests Rossington once had its own station, however, this was closed for regular services in 1958 but a few special trains stopped there until the late 1960s.  The station buildings and platforms remained in place until the early 1980s, when the platforms, which were to the south of the level crossing were dug up and the old signal box that stood on the north east side of the crossing was demolished.  The signalling having been automated and control of the crossing moved to PSB a few years before.  When the old signal box was in operation the crossing was controlled by a large set of wooden gates, which were operated by the signalman who had to leave the signal box and open and close the gates by hand. By the mid 1950s these gates were opened and closed by a large wheel in the signal box. These gates were replaced by automated barriers controlled from PSB at the same time as the signal box was closed; however, some older residents of Rossington still refer to the crossing gates. The only surviving building is the old Station cottages, which stand on the north west side of the crossing and are now private dwellings.Public housesthumb|170px|left|Former Royal Hotel in 2006Although there are no really old or historic pubs in Rossington, there two pubs in the village with names that relate to local history, both of which are relatively new buildings (post Second World War). Firstly there is The Styrrup, which is located on the junction of Station Road and Stripe Road, this pub reputedly acquired its name because the infamous Highwayman Turpin once watered his horse Black Bess at the nearby pump on Station Road while on his legendary ride to York.  The second Rossington pub with a story behind its name is The Poacher on Radburn Road, this pub was built in the early 1980s and at the time the pub was being built along with the surrounding housing estate, the village was rocked by the murder of a local girl by her uncle.  When the murder case was brought to trial the key prosecution witness was a local man who had seen the murder take place while out poaching, it was therefore decided that the pub should be named in his honour.Correction - in addition there was a coaching inn at Rossington Bridge locally as Parrots Corner which operated until the late 19th century, after which it became a private house. Within the last 20 years it was again licenced and is now a pub called The Hare & Tortoise.Places of worshipThe village currently supports a number of churches.* St. Michaels Church (Old Rossington Parish Church)* St. Lukess Church (New Rossington Parish Church)* Rossington Methodist Church* Christ The King Roman Catholic Church* New Life Christian Centre* Rossington Community Baptist Church, Holmes Carr CentreEducationthumb|160px|right|Entrance to Rossington Hall SchoolThe village has many successful schools, including:* St. Michaels CE Primary School* St. Josephs RC Primary School* Tornedale Infant School* Pheasant Bank Junior School* Grange Lane Infant School* Rossington All Saints Academy (Aided) CE Sports College. The school is voluntary aided, has a sixth form, and continues to increase its results each year.* Rossington HallSportRossington Main Football Club was formed in 1919 as Rossington Colliery, originally playing behind the Colliery offices in New Rossington, before moving to their current home at the end of Oxford Street in 1921. In 1998 the club merged with the latterly formed Rossington FC (formerly Station FC), and the new Main F.C. currently play in the Northern Counties East League.Rossington is the home to the RASCALS swimming team based at Rossington Sports Centre. Rossington Swimming Club was founded in June 1966.(Rossington Swimming Club)Rossington has a long history of local junior and senior cricket. Rossington Main Cricket Club. The Cricket Club has 3 Senior teams that mixes youth and experience and these teams play on a Saturday and Sunday. The Cricket Club also has junior teams from the age ranges under 11s, under 13s, under 15s and under 17s.(Rossington Main Cricket Club)People from Rossington* Concannon, Labour MP from 1966-87 for Mansfield (another area with coal mining heritage)* Ernest Jones CBE, President from 1954-60 of the NUM, worked at Rossington Main Colliery from 191821Bridge - geograph.org.uk - 210447.jpg|thumb|right|Rossington Bridge, to the north of the village, on the former Great North Road - A638 ReferencesExternal links* Northern Racing Collegeit:Rossingtonnl:Rossingtonpl:Rossington
1036221
Star_Fleet_Universe
The Star Fleet Universe (SFU) is the variant of the Trek universe detailed in the series of Fleet Battles games (board-, card-, and role-playing) from Design Bureau Inc. and used as reference for the Starfleet Command series of games. Its source material stems from the original and animated series of Trek as well as from other fan sources, such as Star Trek Star Fleet Technical Manual. In addition, it also includes a substantial number of new races and technologies, such as the Hydran Kingdom, the Inter-Stellar Concordium and the Andromedans.Star Fleet Battles was based on the Star Trek universe as of 1979()  and includes elements of Trek: The Original Series and Trek: The Animated Series.  Federation elements were heavily based on concepts from Star Trek Star Fleet Technical Manual.  Unlike the mainstream Star Trek universe, Star Fleet Battles seems to consider some, but not all of The Animated Series, as being a canon material source, thus leading to the inclusion of aliens such as the Kzinti, which had originally been created for a non-Trek story series.Since the first publication of the game, Star Fleet Battles and the Star Trek universe have diverged considerably as the authors of the game and those of the films and series have basically ignored each other.  The resulting divergent world of Star Fleet Battles is known as the Star Fleet Universe.  Games set in this universe include the tactical board wargames Fleet Battles, Commander and Fleet Armada (a Star Fleet Universe adaptation of 12 Games Starmada engine); the strategic wargame and Empire; the card game Fleet Battle Force; and the role-playing game Prime Directive in editions for the GURPS, D20 and Modern game systems. Also, ADB produces Captains Log, a non-periodical journal published roughly semi-annually with additional SFU background material, starship information and reports from various game events and tournaments.The Starfleet Command games draw on this universe considerably, yet maintain a number of elements not found in the original Star Fleet Universe, such as movie-era ships and the Meskeen race for the ISC.Nature of the GalaxyIn the Star Fleet Universe, the Way Galaxy is divided up into 24 sectors, each named for the letters of the alphabet.(The Milky Way Galaxy, Captains Log #27, (ADB, 2003)) Each sector extends from the galactic rim, and inwards to where star density and radiation problems cause ion storms, precluding travel. There are five void sectors (Epsilon, Iota, Pi, Upsilon and Omega), where star and planet density is low, and which tend to generate large ion storms and radiation clouds, restricting travel from one set of sectors to another. This leads to the sectors in between to be grouped together in (generally) sets of three, termed octants, as three sectors are one eighth of the rim of the galaxy, and which are sometimes inaccurately referred to as sectors themselves.The Storm Zone is unoccupied, as even bases cannot exist there due to the severity of the storms, and ships cannot penetrate the Radiation Zone. The Core of the galaxy has never been explored.The five areas into which the Voids separate the inhabitable portions of the galaxy are the Alpha Octant, the Sargasso Octant, the Xorkaelian Empire, the Sigma Octant, and the Omega Octant.Alpha OctantThe Alpha Octant is the primary setting of the Star Fleet Universe, being home to the United Federation of Planets, the Klingon Empire, the Romulan Star Empire, and all the other empires inherited from other Star Trek settings. It extends from the Alpha Sector to the Delta Sector, but only Alpha, Beta and Gamma (more specifically, the area covered by the and Empire map sections) have been extensively explored by the major powers of the region.Omega OctantThe Omega Octant runs from the Void in the Omega Sector through the Psi, Chi and Phi Sectors (though Phi is mostly off the detailed Omega map, as Delta is in the Alpha Octant), and is detailed in a series of Star Fleet Battles modules (and a playtest pack for Federation Commander). Over two dozen empires have operated in this region; some remain a factor in the Octant throughout the modern era, others rise at an early time only to be crushed or sidelined, while still others only enter the scene at a later point in history. Notable powers include the Msron Alliance (a union of several species, like the Federation and ISC; its rise, collapse and renaissance helped define the Octants history), the Trobrin Empire (composed of silicon-based life forms, who consider a Silicate Plan to rule the galaxy as their only insurance against domination by carbonites), the Probr Revolution (a species of genetically uplifted salamanders who rose against their creators, then used their technology to forge their own empire) and the Federal Republic of Aurora (a collection of exiles from several Alpha Octant empires, involuntarily transferred to the Omega Octant and forced to find their own way amidst the warring factions of Omega).((OA1.0) History of the Omega Octant, Star Fleet Battles Omega Master Rulebook, (ADB, 2007))Other Milky Way Factions and Octantsthumb|Much of the rest of the Milky Way Galaxy remains to be explored in the Star Fleet Universe...The JindariansThe Jindarians are known to be found throughout the Alpha and Omega Octants (controlling a small Freehold in the latter), with two-to-three caravans extant in the SMC. They are described as having been in space for longer than Homo sapiens has been on Earth, use hollow asteroids for their ships (with some metal-hull starships in supporting roles) and travel in unrelated caravans. Beyond the Freehold, they care little about borders, governments, and wars; instead travelling from system to system, mining asteroid belts and trading with the locals. They push aside any competition using their warp augmented railguns to fire thousands of cubic meters of gravel and rock at opponent vessels.( In the SMC, their legacy was far-reaching; the Jumokian rebels fleeing the Eneen conquest of their home world developed asteroid shipyards based on Jindarian templates, and later passed these on to the Magellanic forces driven into exile by the Andromedan invasion.((MR1.15) Small Asteroid Shipyard, Star Fleet Battles Module C5 (ADB, 2006))The Xorkaelian EmpireThe fearsome Xorkaelians control six Sectors, from Kappa to Omicron on the far side of the galaxy from the Alpha Octant, serving as a grim reminder of their might. It is known that they have sent occasional raids to the Alpha Octant for some time, and invaded the Alpha races sometime after the Andromedan War, but nothing has been published about these events at the time of writing. Their ships are reported to have a modular design, but little else of this race has been revealed.(Sargasso Storm OctantThe Sargasso Octant contains Zeta, Eta, and Theta Sectors. It has not been covered by any product but is known to experience periods of truly massive ion storms that make interstellar travel impossible for decades at a time throughout the octant. It is believed to be home to some 20 races who live in protected enclaves and come out between storms to claim available resources.Sigma OctantThe Sigma Octant contains Tau, Sigma and Rho Sectors. It has not been covered by any product at this time but is known to be inhabited.Other GalaxiesAndromeda Galaxythumb|M31, home of the Andromedan Invaders.So far, only one empire has been revealed as originating from M31, but it has made quite an impact on the Star Fleet Universe; Andromedan Invaders: The Andromedans (who were backtracked to a galaxy visible in the Andromeda constellation from Earth) were first contacted in the Alpha Octant in Y166, and in the Omega Octant in Y167; though they had already made their presence felt in the Lesser Magellanic Cloud. In Y188, they launched an all out attack on the Milky Way. They utilise technology unlike any used by known Galactic or Magellanic races, such as Power Absorbers instead of shields, which allow them to use incoming attacks to help power their ships, as well as the devastating Tractor-Repulsor Beam, which can rip enemy vessels apart.Small Magellanic Cloudthumb|The Small Magellanic Cloud, a stepping stone of the Andromedan invasion.The Magellanic Cloud (referred to in-setting as the Lesser Magellanic Cloud) is composed of three main regions; the densely populated Core (shrouded by a dense radiation shell), a ring of provinces with standard stellar densities, and an outer Fringe region where stars and planets are much fewer and further between. Beyond the Fringe worlds lies the Chomak Cluster, a collection of stars only recently (in astronomical terms) captured by the Clouds gravitational field.(Magellanic Map (ADB, 2006)) Module C5 for SFB presented five of the Magellanic empires; the Baduvai Imperium, the Eneen Protectorates, the Maghadim Hives, the Uthiki Harmony and the Jumokian Resistance. Others, such as the ancient Chomak Community and the reclusive Yrol Septs, await publication. In the decades prior to the Andromedan arrival, several wars were waged between the three Magellanic Powers (Baduvai, Eneen and Maghadim), most notably for control of the strategically vital Neutral Worlds. Unfortunately for these empires, the Andromedans eventually sought to conquer the Cloud outright, in order to claim it as an advanced base of operations for their full-scale invasion of the Milky Way Galaxy. In the face of this common threat, the rival powers formed the Triple Pact; a desperate, and ultimately doomed, joint bid for survival. Once Operation Unity succeeded in subduing the Andromedans, the surviving Magellanic forces (which had held out in exile among the Fringe worlds) took to re-building their fallen empires; though it would take a long time for any of them to approach their former glory.((MA1.0) Magellanic History (ADB, 2006))M81 Galaxythumb|M81, home of the (former) Tholian Will and the Seltorian Tribunal.The original location of the Tholian Will was M81, a galaxy outside the Group. Before the Seltorian revolt, it was controlled completely by the Tholians, with the exception of isolated nebulae from which the Nebuline species helped support M81 piracy.(Pirates of M81 Galaxy, Captains Log #41, (ADB, 2010)) In addition, this galaxy was once home to the Bolosco Merchant Guilds, later found in the Omega Octant.; The Seltorian Tribunal : After their successful revolt, the Seltorians kept the same basic political structure as the Tholian Will in place, just with themselves in charge. Fearful of an eventual Tholian return, they have sent out large nest ships as mobile bases of operation against any remnants of the Tholians they locate. It is unknown just how many expeditions were sent out, but it is known that one did go to the Galaxy (and presumably did not fare well), as well as to the Milky Way.The Iridani Clusterthumb|M3, An example of a globular cluster in orbit of the Milky Way - the kind of place the Iridani call home.Adjacent to the Omega Octant of the Milky Way Galaxy, the Iridani Cluster is home to one rather adventurous space-faring race presented in the SFB Omega-series modules...; The Iridani Questors : Otter-like party goers, the Iridani frequently travel to neighbouring galaxies, such as the Milky Way (most notably among the Omega races) and the Small Magellanic Cloud, in single ships (or sometimes in squadrons) performing Knightly quests. Their Cluster was conquered by the Andromedans in the Y190s, but there were so many Iridani in the Milky Way that their fleet was able to band together for the greatest Quest of all: the liberation of their home worlds.Triangulum GalaxyThe empires of the Galaxy come in two distinct flavours; with a handful of older realms dealing with the consequences of several newly emergent species making their mark on M33.(Timeline of the Triangulum Galaxy, Star Fleet Battles Module E2, (ADB, 2001)) Three of these powers (the Helgardian Protectorate, the Arachnid Worlds of Unions and the Mallaran Empire) were presented in playtest form in SFB Module E2, while the Imperium was previewed in Captains Log #23. Many other empires are noted as being present in this setting, including the Human Republic (founded by a Terran colony caravan which was displaced from the Milky Way in -Y12). The Triangulum setting awaits formal publication in a full published module.HistoryStar Fleet Universe products outline an extensive history that serve as the backdrop of the games. The usual chronology uses an Earth-based calendar (June, August, 365 days, etc.), with dates given in Y-years. These are written as (for instance) Y168, or August Y168, and are dated to the year Earth first made contact with the Vulcans. A direct conversion to familiar Domini dating is (purposefully) not given, however the and Empire rules state that Y0 should be somewhere between AD 2020 and AD 2090, the Commander rules arbitrarily set it as AD 2400 (referred to in-universe as the Valkenburg Chronology) and consistently use AD dates derived from that rather than use Y-year nomenclature, while an option setting the date at 2063 (in line with the year of First Contact set in other Star Trek settings) is known as the Amin-Audeh Chronology. In all cases, it is stated that the actual date cannot be precisely known.As this chronology was created completely separately of anything done for Star Trek after the Original Series (which at the time also avoided any hard date for when it happened), it cannot (and should not) be reconciled directly with current Star Trek canon. As an example of the incompatibilities arising from the separate evolution of the two visions of Star Trek history, the SFU defines the five year mission of the original Star Trek series as being from Y155 to Y160, which by Paramounts chronology would put Y0 at AD 2108; while if one accepts the definition of Y0, it should be the year of the movie Trek: First Contact, AD 2063.While the time periods recorded in the Alpha Octant, Small Magellanic Cloud and Triangulum Galaxy are only loosely arranged into particular eras, the history of the Omega Octant is broken down into Cycles, as recorded by the Chlorophon race (who act as the de facto fictional historians of the Octant). Such Cycles cover the defining events of each period, such as the Pax Msra (the period of the Msron Alliances furthest extent in power and influence) and the Invasions (when the Andromedans and Souldra sought to conquer the Omega races).Alpha-Octant HistoryNon-Tactical WarpMost races of the Alpha-Octant discover warp drive around the same time (Y1 for Humans, Y11 for the Kzintis, etc.), with the exception of the Vulcans and some other future Federation members, who had been in space for some time,(Star Fleet Universe Timeline: The Early Period, Star Fleet Battles Module Y1: The Early Years, (ADB, 2000)) and the Jindarians, who have been in space longer than Humans have existed.((R16.1) Jindarian Background, Star Fleet Battles Module F1: The Jindarians, (ADB, 2005)) Warp drives render a ship extremely vulnerable to weapons damage, so all combat is fought at sub-light speeds, with ships moving strategically at faster than light speeds. All races are just beginning to expand and colonize, so wars are uncommonbut not unknown. The Romulans in particular fight both the Gorns and Earth.(Early yearsThe Early Years start with the introduction of tactical warp drive in Y62. Module Y1 for SFB (the only game system to explore this era so far) presents two distinct generations of ships. the W-era, which mostly consists of non-tactical warp ships converted to tactical-warp, and later, more powerful Y-era ships (starting in Y79) which were built for combat at FTL speeds.During this period, the fleeing Tholians arrive in the Milky Way Galaxy (Y79). The Klingons and Lyrans manage to conquer all of Hydran space other than three lost colonies (Y84-87). The Klingons make a major effort to reclaim territory from the Tholians, reaching their sphere home world before being defeated (Y92-102). Sixteen Orion ship crews mutiny, disappearing, and becoming the nucleus for the Orion Pirates (Y113). A Kzinti civil war ends when the Usurper sends his ships into an energetic nebula, rather than face capture (Y116). The Usurper finds the nebula is hollow and sets up a government in the WYN Cluster.(Middle yearsThis is the era that SFB started out in, the era of The Original Series (Y154-159). It starts in Y120 with the introduction of the first normal ships (e.g., not prefixed by a letter to designate its era in the game designations). Technology and borders are fairly constant through this era, but several important things do happen.The Federation colony Aurora disappears in a massive ion storm (Y130). It has actually been transported to the Omega-octant where it becomes the capital of a minor interstellar state.(Star Fleet Battles Module 1: The Omega Sector (ADB, 2000)) The Hydran lost colonies build an all-new fleet and retake the Kingdom in a surprise campaign (Y135).((R9.1) Hydran Background, Star Fleet Battles Module C1: New Worlds I (ADB, 1999))The Four Powers War involves the Klingons, Kzintis, Lyrans and Hydrans in the biggest armed conflict yet seen in Alpha-octant from Y158 to Y162. The Klingons and Lyrans, forming the Coalition together, do well at first, but the tide of war changes with the introduction of Hydran Helbore Torpedoes and Kzinti fighters. Both sides accept a status quo antebellum peace rather than prolong the conflict.((607.0) The Four Powers War, Federation and Empire: Fighter Operations, (ADB, 2004)) All nations in the Alpha Octant realize that nothing has been resolved and that another major war is just a matter of time. The next decade is marked by the development of new ship designs and refits to improve existing ships.The General WarIn August Y168, the new war came. First the Lyrans and Klingons attack the Kzinti Hegemony, then the Hydrans attack them, in the understanding that they are the next target of the Lyran-Klingon Coalition. The Hydran capital falls (again), the Coalition assaults the Kzinti homeworld, and the Federation starts preparing to intervene on behalf of the Kzintis. With war against the Hydrans and Kzintis wrapping up, and the Federation mobilizing, the Klingons invade the Federation in Y171, and convince the Romulans to join the Coalition in Y173. The Coalition drives deep into Federation space before the lines stabilize, with the Gorn Confederacy joining the Federation-led Alliance in Y174. The situation becomes a large-scale stalemate with both sides fighting back and forth in devastated zones that have been denuded of pre-war bases. The superior Federation economy, and the toll of several years of war prior to invading the Federation cause the war to slowly turn in the Alliances favor. The Hydrans recover and make a drive back to their capital in Y178, Federation and Gorn fleets make a strike into Romulan space that ends with the devastation of the secondary capital, Remus, in Y181. Finally, a cease-fire that leaves the original borders mostly intact is agreed to in Y185, with all parties thoroughly exhausted.(A Brief History of the General War (ADB, 1995))This eighteen-year period of conflict is the main focus of current SFU products. Most new SFB products contain ships and variants that appeared or took part in the conflict. With a very few exceptions all Federation and Empire scenarios revolve around the General War in whole or in part. The ships presented in Federation Commander are the fully refitted versions that appear about mid-way through the war.X-TechnologyX-Technology is a reference to a set of new technologies that started appearing on ships in Y180. By and large, new ships were built with this technology, a few older ships were completely rebuilt to use it, and a few ships had individual systems upgraded to use parts of the new technology. After the end of The General War, more and more ships received these partial upgrades, allowing older designs to stay relevant next to the steadily increasing number of X-ships.((XR0.0) Partial X-Refits, Captains Log #31, (ADB, 2005))The peace after the General War did not last very long. Right after the end of the war, the Interstellar Concordium, determined to save the other races from themselves, started occupying the border areas of all the opposing states in the Pacification Program or ISC Conquest, in the hopes that if the conflicting factions could be kept apart, any wars could be prevented. By Y188 ISC forces had reached Lyran space on the far side of the Octant and had spread everywhere in peacekeeping duties.((R13.1A) ISC Background, Star Fleet Battles Module C2: New Worlds II, (ADB, 1994))Andromedan ships had been encountered at random in steadily increasing numbers since Y166. In Y188 they launched the invasion, which decimated the spread out forces of the ISC, and put great pressure on all of the major powers of the Alpha Octant before the secret of their transportation network was discovered in Y195. In Y201 the galactic powers (led by the Federation and Klingons working together) counterattacked in Operation Unity, which traced the Andromedans back to their main base in the Small Magellanic Cloud and stopped the invasion by destroying the starbase there in Y202.((R10.1B) Andromedan Background Update (as of Y205), Star Fleet Battles Module C2: New Worlds II, (ADB, 1994))Past that point, there has not been much information published in any SFU game, though there are references to a second generation of X-Technology and Trade Wars in Y205,(Star Fleet Universe Timeline (ADB, 2007)) and an invasion of the Alpha Octant by the Xorkaelians in Y210.Various versions of the official timeline have ended in Y225: Presumably a third generation of X-ships was developed, but The Next Generation is not within the scope of the Star Fleet Universe.(  This is presumably a humorous reference to Trek: The Next Generation and the fact that SFB has no license for Star Trek materials outside of TOS and TAS.ReferencesExternal links*Federation Commander About The Universe page*A Brief History of the General War*Star Fleet Universe Timeline*Magellanic History
1037416
Shirebrook
Shirebrook is a town in the Bolsover district of north-east Derbyshire on the border with Nottinghamshire, England. At the UK Census it had a population of 9,291 (civil parish), 10,412 (urban area). It is on the B6407, and close to the road, between Mansfield and Bolsover.The town is served by railway station.Local economyShirebrook is a small market town with a market square (Market days are Tuesdays, Wednesdays, Fridays and Saturdays) surrounded by several shops. There is a large Co-operative food, a butchers, carpet shops, a photographers, 2 card shops, 4 cake shops, 3 Tattooists, 2 furniture shops, a  baby shop, 2 pet shops, 3 cafes, 4 pubs, a lock smith, 1 solicitors, 2 DIY stores, multiple take-aways and 2 pharmacists. Shirebrook is home to many small local businesses. Much of the growth and prosperity of the town was built around coal mining. Shirebrook Colliery opened in 1896 and closed in 1993. Like many former pit towns in the area this led to high unemployment and other social problems. The former site of the colliery is currently being redeveloped. The Kissingate Leisure Centre is on Park Road. It has no swimming pool, but it does have an indoor football area and a park. The Kissingate Leisure Centre itself was closed after being heavily damaged by fire on Friday 7 November, 2008, but reopened almost 12 months later.The town is the head quarters of World International, the UKs largest sports clothes retailer. On 19 May 2008 Shirebrook featured on Tonight on ITV1. It showed various places including Sports Direct, Shirebrook Market, the now demolished Empire Bingo/Cinema and also Carter Lane Social Club.In 2011, planning permission was sought to build a new 30,000 sq/ft Tesco superstore on the location of flats on Portland Road.EducationThe local secondary school is Shirebrook Academy on Common Lane is for pupils aged 1116 at GCSE level and also post 16 (Sixth Form) students.Shirebrook also has many primary schools and nurseries for all children to attend, such as:* Park Infant & Nursery Schools* Park Junior School* Stubbin Wood Special School* Brookfield Primary School* Model Village Primary SchoolRailwayShirebrook once had three stations, that remaining  was on the Railway (later part of the LMS) route from Nottingham to Worksop via Mansfield, and was originally known as Shirebrook West, despite being on the eastern edge of the town. The route lost its passenger services in October 1964 - the same closure which left Mansfield one of the largest towns in the UK without a station, but remained opened as a freight route. On the site of the goods yard a diesel locomotive fuelling depot was opened when diesels replaced steam in the mid 1960s. The station was re-opened in 1998 on the new Hood Line services from Nottingham to Worksop. A wagon repair and manufacturing business have a connection with the main line. Shirebrook North station (originally known as Langwith Junction, renamed in June 1924), was opened by the Derbyshire and East Coast Railway(Cupit,T., Taylor, W., (1984 2nd.Ed.) The Lancashire, Derbyshire and East Coast Railway, Trowbridge: The Oakwood Press) (later part of the Central Railway and subsequently the LNER) in March 1897 and closed in September 1955. By then only one of the four routes converging on it was left anyway - that to Lincoln: the Great Northern Railways Leen Valley Extension line to Pleasley and Sutton-in-Ashfield had closed in September 1931; the LD&ECR line to Beighton via Clowne in September 1939, and that to Chesterfield via Bolsover in December 1951, due to the unsafe condition of Bolsover Tunnel. The filling in of the tunnel began on the 10th of october 1966 and used waste from bolsover colliery. The route of this line can be viewed on google earth,The mouth of the old tunnel can be found on the southern edge of Scarcliffe, Emerging just south of Ridgdale road Bolsover.Shirebrook South station was on the Great Northern Railways Leen Valley Extension line mentioned above, opened in November 1901 and closed in September 1931.MediaThe town publishes a free newspaper, The Post, which is distributed to houses in the area on a monthly basis.  The newspaper has a very strong Labour bias and is very vocal on local issues.  The newspaper is published by Shirebrook Newspapers Ltd.Notable Ex-residentsRay Wilson, a member of the England team that won the World Cup came from Shirebrook. Hurt, an English actor, grew up in the town when his father was the vicar of Holy Trinity Parish Church. Other ex-residents include the actor Tarrant(Colin Tarrant biography at IMDb) who played a number of roles including CloughSportThe towns main football club, Shirebrook Town, currently play in the First Division of the Counties East Football League, and are based at Langwith Road.ReferencesExternal links* Local information* Colliery* Fire Station* Shirebrook Town Council* Shirebrook Miners Welfare Unison Band* Photos of Shirebrook* Photographs of Shirebrookit:Shirebrooknl:Shirebrookpl:Shirebrookvo:Shirebrook
1039292
Trona
Trona PinnaclesTrona (trisodium hydrogendicarbonate dihydrate); Na3(CO3)(HCO3)2H2O  is an evaporite mineral.((Mineral galleries, 2008) It is mined as the primary source of carbonate in the United States, where it has replaced the process used in most of the rest of the world for sodium carbonate production. Etymology The word trona comes to English by way of either Swedish () or Spanish (), with both possible sources having the same meaning as in English.  Both of these derive from the Arabic trn which in turn derives from the Arabic natron, and Hebrew  (natruna), which comes from Greek  (nitron), derived ultimately from Egyptian ntry (or nitry). Natural deposits Trona is found at Lake and Lake, California; the River Formation of Wyoming and Utah; the Pans in Botswana and in the Valley in Egypt.(C. Michael Hogan (2008) Makgadikgadi, The Megalithic Portal, ed. A. Burnham) The trona near River, Wyoming is the largest known deposit in the world and lies in layered evaporite deposits from  below ground, where the trona was deposited in a lake during the Paleogene period.(Banks, Chad (2007-05-24). What is Trona? Wyoming Mining Association. Retrieved on 2009-07-01.)  Trona has also been mined at Magadi in the Rift Valley in Kenya for nearly 100 years, and occurs in salt pans in the National Park in Namibia. Mining operations * Soda Company* Valley Minerals Inc.* Solvay* Chemicals* Corporation* Chemical* Chemical Corp.* Natural Soda Ash Company See also * Natron* Nahcolite* Shortite* sesquicarbonate* Thermonatrite References ca:Tronade:Tronaga:Trnait:Tronaja:pt:Tronapt:Natroru:
1041949
MTU_Friedrichshafen
MTU Friedrichshafen GmbH is a manufacturer of commercial internal combustion engines founded by Maybach and his son Karl Maybach in 1909. It was a subsidiary of DaimlerChrysler until 2006 when it was sold off to the EQT IV private equity fund, and is now a part of the Tognum Corporation.The company manufactures diesel-engines for trains, ships, oil and gas installations, military vehicles, agriculture, mining and construction equipment as well as diesel-generators and very new carbonate fuel cells.MTU derives from Motoren- und Turbinen-Union meaning Motor (Engine) and Turbine Union.In March 2011, it was announced that plc and AG were launching a takeover for TognumHistory* 1909: Foundation of Luftfahrzeug-Motorenbau GmbH in Bissingen an der Enz as part of the Zeppelin corporation. The company manufactures engines for airships.* 1912: 1911/12 relocation to Friedrichshafen; the name is changed to Motorenbau GmbH.* 1918: Motorenbau GmbH is re-named Maybach-Motorenbau GmbH. After the end of the first world war the company began to manufacture car engines.* 1966: Merger of the two companies Mercedes-Benz Motorenbau Friedrichshafen GmbH and Maybach-Motorenbau GmbH to form Maybach Mercedes-Benz Motorenbau GmbH.* 1969: Maybach Mercedes-Benz Motorenbau GmbH is renamed Motoren und Turbinen-Union Friedrichshafen GmbH. The company is a subsidiary of MTU Mnchen GmbH which is owned at equal shares by Daimler-Benz AG and AG until 1985.* 1989: Incorporation of MTU Friedrichshafen in Deutsche Aero-space AG (DASA), a company of the Daimler-Benz Group.* 1994: Cooperation of MTU Friedrichshafen with Detroit Diesel Corporation* 1995: MTU Friedrichshafen and MTU Mnchen go their separate ways; MTU Friedrichshafen becomes a direct subsidiary of Daimler-Benz AG.* 2001: MTU Motoren- und Turbinen-Union Friedrichshafen GmbH is renamed MTU Friedrichshafen GmbH.* 2005: In late 2005, the DaimlerChrysler Off-Highway business unit, including MTU Friedrichshafen and the Off-Highway division of Detroit Diesel Corporation, is sold to the Swedish financial investor EQT Partners.* 2006: The business is transferred into the new holding company Tognum, with MTU Friedrichshafen as its core company.* 2009: MTU Friedrichshafen celebrates its centenary. In the same year introduction of the new Series 1600, rounding off the performance range at the lower end of the product portfolio.Diesel enginesDiesel engines were built in the 1960s under the Maybach name and were fitted to railway locomotives including:* Rail Class 35, Maybach MD870 engine built under licence in UK by Siddeley* Rail Class 42, two Maybach MD650 engines built under licence in UK by Bristol-Siddeley* Rail Class 52, two Maybach MD655 engines* Class V 160 (prototypes)* Pacific 9010, two Maybach MD870 enginesLater engines were built under the MTU name and installations include:* Rail Class 43 (HST) - rebuild* Class V 160 (main series)GalleryFile:Detroit Diesel bauma 2007.jpg|MTU / Detroit Diesel exhibition at a trade fairFile:MTU 20V4000M93.JPG|MTU 20V4000M93 engineFile:MTU croatiaboatshow.jpg|MTU boat engineSee also*Maybach*GmbH*AG*plc*DieselExternal links* Official website* History of the companyFriedrichshafenFriedrichshafenFriedrichshafenFriedrichshafenFriedrichshafenja:MTUFriedrichshafenFriedrichshafenAG(firma)
1044987
Chukchi_Peninsula
thumb|250px|right|Location of the Chukchi Peninsula in Far East Siberia.Image:Berengia - present day.gif|thumb|250px|right|Map showing the proximity of the Chukchi peninsula in Russia to the Peninsula in America right|thumb|Chukchi Peninsula. US military map 1947The Chukchi Peninsula, Chukotka Peninsula or Chukotski Peninsula (, ), at about 66 N 172 W, is the northeastern extremity of Asia. Its eastern end is at Dezhnev near the village of Uelen. It is bordered by the Sea to the north, the Sea to the south, and the Strait to the east. The peninsula is part of Autonomous Okrug of Russia. The estimated population of the region in 1990 was 155,000.(Chukchi Peninsula. Encyclopedia.com. Accessed September 2010.)The peninsula was traditionally the home of the native Chukchi people, some Eskimo peoples (Yupiks and  Eskimos), Koryaks, Chuvans, Evens/Lamuts, Yukagirs, and some Russian settlers. The peninsula lies along the Sea Route (the Northeast passage).Industries on the peninsula are mining (tin, lead, zinc, gold, and coal), hunting and trapping, reindeer raising, and fishing.  See also Bay, Siberia.ReferencesFurther reading* Anana, L., and Richard L. Bland. Umiak the traditional skin boat of the coast dwellers of the Chukchi Peninsula : compiled in the communities of Provideniya and Sireniki, Chukotka Autonomous Region, Russia 1997-2000. Anchorage: U.S. Dept. of the Interior, National Park Service, 2003. * Dinesman, Lev Georgievich. Secular dynamics of coastal zone ecosystems of the northeastern Chukchi Peninsula Chukotka : cultural layers and natural depositions from the last millennia. Tbingen Germany: Mo Vince, 1999. ISBN 3934400035 * Dikov, Nikola Nikolaevich. Asia at the Juncture with America in Antiquity The Stone Age of the Chukchi Peninsula. St. Petersburg: Nauka, 1993. * Portenko, L. A., and Douglas Siegel-Causey. Birds of the Chukchi Peninsula and Wrangel Island  Ptitsy Chukotskogo Poluostrova I Ostrova Vrangelya. New Delhi: Published for the Smithsonian Institution and the National Science Foundation, Washington, D.C., by Amerind, 1981. bg:de Txukotkacs:ukotkade:Tschuktschen-Halbinselpoolsaarde Chukchieo:ukotkotchouktchehsb:ukotkapoluotokChukchidei CiukcipussalapusiasalisChukchinl:Tsjoektsjenschiereilandja:no:Tsjuktsjerhalvyann:Tsjuktsjarhalvyands:Tschuktschen-HalfinselCzukockide Chukotka polostrovniemimaasv:TjuktjerhalvnYarmadaso Chukotkazh:
1048909
ROOT
ROOT is an object-oriented program and library developed by CERN. It was originally designed for physics analysis and contains several features specific to this field, but it is also used in other applications such as astronomy and mining. Description CERN maintained a program library written in FORTRAN for many years; development and maintenance were discontinued in 2003 in favour of ROOT, written in C++.ROOT development was initiated by Ren Brun and Fons Rademakers in 1994. Some parts are published under the LGPL, and others are based on GPL software and thus are also published under the terms of the GPL. It provides independent access to a computers graphics subsystem and system using abstract layers. Parts of the abstract platform are: a user interface and a GUI builder, container classes, reflection, a C++ script and line interpreter (CINT), object serialization and persistence.The packages provided by ROOT include those for* histogramming and graphing to view and analyze distributions and functions,* fitting (regression analysis) and minimization of functionals,* statistics tools used for analysis,* matrix algebra,* four-vector computations, as used in energy physics,* standard mathematical functions,* multivariate analysis, e.g. using networks,* image manipulation, used, for instance, to analyze astronomical pictures,* access to distributed data (in the context of the Grid),* computing, to parallelize data analyses,* persistence and serialization of objects, which can cope with changes in class definitions of persistent data,* access to databases,* 3D visualizations (geometry)* creating files in various graphics formats, like PostScript, PNG, SVG,* interfacing Python and Ruby code in both directions,* interfacing Monte Carlo generators.A key feature of ROOT is a data container called tree, with its substructures branches and leaves. A tree can be seen as a sliding window to the raw data, as stored in a file. Data from the next entry in the file can be retrieved by advancing the index in the tree. This avoids memory allocation problems associated with object creation, and allows the tree to act as a lightweight container while handling buffering invisibly.ROOT is designed for high computing efficiency, as it is required to process data from the Hadron Colliders experiments estimated at several petabytes per year.  ROOT is mainly used in analysis and acquisition in energy physics experiments, and most  experimental plots and results in those subfields are obtained using ROOT.The inclusion of the CINT C++ interpreter makes this package very versatile as it can be used in interactive, scripted and compiled modes in a manner similar to commercial products like MATLAB.Criticisms of ROOT include its difficulty for beginners, as well as various features of its design and implementation.(The problem with ROOT) From time to time these issues are discussed on the ROOT users mailing list.(ROOTTALK: 27 July 2006)(ROOTTALK: 28 July 2008) Applications of ROOT Several physics experiments have written software based on ROOT, often in favor of using more generic solutions (e.g. using ROOT containers instead of STL).* Some of the running particle physics experiments using software based on ROOT** ALICE** ATLAS** BaBar** CB-ELSA/TAPS** CDF** CMS** COMPASS** DZero** H1** LHCb** MINERA** MINOS** NEXT** PEN** PHENIX** PHOBOS** STAR** T2K** ZEUS** CRESST** OPERA* Future particle physics experiments currently developing software based on ROOT** NOA** CBM** PANDA** BELLE II** Baseline Neutrino Experiment (LBNE)* Astroparticle physics projects using ROOT** AMS** ANTARES** DMTPC** Fermi** ICECUBE** H.E.S.S.** MAGIC** (experiment)** Auger Observatory** VERITAS** PAMELA** PoGOLite See also * Matplotlib - a plotting and analysis system for Python* SciPy - a scientific data analysis system for Python, based on the NumPy classes* HippoDraw  an alternative C++-based data analysis system* Analysis Studio  a Java-based AIDA-compliant data analysis system* JHepWork  a Java-based data analysis framework based on FreeHEP libraries* programming language* (computing)  open interfaces and formats for particle physics data processing* PAW* Pro* computing* OpenDX* OpenScientist* Program Library  legacy program library written in Fortran77, still available but not updatedReferencesExternal links* The ROOT System Home Page* ROOT users mailing list* The Qt/ROOT System Home Page* GSI Object Oriented On-line Off-line system, an alternative GUI for ROOT based on QT/ROOT..* The RooFit Toolkit for Data Modeling, an extension to ROOT to facilitate likelihood fits* Dynamic Perl Binding akin to PyROOT* Perl Binding using SWIG* The Karma Rootrade:ROOT(programa)it:ROOTja:ROOTpl:ROOT(CERN)tr:ROOT
1050794
National_Coal_Board
The National Coal Board (NCB) was the corporation created to run the nationalised mining industry in the Kingdom. Set up under the Industry Nationalisation Act 1946, it took over the mines on vesting day, 1 January 1947.  In 1987 it was re-named the British Coal Corporation, whose assets were subsequently privatised. Predecessors Coal mines had been taken under government control during First and Second Wars. A Commission in 1919 gave Tawney, Sidney Webb, and Sir Chiozza Money the opportunity to publicly advocate nationalisation, but this was rejected as a solution at that time.Coal reserves were nationalised in 1942 and placed under the control of the Commission, but the mining industry itself remained in private hands.  Many of the coal companies were very small, although consolidation was underway in the years running up to nationalisation. Formation and history The NCB was one of a number of public corporations created by Clement Attlees post-war Labour government to run nationalised industries.  The Coal Industry Nationalisation Act received the Assent on 12 July 1946 and the NCB was formally constituted on 15 July, with Lord Hyndley as Chairman.(Whitakers Almanack 1948) The number of companies taken over by the Board was about two hundred, at a cost of 338 million. The headquarters of the Board were established in Hobart House, London. The board supplied free coal to its employees, giving rise to the myth that miners in Yorkshire kept coal in the bath instead of using it for ablutions.()The NCB employed over 700,000 people in 1950 and 634,000 in 1960, but successive governments reduced the size of the industry by closing geographically impaired or low productivity pits. Closures were originally concentrated in Scotland, but then moved into East England, Lancashire, and Wales in the 1970s. Closures in all coalfields began in the 1980s as demand for British coal was weakened by large subsidies that other European governments gave to their coal industries (Germany subsidised coal by four times as much and France by three times as much in 1984) and the availability of lower cost, often open-cast, coal mined in Australia, Colombia, Poland and the United States.The NCB saw three major national strikes. The 1972 and 1974 strikes were both over pay and both saw success for the National Union of Mineworkers. The miners strike of 19841985 ended in victory for the government and is still bitterly resented in some parts of Britain that suffered from the aftermath of pit closures.With the passing of the Industry Act 1994, the industry-wide administrative functions of British Coal were transferred to a new Authority. Its economic assets were privatised, the English mining operations being merged with Mining to form Coal plc. By the time of privatisation, only 15 pits remained in production.Duty of the Authority with respect to safety.(1)It shall be the duty of the Authority(a)in conjunction with the Health and Safety Executive, to prepare and from time to time revise a document setting out such means as may, with the approval of the Health and Safety Commission, be agreed between the Authority and that Executive for securing co-operation and the exchange of information between them; and(b)without prejudice to the effect or operation of any relevant statutory provisions (within the meaning of Part I of the M1Health and Safety at Work etc. Act 1974), to conduct itself in the carrying out of its functions in accordance with any agreement contained in that document.(2)As soon as practicable after agreement is reached for the purposes of(a)the preparation of a document in accordance with subsection (1) above, or(b)any revision of a document prepared in accordance with that subsection,the Authority shall send a copy of the document or, as the case may be, of the revised version of it to the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State shall lay the copy before each House of Parliament. Other activities The NCB operated extensive railways at its collieries, employing steam traction until the late 1970s/early 1980s.The NCBs research establishment at Orchard in Gloucestershire was founded in 1950 with Bronowski as Director of Research. It closed following privatisation of the coal mining industry.NCB subsidiaries managed coal-based chemical products (Coal Products Division) and the production of helmets and other mining equipment (Tredomen Engineering Ltd). In the mid-1970s, the activities of Coal Products Division were transferred to two new companies; National Smokeless Fuels Ltd and Thomas Ness Ltd, although they remained wholly owned by the NCB.In coalfield areas, the NCB was also a major landowner, both of colliery housing and of farmland originally acquired by private owners for its mining rights or to avoid subsidence claims. See also *disaster*v. National Coal Board*policy of the United Kingdom*use and conservation in the United Kingdom References  External links * National Coal Mining Museum for England* Durham Mining Museum list of pits in Northern England* North Staffs pics* Scottish Mining Museum* Big Pit: National Coal Museum - WalesGlo Cenedlaethol
1054358
Hokitika
Hokitika is a township in the Coast Region of Zealands Island,  south of Greymouth, and close to the mouth of the River. According to the 2006 census, the usually resident population of the Hokitika urban area was 3,078, a decrease of 12 people since 2001.() A further 828 people live in the surrounding area, an increase of 180 since 2001.() On a clear day / Mount Cook can clearly be seen from Hokitikas main street.HistoryFounded on gold mining in 1864, it was a centre of the Coast Gold Rush. By late 1866 it was one of the countrys most populous centres. It became the capital of the short-lived Province from 1873 until the abolition of provinces in 1876.The population has declined greatly since that time but the population of the Westland District is now on the rise thanks to lifestyle inhabitants. Almost 30% of the districts ratepayers live outside of Westland.EconomyThe major industries of greenstone (pounamu), gold, coal, and forestry have all dwindled over the last century, but a growing ecotourism industry has grown up and the town is starting to show signs of recovery. It has become a major tourist stop on the West Coasts main highway route, with carving of greenstone an important local industry. It is also gaining a reputation for its annual wild food festival which has been running since 1990.() Asylum was once the towns biggest employer.()Another important industry is dairying, with Milk Products being based in the town. A co-operative that has been producing dairy products for many years, it is increasing its production at about 10% annually, and in recent years has installed plants to produce new products such as different types of proteins, AMF and others. The vast majority of its production is exported.The Hokitika Sock Machine Museum in town has on display a collection of antique sock-knitting machines and invites visitors to knit their own socks.(Hokitika Activity Guide.)Hokitika now boasts one of the South Islands best 3D digital cinemas,(Xpand news) the Regent Theatre,(Theatre web Site) due to volunteer hours(cinema treasures) and grants from the Westland development trust, Lions foundation, Lotterys commission, the Major District Initiative($340k funding) and pub charity. The Art Deco theatre narrowly avoided being demolished, thanks to a last minute coup in the management committee.(theatre to close)(today 3d article)TransportState Highway 6 passes through the town.New Zealand Link provides up to five flights a day to Christchurch operated by Airways. The airport is adjacent to the town, immediately to the north-east.A line railway known as the Hokitika Branch runs to the town from Greymouth; it opened in 1893 and an extension to Ross was open from 1909 to 1980. Passengers to Hokitika were initially served by mixed trains that carried both goods and passengers, and in 1936, these services were augmented by a Leyland diesel railbus service that ran from Hokitika to Greymouth, Christchurch, and briefly Reefton. In the early 1940s, the Vulcan railcars were introduced and they provided a twice-daily service between Ross and Christchurch via Hokitika. The mixed trains continued to operate until 1967, and all passenger services to Hokitika ceased when the Vulcan railcars stopped running past Greymouth in 1972.  Since then, the line to Hokitika has been freight-only with traffic primarily coming from Milk Products.In 1865, after the discovery of gold in the area, the town became the official port of entry of the West Coast.  A boom period ensued when Hokitika was second only to Auckland, with reports of over 40 ships in the harbour at one time, with more waiting offshore.  It was a dangerous port, however, with 108 strandings and 32 ships lost from 1865 to 1867.  The lack of nearby coal meant that the port declined rapidly along with the gold, though Hokitika remained an official entry port until the 1950s.()GeographyClimatedateAugust 2010EducationA school was described as recently opened in Hokitika in 1875, and had nearly 350 students.() The Hokitika District High School provided both primary and secondary education for the area for many years.The current high school is Westland High School, which caters for years 7-13 and has a decile rating of 6 and a roll of 479.() School is a contributing primary (years 1-6) school with a decile rating of 4 and a roll of 170.()St Marys School is a full primary (years 1-8) school with a decile rating of 5 and a roll of 108.() It is a state integrated Catholic school.()All these schools are coeducational.ReferencesExternal links*Hokitika Wild Food Festival*Westland Milk Products*Westland High School websitede:Hokitikaes:Hokitikafr:Hokitikanl:Hokitikapl:Hokitikasv:Hokitika
1056006
Vulcan_Iron_Works
Since Vulcan was the Roman god of fire and smithery, the name was an obvious choice for an iron foundry or engineering works in the nineteenth century, both in England, the birthplace of the Revolution, and in the United States.EnglandDuring the Revolution there were numerous factories named Vulcan Iron Works in England, notably that of Thwaites and Edward Carbutt at Bradford (http://www.gracesguide.co.uk/wiki/1862_London_Exhibition:_Catalogue:_Class_7.:_Thwaites_and_Carbutt), Hull and Worcester(http://www.miac.org.uk/mckenzie.htm), England. The Vulcan Works at Thornton Road, Bradford was a spacious and handsome factory. It was described in Industries of Yorkshire as the largest of their kind in Bradford, and the centre and headquarters of an industry of magnificent dimensions and condition throughout. The works cover about four acres of ground... The buildings are all of stone, and the mechanical equipment could not be surpassed in efficacy at the present day, for it includes the lates and best improvements in all kinds of apparatus that can be advantageously brought to bear upon such an industry as that here engaged in. The working staff numbers about 200 men; and the perfection of order and system prevails in each and every department(Industries of Yorkshire, ca 1888).Pennsylvania, United Statesthumb|A Vulcan Iron Works builders plate from 1941.Image:Vulcan Iron Works print advertisement from Railway Age Magazine, February 5, 1944.jpg|thumb|250px|right|A Vulcan Iron Works print advertisement from the February 5, 1944 issue of Age.Vulcan Iron Works, based in Pennsylvania, manufactured railroad locomotives. The company was established in 1849 by Richard Jones, and ceased operation in 1954.Vulcan produced its first combustion locomotive in the 1920s; a total of 54 diesel-electric switcher units (each weighing 25 tons or more) came out of Vulcans shops between 1938 and 1954. Its largest unit was a 70-ton B-B unit built for Steel Company in 1944. It also built a large number of gasoline powered locomotives with mechanical drives.San Francisco, United StatesAn iron works was established at 135 Fremont Street in 1850 during the gold rush.  The factory identified as Vulcan Iron Works occupied the block bounded by Fremont, Mission, Howard, and First Streets.  The factory maintained the name through a number of owners building boilers, steam engines, mining machinery, sawmills, and some relatively primitive steam locomotives for 19th century California railroads.()  The factory was destroyed by the San Francisco earthquake, but steel fabrication activities resumed on the site after the quake.()References(* External links* Preserved Vulcan Iron Works steam locomotive listja:
1057949
Marab,_Brazil
 footnotes  Maraba is a city in the state of Par, Brazil. The reference location is the meeting point between two great rivers, forming a sort of y in the city as seen from above. It basically consists of five urban centers, linked by three highways.It is the fourth most populous city in the state of Para, approximately 233,462 inhabitants according to the IBGE/2010, and the third largest GDP in the state of Par, with 3115485.000, the main center of political, social and economic development of southern and southeastern Para and one of the most dynamic cities in Brazil.Maraba has a strategic position, is crossed by five major highway. He also has a large logistics infrastructure, with port, airport and railway. The city has a growing industrial park, especially the steel industry, is important in agriculture, with a vast agricultural frontier, and also has a strong trade and services sector.Maraba is characterized by its wide mix of peoples and cultures that does justice to the meaning of its popular name of son of the mix. The city is also known as the City Poem, because his name was inspired by a poem by poet Gonalves Dias. Etymology The etymology of the word Maraba is an indigenous term - like many others that we know by name rivers, towns, cities and relieves the state of Par - and means son of the prisoner or abroad or even Indias fruit with white.A poem written by Gonalves Dias inspired Francisco Silva, who named his store of goodwill, situated at the confluence of the Tocantins/Itacainas. The store actually a big shed, served the pioneers of all types of dry and wet. There, according to tradition, Cole bought the rubber collected, Andiroba, Copaiba, wild fruits, and several fighters, funds held in a lively cabaret, with the sale of drinks and women who himself had come from far eastern Amazon. History  Colonization The settlement of the basin Itacainas plays in shaping the city an important role, because even though this region has been further explored by the Portuguese in the sixteenth century, remained without a permanent occupation for nearly 300 years. Only since 1892 is that, in fact, the space was occupied by settlers. The first to participate in the formation of the town of Maraba in 1892 were political leaders who had escaped from the guerrillas staged at the north of Goias, specifically the city of Boa Vista. The pioneer Carlos Gomes Leito, accompanied by his family and aides work shifted to the southeast of Par, establishing their first camp in a locality situated on land bordered by the confluence of the Tocantins and Itacainas. Settling in the end, after a year of observations on the left bank of the Tocantins, about 10 km downstream from the other camp, which he called on local Burgh. The point where they settled began to give way in the woods in search of natural fields that would serve to cattle. In one of these raids, one of its workers struck a tree in some casual shooting until then unknown, whose shot made it abundantly pour into a milky liquid that, some time after touching the ground, clotted spontaneously.In 1894, the following immigrant Goias to the provincial capital to have a meeting with then president of the province of Grand Para, Jos Paes de Carvalho, who requested the cooperation, since the need to colonize the southern province, having been awarded 6 with tales of kings in cash and stock of drugs that would be used particularly in combating malaria and other tropical diseases. Succeeded in their attempt to help and for having the tests of the milk plant hardened proven that it was legitimate rubber, Leito, back to the Burgh, broadcasted the information to all of the little colony. The following year began to arrive the first wave of staff for the extraction of rubber. The dealer and Maranhense Francisco Coelho da Silva would have been the first to establish themselves in the area between the rivers Tocantins and Itacainas. The goal was to negotiate with the miners of Caucho, who through the mouth of the river Itacainas, sailed up the River. The records give the name of Francisco Silva city. He would have installed on the local trading house Maraba, whose name was a tribute to poet Gonalves Dias. Emancipation Hall File:Embarque de castanha em Marab.jpg|thumb|left|250px|Shipment of nuts in small boats.This commercial hub, where the Itacainas flowing in Tocantins, pressing a strip of land shaped peninsula, came the city of Maraba. So in tribute to its founder, the official name of the neighborhood popularly known as Dry hair is Francisco Coelho. Created February 27, 1913 by claim Marab community, the municipality was not formally installed on 5 April of that year, that date is now celebrated as his birthday and only received the title of city on October 27, 1923. The first Mayor Hall, at the time corresponding to the position of mayor, was Colonel Antonio da Rocha Maia, selected and appointed on the date of installation ceremonies. The fronts of migration into the region of Maraba, from the mid-20s, aimed especially the extraction and sale of nuts, and since the late 30s, in diamond mining in the Tocantins River stones. The city received immigrants from various regions of Brazil, especially Bahia, Cear, Piau, Gois, Paraba, Maranho, but also Palestinians and Lebanese immigrants, constituting an important layer in the local society. In 1929, the city is already illuminated by a wood burning power plant and 17 November 1935 the first plane lands at the airport recently opened in town. During this period the city was composed of 450 houses and 1500 inhabitants fixed. The 1970s With the opening of Route PA-70, in 1969, Maraba is linked to the Highway. The implementation of road infrastructure was part of the strategy the federal government (Military Regime in Brazil) to integrate the region with the rest of the country. Besides the official plan of agricultural colonization, the establishment of construction sites, especially the construction of a hydroelectric plant in Tucuru and deployment of the Grande Carajs project, the discovery of gold mine of Serra Pelada, streamlined and accelerated migration to Maraba decades 1970 and 1980. In 1970, the city was declared a National Security Area, a condition that lasted until the end of military dictatorship in 1985. Besides the region is strategic to the integration policy, it was the region to fight the Araguaia Guerrilla (movement inspired by the Chinese Communist action), resulting in an overt presence of the troops of the Brazilian Army, the city was one of the bases of operations for troops Federal. Also in 1970 the NIP (National Integration Program), which, among other measures, provided for the construction of the Highway, whose first section was opened in 1971, along with the creation of a post at the National Institute of Colonization and Agrarian Reform (INCRA) in Maraba. Recent facts In 1980 the city is plagued by the greatest flood in its history, the Tocantins River rises 17.42 meters. As a result there is a redesign of urban growth and city expansion. In 1984, comes into operation the Railroad, in 1988 and start the preparations for the installation of steel industries, for production of iron, a deal that has brought great benefits and growth for the city.On April 5, 1990 is promulgated the Organic Law of the municipality of Maraba. The district population increased significantly during the 90s, and in mid-1998 the number reached 157,884 inhabitants fixed in the next year, the city itself as the headquarters of major events with national impact. During the administration of then Mayor Geraldo Veloso the council went through a rapid process of structural modernization, and economic policy, highlighting the significant growth experienced. In consequence of these reforms the council during the years 2002 to 2008, received a massive investment, which has culminated in the city became a center metal and mechanical industry. Currently the population Marab is around 203,049 inhabitants, according to official estimates, this estimate and growth is inevitable, since the city is in the process of accelerated development and receives many people from other localities. Economy The municipality of Maraba experienced various economic cycles. Until the early 80s economy was based on the extraction plant. At first revolved around the extraction of rubber, whose lucrative attracted large numbers of the Northeast. Since the late nineteenth century (1892) until the late 40s, was marked by the extraction of the boom that has contributed greatly to the economy of the city and the region, however, the rubber crisis led the council to a new cycle . This time, the cycle of Brazil nuts, which for years led the municipal economy. There was also the cycle of diamonds between 1920 and 1940, which were mainly found on the river Tocantins. With the discovery of Pelada and be in the worlds largest mineral, Maraba also experienced the cycle of the mines, which had the greatest emphasis, the extraction of gold.Since the early 70s the city began to experience the installation of the Grande Carajs project, and later steel industries, rather than boosted the local economy. Primary sector Today, Maraba is the economic center and a vast administrative region of the Amazon agricultural frontier , the city has one of the most significant economic growth in the country. Livestock based on cattle ranching is an activity of great importance for the municipality, and ensure the livelihoods of the population, provides the regional and local development by creating large scale, and is marketed in different Brazilian regions and abroad. The herd area is highlighted by its superior quality, being one of the most important cattle herds of the state, a result arising from the use of advanced technology in the selection and fertilization. It has also herds of pigs, horses, sheep and poultryThe fishing sector also has a key role in local economic base by exporting its surplus for the entire north and northeast. Agriculture is diversified, with production cereals, pulses and oilseeds such as corn, rice and beans, fruits such as bananas and acai, and logging Secondary sector Through the Industrial Development Company of Para - CDI, was installed at the end of the eighties, in an area of 1,300 hectares, the industrial district of Maraba - DIM, to create the base of a steel pole targeting the Carajas iron ore, exploited by the mining company Vale.Metallurgical Industries and intense livestock activity, accounted for a large environmental devastation in the region. The activity of the industry requires large amounts of coal, leading to a devastation of native forests. As a result of public pressure the industries were forced to change its production model, investing in reforestation and charcoal production through the babassu coconut palm.Besides, to have more than 200 industries, and the steel (pig iron) most important, second is the timber industry and the manufacture of tiles and bricks. The citys economy also relies on the production of manganese and Agribusiness. In Maraba, Agribusiness works with pulp processing, cassava flour, rice processing, milk and palm.The installation of steel plant came boost the local economy even more, forming a metal pole-mechanical, with a view to verticalize the local mineral production. There are still projects that seen during and after the installation of steel works, among them: The pipeline Aailndia-Maraba and construction of new port city. Tertiary sector The trade and services sector also has its share of contribution. Maraba has approximately 5 000 outlets divided between trade formed by micro, small, medium and large businesses and services, Hospital, Financial, Education, Construction and Public Utilities. It is a very powerful and comes with high rates of growth. This is because the strategy of state government, to decentralize services from the state capital, Belm. The city is increasingly gaining representation in hosting numerous public institutions. The trade of the city is highlighted, because the city is a major regional commercial hub of South and Southeast of Par.Marab is served by Airport. Culture and leisure  Tourism Maraba is a true haven of natural beauty. Bordered by two major rivers, brings an air of provincial town, but offers great opportunities to those resident and visitors.;Beach Tucunar (Peacock Bass)One of the best options during the summer of Par, the Beach Bass is the most visited tourist spot in town. Emerging from the ebb of the River, just after the rainy season the beach occupies an area of approximately 5 km , of which three quarters are of fine sand and one quarter of vegetation. Situated opposite the central region of Maraba, the sands of the island are sighted in mid-April, but their high season is in July, making it the main attraction of the city.The beach provides vacationers, practice water sports and sandy, camping, fishing, and various attractions promoted by the Municipality.Along the beach is prepared a lot of vendors that offer visitors a multitude of dishes and drinks, including the Beach, the peacock bass fry;Beach geladinhoLocated opposite the district of San Felix, also appears in the summer with the decrease in the level of the river Tocantins. Its natural beauty won a special touch with the vision of Rail/Road bridge over the river Tocantins, to transport the ore extracted from the Serra dos Carajs.;Church of St. Felix of ValoisIt was the first chapel built in Maraba. It was made by Francis Acacio, in the 20s in honor of Santa Maria. The first building was destroyed by the flooding of rivers in 1926, then another church was erected on the same site. It is the first historical heritage of the city, officially recognized on April 5, 1993. The church is located in Piazza San Felix, in the central city;Palace Augusto DiasSeat of the Legislature was built in the 30s to serve the City and the Forum;Municipal Museum of MarabaThe Municipal Museum is installed at the Foundation House of Culture of Maraba and includes the following sectors: Division of Anthropology, Department of Botany, Department of Geology, Department of Archaeology and Department of Zoology. In addition to host school of Music, the municipal public archives, the Museum makes several studies on the region southeast of Par, rescuing and preserving local history. The museum has the support and guidance of the Goeldi Museum, in relation to the training of technicians and identification of the material through an agreement with the institution. The Municipal Museum of Maraba is one of Brazils most respected institutions in the framework of research, rescue, environmental and historical preservation. Sport de Marab Futebol Clube, the citys principal football club won the state championship in 2010 and reached the do Brasil semi-finals in 2009. In 2010, it placed 3nd on the National Championships Serie C.Statistics*Elevation: 84 m*Climate: Equatorial hot and dry*Average annual temperature: 32C*Latitude South 05 22 08*Longitude West: 49 07 04*Distances from major cities:*Belm: 485 km*Paulo: 2037 km*Braslia: 1.682 km*So Luiz: 799 km*de Janeiro: 2.818 km*Fortaleza: 2.225 km*Palmas:801 km*Imperatriz: 210 km*Araguaina: 280 kmExternal links*Official website*Marab Onlinede:Marabes:Marabfr:Marabhr:Marabbpy:it:Marab(gemeente)no:Marabpl:Marabpt:Marabro:Marabru:sv:Marabvo:Marabwar:Marab
1060557
Alpbach
Alpbach is a village in Western Austria in the state of Tyrol. Its geographical location is , at 975 m above sea level. Alpbach had a population of 2,549 in 2003.The earliest written record of the name Alpbach comes from 1150, although human settlement is known to have begun there before and around the year 1000, and a bronze axe found at Steinberger Joch (the pass leading to the Ziller Valley) in 1860 suggests that the route was already in use in the Hallstatt period. Christianity was first brought to the region in the 7th and 8th centuries by Irish and Scottish monks, and the saint of the parish church is in fact Oswald, a former King of Northumbria. At the beginning of the 15th century, deposits of copper and silver were discovered on the Gratlspitz and Schatzberg and in the Luegergraben. At the time, the Fugger merchant family from Augsburg had control over mining operations in Schwaz and Kitzbhel, and they extended their activities to include the Alpbach valley. The Bglerhof housed the Fugger offices and was also seat of the Mining Court. In those days, Alpbach already had two inns, the Bglerhof and the Jakober Inn, where the men of the village would go to drink spirits, such as schnapps. By the middle of the 19th century, productivity at the mines had declined to the stage where they had to be closed. Vorder-Unterberg Farm, which was built in 1636-1638 by local carpenters and was lived in until 1952, stands at the edge of the forest above the little church in Inneralpbach. Today the building is a mountain farming museum, and the exhibits include the old parlour, chapel, a combined kitchen and smokehouse, and over 800 artefacts of daily life and work.The road leading up the valley to Alpbach was not built until 1926, and the isolated location of the village led to the development of a distinctive style of architecture and furnishings, and also enabled the local folk traditions to be preserved for much longer than in most of the valleys of the Tyrol. Tourists first began arriving in Alpbach at the beginning of the 20th century, and by 1938 the village had accommodation for 110 visitors. In the mean time, the figure had increased to 2500 and Alpbach now attracts some 22000 visitors in summer and about the same in winter for an annual total of 300000 nights. Tourism is the main source of income for todays 2300 local residents, but there are still 105 working farms in Alpbach, the same number as a hundred years ago. Since 1945, Alpbach has been the venue for the  Alpbach European Forum, an annual two-week conference of leading figures from the worlds of science, business, the arts and politics. The Forum and the participation of so many people who have shaped the thinking of their times has given Alpbach the nickname, The Village Of Thinkers. The first conference hall in Alpbach was built in the mid-1950s and named after the Austrian poetess von Preradovic, who wrote the words for the Austrian anthem. The plenary hall was named after the physicist and Prize-winner Schrdinger. He lies buried in the Alpbach cemetery.thumb|Grave of Erwin Schrdinger In 1999, the new Alpbach Congress Centre was opened, together with the 55th European Forum. With its combination of exciting architecture and a minimum environmental footprint, the main architectural feature is a spiral shaped gallery with floor-to-ceiling glazing for a unique view of the spectacular mountain backdrop.At the suggestion of Alfons Moser, Mayor of Alpbach from 1945 to 1979, the Council issued a local planning law in 1953, which made the traditional style of architecture in Alpbach mandatory for all new buildings. Over the years, Alpbach has collected many awards and distinctions. In 1975, the Austrian Public Health Institute certified that Alpbach had the cleanest and purest air in all of Austria. It was voted Austrias Most Beautiful Village in 1983 by a television contest organised by Austrian Television. In June 1985, the Council of Europe in Strasbourg conferred upon Alpbach the right to fly the European flag in recognition of the communitys services to European Unity. In 1993, Alpbach won The Most Beautiful Floral Village in Europe award. Alpbach is also a well known ski resort and its quiet pistes are well groomed and provide beginner to intermediate runs with lots of off pistes as well as unpatrolled route 5 which is popular with the more advanced skiers.  A new lift has been opened in 2006-2007 which is a gondola and allows people to move from Inner-Alpbach to near the top of the wiedersbergerhorn (the mountain used for all of the runs).  Alpbach is also more popular with skiers than snowboarders due to the lack of extreme off piste, but is a very popular place for beginner boarders, or those looking to re-kindle their boarding passion.  There is also a halfpipe for the more adventurous.  There are two ski schools in the village, the first is the original  Ski and Snowboardschool at Alpbach-Inneralpbach run since 1932 by Sepp Margreiter (a State certified ski instructor and ski guide).  The second is the Alpbach Active Skischule, of which the HQ of the ski school run from Alpbach, the same as the original ski school.External links*www.slopeseeker.com - An independent guide to skiing in Alpbach*http://www.alpbach.at*Pictures of Alpbach*http://www.skischule-alpbach.at/en/willkommen.php*http://www.alpbach-aktiv.com/web/index.html*Others photos of Alpbach in Panoramio.comde:Alpbachfr:Alpbachit:Alpbachnl:Alpbachpl:Alpbachro:Alpbachru:sk:Alpbachsv:Alpbachvo:Alpbachwar:Alpbach
1063090
Richard_Flanagan
Richard Flanagan (born 1961) is a novelist from Tasmania, Australia.Early lifeFlanagan was born in Longford, Tasmania, in 1961, the fifth of six children. He is descended from Irish convicts transported to Land in the 1840s. His father is a survivor of the Burma Railway. One of his three brothers is Australian Rules football journalist Martin Flanagan. He grew up in the remote mining town of Rosebery on Tasmanias western coast.()()() Flanagan left school at the age of 16. He returned to study at the of Tasmania, where he was president of the Student Union. He achieved a first class honours degree in 1982. In the following year was awarded a Scholarship.  At Worcester College, Oxford, he was admitted to the degree of of Letters in History.Flanagan wrote four non-fiction works before moving to fiction, works he has called his apprenticeship.((()In the foreword to Flanagans first book, A Terrible Beauty - History of the Gordon River Country (1985), Brown wrote, DiemensAustralia has not heard the last of the Tasmanian wilderness nor, I happily predict, has it heard the last of Richard Flanagan.NovelsHis first novel, Death of a River Guide  (1997), is the tale of Aljaz Cosini, river guide, who lies drowning, reliving his life and the lives of his family and forebears. It was described by The Times Literary Supplement as one of the most auspicious debuts in Australian writing. His next book, The Sound of One Hand Clapping (1998), which tells the story of Slovenian immigrants, was a major bestseller, selling more than 150,000 copies in Australia alone. Flanagans first two novels, declared Kirkus Reviews, rank with the finest fiction out of Australia since the heyday of Patrick White. Goulds Book of Fish (2001), Flanagans third novel, is based on the life of Buelow Gould, a convict artist, and tells the tale of his love affair with a young black woman in 1828. It went on to win the 2002 Commonwealth Writers Prize. Flanagan has described these early novels as soul histories. Flanagans fourth novel was The Unknown Terrorist (2006), which The New York Times called stunning . . . a brilliant meditation upon the post-9/11 world.()  His fifth novel, Wanting (2008) tells two parallel stories: about the novelist Dickens in England, and Mathinna, an Aboriginal orphan adopted by Lady Jane Franklin, the wife of the colonial Lieutenant-Governor of Van Diemans Land (Tasmania).  As well as being a New Yorker Book of the Year and Observer Book of the Year, it won the Queensland Premiers Prize, the Western Australian Premiers Prize and the Tasmania Book Prize.His most recent book is a collection of non-fiction, What Do You Do, Mr Gable? (2011).OtherThe 1998 film of The Sound of One Hand Clapping, written and directed by Flanagan, was nominated for best film at that years Berlin Film Festival. Flanagan has written on literature, the environment and  politics for the Australian and international press. Some have proved controversial. The Selling-out of Tasmania, published after the death of former Premier Bacon in 2004, was critical of the Bacon governments relationship with corporate interests in the state. Premier Paul Lennon declared, Richard Flanagan and his fictions are not welcome in the new Tasmania.(http://www.abc.net.au/austory/specials/flanagan/default.htm)Flanagans 2007 essay, Gunns. Out of Control in Monthly,(Themonthly.com) first published as Paradise Razed in the London Telegraph,() is credited as catalysing Sydney businessman Geoffrey Cousins high profile campaign against the Gunns two billion dollar Bay Pulp Mill.(SMH.com.au)He has worked with Baz Luhrmann as a writer on the 2008 film Australia. A painting of Richard Flanagan by artist Dyer won the 2003 Prize.(http://www.artgallery.nsw.gov.au/media/archives_2003/archibald_prize_winner) Also a rapid on the Franklin River, Flanagans Surprise, is named after him.(Peter Griffiths and Bruce Baxter,(2010)  The Ever-Varying Flood. A History and Guide to the Franklin River. (2nd ed. Preston, Vic. ISBN 0958664714  p.57)WorksNon-Fiction* (1985) A terrible beauty: history of the Gordon River country()* (1990) The Rest of the world is watching - Tasmania and the Greens()* (1991) Codename Iago: the story of John Friedrich()()* (1991) Parish-Fed Bastards. A History of the Politics of the Unemployed in Britain, 1884-1939(http://catalogue.nla.gov.au/Record/239723?lookforparishes&offset28965&max29413)* (2011) And What Do You Do, Mr Gable?Films* (1998) The Sound of One hand Clapping (Director and scriptwriter)* (2008) Australia (Co-writer)Novels* of a River Guide (1994)* Sound of One Hand Clapping (1997)* Goulds Book of Fish: A Novel in Twelve Fish (2001)()(Review of Goulds Book of Fish)* Unknown Terrorist (2006)(The Unknown Terrorist official site)* Wanting (2008)(ABC.net.au Transcript of interview with Koval on Book Show, Radio National on his novel Wanting, 12/11/2008)(Themonthly.com, Video: Interview with Richard Flanagan about Wanting and Baz Luhrmanns Australia)(Official Australian Wanting book website)()NotesExternal links*http://www.ca-cranston.com/Flanagan%20.pdf Representation of Region and Nation in Literary Culture Studies Conference, University of Madras, 2009. Transcript of Plenary session The (Hydro)power Relations within Nation and Region, and the (de)formation of Identity in the case of Richard Flanagan by Dr. CA. Cranston. Discusses the relationship of Flanagans novels, films, to Island politics.*ABC.net.au Transcript of interview with Koval on Book Show, Radio National from Byron Bay Writers Festival, July 2007*Paradise Razed, published in The Telegraph**ABC.net.auFlanaganFlanaganja:FlanaganFlanagan
1068102
Prior-appropriation_water_rights
Prior appropriation rights, sometimes known as the Colorado Doctrine in reference to the U.S. Supreme Court case v. Colorado, is a system of allocating rights from a water source that is markedly different from water rights.  law in the western States generally follows the appropriation doctrine which developed due to the scarcity of water in that area.Origin of the doctrineThe appropriation doctrine originated in Colorado in 1872 when the territorial court ruled in Yunker v. Nichols, 1 Colo. 552 (1872), that a non-riparian user who had previously applied part of the water from a stream to beneficial use had superior rights to the water with respect to a riparian owner who claimed a right to use of all the water at a later time. The question was not squarely presented again to the Colorado Court until 1882 when in the landmark case, Coffin v. Left Hand Ditch Co., 6 Colo. 443 (1982}, the court explicitly adopted the appropriation doctrine and rejected the riparian doctrine, citing Colorado irrigation and mining practices and the nature of the climate. The decision in Coffin ruled that prior to adoption of the appropriation doctrine in the Colorado Constitution of 1876 that the riparian doctrine had never been the law in Colorado.()() Within 20 years the appropriation doctrine, the so-called Colorado Doctrine, had been adopted, in whole or part, by most of the states in the Western United States that had an arid climate.()OverviewThe legal details vary from state to state; however, the general principle is that water rights are unconnected to land ownership, and can be sold or mortgaged like other property. The first person to use a quantity of water from a water source for a use has the right to continue to use that quantity of water for that purpose.  Subsequent users can use the remaining water for their own beneficial purposes provided that they do not impinge on the rights of previous users.Beneficial use is commonly defined as agricultural, industrial or household use. Ecological purposes, such as maintaining a natural body of water and the wildlife that depends on it, were not initially deemed as beneficial uses in some Western states but have been accepted in some jurisdictions.  The extent to which private parties may own such rights varies among the states.()Each water right has a yearly quantity and an appropriation date. Each year, the user with the earliest appropriation date (known as the senior appropriator) may use up to their full allocation (provided the water source can supply it). Then the user with the next earliest appropriation date may use their full allocation and so on. In times of drought, users with junior appropriation dates might not receive their full allocation or even any water at all.  It is possible for a senior appropriator to change his right without losing his priority date.  However, any change is conditional on protecting Junior appropriators water rights.  Those junior appropriators are entitled to a Preservation of Conditions that were present when the junior appropriator was granted his water right. Farmers High Line v. City of Golden (CO 1954).When a water right is sold, it retains its original appropriation date. Only the amount of water historically consumed can be transferred if a water right is sold. For example, if alfalfa is grown, using irrigation, the amount of the flow may not be transferred, only the amount that would be necessary to irrigate the amount of alfalfa historically grown. If a water right is not used for a beneficial purpose for a period of time it may lapse under the doctrine of abandonment. Abandonment of a water right is rare, but occurred in Colorado in a case involving the South Fork of San Isabel Creek in County, Colorado(San Luis Val. Land & Cattle Co. v. Hazard, 114 Colo. 233 (1945).).For water sources with many users, a government or quasi-government agency is usually charged with overseeing allocations. Allocations involving water sources that cross state borders or international borders can be quite contentious, and are generally governed by federal court rulings, interstate agreements and international  treaties.Even though water markets are increasingly gaining ground, many have criticized the prior appropriation system for failing to adequately adjust to societys evolving values.  For example, the vast majority of water in the West still is allocated to agricultural uses despite the cries for additional water from growing cities.  Similarly, environmentalists and those who use rivers for recreational and/or scenic purposes have demanded that more water be left in rivers in streams.  The prior appropriation system has in many ways inhibited these calls for change.(Brigham Daniels, Emerging Commons Tragic Institutions | Environmental Law | Vol. 37 (2007), pp. 515-571)Prior Appropriation Theory applied to other goodsWater is not the only public good that has been subject to prior appropriation.  The same first in time, first in right theory has been used in the United States to encourage and give a legal framework for other commercial activities.The early prospectors and miners in the Gold Rush of 1849, and later gold and silver rushes in the western United States, applied appropriation theory to mineral deposits.  The first one to discover and begin mining a deposit was acknowledged to have a legal right to mine.  Because appropriation theory in mineral lands and water rights developed in the same time and place, it is likely that they influenced one another. This was seen in the California case Irwin v. Phillips, 5 Cal. 140 (1855) which decided a water rights dispute between two non-riparian miners on the basis of first in time, first in right, a maxim drawn from equity.() As with water rights, mining rights could be forfeited by nonuse.  The miners codes were later legalized by the federal government in 1866, and then in the Law of 1872.The Act of 1862 granted legal title to the first farmer to put public land into agricultural production.  This first in time right to agricultural land may have been influenced by appropriation theory applied to mineral lands.In recent years, there has been some discussion of limiting air pollution by granting rights to existing pollution sources.  Then it has been argued, a free and trade market could develop in pollution rights.  This would be prior appropriation theory applied to air pollution.  Recent concern over dioxide and warming has led to an economic market in CO2 emissions, in which some companies wish to balance emissions increases by offsetting decreases in existing emissions sources.  This is essentially acknowledging a prior appropriation right to existing CO2 emittors. See also *rights*and Rights of Way Act 2000 (in the UK)*land (see Logging and mineral rights under Canada)*Easement (the right of use over the real property of another)*rights*of public access to the wilderness*water rights*States groundwater lawReferencesExternal links*Western States Water Laws BLM site.
1070670
National_University_of_San_Marcos
San Marcos National University logoThe National University of San Marcos (, UNMSM) is the most important and respected higher-education institution in Peru.(UNMSM recibe acreditacin internacional. Peru21. Accessed April 26, 2011. )(San Marcos, luz de la inteligencia del Per y Amrica. San Marcos al da. Accessed April 26, 2011. )  Its main campus, the University City, is located in Lima. It was chartered on May 12, 1551 by a decree signed by V, Holy Roman Emperor, which makes it the oldest officially established university in the Americas and, as such, one of the oldest universities in the world.(Foundation of the University of Lima. San Marcos National University. Accessed August 22, 2009. ) Academically, the University of San Marcos ranks first in Peru.()()()()()San Marcos has 60 academic-professional schools,(http://www.unmsm.edu.pe/sanmarcosaldia/semanarios/165.pdf) organized into 20 faculties, and these, in turn, into 6 academic areas. All the faculties offer undergraduate and graduate degrees. The student body consists of over 30,000 undergraduate and 4,000 graduate students from all the country as well as some international students. The university has also a number of public institutions under its government such as the Marcos Cultural Center and the of Natural History of Lima.San Marcos prestige in Latin America mainly arises from its renowned faculty and alumni. It is the only university in Peru with a Prize laureate among its alumni: Vargas Llosa (Literature). San Marcos is also recognized for the quality of its curricular contents, its very competitive admission process, as well as for being a leading center of scientific research.(Ranking and research supported by: UNESCO and Asamblea Nacional de Rectores, 2007) Several Peruvian and Latin American influential thinkers, researchers, scientists, politicians and writers have studied there, which underscores San Marcos leading role as an educational institution in the history of Peru and the world.HistoryThe origins of San Marcos National University marks the start of higher education in Peru, which dates back to the General Studies carried out at the chambers of the Dominican Orders Convent of Our Lady of the Rosary, near the Plaza de Armas circa 1549. Its main objective was to meet the training and education needs of the clergy in the newly conquered territory of the Spanish Empire. Subsequently, the Limas town council sent to Spain friar Tomas of San Martin and Captain Juan Jeronimo de Aliaga, who - due largely to the efforts of the former  obtained the order for the foundation of the university from Emperor Carlos I of Spain and V of the Holy Roman Empire and his mother, Queen Joanna of Castile, daughter of the Catholic Monarchs. Therefore, by Royal Decree issued on May 12 of 1551 in Valladolid, the Royal University of the City of Kings was officially founded. At the time, it was also called Real y Pontificia Universidad de Lima.9 10 Reading the royal decree, formally authorizing the operation of the Universidad de Lima, its mission is stated as indoctrinate residents of these lands in the Christian faith and submission to the King. With this principle, the university officially began operations on January 2, 1553, in the Chapter House of the Convent of Our Lady of the Rosary of the Dominican Order under the leadership of its first chancellor friar Juan Bautista of la Roca. The initial instruction was delivered by Andres Carrillo and  Cosme Cianca and Corona, both under the supervision of the chancellor.The fact that it was essentially strictly oriented towards monastic life added to the elitism and conservatism of the Dominicans, as well as the continued decline of members of other congregations, caused the loss of the Dominicans predominance and also generated a reaction on the part of the secular teachers. The demand for greater openness led to ask The Royal Audiencia compliance with the Royal Decree of Graces of 1570, which granted the free election of the chancellor by the teachers of the schools senate. The Viceroy Francisco de Toledo, resolved the complaint with the election of Dr. Pedro Fernandez Valenzuela on May 11, 1571, the first secular chancellor and a significant departure from the previous religiously oriented leadership. The legitimacy of the elections was confirmed by Papal bull Exponi Nobis by Saint Pius V on July 25, 1571, after receiving the exequatur from the Council of the Indies. On the bull, ecclesiastic courts were excluded by declaring it absolves friars, lecturers, teachers, students and any of you of all and any censure, sentence and ecclesiastic penalty, for any contracted reason or cause. At the same time, the university becomes pontifical, changing its name to Royal and Pontifical University of Lima the City of Kings. After this reform, the university moved to its second location outside the walls of San Marcelo, where the Convent of the Agustinians had functioned. 9 On September 6, 1574 the official name of the university is chosen by drawing lots. Saint Mark the evangelist is taken as saint patron and the name is changed to Royal and Pontifical University of Saint Mark. 10 In 1575 the university is once more relocated. This time its moved to the former Plaza del Estanque, later called Plaza de la Inquisicion, where the Congress of Peru is currently located 2. Here, it will continue functioning throughout the rest of the Viceroyalty period of Peruvian history.The University of Lima, now officially named University of San Marcos, began its work in the colonial era to the powers of Theology and ArtsThen the fees would be created Laws and MedicineNevertheless academically when the standards governing in Spain, or start their teaching duties Philosophy as the basis for any college. The November 27 of 1579 teachers asked the king Philip II the institution of courts that ruled on the University of Salamanca, A legal medieval-history of the current university autonomy, which empowered the president to the exclusion of ordinary courts, have civil and criminal jurisdiction over members of the faculty. In 1581, Then the absolute presence of lay rectors between 1571 and 1581, Viceroy Francisco de Toledo authorized clergy and laity to be elected, and both sectors alternately ruled the University of San Marcos, during the colonial period until 1820.11Support for the secularization of the University of San Marcos as the viceroy Francisco de Toledo and the institution of courts exercising its rector, and also exercised the rector of San Carlos Real ConvictorioFounded the July 7 of 1770Were the decisive factors that led to the university community, students and teachers, towards achieving the ideal Bolognese who viewed the university as a space of freedom. Thus began the birth of the intellectual climate that made possible the questioning and criticism of the colonial system. Thus, both the University of San Marcos as the College of Law and Literature of San CarlosAndMedical College of San Fernando(Incorporated into it later) began to be monitored closely by the Viceroy, By virtue of holding teachers and students suspected of and manage envisions the end of colonial rule and the emergence of what is now the Republic of Peru.12 Presumably were the privileges enjoyed by both the university and the Convictorio, allowing the entry of the thought of enlightenment in their cloisters, and arise in the theoretical and doctrinal approaches to the ideological emancipation. In 1813During the administration of Viceroy Jos Fernando de AbascalWas established Faculty of Medicine San Fernando (a tribute to King Ferdinand VII of Spain) In the Plaza de Santa Ana now in the Plaza Italia-space occupied by the Ministry of Government, the power base was formed in the College of Medicine of the same name.The First Constitutional Congress of Peru, Which he defined as reality and as a project to the new Republic of PeruWas chaired initially by whom was rector University of San Marcos, Don Toribio Rodrguez de Mendoza; Of the 64 constituent members, were 54 and the San Marcos CarolineAnd the place where he met this great assembly was the Chapel of the University of San Marcos.10 Today, the Congress of the Republic of Peru still operating at that same location and the current Casona de San MarcosWas the local San Carlos Real Convictorio. In 1840 Schools San Carlos and San Fernando, are assumed by the University of San Marcos. During the administration of Marshal Ramn Castilla, San Marcos was officially empowered to approve new universities and newly created control.12 Along the nineteenth century the location of the University of San Marcos was stripped of his university functions, being more frequent use of the sessions Chamber of Deputies and the core activities of Congress of the Republic of Peru. However, the lack of care and the partial abandonment of its functions had their original academic atmosphere began to suffer a significant deterioration since the old local university received little attention on the eve of the installation of Congress or special events.10The exponential growth of the city during the industrial revolution of nineteenth century addition to the efforts of then President of Peru Manuel Pardo to improve architecture and urban planning City during 1870 forced the university to move to a new campus adjacent to the old monastery Jesuit where he lived the San Carlos Real Convictorio (now this is called La Casona del Parque Universitario or simply La Casona de San Marcos). In those years, San Marcos became the Alma MaterFrom other universities Peru and America; It was formed to protect the core scientific and cultural institutions during the Viceroyalty and the same during the Republic; Their graduates, so students were part of missions established universities Hispano.In 1878During the administration of Manuel Pardo, Was issued the General Rules of Public Instruction, universities instituting the concept of major and minor, corresponding to the first title in San Marcos and universities in Arequipa and Cusco the second. During the Pacific War and specifically during the occupation of Lima by troops Chilean, Are taken from the university of art objects and cultural property, to be brought to Chile by boat.10 After the war and coping outcomes, by law 1901 states that the Peruvian college corresponds to the Universidad Nacional Mayor de San Marcos and Under Trujillo, Cusco, Arequipa to which later joined the Catholic and Technical Schools.12At the end of the decade 1960, At the request of an even larger space, some faculties of the university began to move to an area now called Ciudad Universitaria. This new campus is close to the Maranga Culture huacas the same as the university took great pains to restore and protect, having been partially destroyed during construction of the Avenida Venezuela in the 1940s.San Fernando: Although this power belongs to the Department of Health Sciences is also considered as the second campus of the University of San Marcos. It was originally located in the Square PondThen thanks to the efforts of Dr. Hipolito Unanue had its own premises in the old Plaza de Santa Ana (now the Plaza Italia) until its facilities were moved to late nineties of the nineteenth century to the local Avenida GrauIn the Historic Center of Lima.From the legal standpoint regarding ownership, UNMSM first belonged to the royal state, and since 1821 the young Peruvian republic received as an inheritance. The current status of the university was issued on 22 September 1984.On the importance of the University of San Marcos in the historic fabric of Peru and America, the Liberator Simn Bolvar, Said the day he received the degree of Doctor Honoris Causa (Ino Truque jure):Oldest University of the AmericasAs mentioned above, San Marcos was officially established by a royal decree (signed by V, Holy Roman Emperor) on May 12, 1551, and since then it has operated without interruption. Hence, it is known as the Dean of America (dean in the sense of oldest member). San Marcos also claims that according to the General de Indias, a famous Spanish repository of documents on the former colonies in the sixteenth to eighteenth centuries, there were no official records authorizing any other university or higher-education institution before 1551. http://sisbib.unmsm.edu.pe/bibvirtual/libros/historia/San_marcos/Fund_Uni_Sto_Domin.htm The Autonomous University of Mexico (UNAM) was chartered the same year as San Marcos (by a royal decree of September 21, 1551), as the Royal University of the New Spain, which makes it the second oldest in the Americas (but was closed from 18671910).On the other hand, the Autonomous University of Santo Domingo was founded in 1538, but was not officially recognized by Decree until 1558, and, as many other universities in the Americas that closed during independence wars and other political conflicts, it was closed due to the occupations of the Republic by Haiti and then the United States.Therefore, it is unquestionable that San Marcos is the oldest university to be officially established in the Americas.OrganisationGovernmentThe university was originally headed by members of the clergy. During the Enlightenment, Bourbon reforms transformed it into a secular institution. Nowadays, the university is governed by:*The University Council*The University Assembly (composed of professors and students, with the latter holding a third of the seats).*The Rector (president)*Two Vice-Rectors:**Academic Vice-Rector**Vice-Rector of investigation.Academic areas and facultiesThe original faculties at San Marcos were Theology, Arts and Law; Jurisprudence, and Medicine were added later in the colonial period. The Faculty of Sciences and the Faculty of Economics and Commerce were created in the mid-19th century. The Faculty of Science was subdivided by specialities in the 20th century. The Faculty of Theology was closed in 1935.In the mid-1990s San Marcos departments were grouped into four academic blocks. Nowadays, San Marcos falculties are grouped into 6 academic areas, as shown below.Health sciencesAcademic area I: sciences#Faculty of Human Medicine:#*Human Medicine#*Midwifery#*Nursing#*Technology#**laboratory & Pathology (merged)#**therapy & Rehabilitation programme (merged)#**Radiology#**therapy#*Nutrition#Faculty of Pharmacy and Biochemistry:#*Pharmacy & Biochemistry (merged)#*science#*Toxicology#Faculty of Dentistry:#*Dentistry#Faculty of Veterinarian Medicine:#*Veterinarian Medicine#Faculty of Psychology:#*PsychologyHumanitiesAcademic area II: Humanities#Faculty of Letters and Human sciences:#*Literature#*Philosophy#*Linguistics#*Communication#*Art#*and Information Science#*Restoration & Conservation (merged)#*Dance#Faculty of Education:#*Kindergarten teaching#*School teaching#*School teaching#*EducationSocial sciencesAcademic area III: sciences#Faculty of Law and Political science:#*Law#*science#Faculty of Social sciences:#*History#*Sociology#*Anthropology#*Archaeology#*Work#*GeographyBasic sciencesAcademic area IV: sciences#Faculty of Chemistry and Chemical engineering:#*Chemistry#Faculty of Biological sciences:#*Biology#*Genetics & Biotechnology (merged)#*Microbiology & Parasitology (merged)#Faculty of Physical sciences:#*Physics#Faculty of Mathematical sciences:#*Mathematics#*Statistics#*Computing#*ResearchEngineeringAcademic Block V: Engineering#Faculty of Chemistry and Chemical engineering:#*engineering#*engineering#Faculty of Physical Sciences:#*Fluid Mechanics engineering#Faculty of Geology, Mining, Metallurgy and Geography engineering:#*engineering (Geology and Engineering merged)#*Geography engineering#*engineering#*Metallurgy engineering#*engineering#Faculty of Industrial engineering:#*engineering#*manufacturing#Faculty of Electronics and Electrical engineering:#*engineering#*engineering#*engineering#Faculty of Systems engineering:#*engineering#*engineeringBusiness sciencesAcademic Block VI: sciences#Faculty of Administrative sciences:#*Administration#*Tourism#*International Trade#Faculty of Accountancy Sciences:#*Accounting#*audit & Public audit (merged)#*Tributary administration#Faculty of Economic sciences:#*EconomicsNotable alumni and academicsFile:Saintmark-alumni2.JPG|thumb|Class of Jurisprudence and Law of 1896 posing in front of departments fountain.*Antnez de Mayolo, engineer and scientist.*Mara Arguedas, novelist and anthropologist.*Basadre, historian.*Bedoya Reyes, attorney, congressman, Mayor of Lima and founder of the Peoples Party*Bryce Echenique, novelist.*Bustamante, biophysicist.*Alcides Carrin, medical student and pioneer in medical research.*Manuel Chavez, heart surgeon.*Santos Chocano, poet.*Cornejo-Polar, literary critic.*Ral Haya de la Torre, revolutionary thinker, founder of the Popular Revolutionary Alliance (APRA)*Heredia, physician.*Jorge Sanchez, surgeon and physician.*Macera, historian.*Mir Quesada Cantuarias, philosopher and logician.*OHiggins, military officer and first President of Chile.*Paniagua Corazao, former of Peru.*Pesce, physician and leprosy specialist.*Pulgar Vidal, geographer.*Salazar Bondy, philosopher.*Alberto Snchez, writer and statesman.*Scorza, novelist.*C. Tello, archaeologist.*Valdelomar, poet and short-story writer.*Vargas Llosa, novelist,  Prize in Literature (2010).*H. Urteaga, historian.*Villarreal, scientist and mathematician.GalleryFile:Universidad mayor de san marcos.jpg|Casona of San Marcos, used as the Cultural center File:Unmsm sedecentralrectorado jorgebasadre.JPG|Jorge Basadre building, used for administrative functionsFile:UNMSM P1000084.jpg|Main libraryFile:UNMSM Cenprolid.jpg|San Marcos University PressFile:UNMSM Coliseo Deportivo y Gimnasio.jpg|San Marcos University GymFile:Estadio UNMSM 1.jpg|San Marcos University StadiumFile:MetLimaWik.JPG|Metallica concert at University of San MarcosFile:Unmsm monumentofraytomasdesanmartin.JPG|Monument of Fray Tomas de San MartnFile:UNMSM auditorio bibliotecacentral.jpg|Main auditoriumFile:Unmsm clinicauniversitaria1.JPG|San Marcos University ClinicFile:UNMSM Instituto de Medicina Tropical.jpg|Institute Tropical MedicineFile:UNMSM museo historianatural.jpg|Museum of Natural History See also * of colonial universities in Latin AmericaReferencesNotesExternal links* Universidad Nacional Mayor de San Marcos website* Faculty of Medicine website  Markus Jacha Yati Uta  Nacional Major de San MarcosNacional Mayor de San MarcosNacional Mayor de San MarcosNacional Mayor de San MarcosNacional Mayor de San Marcosnationale majeure de San Marcos Nasional San MarcosNacional Mayor de San Marcos Nationalis Maior Sancti Marcipagrindinis v. Morkaus universitetasNacional Mayor de San MarcosSan Marcosja:Nacional Mayor de San Marcoswitego MarkaNacional Maior de So MarcosLlaqtap San Markus Hatun Yachay Sunturnin-University of San MarcosNacional Mayor de San MarcosNacional Mayor de San Marcos -zh:
1072712
Galarrwuy_Yunupingu
 footnotes                  Galarrwuy Yunupingu AM (born 30 June 1948) is a leader in the Australian Indigenous community, and has been involved in the fight for Land Rights throughout his career. He was named the 1978 of the Year(), jointly with Alan Bond.Early life and educationHe was born at Melville Bay near Yirrkala on 30 June 1948, and is a member of the Gumatj clan of the Yolngu people.()He attended the Mission School at Yirrkala in his formative years, and moved to Brisbane to study at the Methodist Bible College for two years, returning to Gove in 1967.(Land rightsIn the early 1960s, with his father, Gumatj clan leader Mungurrawuy, he entered the struggle for Land Rights, and helped draw up the Bark Petition at Yirrkala. He came to national attention in the late 1960s for his role in the landmark, but unsuccessful Land Rights Case. This legal action was the first by Indigenous Australians to challenge mining companies rights to exploit traditional lands. He became a prominent leader and strong voice on behalf of Aboriginal people in the Territory and Australia, gaining respect and admiration from many. In 1969 he was elected to the Yirrkala town council. In 1975 he joined the Land Council (NLC), the authority appointed under the Aboriginal Land Rights (NT) Act 1976 to represent traditional Aboriginal landowners and Aboriginal people. He was chairman of the NLC from 1977-1980, an executive member until 1983 when he was re-elected as chairman. He has led a number of negotiations with mining and government bodies.(As chair of the NLC, he led the Gagudju people in negotiations with mining and government bodies. Not opposed to mining in principle, Yunupingu sees it as a way for Aboriginal people to escape the trap if it is conducted on the traditional owners terms. These include a fair distribution of the economic benefits and respect for the land and specific sacred sites. He said: We will continue to fight for the right to make our own decisions about our own land.HonoursIn 1978 he was named of the Year for his negotiations on the Ranger uranium mine agreement.() He said the award would help him to shake off the image of ratbag and radical and would give him greater strength as an individual and as a leader. It was also a recognition for Aboriginal people as the indigenous people of this country who must share in its future.In 1985, he was made a Member of the of Australia (AM) for his services to the Aboriginal community.  Galarrwuy Yunupingu is one of 100 Australian Living National Treasures selected by the Trust of Australia as leaders in society considered to have a great influence over our environment because of the standards and examples they set. Return to public lifeHe has kept a low profile since the 1980s. In 2007 he spoke up in support of the Howard governments intervention. In 2009 he spoke out against the inability of the government to provide adequate housing.()()He lives near Yirrkala and is a senior ceremonial leader. He continues to hold numerous positions on committees and organisations where he can share his wide experience with other Australians and promote the aspirations of his people.()In January 2010 he spent time in hospital after collapsing in a bank in Nhulunbuy.()ReferencesSee also
1074737
Natural_resource_extraction
The related terms natural resource extraction (or simply resource extraction) both refer to the practice of locating, acquiring and selling resources.In recent times, environmental pressure groups have attempted to reduce the ecological impact of resource extraction, and there have been many successful redevelopment schemes such as reforestation of logging sites, and the large-scale successful conversion of British gravel pits into nature reserves.See also* Logging* Mining* production* disposal* Use MovementReferences
1078359
Pharmacophore
thumb|right|300px|An example of a pharmacophore model.A pharmacophore is an abstract description of molecular features which are necessary for recognition of a ligand by a biological macromolecule.The IUPAC defines a pharmacophore to be an ensemble of steric and electronic features that is necessary to ensure the optimal supramolecular interactions with a specific biological target and to trigger (or block) its biological response.()  In simple English, a pharmacophore is the portion of a ligand molecule which binds to the receptor site. The pharmacophore of a ligand may be localised in a particular area of the ligand molecule or it may be spread across different areas of the ligand molecule. An example of this is the neuromuscular blocking agent, tubocurarine. The quaternary nitrogens present in the tubocurarine molecule are believed to make up its pharmacophore. thumb|center|300px|TubocurarineAs can be seen, the quaternary nitrogens are not localised to a particular area of the molecule, but are rather dispersed across molecule. Historically, pharmacophores were established by Kier, who first mentions the concept in 1967.()and uses the term in a publication in 1971.()The development of the concept is often erroneously accredited to Ehrlich. However neither the alleged source() nor any of his other works mention the term pharmacophore or make use of the concept.()In modern chemistry, pharmacophores are used to define the essential features of one or more molecules with the same activity.  A database of diverse compounds can then be searched for more molecules which share the same features located a similar distance apart from each other. Typical pharmacophore features are for where a molecule is hydrophobic, aromatic, a bond acceptor, a bond donor, a cation, or an anion.  The features need to match different chemical groups with similar properties, in order to identify novel ligands.  Ligands receptor interactions are typically polar positive, polar negative or hydrophobic. A well-defined pharmacophore model includes both hydrophobic volumes and hydrogen bond vectors. See also*Cheminformatics*mining*company*QSAR*silicoReferencesFurther reading*  *  External linksThe following computer software packages enable the user to model the pharmacophore using a variety of computational chemistry methods:* Discovery Studio* LigandScout* Phase* MOE* ICM-Chemist* ZINCPharmerar:ca:Farmacforde:Pharmakophores:Farmacforofr:Pharmacophoreit:Farmacoforoja:ru:sr:Farmakoforsl:Farmakoforzh:
1080251
ukurova_University
website            www.cu.edu.trukurova University () has eleven faculties, three colleges, seven vocational colleges, three institutes and twenty six research and application centers. The university campus is located 10 kilometers away from Adana city center, by the Seyhan Dam Lake.The university, with its 1903 teaching staff, offers courses to over 40,000 undergraduate, post graduate and doctorate students.()The library has internet access and houses national and international publications. Computer rooms are available for student use campus-wide. These computer rooms are also used for computer-assisted education and scientific research. The university also offers its students recreational facilities including an indoor sports center and swimming pool, a boathouse and sports grounds. Students can make the best of their leisure time in any of the 29 student clubs.The students of the university have the opportunity to do practical training abroad through AIESEC and similar organizations.  Transportation to the Balcal Campus is offered by private bus services. History The Faculty of Agriculture, founded in 1969 by University, and the Faculty of Medicine, founded in 1972 by Atatrk University, were combined to form ukurova University in 1973.() The number of the faculties rose to five when the faculties of Basic Sciences, Administrative Sciences and Engineering were founded.In 1982, the Faculty of Basic Sciences was reorganized as the Faculty of Sciences and Letters, and the Faculty of Administrative Sciences was combined with the Department of Economics and Administrative Sciences forming the Faculty of Administrative Sciences and Economics. The Faculty of Engineering and Architecture emerged from the combination of the Faculty of Engineering and the Engineering Department of the Adana Academy of Administrative and Commercial Sciences. Also, the Faculty of Education was established when the two-year Foreign Language Colleges of the Ministry of  Education in Adana, Mersin and Hatay were combined. By 1992, the university helped to lay the foundation of three new universities in Turkey.  Two colleges, complete with modern buildings, laboratories and educational equipment were turned over to Mersin University, and three colleges were turned over to Hatay Mustafa Kemal University, and the Research and Application Center in Kahramanmara was taken over by Sutcu Imam University.The number of faculties rose to 10 when the faculties of Fisheries, Theology, Dentistry and Fine Arts were established.Adana Vocational College of Health and Kozan Vocational College were opened to education. With the addition of three post-graduate institutions and the State Conservatory of ukurova University, the number of academic bodies increased to 21. The Karatas College of Tourism and Hotel Management was set up in 1994, the Karaisali Vocational College was set up in 1995 and the Vocational College of Kadirli offering two educational programs: Computer Programming and Industrial Electronics was founded in 1997. The Department of Physical Education was reorganized as the College of Physical Education and Sports, and in 1996, the Vocational College of Health Services was reorganized as the College of Health Sciences. The Balcal campus The ukurova Universitys Balcali campus which is on the eastern side of Seyhan Lake occupies an area of 20 km. The name Balcali originates from the name of the village that stood on the present campus before the university was built.()The campus houses administrative and educational buildings with labs available for research services in  various branches of a hospital complex, a central library, a central cafeteria, sports facilities, teacher residences, social facilities and dormitories which accommodate a total of 3500 students.Public transport vehicles commute between the city center and the campus.Faculties and departmentsEducation The language of instruction in almost all the programs of the university is Turkish. However, the language of instruction in the Electric-Electronics and Mechanical Engineering Departments of the Faculty of Engineering and Architecture is English.()Students receive compulsory English preparatory classes in all the programs of the Faculty of Economics and Administrative Sciences.English preparatory classes are optional for the students registered in the Mathematics, Chemistry and Physics Departments of the Faculty of Science and Letters and for the students of Civil Engineering, Geology, Architecture, Industry and Textile Departments of the Faculty of Engineering and Architecture.Foreign language preparatory classes are conducted in the English, French and German Language Teaching Departments of the Faculty of Education.The university consists of 10 faculties (with 80 undergraduate programs), three graduate schools (with 64 post-graduate programs), three colleges (with four undergraduate programs), seven vocational colleges (with 23 vocational programs) and YADIM (Foreign Languages Research and Application Center where  both undergraduate and post-graduate students are taught English), and a state conservatory.Evening classesEvening classes are available in the Department of Teacher Training of the Faculty of Education; in the Departments of Economics and Business in the Faculty of Economics and Administrative Sciences; in the Departments of Biology, Physics, Chemistry, Mathematics and Turkish Language and Literature in the Faculty of Science and Letters; in the Departments of Civil- Mechanical- Geological- Industrial- and Mining Engineering in the Faculty of Engineering and Architecture; in the Faculty of Fisheries; and in all Departments of Ceyhan and Osmaniye Vocational Colleges.Student societiesThere are numerous student societies active in Cukurova University. The most important and active societies are:* Cukurova University Equestrian Sports Club UASK: Founded in the year 2000, CUASK offers university students and staff alike an opportunity to start lessons in horse-riding. The club currently has 4 Thoroughbred stallions that are used for schooling. Once students gain experience, they are free to go on trail rides anywhere within the campus boundaries. Instructors in the club are students themselves, who volunteer in giving lessons, taking care of the horses/stables and in managing the club.Academic staffThe university employs 1903 academic staff (24 from abroad) of which 330 are professors, 141 associate professors, 299 assistant professors, 152 instructors, 723 research assistants, 76 specialists, 157 lecturer.Related EU universitiesAustria# Fachhochschule BFI# Klagenfurt University# Paris-London Universitaet Salzburg# VORARLBERGER LANDESKONSERVATORIUMBelgium# Free University Brussels# Ghent University# Hasselt University# Hogeschool Antwerpen# Hogeschool Sint-Lukas Brussel# Libre De Bruxelles University# Provinciale Hogeschool LimburgCyprus# Cyrups UniversityCzech Republic# Czech University Of Agriculture# Liberec Technical University# Masaryk University# Univerzita Jana Evangelisty Purkyne v Usti Nad Labem# Zapadoceska UniversityDenmark# Aarhus University# Dortmunt University# West Jutland University CollegeEstonia# Tallinn UniversityFinland# Flensburg University# Helsinki University# Oulu University# Svenska Yrkeshgskolan/ Up musik# Swedish Polytechnic# Tampere Polytechnic# Tampere UniversityFrance# Franche-Comt# Franois Rabelais# Paris-Sorbonne University (Paris 4)# Universite de Corse-Pascal PaoliGermany# Anhalt University of Applied Sciences# Augsburg University# Bonn University# Dresden Technical University# Duisburg Essen University# European Academy Berlin# Flensburg Universitat# Free University Berlin# Friedrich Alexander University# Hannover University# Heidelberg University# Hohenheim University# Humboldt University# Johannes Gutenberg University# Ludwigshafen University of Applied Sciences# Mnster University# Oldenburg university# Osnabrck University# Ruhr University Bochum# Siegen University# Technical University Darmstadt# Technische Universitat Bergakademie Freiberg# Technische Universitat Berlin# ULM University# Weingarten Padagogische HogeschuleGreece# Aristotle University of Thessaloniki# Crete University# H.R.T.E.I Ionian University# Mediterranean Agronomic Institute of Chania# T.E.I Ionian Islands# Technological Educational Institute of Epirus# Technological Educational Institute of EpirusHungary# Corvinus University of Budapest# Debrecen University# Kodalanyi Janos University Collage# Pecs University# Semmelweiss UniversityItaly# Bologna University# Degli Studi Di Napoli# Padova University# Palermo University# Roma Tre Universita# Sassari University# Universita degli Studi di Modena e Reggio Emmilia# Universita Degli Studi Di Trento# Universita Di Catania# Universita di LAquila# University of PisaLetonia# Daugavpils UniversitateLithuania# Klapedia University# Tarprautine aukstoji vadybos mokykiaNorway# NORGES TEKNISK-NATURVITENSKAPELIGE UNIVERSITET# Tromso UniversityPoland# Adam Mickiewicz University# Agriculture University in Szczecn# Akademia Pedagogiczna W Krakowie# Akademia Rolnicza w Lubline# Akademia Techniczno - Rolnicza# Mikolaja Kopernika Toruniu# Ryzsard Lazarski# Szczecin Agriculture University# Szkola Glowna Gospodarstwa Wiejskiego# Warsaw Agricultural University# Warsaw UniversityPortugal# Algarve University# Lisboa (Lizbon) University# Minho University# Porto University# Universidade De Tras-os-montese e Alto DouroRomania# Ovidius Constanta University# Universitatea de Medicine si Fermacie din Targu Mures# University of Agronomic Sciences And Veterinery MedicineSlovakia# Cyrila a Metoda v Tmave# Slovak Agricultural University in NitraSpain# Catalonia Technical University# Granada Kraliyet Konservatuar# Jaume I University# Lleida University# Politecnica de Cartagena Universidad# Politcnica de Valencia Universidad# Real Conservatorio Superior# Universidade de Santiago de Compostela# Universitat De GironaSweden# Hgskolan I Boras University# Linkping University# Lulea University of Technology# Vaxj UniversityThe Netherlands# Delft University# Drenthe University of Professional Education# Eindhoven University Of Technology# Wageningen UniversityThe United Kingdom# Edinburgh University# Huddersfield University# Lancaster University# Nottingham UniversityReferences(Related EU universitiesAvrupa Birlii Erasmus ProgramAustriaFachhochschule BFIKlagenfurt UniversityParis-London Universitaet SalzburgVORARLBERGER LANDESKONSERVATORIUMBelgiumFree University BrusselsGhent UniversityHasselt UniversityHogeschool AntwerpenHogeschool Sint-Lukas BrusselLibre De Bruxelles UniversityProvinciale Hogeschool LimburgCyprusCyrups UniversityCzech RepublicCzech University Of AgricultureLiberec Technical UniversityMasaryk UniversityUniverzita Jana Evangelisty Purkyne v Usti Nad LabemZapadoceska UniversityDenmarkAarhus UniversityDortmunt UniversityWest Jutland University CollegeEstoniaTallinn UniversityFinlandFlensburg UniversityHelsinki UniversityOulu UniversitySvenska Yrkeshgskolan/ Up musikSwedish PolytechnicTampere PolytechnicTampere UniversityFranceFranche-ComtFranois RabelaisParis-Sorbonne University (Paris 4)Universite de Corse-Pascal PaoliGermanyAnhalt University of Applied SciencesAugsburg UniversityBonn UniversityDresden Technical UniversityDuisburg Essen UniversityEuropean Academy BerlinFlensburg UniversitatFree University BerlinFriedrich Alexander UniversityHannover UniversityHeidelberg UniversityHohenheim UniversityHumboldt UniversityJohannes Gutenberg UniversityLudwigshafen University of Applied SciencesMnster UniversityOldenburg universityOsnabrck UniversityRuhr University BochumSiegen UniversityTechnical University DarmstadtTechnische Universitat Bergakademie FreibergTechnische Universitat BerlinULM UniversityWeingarten Padagogische HogeschuleGreeceAristotle University of ThessalonikiCrete UniversityH.R.T.E.I Ionian UniversityMediterranean Agronomic Institute of ChaniaT.E.I Ionian IslandsTechnological Educational Institute of EpirusTechnological Educational Institute of EpirusHungaryCorvinus University of BudapestDebrecen UniversityKodalanyi Janos University CollagePecs UniversitySemmelweiss UniversityItalyBologna UniversityDegli Studi Di NapoliPadova UniversityPalermo UniversityRoma Tre UniversitaSassari UniversityUniversita degli Studi di Modena e Reggio EmmiliaUniversita Degli Studi Di TrentoUniversita Di CataniaUniversita di LAquilaUniversity of PisaLetoniaDaugavpils UniversitateLithuaniaKlapedia UniversityTarprautine aukstoji vadybos mokykiaNorwayNORGES TEKNISK-NATURVITENSKAPELIGE UNIVERSITETTromso UniversityPolandAdam Mickiewicz UniversityAgriculture University in SzczecnAkademia Pedagogiczna W KrakowieAkademia Rolnicza w LublineAkademia Techniczno - RolniczaMikolaja Kopernika ToruniuRyzsard LazarskiSzczecin Agriculture UniversitySzkola Glowna Gospodarstwa WiejskiegoWarsaw Agricultural UniversityWarsaw UniversityPortugalAlgarve UniversityLisboa (Lizbon) UniversityMinho UniversityPorto UniversityUniversidade De Tras-os-montese e Alto DouroRomaniaOvidius Constanta UniversityUniversitatea de Medicine si Fermacie din Targu MuresUniversity of Agronomic Sciences And Veterinery MedicineSlovakiaCyrila a Metoda v TmaveSlovak Agricultural University in NitraSpainCatalonia Technical UniversityGranada Kraliyet KonservatuarJaume I UniversityLleida UniversityPolitecnica de Cartagena UniversidadPolitcnica de Valencia UniversidadReal Conservatorio SuperiorUniversidade de Santiago de CompostelaUniversitat De GironaUniveristat Miguel Hernndez dElxSwedenHgskolan I Boras UniversityLinkping UniversityLulea University of TechnologyVaxj UniversityThe NetherlandsDelft UniversityDrenthe University of Professional EducationEindhoven University Of TechnologyWageningen UniversityThe United KingdomEdinburgh UniversityHuddersfield UniversityLancaster UniversityNottingham UniversityNotable alumni*Avc, poltician and Deputy Prime Minister and Minister of Foreign Affairs of the Republic of Northern Cyprus*Dndar, world and European champion of arts disciplines*zcan, politician and mayor of MersinExternal links* Turkish Agricultural Learning Objects Repository* Alumni Association of ukurova University* Unofficial Site of ukurova Universityniversitesiniversitesi
1082513
Dearne_and_Dove_Canal
nav         The Dearne and Dove Canal ran for almost ten miles through Yorkshire, England from Swinton to Barnsley through nineteen locks, rising 127 yards. The canal also had two short branches, the Worsbrough branch and the Elsecar branch, both about two miles long with reservoirs at the head of each. The Elsecar branch also has another six locks. The only tunnel was bypassed by a cutting in 1840.(Glister (2004))The canal was created mainly to carry cargo from the extensive mining industry in the area. Other cargo included iron, glass, lime, oil products and general merchandise.  A combination of railway competition and subsidence caused by the same mines it served forced the canal into a gradual decline, closing completely in 1961. As the local coal industry also collapsed in the 1980s the canal was thrown a lifeline with the forming of the Barnsley Canal Group who are now attempting to restore the whole canal, an effort further boosted by the abandonment of the railway which replaced it.HistoryCreation and early yearsThe idea of creating a navigable waterway from the River Don to Barnsley along the course of the River Dearne was first proposed in 1773 by the of Rockingham. However the idea was not pursued,(Hadfield (1972), p.79) until a meeting of the shareholders of the Don Navigation Company in 1792, where a canal from the Don Navigation into Barnsley was proposed.  At the same time the & Calder Navigation company was considering a canal from Wakefield to Barnsley.  On 20 October 1792, the rival companies held a famous meeting at the White Bear Inn (now the Royal Hotel) in Barnsley and agreed to join their canals just south of Barnsley and go forward with complementary proposals.(Hadfield (1972), pp.169-170) These were to become the Dearne and Dove Canal and the Canal, both of which sought to provide access to the coalfields of Barnby bridge and Haigh bridge.(Hadfield (1973), p.281)The canal obtained its of Parliament on 3 June 1793, on the same day as the Act which authorised the building of the Canal. The Act created the Dearne and Dove Canal Company, consisting of 211 people, and allowed them to raise 60,000 by issuing shares, and a further 30,000 by mortgage if required.(Priestley (1831), p.185-188)  Mylne was named as chief engineer on the project, and appears to have made the initial survey and given evidence to parliament in support of the bill.( However the construction was managed by John Thompson, the engineer to the Don Navigation Company, until he died in 1795. The post was then held by Robert Whitworth until 1799, when he died also, and it is thought that one of Whitworths sons acted as engineer until the finish of the work. The canal was opened as far as Elsecar by 1798 and fully opened by November 1804 at a cost of just under 100,000.(Hadfield (1973), pp.283-285) The cost overrun was managed when the company obtained a second Act of Parliament on 30 May 1800, which allowed the original option for a 30,000 mortgage to be raised by shares, a mortgage of 10,000 to be obtained, and the toll rates to be increased.( Construction costs included the provision of two reservoirs, at Elsecar and Worsbrough, tramroads from Elsecar basin to two ironworks and a colliery, which included inclined planes, and a  tunnel near Swinton, which was built using the cut-and-cover method.(Hadfield (1973), p.285) The canal was shut briefly in the summers of 1805 and 1806 due to a shortage of water, but was initially successful and by 1830 it was carrying 181,000 tons of coal a year.(In the early 1820s, several proposals were made to build additional tramroads and reservoirs, but the plans were opposed by the Barnsley Canal and the Aire and Calder. Plans for an additional reservoir at Wentworth Castle, above the Worsbrough reservoir, were opposed in the House of Lords, unless the Company would release its exclusive rights to build tramways from the canal to local collieries, and the bill was withdrawn, rather than agree to a clause which would have broken their monopoly on the coal reserves near to the canal. A decision was taken instead to raise the level of the Worsbrough reservoir by , thereby increasing the surface area to , and this was completed in 1826.(Hadfield (1973), pp.287-288)Railway competitionThe Midland Railway, running from Leeds to Derby, opened in 1840 and this represented a major threat to the domination of the coal trade by all the Yorkshire navigations. Parts of the railway ran alongside the canal. At upon Dearne the railway constructed a long cutting, and in order to maintain their alignment, the canal tunnel was demolished and the canal was re-routed to share the new cutting.(Barnley, Dearne and Dove Canal Trust, History: Dearne & Dove Canal, accessed 20 December 2008) The canal Company took the opportunity to build interchange facilities with the new railway.(Hadfield (1973), p.289)With the threat of the railways taking trade from the canals, the Don Navigation Company decided to purchase the Barnsley Canal, and to lease the Dearne and Dove for a year, after which they would buy it. The agreement with the Dearne and Dove went ahead, with the River Don Navigation taking over the canal from 1 January 1846, and paying 210,000 for it on 2 January 1847, but they failed to reach agreement with the Barnsley Canal. Tolls were reduced by 60 per cent in 1846, with free passage for empty boats from 1847, with the result that much of the coal traffic which had previously used the Barnsley Canal now used the Dearne and Dove. The South Yorkshire, Doncaster & Goole Railway Company was authorised in 1847, and the Act of Parliament allowed them to amalgamate with the Don Navigation Company, and hence the Dearne and Dove, once they had raised half of their authorised capital. The amalgamation took place on 19 April 1850.(Hadfield (1973), pp.289-290) The railway company opened their line from Doncaster to Swinton in November 1849, which was followed by a branch to Elsecar in February 1850, and another branch to Worsbrough in June 1850. At Elsecar, the canal basin was moved, and about  of the canal were filled in to make way for the railway. While the takeover was beneficial to traffic on parts of the Don Navigation, tonnage carried on the Dearne and Dove fell.(Hadfield (1973), pp.410-411)Subsequently, both the railway and the canals were leased to the Sheffield and Lincolnshire Railway, with a 999-year lease starting in June 1864, but in 1874 the lease became a takeover, and the canals were just a small part of a bigger undertaking.(Hadfield (1973), pp.413-414) Users of the canals were unhappy with the high tolls and the lack of modernisation, and so in November 1888, the Sheffield and South Yorkshire Canal Company was formed, with the intent of obtaining the canals from the railway company. They obtained an of Parliament on 26 August 1889, which created the and South Yorkshire Navigation Company, with an authorised capital of 1.5 million, and powers to buy the canals, by compulsory purchase if agreement could not be reached with the railway company.(Hadfield (1973), pp.415-417) The transfer did not occur until 1895, when agreement was finally reached, and the Dearne and Dove Canal became part of the Sheffield and South Yorkshire Navigation along with the Canal, the Don Navigation, and the and Keadby Canal.(Hadfield (1973), p.419)DeclineThe Sheffield and South Yorkshire Navigation Company intended to upgrade the system to take 300 or 400 ton boats, and to allow compartment boats to be used. Coal from the collieries on the canal would transferred from the compartment boats to larger vessels at a new coal handling plant to be located at Keadby. However, the company failed to raise the finance to purchase the canals from the railway company outright, and so struggled to make significant improvements. The Dearne and Dove was the least profitable part of the system, with high maintenance costs as a result of subsidence from the coal mining.( As early as 1884, a  stretch of the Worsbrough branch had collapsed due to subsidence, which had taken 6 months and cost 19,000 to repair.(Elliot (1995))In 1906 the branch to Worsbrough closed due to the increasing cost of maintenance, although it was retained as a water feeder. The depth of water at the top end of the canal could only be maintained at , rather than , and in 1909, the company agreed to allow mining beneath the canal.( The Elsecar branch was the next to close in 1928, also due to subsidence. The last boat traversed the central section of the main line in 1934, although an abandonment order for the canal was not obtained, as the company expected opposition to such a bill. After this date water levels were not maintained: this allowed the maintenance necessary to combat the ever-present mining subsidence to be reduced; only a mile or so of each end of the canal attracted traffic and was properly maintained. In 1942 traffic at the Barnsley end ceased. Traffic from the Manvers Main colliery ended in 1952,(Hadfield (1973), pp.425-426) and despite vigorous campaigning for the reinstatement of the canal by the Inalnd Waterways Association and the Inland Waterways Protection Society in the late 1950s,(Squires (2008), pp.34,37-38) the canal was finally closed in 1961, under the terms of the British Transport Commission Act. Only the half mile (0.8 km) to the glassworks in Swinton was retained. This included four locks which were supplied with water by pumps.(  The last boat called at the glassworks in 1977; since then the lower portion of the remaining canal has been incorporated into a boatyard,( while the upper portion remains in water but not accessible by boat as the uppermost locks gates have been replaced with a dam.After closure the canal land passed into the hands of the local councils.  Several drownings of children in the 1960s caused large parts of the canal in the Swinton and Wath-upon-Dearne areas to be filled in, however much the remaining canal was simply left to deteriorate, in some areas still in water, albeit at a much lower level than the original canal and very overgrown.  Even as late as the early 1980s large parts of the canal line were easily recognisable with local roads passing over the old narrow sandstone hump-back canal bridges, however since then road-improvement schemes have seen the removal of redundant bridges and in some areas the utilisation of the canal bed for new roads.RestorationIn 1 April 1984, after a number of articles in the local press, twelve people met to address the lack of interest in local waterways. The Barnsley Canal Group was formed(Squires (2008), p.114) at this meeting and started campaigning for the preservation and restoration of the Dearne and Dove and Barnsley Canals.  Since the late 1980s the group has been active in trying to protect the remaining canal bed from obstruction through the local planning process.In 1991 the canal group commenced restoring the top of the Elsecar branch of the canal in conjunction with work at what is now the Heritage Centre.  A study was also carried out on the branch. It determined that, although expensive, it is viable to restore that section of the canal. The Barnsley Canal Group was reformed as the Barnsley, Dearne & Dove Canals Trust in 2000.The Canal TodayThe two branches have fared far better than the main line since its closure. The more rural nature of these sections means that the land has been left relatively untouched. In parts of the main line problems of obstruction and poor maintenance means that alternative routes have been suggested.  This is particularly acute in Wath-upon-Dearne, Wombwell and Stairfoot where road improvement and land-reclamation schemes have utilised and obliterated several miles of the former canal bed.The closure of all the local mines that the canal served means that further subsidence is no longer a problem.  The abandonment of the railway line that replaced the canal in 1988 has given the canal an alternative route. This land has been secured from intrusion by other land users and will be relatively easily excavated to create a new channel. It is also being used as part of the Pennine Trail.The canal is referred to as a vital missing link by the Barnsley, Dearne & Dove Canals Trust.(Barnsley, Dearne & Dove Canals Trust Aims, accessed 20 December 2008) Their aim is to completely restore the canal along with the Barnsley Canal in order to complete the Ring. The canal is now undergoing restoration. The Elsecar branch is to be the first part of the canal to be restored. The top two pounds and top lock have been restored and a launch ramp has been added in the top pound. Funding was obtained from the Yorkshire European Community Trust, and the lock gates were fitted in May 1999.(Squires (2008), p.144) Other parts of the canal such as the top of the Worsbrough branch have remained in good condition despite years of neglect.Parts of the towpath form sections of the Pennine Trail, a long distance footpath that connects Liverpool, Leeds, Hull and Chesterfield.(Trans Pennine Trail, Overview and map, accessed 22 December 2008) The reservoir at the top of the Elsecar branch has been designated a local reserve by Barnsley Council(Barnsley Metropolitan Borough Council, Elsecar Park and Local Reservoir Nature Reserve raises the Green Flag, accessed 22 December 2008) and the area surrounding the reservoir at the top of the Worsbrough branch has become Country Park.(Barnsley Metropolitan Borough Council, Worsbrough Mill and Country Park, accessed 22 December 2008)Original routeMain Linethumb|right|A short section above the fourth lock remains in water, although the top gate of the lock has been replaced by a concrete wallThe canal started at a junction with the Don Navigation at Swinton. From there it passed through six locks before it passed through a 472 yard tunnel. This tunnel was bypassed in 1840 when the canal was diverted to run through the same cutting created to accommodate the railway. It then passed Manvers Main Colliery and entered Wath-upon-Dearne running parallel to Doncaster Road, before passing between rows of terraced houses past the town centre.  It then looped north-west towards the middle of the valley, with a wide section on a high embankment which became known as the Bay of Biscay. After that it passed into Brampton and back onto the hillside. There were another four locks up to the junction with the Elsecar branch, which lay between Brampton and Wombwell at the junction of the Dearne Valley Parkway and the A633.The canal then passed Wombwell to the north of the town centre, and Aldham before arriving at the eight locks of the Stairfoot flight. At that point there followed the junction with the Worsbrough Branch. The canal then passed through the site of Stairfoot Roundabout and headed towards Mill where a final stop lock marks the boundary between the Dearne & Dove and Barnsley Canals.Elsecar BranchThe Elsecar branch was built to serve the mines and so went past many of them. Starting in Brampton the branch passed Cortonwood Colliery (now a park). After passing below Hemingfield and the site of the Hemingfield Colliery it finished at Elsecar basin. The reservoir is about another half a mile from the basin past the heritage centre. The majority of the towpath is on the Elsecar Greenway, part of the Trans Pennine Trail.Worsbrough BranchAfter leaving Stairfoot the Worsbrough branch passes through Swaithe and then passes under the Line.  After this it ran alongside the River Dove until reaching Worsbrough Basin.  The reservoir is just beyond the basin.Proposed Restoration RouteIn the survey done by the Barnsley Canal Group in 1987 it was established that the original route of the canal would be very difficult to restore. This is due in large part to canal land reclaimed by the council in the 1970s. Over time, several proposals have been put forward as to a possible new route. These include the use of the River Dearne or the use of the Mexborough to Barnsley railway line, which was abandoned in 1988.In August 2004, a professional engineering company was commissioned to conduct a feasibility study of restoration options, and presented its findings in November 2006. The estimated costs for a full restoration of the Dearne and Dove and the Barnsley Canals to take narrow boats was 127 million, and the likely benefits to the local economy were estimated at 3.1 million per year.(Feasibility Study, (November 2006), Post Launch Press Release, accessed 22 December 2008) The route which this proposed would follow the old route through Swinton onto the old Manvers pit pony field where it would divert around the newly built Dearne Valley College and Call Centres. It would then divert around to the north of Wath-Upon-Dearne via the longest Aqueduct in the world to join up to its old route near what was once the Bay of Biscay. There would be relatively minor course corrections to the rest of the route through to Barnsley, although it would follow a parallel route to the original canal on this section.Barnsley Canals ConsortiumThe Barnsley Canals Consortium is the name given to all the interested parties who are cooperating in order to restore the Dearne and Dove along with its sister canal the Barnsley. Its members include:-*Dearne & Dove Canals Trust*Waterways Association*and Carlton Partnership*Barnsley Metropolitan Borough Council*Rotherham Metropolitan Borough Council*Wakefield City CouncilSee also*of Great Britain*of the British canal systemBibliography******ReferencesExternal links*Barnsley, Dearne & Dove Canals Trust*Pennine Waterways
1088913
Oodnadatta
 location3 Coober PedyOodnadatta, Australia, is a small town surrounded by an area of  with cattle stations in arid pastoral rangelands close to the Desert,  north of Adelaide and 112 m above sea level. It can be reached by an unsealed road from Coober Pedy or via the unsealed Track from Marree to Marla or from the north via Northern Territory (Old Ghan Heritage Trail). The name is derived from Arrernte utnadata, meaning mulga blossom.()The population was 229 in 1976 and 160 in 1986. The 2006 census reported a population of 277 (150 male, 127 female, including 103 Australians).() History McDouall Stuart explored the region in 1859. The route mapped by Stuart in his journeys of 1857 to 1862 was adopted as part of the Overland Telegraph Line route. Oodnadatta became the terminus of the Great Northern Railway in 1890,(Great Northern to Government Gums - A Mineral Railway Callaghan, W.H. Railway History, September;October, 2008 pp283-301;323-336) and remained so until the line, which then became known as Ghan, was extended to Alice Springs in 1929. Oodnadatta busiest era was War II when Army and Air Force set up local facilities to service troop trains and fighter aircraft en route to Darwin. In 1981 the line was moved to the west, and Oodnadatta, formerly a government service centre and supply depot for surrounding pastoral properties, became a residential freehold town for Australians who, moving from cattle work, bought empty houses as railways workers left. Increasing tourist traffic along the Track and an emerging mining industry keep the village alive. The Aboriginal school is the biggest employer.( Climate Oodnadatta has a climate (climate classification BWh) and has also recorded the highest reliably measured maximum temperature in Australia: 50.7C (123.3 F) on 2 January 1960. A higher temperature was recorded at Cloncurry in 1889, however this has since been shown to have been recorded in a non-standard enclosure and likely to have been considerably cooler than first believed.()dateAugust 2010Oodnadatta elsewhereThe name Oodnadatta has been used as a name for a crater on the planet Mars(Categories for Naming Features on Planets and Satellites, Gazetteer of Planetary Nomenclature, Astrogeology Science Center, NASA). Life in Oodnadatta thumb |Oodnadatta Track signthumb | Canoe hireThe Pink Roadhouse (so-called because it is painted bright pink) is a focal point for the town, providing petrol, a general store, meals, post office facilities and canoe hire. Although they really have canoes (also painted bright pink), it is not clear where to use them in the surrounding area unless the local waterholes are recently filled.Oodnadatta is serviced twice weekly by the Pedy Oodnadatta One Day Mail Run. The OKA mail truck also carries some general freight and passengers.() Road trains bring weekly supplies of food and fuel etc from Adelaide. Royal Flying Doctor Service and charter flights use the Oodnadatta Progress Associations local all weather WW2 airstrip which houses an automatic weather station.There is a museum in the old Ghan railway station, and a staffed Medical Centre.ReferencesExternal links* Tracking History to Oodnadatta by Roderick Eime* Pink Roadhouse Iconic landmark of Oodnadatta* Pacific Island Travel* Oodnadatta Pioneer Cemetery with photos of headstones* Coober Pedy Oodnadatta One Day Mail Runde:Oodnadattafr:Oodnadattanl:Oodnadattann:Oodnadattapl:Oodnadattaru:South Australia
1089972
Carluke
Clydesdale The town of Carluke (Gaelic: Cathair MoLuaig) lies in the heart of the Lanarkshire countryside in Lanarkshire, Scotland, 5.4 miles northwest of Lanark and 4 miles southeast of Wishaw.Carluke is largely a commuting town, with a variety of small stores and supermarkets available at its centre. The surrounding villages of Braidwood, Forth, Kilncadzow, and Law are supported by the various shops and services available in Carluke.Carluke todayCarluke is the Clyde Valleys largest town with a population of 13,500. It sits on a high plateau overlooking the River Clyde, right in the heart of Lanarkshires fruit growing area.It has an almost thriving shopping centre and it has seen a recent boom in house building thanks to its direct train link with Glasgow. The town centre was redesigned to create an attractive shopping environment and work finished in 2006.Thanks to its proximity to the Clyde Valleys major fruit growers, one of Carlukes biggest employers is the jam company Renshaw Scott who recently added a chocolate refinery to their plant.Memorials to two of Carlukes most famous sons were completed in 2006 as part of the towns Streetscape Project, regenerating the centre of the town. On the paving at the bottom of the High Street, a design of a compass etched with arrows pointing to places relevant to Carluke such as Tinto Hill and Carluke, New Zealand, has been created in honour of the noted surveyor and cartographer Major General William Roy. Doctor Daniel Reid Rankin is remembered by a plaque in Rankin Square with etchings of fossils carved into the granite.HistoryIn a charter by Robert I, dated 1315, Carluke is written Carneluk; at different periods it appears as Carlowck, Carlowk, Carluk, Carlook, Carlouk and Carluke. Car or Caer tells us that it is a height or strong position and Luke suggests that it may be dedicated to the saint of that name, however there is evidence that the earliest church was dedicated to Andrew.The town was chartered as a Royal Burgh in 1662.(-- southlanarkshire.gov.uk,  Carluke, retrieved 1 February 2007) Carluke expanded during through the industrial age, with work involving milling, weaving, mining and the manufacture of bricks, glass, confectionery and jam.Notable figuresCarluke is the home of R&W Scott, who have been handmaking preserves from locally-grown Clyde Valley fruit since the 1880s. Owned by Napier Brown Foods since September 2004, Scotts Carluke site was expanded in 2007 with the construction of a new foodhall for the manufacture of baking chocolate.  The multi-award winning bacon curers Ramsay of Carluke have also been based in the town since 1857. Family-owned for five generations, the company is one of Steins Food Heroes.The town has the distinction of being home to three gallant recipients of the Cross: *Angus *Thomas Caldwell*Donald CameronIt is also the birthplace of:*Thomas Weir, covenanting soldier and alleged Warlock*Major General William Roy, widely regarded as the founding father of the Survey*Daniel Rankin, a noted 19th century geologist and paleontologist http://findarticles.com/p/news-articles/carluke-gazette-scotland/mi_7807/is_2006_March_1/streetscape-commemorate-carlukes-famous-historic/ai_n34562536/.*Dodds, a left-sided defender who played for Celtic, Cowdenbeath, Queen of the South and the Scotland national team*Arnott, the former Motherwell striker, currently resides in the town.Present dayToday Carlukes population stands at 18,609 and has 6 primary schools.Carluke Streetscape, a 2.35million town centre redevelopment project funded by Lanarkshire Council it cost 2.35million and was completed in April 2006.(-- southlanarkshire.gov.uk,  Streetscape spectacular all set for Saturday, retrieved 1 February 2007) As a result, after many years of pedestrianisation, unidirectional vehicular traffic is now permitted along the towns High Street and Hamilton Street outwith business hours.Carluke high School was also redeveloped to make it bigger and more up to date in 2008. In 2010 a 1.1million indoor soft play and cafe The Bubbles Factory was built and opened in Hamilton Street, where the old smiddy was sited. The next big step for Carluke is Tesco coming in 2011.EducationThe town currently has five primary schools: Carluke Primary http://www.carluke-pri.s-lanark.sch.uk/, High Mill Primary http://www.highmill-pri.s-lanark.sch.uk/, Kirkton Primary http://www.kirkton-pri.s-lanark.sch.uk/, Crawforddyke Primary http://www.crawforddyke-pri.s-lanark.sch.uk, and St Athanasius Primary http://www.st-athanasius-pri.s-lanark.sch.uk/, all of which are in the process of being rebuilt or refurbished. Secondary education is provided by High School, which also serves Law village, Braidwood and Forth. Carluke High School has also been rebuilt on its current site.In addition Carluke is home to a state funded Special School, Victoria Park The school serves the whole of South Lanarkshire Council and provides education for primary and secondary pupils aged 3 to 18 with special educational needs.SportCarluke is homed to Rovers F.C. who play at John Cumming Stadium and the Carluke Cobras, one of the top three football teams in the UK.Transport linksCarluke is situated 6.5 miles from Junction 8 of the M74, 8 miles from Junction 6 of the M8 and 17 miles from the A80 at Cumbernauld, and is the meeting place of the A73 and A721 roads. The town also benefits from frequent direct rail services to Lanark, Motherwell, Hamilton and Glasgow, in addition to a twice daily commuter service to Edinburgh (Sundays excepted) from railway station, less than a 10 minute walk from the town centre. There is a circular town bus route that connects the town centre with several local housing schemes, and there are also regular bus services to Lanark, Wishaw, Motherwell, Hamilton and Glasgow, as well as an hourly express coach service to Glasgow that runs non-stop from the outskirts of Motherwell via the M74, M73 and M8 motorways.See also* of places in South LanarkshireReferencesExternal links* The Bubbles Factory* Carluke Community Website* Carluke Development Trust* Carluke High School* Carluke Parish Historical Society (NEW, incl. maps & historical records)* Carluke Primrose Orchestral Flutes*  Carluke Rotary Club* Images of Carluke on Flickr.com* Information on Carluke Leisure Centre.* Kirkton Church, Carluke* St. Athanasius Church, Carluke*  St Johns Church, Carluke*  Ramsay of Carlukede:Carlukeno:Carlukesimple:Carlukeuk:
1091054
Generative_topographic_map
Generative topographic map (GTM) is a learning method that is a probabilistic counterpart of the map (SOM), is provably convergent and does not require a shrinking  neighborhood or a decreasing step size. It is a model: the data is assumed to arise by first probabilistically picking a point in a low-dimensional space, mapping the point to the observed high-dimensional input space (via a smooth function), then adding noise in that space. The parameters of the low-dimensional probability distribution, the smooth map and the noise are all learned from the training data using the expectation-maximization (EM) algorithm.  GTM was introduced in 1996 in a paper by M. Bishop, Markus Svensen, and Christopher K. I. Williams. Details of the algorithm The approach is strongly related to networks which use sampling and a perceptron to form a non-linear variable model. In the GTM the latent space is a discrete grid of points which is assumed to be non-linearly projected into data space. A noise assumption is then made in data space so that the model becomes a constrained mixture of Gaussians. Then the models likelihood can be maximized by EM. In theory, an arbitrary nonlinear parametric deformation could be used.  The optimal parameters could be found by gradient descent etc.The suggested approach to the nonlinear mapping is to use a basis function network (RBF) to create a nonlinear mapping between the latent space and the data space. The nodes of the  RBF network then form a feature space and the nonlinear mapping can then be taken as a transform of this feature space.  This approach has the advantage over the suggested density network approach that it can be optimised analytically. Uses In data analysis, GTMs are like a nonlinear version of components analysis, which allows high dimensional data to be modelled as resulting from Gaussian noise added to sources in lower-dimensional latent space.  For example, to locate stocks in plottable 2D space based on their hi-D time-series shapes.  Other applications may want to have fewer sources than data points, for example mixture models.In generative modelling, the latent and data spaces have the same dimensions, for example, 2D images or 1 audio sound waves.  Extra empty dimensions are added to the source (known as the template in this form of modelling), for example locating the 1D sound wave in 2D space.  Further nonlinear dimensions are then added, produced by combining the original dimensions.  The enlarged latent space is then projected back into the 1D data space.  The probability of a given projection is, as before, given by the product of the likelihood of the data under the Gaussian noise model with the prior on the deformation parameter.  Unlike conventional spring-based deformation modelling, this has the advantage of being analytically optimizable.  The disadvantage is that it is a data-mining approach, ie. the shape of the deformation prior is unlikely to be meaningful as an explanation of the possible deformations, as it is based on a very high, artificial- and arbitrarily constructed nonlinear latent space.  For this reason the prior is learned from data rather than created by a human expert, as is possible for spring-based models. Comparison with Kohonens self-organizing maps While nodes in the self-organizing map (SOM) can wander around at will, GTM nodes are constrained by the allowable transformations and their probabilities.  If the deformations are well-behaved the topology of the latent space is preserved. The SOM was created as a biological model of neurons and is a heuristic algorithm. By contrast, the GTM has nothing to do with neuroscience or cognition and is a probabilistically principled model. Thus, it has a number of advantages over SOM, namely:* it explicitly formulates a density model over the data.* it uses a cost function that quantifies how well the map is trained.* it uses a sound optimization procedure (EM algorithm).GTM was introduced by Bishop, Svensen and Williams in their Technical Report in 1997 (Technical Report NCRG/96/015, Aston University, UK) published later in Neural Computation. It was also described in PhD thesis of Markus Svensen (Aston, 1998). See also * Self-organizing map (SOM)* Neural Network* Connectionism* mining* learning* dimensionality reduction* network software* recognition External links * Bishop, Svensen and Williams Generative Topographic Mapping paper* Generative topographic mapping developed at the Neural Computing Research Group os Aston University (UK). ( Matlab toolbox )
1094700
Fridays_Child_(Star_Trek:_The_Original_Series)
__NOTOC__Fridays Child is a second season episode of Trek: The Original Series. It is episode #40, production #32, and was broadcast December 1, 1967. It was written by Fontana, and directed by Pevney.Overview: The crew of the Enterprise become entangled in a planets tribal power struggle.  Plot On stardate 3497.2, the starship USS Enterprise, under the command of Captain T. Kirk, arrives at Capella IV to negotiate a mining contact for topeline. The Capellan inhabitants are described by Dr. McCoy as strong, warlike humanoids who average 7 feet in height; and, despite their violent tendencies, the Capellans do have a strong sense of honesty.  McCoy is familiar with the Capellans since he spent a few months of his Starfleet career stationed on their world; he speaks their language and knows a great deal about their customs. Kirk is also aware that the Capellans are known to have dealings with the Klingons, which may make the negotiations difficult. Kirk beams down to the planet with Dr. McCoy, Spock and a security officer, and leaves Mr. Scott in command. He warns him to keep alert for Klingon ships in the area, since they may try to interfere in the talks. Kirks fear is realized as soon as he arrives, finding Kras, a Klingon emissary, is already present. Kirks security officer reacts without thinking and draws his phaser on the emissary, but the redshirted officer is immediately killed by a Capellan guard with his kligat, (pronounced Klee-got), a weapon that is part boomerang and part dagger. The Capellans order Kirk and his party to hand over their weapons just as the Klingon had done. Despite the hostile greeting, the Capellans treat the party as honored guests. Kirk is offered some food by a Capellan woman, but McCoy manages to restrain Kirk from physical contact with a small bulbous object that she is holding, for touching it mandates hand-to-hand combat with her closest male relative. McCoy explains that the Capellans consider such fights entertaining. Kirks restraint actually annoys the womans male relative, who was looking forward to a deadly duel with the Captain. Kirk and the Klingon emissary meet with Akaar, the Teer - leader - of the Ten Tribes, and the talks begin, with McCoy interpreting for the Earthmen. While Akaar seems to favor the Federations offer over the Klingons, Akaars rivals seem to disagree, especially Maab, who challenges Akaar. A coup dtat ensues and Maab kills Akaar, thus winning the throne and becoming the new Teer. Kirk wisely takes this in stride, but the Klingon demands that the Earthmen be killed. Maab begins to disparage the Klingon, who showed fear, and to respect Kirk, who did not.Maab orders the death of Eleen, Akaars wife, for she is pregnant with Akaars child, who was to be the next Teer in line of succession. As Eleen comes into the main tent expecting to be killed, Maab partly trips and partly shoves her with the flat of his sword, so that she falls against a lit torch and burns her arm. When Kirk and McCoy intervene, Maab becomes greatly angered by the break of tradition, and has Kirk and his party imprisoned along with Eleen, who herself is upset, claiming that she was prepared to die. Kras wickedly smirks, for the scales have tipped in favor of the Klingons offer. Meanwhile the Enterprise receives a distress call from the S.S. Deirdre. Mr. Scott takes the Enterprise out of orbit to find the ship, but when it arrives at the coordinates, he finds nothing. He notes the call strangely asked for the Enterprise by name, and no civilian ship would have direct knowledge of the Enterprises whereabouts. Realizing he had been duped, he races back to Capella IV, but receives another distress signal along the way, this time from the U.S.S. Carolina. Scotty ignores it saying fool me once, shame on you, fool me twice, shame on me, which Chekov reports is an old Russian saying. When the Enterprise shows up at Capella, Scotty finds a Klingon warship waiting to ambush him. Forced to deal with a heavily armed adversary, the Enterprise is rendered unable to help its captured crewmembers imprisoned on the planet. Kirk and his party, along with Eleen, manage to overpower their captors and escape into some nearby hills. McCoy is worried about Eleens arm, and persists in touching her to determine the scale of the wound. She resists and slaps him twice, very hard, which causes McCoy to slap her in response. Due to the militaristic ideology of her culture, this actually impresses Eleen, and she allows McCoy to examine her. He discovers that she is ready to give birth at any time. He is concerned about his ability to deliver the child, since the Capellans are not human but humanoid, and he might not be able to handle complications. Eventually the party finds a cave to hide in. The way to the cave is steep and rocky, and Eleen insists McCoy, and only McCoy, help her up, whereupon he comments Im a doctor, not an escalator. Kirk and Spock start a fire and begin to fashion primitive bows and arrows to defend themselves. Maab and his warriors, now hot on their trail, are getting closer. Kirk and Spock use their communicators to create a frequency that will disrupt the rocks above them. They cause an avalanche which kills some of the Capellan pursuers. Kras uses this opportunity to obtain a Federation phaser weapon of his own from a fallen Capellan. Meanwhile, McCoy attempts to deliver Eleens baby. She refuses to have it born, struggling against the contractions, saying that it isnt hers, and that it must be killed. McCoy tells her to repeat the words: it is mine, but she misinterprets, thinking McCoy is claiming the child as his own. Due to her medical state, McCoy refrains from attempting to convince her of her error. The delivery is successful. Thinking everything will be fine, McCoy nods off, just as Eleen knocks him unconscious with a rock, and heads out to surrender to Maab. When she meets him she claims she killed the baby, as well as the humans, while they slept.Kras steps forward, and with a weapon in hand, demands to see Kirks dead body to verify Eleens story, which is seen as a sign of extreme disrespect for the widow of a High Teer.  When one of the Capellans tries to kill Kras with a kligat, Kras vaporizes him with the phaser. Kras and the Capellans quickly discover that Kirk and Spock are still alive when arrows  a weapon unknown on Capella IV  begin to fly. One strikes Kras in the knee. Kras returns fire. An exchange of fire ensues between Kras, Kirk, Spock and the Capellans. Kras threatens to kill any Capellan who raises a weapon against him. Maab takes defensive action, saying he will allow Eleen to live in exchange for his own death. Maab confronts Kras, and is vaporized. As arranged, a Capellan warrior takes advantage of the distraction and kills Kras. At this point, Mr. Scott and a squad of security officers show up and stop the fighting.With the conflict over, McCoy reunites Eleen with her baby. The Capellans then hail their new infant leader. As allowed by custom until the newborn Teer comes of age, Eleen acts as her sons regent, naming him James Akaar and authorizes the mining agreement with the Federation. In a rare display of emotion, Spock is astonished and supposedly jealous at the childs name and when Kirk and McCoy talk of how great a name it is, Spock declares that the two will be insufferably pleased with yourselves for at least a month.In D. C. Fontanas original ending, Eleen hands over her baby to save herself. The Capellans keep the baby, because he is a boy, and kill her. Gene Roddenberry overrode Fontanas ending.(Archive of American Television interview with D.C. Fontana, part 3 of 7, http://www.youtube.com/watch?vDx_zdQ-36nc) 40th Anniversary Remastering This episode was remastered and first aired January 6, 2007 as part of the 40th anniversary remastering of the Original Series. It was preceded three weeks earlier by Corbomite Maneuver and followed a week later by of an Eye. Aside from remastered video and audio, and the all-CGI animation of the USS Enterprise that is standard among the revisions, specific changes to this episode also include:* Capella IV has been reworked with more realistic features.* The bridge readout of the distress call ship has been enhanced to an animated tactical diagram instead of a simple point of light on the screen.* Correction of a scene after the Klingon ship disappears from the sensors, the original shot of the navigators station controls was changed to one of Chekov hitting buttons at the science station.* The Klingon ship has been reworked to an actual model instead of a glowing shape.* Phasers beams and their vaporizing effects have been refined. Notes * The name of this episode derives from the old childrens rhyme, Fridays Child The oldest version of the rhyme has Fridays child is full of woe.  A newer version flips this line with that of Wednesdays child and reads, Fridays child is loving and giving..  Fontana typed the rhyme with the Fridays child is full of woe reading on the title page of her April 20, 1967 First Draft script.* This episode is one of several filmed on location at Rocks.* In a storyline in the DC Comics Star Trek series, the now grown Leonard James Akaar shows up to testify on Kirks behalf when the Captain is on trial. Echoing his last line from the episode, Spock notes that McCoy is still insufferably pleased with himself. References  External links * *** Review of Fridays Child on TrekMovie.com* Side-by-side comparisons of Fridays Childdtde un jefe (Star Trek: La serie original)
1097432
Rio_Tinto_Group
  homepage        www.riotinto.comThe Rio Tinto Group is a diversified, British-Australian, multinational mining and resources group with headquarters in London and Melbourne.  The company was founded in 1873, when a multinational consortium of investors purchased a mine complex on the Rio Tinto river, in Huelva, Spain from the Spanish government.  Since then, the company has grown through a long series of mergers and acquisitions to place itself among the world leaders in the production of many commodities, including aluminium, iron ore, copper, uranium, coal, and diamonds.()  Although primarily focused on extraction of minerals, Rio Tinto also has significant operations in refining, particularly for refining bauxite and iron ore.(  The company has operations on six continents but is mainly concentrated in Australia and Canada, and owns gross assets valued at $81 billion through a complex web of wholly and partly owned subsidiaries.( In 2007, the company was valued at $147 billion.()() Its head office in the United Kingdom is in the of Westminster, London, while its Australian head office is in the of Melbourne.(Contact Us. Rio Tinto Group. Retrieved on 9 April 2010.)(Suburbs & Postcodes. of Melbourne. Retrieved on 5 April 2010.)Rio Tinto Group is a company traded on both the Stock Exchange where it is a component of the 100 Index( and the Securities Exchange where it is a component of the 200 index.( As of March 2009, Rio Tinto is the fourth-largest publicly listed mining company in the world with a capitalisation of approximately $134 billion,( and was listed in Fortune magazines 2008 Global 500 ranking of largest worldwide companies by revenue at number 263.() Although the company has a long record of producing profitable operating results and favourable investment returns, the companys 2007 acquisition of Canadian aluminium company Alcan for  $38.1 billion burdened Rio Tinto with substantial debt.(HistoryFormationImage:Rio tinto river CarolStoker NASA Ames Research Center.jpg|thumb|left|The companys name comes from the Rio Tinto river, which has flowed red since antiquity due to mine drainage.thumb|right|upright|Hugh Matheson led the purchase of the Rio Tinto mines from Spain, and was the companys first president.Since antiquity, a site along the Rio Tinto, in the Andalusian Province of Huelva in Spain has been mined for copper, silver, gold, and other minerals.() Approximately 3000 BC, Iberians and Tartessians began mining the site, followed by the Phoenicians, Greeks, Romans, Visigoths, and Moors.  After a period of abandonment, the mines were rediscovered in 1556 and the Spanish government began operating them once again in 1724.(However, Spains mining operations there were inefficient, and the government itself was otherwise distracted by political and financial crises,() leading the government to sell the mines in 1873 at a price later determined to be well below actual value.() The purchasers of the mine were led by Hugh Mathesons Matheson and Company, which ultimately formed a syndicate consisting of Bank (56% ownership), Matheson (24%), and railway firm Clark, Punchard and Company (20%). At an auction held by the Spanish government for sale of the mine on 14 February 1873, the group won with a bid GB3,680,000 (ESP 92,800,000). The bid also specified that Spain permanently relinquish any right to claim royalties on the mines production. Following purchase of the mine, the syndicate launched the Rio Tinto Company, registering it on 29 March 1873.( At the end of the 1880s, control of the firm was passed to the family, who greatly increased the scale of its mining operations.(The Rio Tinto Company: an economic history of a leading international mining concern, Charles E. Harvey (1981), page 188)Operating historyFollowing their purchase of the Rio Tinto Mine, the new ownership constructed a number of new processing facilities, innovated new mining techniques, and expanded mining activities.(From 1877 to 1891, the Rio Tinto Mine was the worlds leading producer of copper.()Image:Panoramica Corta Atalaya2.jpg|thumb|The open-pit Atalaya mine was part of Rio Tintos original operations in Spain.From 1870 through 1925, the company was inwardly focused on fully exploiting the Rio Tinto Mine, with little attention paid to expansion or exploration activities outside of Spain.  The company enjoyed strong financial success until 1914, cooperating with other pyrite producers to control market prices.  However, World War I and its aftermath effectively eliminated the United States as a viable market for European pyrites, leading to a decline in the firms prominence.(Image:Pyrite foolsgold.jpg|thumb|right|Pyrite was a major product of Rio Tintos first mines.The companys failure to diversify during this period led to the slow decline of the company among the ranks of international mining firms.  However, this changed in 1925, when Sir Auckland Geddes succeeded Lord Alfred Milner as chairman.  Geddes and the new management team he installed focused on diversification of the companys investments and operations and reformation of marketing strategy.  Geddes led the company into a series of joint ventures with customers in the development of new technologies, as well as exploration and development of new mines outside of Spain.(Perhaps most significant was the companys investment in copper mines in Rhodesia, which it eventually consolidated into the Corporation.(  These and later efforts at diversification eventually allowed the company to divest from the Rio Tinto mine in Spain.  By the 1950s, Francos nationalistic government had made it increasingly difficult to exploit Spanish resources for the profit of foreigners.(  Rio Tinto Company, supported by its international investments, was able to divest two-thirds of its Spanish operations in 1954 and the remainder over the following years.()Major mergers and acquisitionsLike many major mining companies, the Rio Tinto Group has historically grown through a series of mergers and acquisitions.Early acquisitionsImage:LocationRhodesia.png|thumb|right|Rhodesia was the location of Rio Tintos first major international expansion of mining activities.The companys first major acquisition occurred in 1929, when the company issued stock for the purpose of raising 2.5 million pounds to invest in Rhodesian copper mining companies, which was fully invested by the end of 1930.  The Rio Tinto company consolidated its holdings of these various firms under the Rhokana Corporation by forcing the various companies to merge.(Rio Tintos investment in Rhodesian copper mines did much to support the company through troubled times at its Spanish Rio Tinto operations spanning the Civil War, World War II, and Francos nationalistic policies.  In 1950s the political situation made it increasingly difficult for mostly British and French owners to extract profits from Spanish operations, and the company decided to dispose of the mines from which it took its name.( Thus, in 1954 Rio Tinto Company sold two thirds of its stake in the Rio Tinto mines, disposing of the rest over the following years.(  The sale of the mines financed extensive exploration activities over the following decade.()Merger with Consolidated ZincThe companys exploration activities presented the company with an abundance of opportunities; however it lacked sufficient capital and operating revenue to exploit those opportunities.  This situation precipitated the next, and perhaps most significant, merger in the companys history.  In 1962 Rio Tinto Company merged with the Australian firm Zinc to form the Rio Tinto  Zinc Corporation (RTZ) and its main subsidiary, Conzinc Riotinto of Australia (CRA).  The merger provided Rio Tinto the ability to exploit its new-found opportunities, and gave Consolidated Zinc a much larger asset base.(RTZ and CRA were separately managed and operated, with CRA focusing on opportunities within Australasia and RTZ taking the rest of the world.  However, the companies continued to trade separately, and RTZs ownership of CRA dipped below 50% by 1986.(  Strategic needs of the two companies eventually led to conflicts of interest regarding new mining opportunities, and shareholders of both companies determined a merger was in their mutual best interest.  In 1995, the companies merged into a listed company, in which management was consolidated into a single entity and share holder interests were aligned and equivalent, although maintained as shares in separately named entities.  The merger also precipitated a name change; after two years as RTZ-CRA, RTZ became Rio Tinto plc and CRA became Rio Tinto Limited, referred to collectively as Rio Tinto Group or simply Rio Tinto.(Mergers and acquisitions following Consolidated ZincMajor acquisitions following the Consolidated Zinc merger included Borax, a major producer of borax, bought in 1968,( Utah Copper and BP Australias coal assets which were bought from Petroleum in 1989 and a 70.7% interest in the South Wales operations of & Allied Industries also in 1989.( In 1993, the Company acquired Nerco and also the United States coal mining businesses of Mining Company.(right|thumb|The wordmark of Alcan after its purchase by Rio Tinto. The 2007 acquisition made Rio Tinto the largest aluminium producer in the world.In 2000, Rio Tinto acquired Limited, an Australian company with iron ore and uranium mines, for $2.8 billion.() The takeover was partially motivated as a response to Northern Limiteds 1999 bid to have Rio Tintos Pilbara railway network declared open access.() The Competition and Consumer Commission regulatory body approved the acquisition in August 2000,() and the purchase was completed in October of the same year.() That year Rio Tinto also bought North Ltd and Ashton Mining for 4 billion USD, adding additional resources in aluminium, iron ore, diamonds, and coal.( In 2001 it bought (under Coal and Allied Industries) the Australian coal businesses of the Energy Corporation.(On 14 November 2007, Rio Tinto completed its largest acquisition to date,( purchasing Canadian aluminium company Alcan for $38.1 billion.() Alcans chief executive, Jacynthe Cote, leads the new division, which has been renamed Tinto Alcan and its headquarters situated in Montreal.()M&A activity in 2008 and 2009 has been focused on divestments of assets to raise cash and refocus on core business opportunities.  The company sold three major assets in 2008, raising approximately $3 billion in cash.  In the first quarter of 2009 Rio Tinto has reached agreements to sell its interests in the Corumba iron ore mine and the Jacobs Ranch coal mine, and completed sales of an aluminium smelter in China and the companys potash operations, for an additional estimated $2.5 billion.(In April 2011, Rio Tinto gained a majority stake in Mining.()China Arrests in 2009On 5 July 2009, four Rio Tinto employees were arrested in Shanghai for corruption and espionage.(Rio Tinto iron ore sales team arrested in China Sydney Morning Herald  Business Day)(Rio Tinto: 4 arrested in China on corruption charges  AGI) One of the arrested, Australian citizen Hu, was ...suspected of stealing Chinese state secrets for foreign countries and was detained on criminal charges, according to a spokesman for the Chinese foreign ministry.(Australia tries to limit damage over detention of Rio Tinto staff in China  Telegraph UK) Stern Hu has also been accused of bribery by Chinese steel mill executives for sensitive information during the iron ore contract negotiations.(Hu accused of bribery during negotiation  Yahoo!7 News)()Corporate StatusOrganisationRio Tinto is primarily organised into five operational businesses, divided by product type:()*Rio Tinto Copper  copper and byproducts such as gold, silver, molybdenum, and acid; future home of nickel operations if developed*Tinto Alcan  aluminium, bauxite and alumina*Rio Tinto Energy  coal and uranium*Rio Tinto Diamonds & Minerals  diamonds, industrial minerals such as borax, talc, salt and gypsum and dioxide*Rio Tinto Iron Ore  iron ore and ironThese operating groups are supported by separate divisions providing exploration and function support.(SubsidiariesRio Tinto Group has a complex structure of partly and wholly owned subsidiaries, each held within one of the five operational groups described above.  Major subsidiaries include():Stock structure and ownershipRio Tinto Group is structured as a company, with listings on both the Stock Exchange (symbol: RIO) in London under the name Rio Tinto Plc.( ) and the Securities Exchange (symbol: RIO) in Sydney under the name Rio Tinto Limited()  The dual-listed company structure grants shareholders of the two companies the same proportional economic interests and ownership rights in the consolidated Rio Tinto Group, in such a way as to be equivalent to all shareholders of the two companies actually being shareholders in a single, unified entity.  This structure was implemented in order to avoid adverse tax consequences and regulatory burdens.  In order to eliminate exchange issues, the companys accounts are kept, and dividends paid, in United States dollars.(Rio Tinto is one of the largest companies listed on either exchange.  As such, it is included in the widely-quoted indices for each market: the 100 Index of the London Stock Exchange,( and the 200 index of the Australian Securities Exchange.() LSE-listed shares in Rio Tinto plc can also be traded indirectly on the York Stock Exchange via an Depositary Receipt.()  As of 4 March 2009, Rio Tinto was the fourth-largest publicly listed mining company in the world, with a market capitalization of approximately $34 billion.() As of mid-February 2009, shareholders were geographically distributed 42% in the United Kingdom, 18% in North America, 16% in Australia, 14% in Asia, and 10% in continental Europe.(BHP Billiton bidOn 8 November 2007, rival mining company Billiton announced it was seeking to purchase Rio Tinto Group in an all share deal. This offer was rejected by the board of Rio Tinto as significantly undervaluing the company. Another attempt by BHP Billiton for a takeover, valuing Rio Tinto at $147 billion, was rejected on the same grounds.  Meanwhile, the Chinese Government-owned resources group Chinalco and the US aluminum producer Alcoa purchased 12% of Rio Tintos London-listed shares in a move that would block or severely complicate BHP Billitons plans to buy the company.((  BHP Billitons bid was withdrawn on 25 November 2008, with the BHP citing market instability from the financial crisis of 20082009.()Chinalco investmentOn 1 February 2009, Rio Tinto management announced that they were in talks to receive a substantial equity infusion from Chinalco, a major Chinese state-controlled( mining enterprise, in exchange for ownership interest in certain assets and bonds.  Chinalco is already a major shareholder, having bought up 9% of the companys ownership in a surprise move in early 2008.()  The proposed investment structure reportedly involves $12.3 billion for the purchase of ownership interests of Rio Tinto assets in its iron ore, copper, and aluminium operations, plus $7.2 billion for bonds.  The transaction would bring Chinalcos ownership of the company to approximately 18.5%.()  The deal is still pending approval from regulators in the United States and China, and has not yet been approved by shareholders, although regulatory approval has been received from Germany and the Competition and Consumer Commission.()  The largest barrier to completing the investment may come from Rio Tintos shareholders: support for the deal by shareholders was never overwhelming and has reportedly declined recently() as other financing options (such as a more traditional bond issuance) are beginning to appear more realistic as a viable alternative funding source.((  A shareholder vote on the proposed deal is expected in the third quarter of 2009.(Rio Tinto is believed to have pursued this combined asset and convertible bond sale to raise cash to satisfy its debt obligations, which require payments of $9.0 billion in October 2009 and $10.5 billion by the end of 2010.(  The company has also noted Chinas increasing appetite for commodities, and the potential for increased opportunities to exploit these market trends, as a key factor in recommending the transaction to its shareholders.(In March 2010, it was announced that Chinalco will invest $1.3 billion for a 44.65% stake in Rio Tintos iron ore project in Simandou, Guinea. Rio Tinto retains 50.35% ownership at Simandou.()ManagementImage:120CollinsSt.jpg|thumb|right|upright|Rio Tintos Australian headquarters are located in the Collins Street building in Melbourne, Australia.Under the companys dual-listed company structure, management powers of the Rio Tinto Group are consolidated in a single senior management group led by a of directors and executive committee.  The board of directors has both executive and non-executive members, while the executive committee is composed of the heads of major operational groups.(*Board of Directors**Executive Directors***du Plessis, Chairman***Albanese, Chief executive***Guy Elliott, Chief financial officer**Non-Executive Directors***Sir Clementi***Cox***Sir Eddington***Michael Fitzpatrick***Yves Fortier***Goodmanson***Gould***The Lord Kerr of Kinlochard***Mayhew***TellierOperationsRio Tintos main business is the production of raw materials including copper, iron ore, coal, bauxite, diamonds, uranium, and industrial minerals including titanium dioxide, talc, salt, gypsum, and borates.  Rio Tinto also performs processing on some of these materials, with plants dedicated to processing bauxite into alumina and aluminium, and smelting iron ore into iron.  The company also produces other metals and minerals as byproducts from the processing of its main resources, including gold, silver, molybdenum, sulfuric acid, nickel, potash, lead, and zinc.()  Rio Tinto controls gross assets of $81 billion in value across the globe, with main concentrations in Australia (35%), Canada (34%), Europe (13%), and the United States (11%), and smaller holdings in Africa (3%), South America (3%), and Indonesia (1%).(Rio Tinto is a signatory participant of the Voluntary Principles on Security and Human Rights.Copper and byproducts: Rio Tinto CopperImage:Bingham Canyon April 2005.jpg|thumb|right|The Canyon Mine of Rio Tintos subsidiary, Kennecott Utah Copper.Image:Oyu Tolgoi 23.JPG|The Tolgoi mine is currently under development in Mongolia|thumb|rightCopper was one of Rio Tinto Groups main products from its earliest days operating at the Rio Tinto complex of mines in Spain.  Since that time, the company has divested itself from its original Spanish mines, and grown its copper mining capacity through acquisitions of major copper resources around the world.  The copper groups main active mining interests are Minera Escondida in Chile, the Grasberg Mine on Papua New Guinea, Utah Copper in the United States, Northparkes in Australia, and Palabora in South Africa.  Most of these mines are joint ventures with other major mining companies, with Rio Tintos ownership ranging from 30% to 80%; only Kennecott is wholly owned.  Operations typically include the mining of ore through to production of 99.99% purified copper, including extraction of economically valuable byproducts.()  Together, Rio Tintos share of copper production at its mines totaled nearly 700,000 tonnes, making the company the fourth-largest copper producer in the world.(Rio Tinto Copper continues to seek new opportunities for expansion, with major exploration activities at the Copper project in the United States, La Granja Mine in Peru, and Oyu Tolgoi in Mongolia.  In addition, the company is seeking to become a major producer of nickel, with exploration projects currently underway in the United States and Indonesia.(Although not the primary focus of Rio Tinto Coppers operations, several economically valuable byproducts are produced during the refining of copper ore into purified copper.  Gold, silver, molybdenum, and sulfuric acid are all removed from copper ore during processing.  Due to the scale of Rio Tintos copper mining and processing facilities, the company is also a leading producer of these materials, which drive substantial revenues to the company.(Sales of copper generated 8% of the companys 2008 revenues, and copper and byproduct operations accounted for 16% of underlying earnings.(Rio Tinto also owns the naming rights to Tinto Stadium located in nearby Utah and the home of the League Soccer team, Salt Lake.Aluminium and related products: Rio Tinto AlcanImage:Alcan lynemouth.JPG|thumb|right|The Lynemouth Aluminium Smelter in Northumberland, EnglandThe Rio Tinto Group has consolidated its aluminium-related businesses in its Rio Tinto Alcan division.  Rio Tinto Alcan was formed in late 2007, when Rio Tinto purchased the Canadian company Alcan for $38.1 billion.  Combined with Rio Tintos existing aluminium-related assets, the new Rio Tinto Alcan vaulted to the world number one producer of bauxite, alumina, and aluminium.()  Rio Tinto Alcan kept key leadership from Alcan, and the companys headquarters remain in Montreal.(Tinto Alcan is the worlds leading producer of bauxite (shown here with a US Cent for scale).Rio Tinto Alcan divides its operations into three main business units.  The Bauxite and Alumina unit mines raw bauxite from locations in Australia, Brazil, and west Africa.  The unit then refines the bauxite into alumina at refineries located in Australia, Brazil, Canada, and France.  The Primary Metal business units operations consist of smelting aluminium from alumina, with smelters located in 11 countries around the world.  The Primary Metal group also operates several power plants in order to support the energy-intensive smelting process.  Finally, the Engineered Products unit processes aluminium into derivative products for specialty uses ranging from beverage containers to aerospace applications.(Rio Tinto Alcan has interests in seven bauxite mines and deposits, six alumina refineries and six specialty alumina plants, 26 aluminium smelters, 13 plants, and 120 facilities for the manufacture of specialty products.( The acquisition of Alcan operations in 2007 substantially increased Rio Tintos asset base, revenues and profits: in 2008, 41% of company revenues and 10% of underlying earnings were attributable to Rio Tinto Alcan.(Coal and uranium: Rio Tinto EnergyImage:Ranger Uranium Mine in Kakadu National Park.jpg|thumb|right|The Uranium Mine of Energy Resources of Australia, a Rio Tinto subsidiary.Image:Yellowcake.jpg|right|thumb|Rio Tinto is the third-leading producer of uranium in the world (here as yellowcake ore concentrate).Rio Tinto Energy is a business group of Rio Tinto dedicated to the mining and sale of coal and uranium.()The company focuses on both fuel coal for electricity generation in coal power plants, and coal for use in iron and mills.  The companys coal operations are located in Australia and the United States, mainly operating under its subsidiaries such as Tinto Coal Australia and Tinto Energy America.(  In 2009, Rio Tinto was engaged in an ongoing attempt to sell off assets of Rio Tinto Energy America.  In March 2009, the company agreed to sell a major asset, the Ranch coal mine in Wyoming, to Coal for $761 million, and is continuing to seek buyers for remaining assets in an effort to reduce corporate debt.()Rio Tintos uranium operations are located at two mines: the Uranium Mine of Resources of Australia and the Uranium Mine in Namibia.  The company is the third-largest producer of uranium in the world.  According to Rio Tintos website, the company institutes strict controls and contractual limitations on uranium exports, limiting uses to peaceful, non-explosive uses only.  Such controls are intended to limit use of the companys uranium production to use as fuel for power plants only, and not for use in the production of weapons.() Rio Tinto Energy was responsible for 12% of revenues and 18% of underlying earnings in 2008.(Diamonds: Rio Tinto Diamondsthumb|right|The Diavik diamond mine in the Northwest Territories of CanadaRio Tinto Diamonds operates three diamond mines: the Argyle Diamond Mine in Western Australia (100% ownership), the Diavik Diamond Mine in the Northwest Territories of Canada (60% ownership), and the Murowa Diamond Mine located in Zimbabwe (78% ownership).  Together, these three mines produce 20% of the worlds annual production of rough diamonds,() making Rio Tinto the worlds third-largest producer of mined diamonds.(The diamond business units most advanced exploration project is the Project in Madhya Pradesh, India, where Rio Tinto became the first foreign group to be granted a prospecting license there.() Rio Tinto Diamonds generated 1% of revenues and earnings for Rio Tinto Group in 2008.(Industrial minerals: Rio Tinto MineralsImage:Dampier Salt.jpg|thumb|right|Map of Dampier Salts saltworks in Western Australia.Rio Tinto Minerals is a diverse business group with mining and processing interest in borates, talc, salt, and gypsum. Tinto Borax, with main operations in California and another mine in Argentina, supplies nearly half of the worlds annual demand for refined borates, while the companys Group subsidiary supplies 25% of global talc consumption. The Luzenac Group is also the only arm of the company with continuing active mining operations on the European continent: in addition to mines in North America and Australia, the company also operates a talc mine in southern France.()  The Minerals group is also majority owner of Salt, which produces over 9 million tonnes of salt and 1.5 million tonnes of gypsum annually from its three facilities in northwest Australia.( ) Rio Tinto Minerals accounted for 6% of company revenues, and contributed 3% to earnings in 2008.(On 31 January 2010, the management of U.S. Borax locked out its hourly workforce, replacing the workers with nonunion workers and managers from other Rio Tinto operations. The 560 Longshore and Warehouse Union Local 30 members immediately began a fireside vigil that garnered national and international labor attention.() ILWU filed seveal unfair labor practices against the company, including an illegal lockout claim.(Iron products and titanium: Rio Tinto Iron and Titaniumthumb|left|Pilbara Iron maintains the Pilbara Rail Company to serve its Western Australia iron ore mines.()Rio Tinto Iron and Titanium (RTIT) groups together the companys iron and titanium production.  Rio Tinto is the worlds second-largest supplier of iron ore,( producing over 153 million tonnes in calendar year 2008.(  The companys major iron ore mines and development projects are located in Australia, South America, Canada, India, and Guinea.  Major subsidiaries held within RTIT include Iron, majority interest in the Iron mines, and the Ore Company of Canada.()  The company also has smelting facilities for the production of iron and steel, limited in size in comparison to the massive amount of iron ore produced, at et Titane in Canada() and HISmelt in Australia.(Titanium dioxide is mined at three locations in Canada, South Africa, and Madagascar, and refined at QIT-Fer et Titanes Canadian facilities.(  Major subsidiaries include Bay Minerals of South Africa and Madagascar Minerals.()  In 2008, Rio Tinto produced 1.524 million tonnes of titanium dioxide,( or approximately 27% of the estimated global production of 5.6 million tonnes.()Rio Tinto Iron and Titanium generated a large portion of the companys revenues and earnings in 2008, accounting for 27% and 52%, respectively, of company-wide operating results.(Financial resultsRio Tinto Groups revenues and earnings have grown substantially in the 20032010 time period, with one of the largest increase attributable to the companys 2007 acquisition of Alcan.  Although operating margin is significantly impacted by the market prices of the various commodities it produces, Rio Tinto has remained profitable over its recent history and consistently generated positive cash flows from operations.((Preliminary Results 2009)(Public impactInvolvement with Axis powers in World War IIRio Tintos status as a mainly British-owned company, located in Spain and producing pyrites  an important material for military applications  created a complicated set of circumstances for the companys operation in the 1930s and 1940s. During the Civil War, the region in which Rio Tintos mines were located came under the control of Francos nationalists in 1936.  However, Franco increasingly intervened in the companys operations, at times requisitioning pyrite supplies for use by Spain and its Axis allies Germany and Italy, forcing price controls on the companys production, restricting exports, and threatening nationalisation of the mines.  Although company management (and indirectly, the British government) managed to counteract some of these efforts by Franco, much of the mines pyrite production was channeled to Axis powers before and during World War II.  Nonetheless, Francos meddling caused the mines production and profitability to fall precipitously during and after the war, leading the company to ultimately exit from its Spanish operations in 1954.()CriticismsEnvironmentRio Tinto Group, like many other companies in extractive industries, has been widely targeted by environmentalist groups for its mining activities.  Opposition to the company focuses on its mining methods due to environmental degradation, the companys coal operations for their contribution to warming, and uranium operations for environmental and nuclear technology concerns.thumb|right|Rio Tintos Grasberg mine in Indonesia has been the focus of environmental concerns. (Photo by Alfindra Primaldhi)Perhaps the most significant environmental criticism to date has come from the of Norway, which divested itself from Rio Tinto shares and banned further investment due to environmental concerns.  Claims of severe environmental damages related to Rio Tintos engagement in the mine in Indonesia led Government Pension Fund of Norway to exclude Rio Tinto from its investment portfolio. The fund, which is said to be the worlds second-largest pension fund, sold shares in the company valued at  (US$ 855 million) to avoid contributing to environmental damages caused by the company.()Norwegian Minister of FinanceRio Tinto disputes the claims of environmental damage at the Grasberg mine, and states that the company has long maintained an excellent record on environmental issues.()Labour and human rightsSafety and labour rights concerns have been raised against Rio Tinto by unions and political action groups, in particular the Forestry, Mining and Energy Union (CFMEU). The CFMEU ran a campaign against the company after it tried to de-unionise its workforce after the introduction of the Howard Governments Workplace Relations Act 1996.Activist groups have also expressed concern regarding Rio Tintos operations in Papua New Guinea, which they allege were one catalyst of the Bougainville separatist crisis.() The British anti-poverty charity on Want has also criticised Rio Tinto for its complicity in the serious human rights violations which have been occurred near the mines it operates in Indonesia and Papua New Guinea.() The 2001 British documentary Coconut Revolution tells the story of the eventual success of the local peoples in overcoming the plans of the company and the New Papuan army.On 31 January 2010, Rio Tinto locked out nearly 600 workers from a mine in Boron, California.() The workers, represented by the local Longshore and Warehouse Union, had rejected a contract proposal, claiming it would scrap their seniority system and allow the company to hire more nonunion employees.Rio Tinto is not, however, universally condemned for its ethical behavior.  The company has won an award for ethical behavior, the Worldaware Award for Sustainable Development in 1993.() The award, although given by an independent committee, is sponsored by another multinational corporation (in this case, the sponsor was and Lyle). Rio Tinto has, in turn, sponsored its own WorldAware award, the Rio Tinto Award for Long-term Commitment.() The British charity Worldaware ceased to exist in March 2005.(About Worldaware) These awards, awarded to extractive industries who make some environmental commitments in order to deflect the more general criticisms of their operations, are referred to by corporate watchdog groups as Greenwashing.()()()See also* as an investmentReferencesExternal links* * Rio Tinto Coal Australia (RTCA) corporate website* * MBendi Rio Tinto information page, including a detailed list of related companies and Rio Tinto activity worldwidelist1Tinto TintoTinto GroupTinto GroupTinto GroupTinto (entreprise)Tinto GroupTinto GroupTintoTinto Groupja:Tinto GroupTinto (przedsibiorstwo)Tinto (empresa)TintoTintoTinto plcTinto Groupzh:
1099729
Eric_Varley
alma_mater        CollegeEric Graham Varley, Baron Varley, PC (11 August 1932  29 July 2008) was an English politician and former Cabinet Minister on the right wing of the Labour Party.Varley was born in Poolsbrook near Staveley, Chesterfield, Derbyshire and left school at 15 to become a craftsman, first in the local iron works and then for the local mining industry. He was active in the National Union of Mineworkers, and became a branch secretary of the union in 1955, joining the Labour Party the same year. After a period at College, Varley won the NUM nomination to be the Labour candidate for his home town, where the sitting Labour of Parliament (MP) George Benson was retiring from Parliament. He was narrowly selected in June 1963 and duly held the Chesterfield seat in the 1964 election.Despite rebelling against the governments application to join the Common Market in 1967, Varley became an Assistant Whip later that year, and Parliamentary Private Secretary to Prime Minister Wilson in November 1968. He served briefly as a junior minister under Benn at the Ministry of Technology from 1969. During the Labour Partys period of opposition in the early 1970s Varley was Chairman of the Trade Union Group of MPs, and became spokesman on fuel and power.Varley was appointed of State for Energy in March 1974 when Labour returned to power. The appointment of an NUM-sponsored MP helped the government end the NUM strike which had led the previous government to ration electricity to three days a week. Varley subsidised the Coal Board and chose a British design for new nuclear power stations over an American rival. He also began the procedure to nationalise North Sea oil. During the Common Market referendum Varley advocated a No vote but was not prominent in the campaign. Immediately afterwards Wilson swapped Varleys and Benns posts, so that Varley was effectively promoted to Secretary of State for Industry. In November 1976 Varley suffered an embarrassing public defeat when he determined to shut down the loss-making Chrysler car factory: the Cabinet forced him to increase its subsidy to keep it open. Varley continued the governments slow nationalisation programme by appointing Edwardes to take over at British Leyland. When Labour went into opposition in 1979 Varley was elected to the Shadow Cabinet in fifth place. He led Healeys campaign for the party leadership in 1980 and defeated the left-winger Atkinson for the post of party Treasurer (an office he had coveted for some years) in 1981. He served as opposition spokesman on employment, and resisted an attempt by Foot to replace him with Kinnock (whom he disliked) in 1982.After Kinnocks election as party leader in 1983 Varley announced that he would retire from Parliament at the next general election. However, he was appointed as Chairman of Coalite PLC, a private company manufacturing coal-based products including a  coke-like smokeless fuel of the same name, and resigned his seat in January 1984. Ironically, this opened the way for Tony Benn to return to the House of Commons as Varleys successor in the seat. Varley served five years at Coalite, and later held other directorships. He was given a life peerage as Baron Varley, of Chesterfield in the County of Derbyshire on a Labour Party nomination in 1990.Eric Varley died in 2008 of cancer at his home.()References External links * |-|-|-VarleyVarley
1103627
St_Helens,_Merseyside
St Helens () is a large town()() in Merseyside, England. It is the largest settlement and administrative centre of the Borough of St Helens with a population of just over 100,000, part of an area with a total population of 176,843 at the time of the 2001 Census.()  The Town was officially incorporated as a Borough in 1868 responsible for the administration of the 4 townships consisting of Eccleston, Parr, Sutton and Windle, with the larger responsibility as a Borough established in 1887 (superseded in 1974 by the larger still Borough).St Helens is situated in the far south west of the historic county of Lancashire, in West England,  north of the Mersey. The town historically lay within the ancient Lancashire division of West Derby known as a hundred.()The local area developed rapidly during the revolution of the 18th and 19th century into a significant centre for mining,()() and glassmaking.()()  Both prior and during this time it was also home to a cotton and linen industry (notably sail making)() that lasted until the mid-19th century as well as salt,( lime and alkali pits,( copper smelting,()()() and brewing.()Today, St Helens is very much a commercial town. The main industries have since left, become outdated, or have been outsourced leaving the float and patterned rolled glass producer Pilkingtons, a world leader in their industry, as the towns one remaining large industrial employer. Previously the town had been home to Beechams (now part of GlaxoSmithKline), the Gamble family of the Alkali Works, glass (bought out by the Belgian nationalised Durobor),() United Glass Bottles (U.G.B.), Triplex (owned by Pilkington, farmed out to India), Daglish Foundry (closed and demolished 1939),() and Greenalls (now located in nearby Warrington).HistoryPre-historyThe southern regions of the ancient Lancashire county was at least partially settled by the Celtic Brigantes() who were subsequently subjugated by the Romans during their 1st Century conquest, with nearby Wigan suggested as a location for the Roman settlement of Coccium.()  No archaeological evidence has yet been uncovered to tie either group specifically to the St Helens area, however Eccleston derives its name from either the Latin Ecclesia or Welsh Eglwys suggesting a common link to a church (though none are known in that township until the 19th century).(The first recorded settlements are Manors, Parishes and Titled Lands listed in the book in the 11th century. The titled lands would have encompassed the modern townships as part of their fiefdoms, though it may be inferred from listed tithes that the land was populated before then.(((Formation of the townright|thumb|200px|St Helins Chapel as recorded on a map of 1610.right|thumb|200px|The Sherdley Old Hall farmhouse, built in 1671 in the Elizabethan style, a Grade II listed building.right|thumb|200px| St Hellens as recorded in 1818 OS.right|thumb|200px| A contemporary sketch of the original Town Hall, built 1839.right|thumb|200px| The 1839 town hall after the fire of 1872.St Helens did not exist as a town in its own rights until as late as the middle of the 19th Century. The town has a complex evolution spurred on by rapid population growth in the region during the period of the Revolution. Between 1629 and 1839 St Helens grew from a small collection of houses surrounding an old chapel,( to a village,(( before finally becoming the significant urban centre of the four primary Manors and surrounding townships that make up the modern Town.(((()The origin of the name St Helens stretches back at least to a chapel of ease dedicated to St Elyn,( The Section dedicated to Windle.)() the earliest documented reference to which is in 1552.(( The first time the Chapel is formally referred to appears to be 1558 when Thomas Parr of Parr bequeathed a sum of money to a stock towards finding a priest at St. Helens Chapel in Hardshaw, and to the maintenance of Gods divine service there for ever, if the stock go forward and that the priest do service as is aforesaid.(  Early maps show that it originally existed on Chapel Lane, around the approximate site of the modern pedestrianised Church Street. Historically this would have fallen within the berewick of Hardshaw, within greater Township of Windle (making up the southern border)()( abutting onto the open farmland of Parr to the East, and Sutton and Eccleston to the South and West respectively.The completion of the Book in 1086 reveals several Manors existed at that time although there are no specific references to St Elyn, or mentions of the particular vill or villages. Windle is first recorded on some maps as Windhull (or variations thereof) in 1201,( Bold in 1212 (as Bolde)( The Section dedicated to Bold.) and Parr (or Parre) in 1246,( The Section dedicated to Parr.) whilst Sutton( The Section dedicated to Sutton.) and Ecclestone( The Section dedicated to Eccleston.) are expected to have composed part of the Widnes fee (a hereditary entitlement of ownership) under a Knight or Earl.( It is known that The Hospitallers held lands in the area of Hardshaw as early as 1292, known as Crossgate(( (which may be referred to by the long built over Cross Street in the town centre located beneath the modern College campus) and many of the original Parishes, Townships and local areas are named after the families that owned the land between the 11th and 18th century.((The Ecclestone family owned the Eccleston township.( Their ancestral home dates to 1100, built by Hugh Ecclestone and are referred to throughout the period until the 18th century when they departed for nearby Southport()The manor of Parr remained in control of the Parr family and their descendants throughout the 13th to the early 15th Century when a distant relative of the original family line Parr, 1st Marquess of Northampton (brother of Henry VIIIs wife Catherine Parr) sold the manor to the Byroms of Lowton.( A family that later supported the Royalists during the Civil War and resulted in the death of Henry Byrom (son of the Lord of the Manor) dying at the of Edgehill.( The Section dedicated to the Byroms.)The extensive lands of Sutton Manor stretched across the open and flat land leading towards the Mersey. The Manors name itself is of unknown origin, but the land within the enlarged estate refer to several leading families including the Elton Head, Ravenhead, and Sherdley.(  In 1212 William de Daresbury was the title holder of the Manors.( The Sherdley family trace back to the Northales who had been settled in the area since at least 1276 when they are referred to as plaintiffs in a boundary dispute with the Lords of Rainhill.(Windle contained the smaller Hardshaw, described as a Berewick( in the Domesday book. It was in Hardshaw that Chapel Lane (containing the aforementioned Chapel of St Elyn) was constructed. The Windle Family were Lords of the Manor and Township from the Norman period onward, before ceding control to the Gerards of Bryn.(In 1139 the Peerage of Derby was created with Norman descendent Robert De Ferrers installed. Subsequently the region passed on to of Gaunt, and eventually the Stanley family. Their ancestral home was eventually established in the nearby Knowsley area (to the west of the modern St. Helens borough), with the foundation of a hunting lodge in the 15th century and subsequently Hall in the 18th century. The Earl of Derbys lands encompassed a region from Liverpool to Manchester, and to the north beyond Lancaster and were primarily turned to meeting the pastoral needs of the people.((Throughout this period of time the area was predominantly arable land(( and was noted for its large swathes of moss, heath and bog land while elsewhere in parts it was covered by the greater Mersey Forest( (the larger Community Forest was not established until much later).()In 1552 the Chapel of St Elyn was noted as consisting only of a challis and a lytle bell.( The chapel was described as being at the crux of the four townships of Eccleston, Parr, Sutton and Windle,( and lay on the intersecting roads that criss-crossed the area and that also served as a major thoroughfare for traffic between Lancashire towns such as Liverpool, Ormskirk, Lathom( and the Cheshire region south of the Mersey.(  The transport link is attested to by the existence of Chester Lane (the modern B5419 is much foreshortened) that originally wound through the west of the town heading South to the Mersey crossing point of Warrington( and beyond to the ancient Chester Road (that now makes up part of the modern A56) that stretched between the historic town of its name and the Manchester townships.( The Chapel also sat directly between the port town of Liverpool, and the landlocked Manchester townships that would become important in the development of the greater area of both St Helens and Wigan.(As a busy thoroughfare it is suggested by Historian and genealogist William Farrer that a village existed in the vicinity for centuries,( later sharing the name of the Chapel. It is known from the Diaries of a local Puritan by the name of Martindale,() that by the time the Kings Head Inn was constructed in 1629 on the great road (taken to refer to all or part of Chester Lane) between Warrington and Ormskirk, a number of houses, farms and manors counted amongst the properties in the local vicinity and general area.(  Martindale notes that by 1618 that the original Chapel had been demolished and rebuilt( in the same vicinity. In 1678 a building was converted for use as a meeting place for the Society of Friends by George Shaw of Bickerstaffe. Local historians believe the building had been used for another purpose long before 1678. The Quaker Friends Meeting House, as it is now known, is a Grade II building.The strong link to Roman Catholicism in the area was maintained throughout this period by the eventual Lords of Sutton Manor, the De Holland family starting in 1321,( and it is proposed that Thomas Holland, a local Jesuit Priest tried for arrested and tried for high treason in October 1642 as taking orders by authority of the see of Rome and returning to England the first step in the process of beatification was allowed by Pope Leo XIII in 1886.(  Conversely Roger Holland was burnt at the stake for heresy when he continued to his professed belief in the churches some 100 years earlier in 1558 during the Persecution of the Mary I.(  It is suggested that Ravenhead Hall was the site of a Catholic Chapel during the most severe of Catholic Persecutions during the 17th and 18th century.( Whilst the Lathom family maintained Rainfords close connections, as did the Ecclestons.((Less well known is the Windle connection to witches. In 1602 two women were sent to Lancaster for trial, while a decade later Isobel Roby was submitted to Sir Thomas Gerard, accused of upsetting the ship upon which Princess Anne of Denmark was arriving . She was finally executed at Lancaster, along with the Pendle and Salmesburg witches, 20 August 1612By 1746 St Helens, composed of the greater area of the 4 Townships (and their collieries) beyond Prescot, was referred to in a Statement in Parliament related to the extension of the Liverpool to Prescot Turnpike.()()The rapid growth of St Helens at the epicentre of the townships is attested to by several authors. The Cyclopaedia states in 1839 that Saint Helens, Lancashire, is in the township of Windle, in the chapelry of St Helens, Prescott parish. The township contains 3,540 acres, and had in 1831 a population of 5,825. The town has risen into importance of late years( In contrast by 1854 (20 years prior to the establishment of St Helens the borough) George Routledge states a reversal of the roles St Helens, originally an inconsiderable village, is now a very thriving town and later describes the town as a ...may be said to contain the four townships of Sutton, Parr, Windle and Eccleston.()  The composition of the town described by Routledge largely mirrors those observations made by Samuel Lewis in 1848( and later still in 1874 by John Marius Wilson() and John Bartholemew in 1887.()Census figures from 1801 suggest the population of the District Area of St Helens to be 12,500() which by 1861 had reached between 37,631 and 55,523( (John Marius Wilson placing populace at the lower number, with total households at the specific figure of 6,539) in the wider area( with St Helens itself comprising a population of 20,176 in 3,577 households.(  The Ordnance Survey of 1843 shows St Helens as the significant urban centre()The original Town Hall was constructed in 1839 and described by Wilson in 1874 as in the Italian style, with a Corinthian portico; and contains a lock-up, a news room, and a large hall for courts, concerts, balls, and public meetings.(  It wasnt until 1852 that the Civil Parish of St Helens was instituted (noted in 1874 by Wilson as more extensive than the town().On 2 February 1868 Queen Victoria granted a Charter of Incorporation, defining St Helens officially as a Municipal Borough. The first election of Councillors took place on 9 May the same year, followed by the first Town Council meeting on 18 May.( Twenty years later in 1887 St Helens became a County Borough granting them two representatives in Parliament.(in 1894 the Parish of St Helens was officially incorporated by the 1893 St Helens Corporation Act.(() This was achieved by the abolition of the Civil Parishes of Parr, Sutton and amalgamation of their townships. The Civil Parishes of Eccleston and Windle both ceded a portions of their areas over to St Helens.(St Helens, in the sense of the modern Borough, covers areas traditionally not associated with the town. The 1974 creation of the Ceremonial County of Merseyside appended the former districts of Haydock, Newton-le-Willows and Rainford, and parts of Billinge-and-Winstanley and Ashton-in-Makerfield urban districts, along with part of Rural District, all from the administrative county of Lancashire. The urban sprawl of St Helens was already extended up to the boundary lines of places such as Haydock and Rainhill, where inhabitants may consider themselves either part of either both St Helens the Town or Borough, or just the Borough.Industrial Developmentright|thumb|200px|Beechams Clock Tower built in 1877.right|thumb|200px|The Town Hall loses its steeple a second time, permanently, in 1913.right|thumb|200px|Steam rises from The Hotties in St Helens town centre in the 1970s, water warmed by the Pilkingtons factory was pumped into the canal via the gusher and was warm enough to support tropical fish. The canal is still a popular fishing site.Until the mid-18th century the local industry was almost entirely based on small scale home based initiatives such as linen weaving.(  The landscape was dotted with similarly small scale excavation and mining operations, primarily for clay and peat, but also notably for coal and its the coal to which the town owes its initial growth and development( and (subsequently) the symbiotic relationship shared with the coal dependent copper smelting and glass industries.Sitting bare on the Lancashire Coalfield the town was built both physically and metaphorically on coal; the original motto on the borough councils coat of arms was Ex Terra Lucem (roughly translated from Latin to From the Ground, Light)()()()() and local collieries employed up to 5,000 men as late as the 1970s. During the boom years of the British coal industry (with 1913 the peak year of production with 1 million being employed in UK mining industry) the St.Helens division of the and Cheshire Miners Federation (the local miners union) had the largest membership (10%) of that federation.(The discovery of winnable coal seams is mentioned in 1556, referred to as Beds of cinders or coke...have been discovered three feet thick( during the digging of a clay pit( and commonly is attributed to the Eltonhead family (Elton Head Road, modern B5204, shares the name of the family) whilst reference to the significant distribution of potsherds( during excavation suggest that some light industry had been under way for some time prior (suggested to date back to the 13th Century) and the clay and pottery industries lasted in the area through to the early 20th Century.(( A dispute arose between the Landlord Bolds and the Tennant Eltonheads, eventually resulting in an agreement to compensate the Bold family.((The majority of the land prior to 1700 had been turned over to arable farming since at least the 12th century according to the historical family records of William De Daresbury. The township of Sutton was recorded as by itself being assessed at four plough-lands.(  Plow or ploughlands are assessed at  apiece.( Available online at Internet Archive http://www.archive.org/details/maninadaptationc00cohe) The pastoral nature of the land in the local area was common even in 1901 with William Farrer noting of Eccleston that the country is of an undulating nature and principally dedicated to agriculture, fields of rich and fertile soil being predominant( and describing the produce as chiefly potatoes, oats, and wheat on a clayey soil which alternates with peat.( Even so, Farrer also notes that several old quarries and shafts still existed within the area while also making reference to a brewery at Portico, and a pottery near Prescot, while glass, watchmakers tools, and mineral waters are also manufactured.(Two hundred years earlier and Farrer may well have seen a different sight as St Helens was scarred and pitted by shallow mining operations, often quickly abandoned, left to flood and exceedingly prone to collapse. The primitive mining techniques, and limited ability to bail out gathering water left many pits with short lifespans. Complaints are recorded in Sutton Heath in particular to the plans to expand out the mining across the town, but the lure of a stable income ultimately won out against whatever reservations were held.( 100 years later, Farrer might be equally surprised to find the town knocking back offers of mining excavation, when in 2009 the Council rejected a planning application for an open cast mine effectively underlining the finality of the decline of coal mining in the area.()In the 18th century however coal was an enabling force for the town that opened up opportunities for further commercial and industrial developments,( which in turn drove demand for the expeditious movement of raw goods not simply out of the town (coal to Liverpool to fuel its shipping and steel works for instance, but also its salt works() but also in promoting an influx of raw products for processing. The symbiotic relationship of St Helens to its transport links is made evident through claims made to Parliament in 1746 for maintenance, and extension of the Turnpike road after localised flooding had damaged it.((It is clear that St Helens development owes as much to its location on the south Lancashire Coalfield as it does the fact that Liverpool, Manchester, Chester and other centres of industry were not and yearned for the fossil fuel of choice.(It was essential therefore for the town to maintain, and invest further, in transport links and promote itself as a hub for the growth of Liverpool, ably providing raw materials chiefly due to its location and promising transport links. Liverpool, recognising the need for a ready supply of coal for their forges, responded with a petition for the extension of the Liverpool to Prescot Turnpike.( This soon developed into a far more forward thinking development to be at the heart of the Industrial Revolution; canals.Originally mooted was the concept to make the Sankey Brook navigable, but its eventual result was a full man made canal linking St. Helens to the River Mersey and the city of Liverpool. The Canal was opened in 1757, and extended in 1775, to transport coal from the pits in Ravenhead, Haydock and Parr to Liverpool, and for raw materials to be shipped to St Helens.The transport revolution centred on the region encouraged an influx of industry to the sparsely populated area. With industry came job opportunities and population growth. Between 1700 St Helens grew from a sparsely populated array of manor houses and their tenants into a sprawling span of mining operations.((Owing primarily to the abundance of coal reserves, the quality of local sand, the near availability of Cheshire salt( glass making is known to have been an ongoing industry in Sutton area since at least 1688 when the French John Leaf Snr is recorded paying the Eltonhead family 50 for a lease of 2 acres of Suttons Lower Hey. The glass industry got a significant lift with the Crown authorised British Cast Plate Glass Company established in Ravenhead in 1786(( that latched onto the success of similar enterprises to set the region as the market leader for glass.The foundation of the companies owed as much to Industrial leaders (and their money) from outside the town, as much to its natural resources. The synchronous development of the steam engine was however the significant development, with Watts stationary steam engine design leading the way. Now able to pump water from deeper than ever before, mines could be driven to find even more dense seams.( At the same time, the growth in using such machinery (for mills, forges, ships both domestic and foreign) increased the demand exponentially for coal - and the town responded in due course.(Land exchanged hands in St Helens rapidly, as established families moved out of the growing towns filled with the working classes, to more gentrified areas in less industrially developed regions. In their place came men of money, self made wealthy Industrialists such as John Mackay (who first leased land in St Helens in the 1760s from George III before buying the land constituting Ravenhead Farm from the Archbishop of York), Michael Hughes, the Gambles, and later Thomas Beecham, Thomas Greenall and the Pilkingtons(( willing and able to take advantage of the situation. A few remained such as the Gerards of Windle Hall. They took it upon themselves to avail their land to professionals, and were successful enough to expand out their control to Bryn and Garswood.(One of the first major industries to grow out of the transport innovations in the region was Copper Smelting.( The Parys Mining company, led by Michael Hughes, arranged to lease land from John Mackay on land close to the newly constructed Sankey Canal at Ravenhead (where Ravenhead Colliery had since been established).(( This allowed copper ore carried from Amlech in North Wales to arrive in the St Helens region via the Mersey directly at the point where coal was being excavated to fire the forges of industry. Some 10,000 tons of copper ore yielding over 1,300 tons of copper passed along this route.(( At the same time the Gerards were renting out land in Blackbrook to the Patten & Co company from nearby Warrington. The company smelted using the Gerards own coal, then moved the coal downstream from a private wharf on the navigable brook.(The boom was not to last however, and by 1783 the coal industry leaders such as Mackay, Sarah Clayton and Thomas Case were all dead, penniless or both as a global constriction on coal shipments. An over reliance on shipping to the USA during the period of the War of Independence 1775-1783 brought ruin to many and was to lead to the permanent loss of several smaller industries.( It took partnership and coordination with other industries for the Mining industry to recover, and with the embargo lifted with the US the towns troubles were soon overcome if not forgotten, and nor would this be the last troubling incident.(The demand for chemicals such as alkali brought meant it wasnt long before the Gamble family started their lime and alkali pits, fulfilling the final need of the glass industry and saving on import costs. The growing demand for chemical processing also contributed heavily to the growth of Widnes.The and Manchester Railway was finished in 1830 passing through the southern edge of the town at Rainhill and St Helens Junction, and furthering its economic development as a centre of industry.(The decline of the mining industryThe last coal mine located close to the town centre (Ravenhead Colliery) and those that were located in the outlying districts of St Helens, including Clock Face (Clock Face Colliery), Sutton, (Bold Colliery), Sutton Heath (Lea Green Colliery), Haydock (Lyme Pit, Wood Pit, Old Boston), were closed during a period that lasted from the nationalisation of the deep coal mining industry in 1947 until the early 1990s. By 1992 all the mines had been shut, with Sutton Manor Colliery, the last to go in St Helens proper, finally closing its gates on 24 May 1991. The collapse of the coal mining industry in St. Helens was the consequence of the implementation of government energy policy, which policy was opposed by the National Union of Mineworkers during the year-long Miners Strike of 1984-1985. After the collapse of the miners strike in March 1985, St. Helens was but one of dozens of towns in the UK that was immediately set to lose a long standing employer owing to the government maintaining that the deep mining of coal was no longer an economically viable proposition in most British coalfields. In the case of both Sutton Manor and Bold Collieries, it was estimated that when they were closed they each still had up to 40 years of winnable coal reserves.()()  The last colliery in the modern borough and in the St Helens area of the South Lancashire Coalfield, was Parkside, in Newton-le-Willows, which was closed in 1992.The Modern TownEmploymentImage:PilkingtonHeadOfficeStHelens.jpg|right|thumb|200px|The distinctive blue Pilkingtons Head Office, a Grade II listed building constructed in 1959-63 designed by Fry and Drew.The glass industry is no longer the major employer it once was, however it still employs over a thousand people in the town.(Taken from St Helens Casino Bid Background Information 1.4.1) The large Pilkington Brothers works, founded in 1826, dominates the towns industrial quarter and still produces all the UKs output of flat glass.In 1994 planning permission was sought out for a link road connecting the M62 directly with the town centre.() The development included a 5m retail and commercial property project in the Ravenhead area that had seen successive business closures with the folding of UGB and Ravenhead Glass.(HousingSt Helens is still predominately divided into the quarters of the original four townships, inside which exist period developments and housing estates. The Town centre is predominately Terraced Housing dating to the late 19th century onwards through to the 1930s. Development from that point focused out on the wider areas of Parr and Sutton that were largely undeveloped until that point.Between 1930 and 2000 there were several phased developments giving the town an artificial landscape dominated by large expanses of housing estates in their own unique building styles dependent upon the era in which they were designed and constructed. For instance Parrs Councourse Way is a semicircular web structure of concrete fabricated buildings built for the miners. The pebble dashed exterior is distinctive enough to give the estate the name Cement City. Elsewhere the New Street Estate known locally as Beth Ave, after the primary access on New Street, was stigmatised from the beginning as its modern angular construction (with distinctive angled roof) and vivid red brick led to it being called Lego Land.Partnerships are the largest association in St Helens, responsible for the administration of over 13,000 housing properties. The Liverpool based Riverside group are the largest organisation in Merseyside, and hold a significant share in St Helens including Residential Care (such as Holley Court). Independent organisations such as Extracare Charitable Trust operate the Reeve Court development on the border of Rainhill/Sutton on Eltonhead Road.Retailright|thumb|200px|The view down into the Town Centre, with Beechams Clock Tower in view.The towns shopping area is centred on the parish church of St Helens, the original site of St Marys open market. The open market was later replaced by an awned covered market that populated Chapel Lane and the locale.The current Church Square shopping centre was built in the early 1970s and surrounds St Helens on 3 sides. Church Street, the main high street, runs parallel to Church Square and is sandwiched by the towns second shopping centre known as The Hardshaw Centre. These primary centres contain many of the most popular British retail chains such as Boots, BHS, Topshop and Marks & Spencer. The other main shopping streets in the town centre include the more traditional small store based Bridge Street, Duke Street and Westfield Street populated by independent specialists.The town centre has several supermarkets including mainstream stores such as Asda and Tesco, as well as smaller stores such as Lidl and the Co-Op. Morrisons retain three stores located in the Eccleston, Sutton and Earlestown areas of the town, whilst Tesco opened a second superstore in Haydock in 2006. There is also a Tesco superstore in Earlestown, which is on a former Safeway site and many smaller Tesco Express and Tesco Metro stores. A new Tesco Extra store is set to open in October 2011 on the outskirts of the town centre to replace the existing superstore, which is expected to be replaced by a new retail outlet or a new bus terminal for the town.Outside of the town centre, traditional shopping streets still exist in several areas including Fingerpost, Chain Lane, Ashtons Green Drive, The Concourse (Parr), Sutton (Peckers Hill Road) and the High Street and Park Road South areas of Newton-le-Willows. These share a mix of small chain stores and independent companies.St Helens has two major retail parks, one on either side of the St Helens Linkway. The older of these, St Helens Retail Park, is home to several discount stores and wholesale retailers such as Maxx, Aldi, Iceland, Tiles and Mill. The larger Ravenhead Retail Park houses more large scale mainstream retail stores, such as PC World, Currys, Next, B&Q and Boots. Ravenhead Retail Park is among the top 10 largest retail parks in the UK and continues to attract further investment and phased construction, developing on land. The same area (in particular the old United Glass Bottles site) is currently undergoing landscaping for the development of the new St. Helens RLFC stadium and the construction of a Tesco Extra supermarket, to replace the smaller Tesco supermarket in the town centre.()Major investment is currently transforming former industrial land for use as hotels, shopping areas and housing after an initial landscape grading and character assessment project was concluded in late 2005 by Land Use Consultants on behalf of St Helens Council.()Urban Regeneration Projectsright|thumb|200px|Modern apartments, part of a major redevelopment of the Town Centre.right|thumb|200px|The Green Man art installation on The Duckeries in Parr. Part of Project Re:new.Since the millennium() St Helens has become a focus for a whole borough scheme of Urban Regeneration initiatives in coordination with local Housing Authorities, Business and Art Projects in addition to European, Regional and Central Government funding such as the Neighbourhood Renewal Fund,() the North West Regional Development Agency() and The Mersey Partnership() as part of the European Regional Development Fund()The whole project is coordinated by St Helens Council under their umbrella corporate branding St Helens; The Heart of the North West() with an emphasis on promoting the location of the town as a vital hub of the region, to encourage investment and the development of business links.()()In 2007 the Brand New St Helens project was launched() and published their Development Review Document.()  The report set out the achievements in the years since the millennium and set out the future development projects for the town including the wholly rebuilt College Campus, and Cowley Language College (formerly Cowley High). The document also lays out retail, leisure and tourism developments for the Town.Local Projects such as Re:new St Helens() operated in conjunction with Helena Housing was originally set up in 2006 in an effort to initially make the Parr area of St Helens a better place to live, work and be part of. The schemes success led to it being expanded to other identified areas in need of redevelopment including Four Acre (in Clock Face), Thatto Heath and the North of the Town Centre.(The Re:new projects coordinate a Partnership Board to meet the needs of local residents in conjunction with local service providers such as the Council, Local Education Authority, Local Healthcare, Housing Associations and the Police to help improve services, identify local priorities and make changes with an aim to tackle the quality of life issues which matter most to local people.( The scheme has been responsible for the redevelopment of The Duckeries and Gaskell Park in Parr that both achieved Green Flag status in 2008()The George Street Quarter regeneration programme left an impressive stamp on the town. The George Street area receives foot traffic from the railway station so the area was enhanced to leave a positive impression on tourists. Major improvements were made to building exteriors, parking, security, street furniture and paving. This has attracted several new businesses to the quarter including award-winning restaurants. The surrounding areas are now receiving attention, with the Hardshaw Centre receiving a new car park exit stairway into the George Street quarter. The stairway spirals around a tall pointed metal structure and is named The Needle. However this new and modern looking stairway is in stark contrast to the brown, square and brick built Hardshaw Centre.The main shopping areas, Church Street and Church Square, are currently undergoing extensive regeneration and there is a proposal for Duke Street, which extends into the town centre, to also receive funding.Historic and notable buildingsright|thumb|200px|A tinctured period postcard of the new (and current) Town Hall as it would have appeared in 1876.right|thumb|200px| An artists rendition of the Quaker Friends Meeting House, a Grade II listed building.The modern Town Hall built in 1876 to replace the original (damaged by a fire in 1871); its clock tower originally had a steeple but this was destroyed in a fire in 1913.In the centre of the modern town centre, adjacent to the town hall, is the Gamble Institute, built in 1896 and named after Sir David Gamble, who was the first mayor and who also gifted the land for the building. Today, the Gamble Institute building serves as the central library and also houses other municipal offices and archives.Other buildings of note are: The Friends Meeting House, Church Street. This attractive stone-built Grade II listed hall has been used for Quaker worship for over 300 years since its establishment, in 1678, by George Shaw of Bickerstaffe. A sign at the front of the building reads so used since 1678, partly leading local historians to believe the building had been used for another purpose for quite a number of years before 1678. The building & garden have been recently restored and are an important element of the George Street Conservation Area. The sundial over the door of the meeting house is dated 1753, while a curiosity in the garden is a huge glacial boulder, said to have been deposited from the Lake District following the last ice age.()The Beecham Clock Tower, Westfield Street - which is now part of St Helens College. This was the original headquarters of the Beecham Pharmaceutical Empire. St Marys Lowe House Catholic Church, North Road is a grade II listed building, opened in 1929, the second on this site (the land having been donated by Winifred Gorsuch Lowe - hence the name Lowe House). The church is an unusual and striking landmark with a 130 ft tower and a dome of a Romanesque crossed with Gothic style. The major feature is the historic Carillon() (bells playable in musical notation by a keyboard, rather than in sequences by ropes). It is the largest in the North West of England housing 47 bells.( Other features include the clock, which is set in gold mosaic. The Roman Catholic Church of St. Anne and Blessed Dominic, Monastery Road, Sutton, is a site of pilgrimage for Roman Catholics. The Victorian missionary Blessed Barberi is buried in the church. It was he who received Blessed John Henry Cardinal Newman into the Roman Catholic Church. Alongside Blessed Dominic, Father Spencer is buried. The son of the 2nd Earl Spencer he was a famed convert to the Roman Catholic faith. Prout, foundress of the religious order, the of the Cross and Passion is also buried with them.GeographyImage:Billinge Hill.jpg|right|thumb|200px|Hill is the highest point in St Helens and MerseysideThe St Helens Borough covers roughly 30 km over an area of soft rolling hills used primarily for agricultural purposes, mainly arable. The highest point in the Metropolitan Borough of St Helens, and the whole of Merseyside is Hill, 4.5 miles (7.2 km) north from the town centre. The town is landlocked with a stream running through, Mill Brook/Windle Brook running through Eccleston and connecting with the (disused) St. Helens Branch/Section of the Canal in the town centre. St Helens is around 160 feet (50 m) above sea level. From the top of Billinge Hill the cities of Manchester and Liverpool are visible on a clear day as well as the towns of Wigan, Bolton and Warrington.Mill Dam is Merseysides largest body of inland water, offering picturesque lakeside trails and walks as well as national competitive powerboating and angling events.Burgies are two tailings on the site of the old Rushy Park coal mine. They were created by the dumping of toxic chemical waste from the manufacture of glass, they have since been covered with tall grass and woodland.Transport and infrastructureLocationImage:St Helens 07.07R edited-2.jpg|thumb|200px|right|St Helens viewed looking southwest in 2007. The town centre is at centre and the Linkway runs to the top. Park is top left. Pilkington Cowley Hill works is bottom centre.St Helens is  to the East of Liverpool and  from the centre of Manchester. The town shares borders with the towns or boroughs of Prescot in Knowsley, Skelmersdale, Warrington, Widnes, Wigan, and has direct transport links by road and via two main railway lines. The idea of its centralised location has formed the basis behind promotional literature by the local authority.(HospitalityThe principal hotel is the four star Park Inn (formerly Hilton Hotel) in the town centre, built during a period of commercial augmentation in the town during the mid-1990s.Other large hotels in the locality are the Holiday Inn, Travelodge, Ramada Encore and Thistle Hotel in Haydock, plus Premier Inns at Carr Mill and Micklehead Green, Sutton Manor.There are numerous smaller hotels, inns and B&Bs across the borough.RoadSt Helens is well served by motorway links with the East/West corridors of the M58 and M62 to the North and South of the town respectively. The town is also served by the parallel running North/South routes of the M57 and M6 to the East and West.The M6 runs a few miles to the eastern side of the town centre, with Junction 23, at Haydock, serving both north and south bound traffic and Junction 24, at Ashton in Makerfield, serving south bound exit and north bound access.The M62 runs a couple of miles to the south of the town with Junction 7 at Rainhill Stoops. The M57s Junction 2 lies several miles south west of St.Helens, at Prescot. The M58 is several miles north, at the north-western end of the A570 Rainford By-Pass dual carriageway.The A580 East Lancashire Road runs north of the town centre alongside Eccleston, Bank and through Haydock. It is a former trunk road taking traffic from Manchester to the Liverpool Docks. It was built between 1929 and 1934 and was opened by King George V. It was intended to take pressure away from the A58, a major road running from Prescot (M57) through St.Helens to the A1(M) at Wetherby, Yorkshire.The Rainford By-Pass is a section of the A570, between the East Lancashire Road and the M58 and is part of the transport route from Southport, in Sefton, through West Lancashire, through St Helens to the M62 Junction 7 at Rainhill.A major development in communication was the opening of the St Helens Linkway (classified as part of the A570) in 1994, which linked the town centre directly with the M62 (at Rainhill). The A572 takes traffic from the town centre through Parr to Earlestown and Newton-le-Willows.In 2010 St Helens was proclaimed UKs most car-friendly town measured on variables such as petrol prices, parking costs and the number of speed cameras in an assessment carried out by Virgin Money Car Insurance in research conducted by()Bus Serviceright|thumb|200px|A St Helens Corporation liveried bus in 1968, in front of the Town HallSt Helens has a central bus station that sits between Bickerstaffe Street and Corporation Street. A Merseytravel office is located on Bickerstaffe Street, where passes and advice can be sought. The town currently has no Borough Corporation bus service of its own, having been privatised in the 80s.From 1890 the town operated St Helens Corporation Transport providing Bus, Trolleybus and organising public network services throughout the area. Following local government re-organisation in 1974, the Passenger Transport Executive (Merseytravel) was expanded to cover St Helens . After privatisation in 1986 the town was served by several locally branded operations under the umbrella of the Merseyside Transport Limited (MTL) company in which Merseytravel retained shares until 1993.Arriva purchased the MTL operating company in 2000 and has operated the majority of the routes since. Several smaller operators run specific routes within the town area such as Cumfybus, Hattons, Buses, Red Kite,() Strawberry,() and local munipical bus companies such as Transport operate limited routes.  There are also three zero-fare services operated by battery-electric minibuses in and around the town centre, which are provided on behalf of Merseytravel by Selwyns Travel.Private HireSt Helens is well served by almost a dozen Private Hire minicab firms and the distinctive Black Cab hackney-carriage service popular across the UK. AtoB&Delta,() Cable Cars and Critchleys are the most prominent and offer minibus services also to local airports, cities and nightspots.In addition to taxis the town is home to several licensed tour operators. For example David Ogdens() offer tours and private hire coach facilities, as do Ashtons, Coachmaster,()  Ellisons, a company first established in St Helens in 1920,()  Red Kite( and Hattons who in addition also supplies coach travel to Helens RLFC and Wolves.()Railright|thumb|200px|The completely rebuilt St Helens Central stationImage:2004-10-09 Sankey Canal.jpg|right|thumb|200px| The Sankey Canal (photograph taken in Newton-le-Willows).right|thumb|200px| One of St Helens Corporations trams.Rail is an important means of transport in the region as a whole. St Helens Central (formerly known as St. Helens Shaw Street) serves the town centre. The St Helens stations of Thatto Heath and Eccleston Park and Garswood are on the same Line that runs from Lime Street railway station to Wigan North Western railway station.The Liverpool to Manchester line (following the old and Manchester Railway route) serves the St Helens area at Rainhill, Lea Green and St Helens Junction before passing on to Earlestown and railway station. The St Helens Junction and Rainhill buildings are two of the original stations built when the line opened in 1830, and are both now Listed Buildings. Other local stations included Collins Green that closed in 1951 and the old Lea Green, closed in 1955.A major redevelopment of St Helens Central has recently been completed at a cost of 6.2 million.() which the Council hopes will encourage investment, create more jobs and improve the gateway into the town. The building has been constructed using Copper on the fins, in reference to the towns early industrial heritage.(Previously the new Lea Green station was opened in 2000 with a Park & Ride system to encourage use of the route and alleviate congestionAir and seaThe nearest airport is John Lennon Airport, serving European destinations, located about 12 miles (19 km) south-west of the town and is connected by a frequent service from St. Helens bus station. By road it is accessed via the St. Helens Linkway to M62 westbound Junction 7 at Rainhill. There is no direct rail connection at present.Airport is approximately 25 miles (40 km) away and has numerous direct flights to Europe, North America, the Middle East and Asia. By road it is accessed via the St. Helens Linkway to M62 eastbound Junction 7 at Rainhill and by rail, the Manchester Airport train service serves St. Helens Junction station.St Helens is a landlocked town, but with easy access to the ports of Liverpool, on the River Mersey and Mostyn, North Wales, on the River Dee. The Sankey Canal, including the St.Helens section, is no longer used for transporting goods, consisting of several short sections only, the remainder being drained and filled.Past LinksAn extensive tram and trolleybus system was operated between 1880 and 30 June 1958 when the last Prescot Circle tram was replaced by a bus service. From 1919 the service was operated by the St Helens Corporation, prior to this it had been operated by the St. Helens and District Tramways Company, and subsequently the New St. Helens and District Tramways Company. Originally horse drawn, they became steam powered by 1890, and then electric by 1899. The original lines still remain buried beneath the tarmac and pedestrianised town centre, and a few isolated poles that carried the power lines are spotted around the town.A tram link also existed, in Windle and in Haydock, serving Liverpool via Ash.GovernanceCivic historyright|thumb|200px|St Helens Town Hall as it appears today without the steeple.St Helens first became responsible for the administration of the wider area in 1836 when made a Registration sub-district of the Prescot Parish as part of the Corporations Act 1835 that devolved control down to the more localised Parish control (spurred on by the Act 1832.St Helens, in Hardshaw of Windle, constructed its original Town Hall in 1839 that served as a legal court, meeting house, and administrative centre. It also held Council meetings for Aldermen and Parishioners alike.In 1868 St Helens was incorporated as a borough (covering the 4 Townships). In response to the old, smaller, hall burning suffering fire damage in 1872 a new hall was planned. This, current town hall, was built between 1872 and 1876. In 1889 St Helens was again reformed, this time as a borough with greater responsibility over an increased area of land. This was part of an ongoing process of local government restructure during the Victorian era, this time as part of the Corporations Act 1882.As a county borough, St Helens was, from 1889 to 1974, inside the administrative county of Lancashire. On 1 April 1974, under the provisions of the Government Act 1972, St Helens became the administrative centre of the Borough of St Helens in the newly created Merseyside county. At this time St Helens Council replaced all the local Councils within the prescribed area.Historic Coat of Armsright|thumb|200px|St. Helens County Borough Council coat of arms 1876-1974, Ex Terra Lucem - From the Ground, Light granted in 1876The old Town and Borough Council coat of arms were granted on 17 January 1876. The coat of arms is an Argent (white or silver) Field common to earlier coat of arms in the area. The black cross is referenced from the family of the Ecclestons. The saltires in the first and fourth quarters are from the arms of the Gerards, in 1435, at Windleshaw, a chantry chapel was built and endowed by Sir Thomas Gerard. The second and third a griffon segreant gules meanwhile are taken from the Bold family. The blue bars are from the arms of the Parr family, Marquises of Northampton. The lion the is from the crest of the Walmsleys and the two fleurs-de-lys refer to Sir David Gamble, first Mayor and benefactor of the town, and the Haydock family.MottoThe motto was the Latin Ex Terra Lucem. A literal translation would be From the Ground, Light whilst more descriptive translations might be Light out of the earth or Out of the earth comes light. The phrase refers to both the abundant and winnable coal resources (which can be burnt, to produce light) in addition to their use in local industry such as Glass (through which light passes).The motto was changed in 1974 to PROSPERITAS IN EXCELSIS, which is included on the arms of the Metropolitan borough Council.Parliamentary representationSt. Helens is represented by the St. Helens South and St. Helens North constituencies. Both contain areas outside of the town boundary, but within the greater Borough. Each constituency sends 1 representative to Parliament.At the last election in 2010 both Dave Watts and Woodward retained their seats for The Labour Party. David Watts MP has been incumbent since 1997, whilst Shaun Woodward MP has retained his role since 2001.The town is considered a Labour Stronghold and to have a safe seat.Local Council RepresentationSt. Helens and its associated wards are represented by St. Helens Metropolitan Borough Council.()The Council has historically been in Labour hands (since the existence of the Borough Council in 1974), however between 2006 and 2010 the Council Leadership was a Liberal / Conservative coalition. The 2010 Local Election returned Labour to control of the area.Parish CouncilsSt Helens is still served by several Parish Councils. Their activity is much reduced in the modern town, but are still active in the communities and are recognised by the Borough Council() as they may undertake many duties such as street lighting, managing cemeteries, allotments, commons, village halls, war memorials and markets etc.St Helens Council lists the Parish Councils as:DemographyChristianity is the main religion in St Helens Borough, being about 87% according to the 2001 census.( This makes St Helens the most Christian town in Britain.() Nearby Wigan is also in the top 3.() Conversely St Helens shows the second least number of people (out of 376 local authorities) that actively describe themselves as having no religion at all.(There is very little ethnic minority representation in the St Helens population, amongst the lowest levels recorded in the country. 98.84% of the St Helens population described itself as White British in 2001() The largest ethnic minority in St Helens in 2001 was recorded as Indian with 409.(By 2006 the otherwise transient gypsy and traveller community have overtaken that number and are now considered to make up the largest identifiable ethnic minority group in St Helens.()Crime statistics have shown a decline in 6/7 key indicators since 2008() The town also has lower than recorded national rates of criminal offences in 6/7 key indicators.( Theft from a Motor Vehicle, and Interfering with a Motor Vehicle bucking the trend.In 2006 a controversial() study by think tank Reform placed St Helens 2nd in the country for murders per 100,000 population with 4.87 (behind Nottingham with 5.21) and vaulted the town to 10th overall in the country (out of the 55 areas studied).() The study drew criticism for its use of inaccurate population figures from both Nottingham and St Helens Police and officials, and was described as too simplistic.(( The discrepancy was dealt with by a Liverpool Echo article that demonstrated the think tank had conflated the towns urban population (of 102,000) with that of the greater borough (of 175,000) causing the Boroughs recorded crime rate to soar to 10th from 44th.(EducationPrimary schoolsThe Borough of St Helens has one nursery school, one infant school, one junior school and fifty-two primary schools. Performance in the Key Stage 1 and Key Stage 2 SATs has been consistently above national averages over the past 5 years.Special schoolsThere are three special schools in St Helens - Penkford, Mill Green and Lansbury Bridge.Secondary schoolsThe Borough of St Helens has nine secondary schools:Further educationThe town has seven educational institutions offering post-16 education in International College, High Technology College, High School, Sutton Academy, The Hope Academy - (all 11-18 secondary schools), Carmel College (a sixth form college) and Helens College (a general FE college). Carmel College is a leading college in the country with a value added score of 328. The college is an associate of the of Liverpool. St Helens College, which has recently rebuilt its Town Centre Campus, offers a wide variety of Higher and Further Education courses including degree courses, foundation degrees, BTECs and professional qualifications at the colleges Business School. The college has a growing reputation for its standards and achievements. There is no university in St Helens; locals who stay in the area and go to university often take advantage of the surrounding universities such as Edge Hill (Ormskirk), Liverpool, Manchester, Salford and Chester.Media, entertainment and leisureMediaThere are two local weekly newspapers which are freely distributed. These are the Helens Star and the Helens ReporterSt Helens has no television or radio broadcasters. However, Wish FM gives the second part of its name (sh) to St Helens while the first half goes to Wigan (Wi), representing the two reception areas. The radio station is based in Orrell, near Wigan, the transmitter site being at Billinge Hill, right on the border of the two metropolitan areas.St Helens College has previously broadcast temporary, limited service radio broadcasts from their Town Centre Campus, headed by the late Paul Dempsey, who previously worked as a presenter on BBC radio. In December 2010, the St Helens College radio station Solar 1287 AM started broadcasting again.MuseumsLocated in the town centre, The World of Glass Museum, which opened in 2000 incorporating the Pilkington Glass Museum and the St. Helens Local Museum, has received many awards including North West Attraction of the Year. It also accommodates the St. Helens Tourist Office, however the local press recently carried news that this facility will end as of 31 March 2011.The West Museum of Road Transport is another museum located in the town centre. The Smithy Heritage Centre is a small museum in Kiln Lane, Eccleston about the works of a local blacksmith.Parks, open spaces and nature walksThe Dream Sutton 011.jpg|200px|thumb|The Dream unveiled in 2009right|thumb|200px|The Green Man art installation on The Duckeries in ParrThe borough of St Helens has several major parks and open spaces. These include the historic Taylor Park, a listed Grade II Historic Park and Garden, that opened in 1893 as well as Victoria Park located near the town centre.Park is a modern park in Sutton which features a zoo and annually holds a funfair in the summer, usually in July, called the St Helens Festival (originally called the St Helens Show). Sherdley Park was purchased immediately after the Second World War from the Hughes Family.Parr has Gaskell Park in addition to the reclaimed open space known as The Duckeries (or Ashtons Green), and shares a boundary with boggy heathland known as The Moss or Colliers Moss (traditionally associated with Bold and its power station),()()() and the area known as the Flash (remnants of the canal tributary system and fishing ponds) with nature walk along part of the 7 mile route that makes up the Sankey Valley Country Park ((part of the Trans Pennine trail).(Countryside Walks - Visit St. Helens, Merseyside)A 20m tall sculpture, called Dream, is sited on a former colliery in Sutton Manor in St Helens and can be seen from the motorway.()St Helens Parks and open spaces:Gaskell Park, Taylor Park and The Duckeries all received Flag Award status in 2009.Nightlife and social sceneTraditionally, the town was known for its social clubs, mainly connected with the Labour Party and the Roman Catholic Church. In recent years, the boom in Britains drinking culture in the mid-1990s has fuelled the nightlife industry over the past 10 years. The town centre has exploded over this time with many new or relaunched drinking establishments. Many of the new bars including Dali Bar, Bar Java and Zoo are centred around Westfield Street and Bridge Street in the town centre. Several bars such as Panama Joes, Zoo Bar and Dali Bar have licences to serve alcohol until 3 am.The town has one main nightclub; Club Rouge which opened in late December 2009. Formerly known as Club Nexus, which ceased trading in February 2008,() the new 1,700 capacity venue opened a with a 160,000 transformation and under new management eager for a clean break from its predecessors bad reputation of alcohol-fuelled violence and underage drinking.()A second nightclub was planned for Bridge Street, with building work being completed for the end of 2002, but it has remained closed since completion. The building was up for sale for many months and was bought for around the sum of 3 million. There are plans to transform it from a club/cafe bar to a shopping precinct.(Kilmurray, A., Savoy site snapped up in 3m deal, St. Helens Star, 24 October 2007)There are several restaurants in the town centre with an increasingly mixed cuisine on offer. The George Street Quarter alone offers Italian, Spanish, French/Modern British at Le Frog, Chinese and Thai cuisine. A local newspaper, The St Helens Reporter, awarded its 2005 Restaurant of the Year prize to The Griffin Inn, Eccleston.()TheatreImage:TheCitadel1910.jpg|right|thumb|200px|The Citadel, as it stood at the turn of the century after the Army procured itThe Citadel TheatreThe first Theatre Royal was built on Bridge Street and was a large wooden barn. This was open for several seasons until heavy snow caused the roof to collapse. It was then replaced by a new Theatre Royal on Milk Street. This building can still be seen today, in its newer guise as The Citadel arts centre. The Theatre Royal on Milk Street consisted of stalls, two balconies and an ornate interior. It became extremely popular with touring theatre and music hall, playing host to the likes of Vesta Tilley and George Formby and some of the best known theatre productions of the day. With growing audience figures, Revill built a new theatre on Corporation street and transferred the Theatre Royal name to this instead. The Milk Street theatre was then purchased by the Salvation Army where it was more or less completely re-built internally. It was re named SA Citadel. It remained in this use for nearly 90 years, until the Salvation Army moved to a newer site. It was then opened as The Citadel arts centre in 1988, and was completely refurbished again in 2000. Today it is an extremely popular venue for live music, dance, drama and art.The Theatre RoyalThe Theatre Royal opened by Revill on Corporation Street in 1889 was relatively short-lived as it was severely damaged by fire in 1901.() It was then reconstructed by revered theatre architect Matcham.(() The theatre was designed in a baroque style with ornate balconies, chandeliers and boxes.( In the 1960s the theatre was purchased by Pilkingtons and was gutted internally.( The auditorium was completely refurbished removing all traces of the original interior design, whilst the ornate frontage was replaced with a plain glass facade. This was subsequently heavily refurbished in 2001.The theatre is today a very popular venue with top class touring acts and of course, the annual Pantomime. In addition there are performances by local amateur operatic and dramatic societies, schools and dancing academies.Each year many youngsters from the Scout and Guide Movement perform at the annual St. Helens Scout and Guide Show. The show has been nationally recognised as being of a high standard and is often used by other gang shows worldwide as a form of inspiration to get ideas or acts or dance etc. The show is usually held in mid April at the Theatre Royal on Corporation Street. The show has a lovely mixture of dance, song and act which proves a huge hit year after year and due to its nature it is deemed one of the most family friendly shows in St. Helens.SportRugby LeagueProfessionalright|thumb|200px|An artists impression of the proposed new stadium.right|thumb|200px|St Helens (in white) face off against Wigan in 2009 Playoffs.St Helens is home to St. Helens Rugby League Football Club founded in 1873, known otherwise simply as Saints. The club have played their home games at Road in Eccleston since 1910. In 2009 development started on the old United Glass Bottle (UGB) site in Ravenhead of the new St Helens stadium that as yet remains unnamed.Since the formation of the all professional League in 1996 St Helens have successfully won the title on 5 occasions, and been runners-up on 3 more occasions. The club have been awarded the Leaders Shield 4 times in the last 5 seasons. The club have been crowned World Club Champions on two occasions, winning the Club Challenge in 2001 and most recently in 2007 defeating Australian side Broncos on both occasions.Historically the club have won the Rugby League Cup on twelve occasions, seven wins have taken place since 1996. They most recently defeated Hull on 30 August 2008 to cap a hat-trick of successive Titles.In 2006 season the club won all three major honours in the domestic game, the Challenge Cup, League Leaders Shield and the Super League Grand Final.() The club were awarded in December 2006 the Sports Personality of the Year Team Award at the annual Sports Personality of the Year Ceremony.()  Club Coach Daniel Anderson won the Sports Personality of the Year Coach Award (a first for Rugby League).((Saints players have won seven of the last 10 of Steel Awards and 5 Todd Trophys since 2000.  Wellens and Joynt have each won the Sunderland Trophy in the Clubs two Club Challenge victories.Amateurright|thumb|200px|A local Rugby League junior game underway.The town is also home to a large number of amateur rugby league teams comprising Senior and Youth teams. Most notable of these are ARLFC,() Bold Miners, Clock Face Miners, Haresfinch Hawks, Haydock Warriors, Recs() and Heath Crusaders.() Most of these teams and others in the area compete in the BARLA West Counties competition (Pilkingtons in the Premier League, Haydock and Blackbrook in Division 1, Thatto Heath and Clock Face in Division 2). Thatto Heath compete in the higher ranked Conference League.The continued success and achievement of these teams at the grass roots level is important to the town and have provided many players who have gone on to play for the Saints and other professional and semi-professional clubs. Significantly in recent years Blackbrook Royals have contributed 26 Lancashire Cup winning sides across 8 age ranges from U12 to U18, with two in the Open Age category( and 10 National Cups. Pilkington Recs with 17 wins (and 6 times runner up) and Thatto Heath with 10() have ensured St Helens teams have contested have been represented in a significant number of North West Counties competition finals since 1994.Thatto Heath alone have helped to contribute over 40 professionals to the game including current St Helens players Graham, Cunningham (who also played for Wigan St Judes), Wellens and Yates,() and former players Briers and Prescott.( While Blackbrook have current St Helens representation in the form of first team regulars Roby, Scott Moore, Clough, Wheeler, Jamie Foster and Dixon,( with Emmitt, Magenniss, Gaskell and Johnson on the fringes.(  Pilkington Recs meanwhile have recently contributed Frodsham and Tom Armstrong.(The Helens RLFC Under 18s and 16s and Helens RLFC Academy teams serve as official feeders to Saints.Rugby Unionright|thumb|200px|West Park (in Green) play.St Helens is home to several Amateur Rugby Union teams.  St Helens F.C. are the most prominent Union team in a town where the League code takes precedence. The team claims to be the oldest open rugby club in the World based on its origins in the formation of Liverpool Football Club (not to be confused with the later Association Football team of the same name) in 1857.Liverpool St Helens operate, in addition to their First Team, both multiple Senior, Colts and Junior teams, and in addition have an U18 and U15 Girls rugby team as part of their open and inclusive Rugby approach. In 2008 the club announced an unveiling of its Centre of Excellence in coordination with Sportsmatch (a department of England).Several local Social, Sports and Leisure clubs host their own teams, including the most successful club in the town of recent history Park St Helens (commonly referred to simply as West Park),() that currently play in League 3 North, and Ruskin Park R.F.C.()Association FootballHelens Town FC is an Amateur English football club, currently playing in the first division of the West Counties Football League. The club, based in St. Helens, play their home games at Knowsley Road, the current home of St Helens RLFC, the towns rugby league club.The town also has its own amateur football league, the Helens Combination which has been running since the 1917/18 season.CricketSt. Helens is home to several Amateur Cricket sides.  Helens Cricket Club, formed in 1843, and Helens Recreation Cricket Club are the most prominent and both play in the and District Cricket Competition at various levels.Sutton, Haydock, Rainhill and Newton le Willows also have their own local Cricket Clubs with representation from 11 to multiple senior teams.Other SportsThe Town was formerly home to the Amateur American Football team St Helens Cardinals. The Cardinals were active between 1984 and 1998, successfully winning the UKAFL Championship in 1987 with a 28-26 win over the Ipswich Cardinals. The teams colours were red, white and black and used the crest of the Arizona Cardinals on their black helmets.Former player Mike Worthington was involved in the prospective take-over of United F.C. in 2004 that didnt come to fruition and is a Chairman with Earth Mortgages.Former manager Brian Coulson is still active in the league after 30 years, now based with the Merseyside Nighthawks. Several former players still ply their trade with local teams including the Chester Romans.The Town also had an Amateur Australian Rules Football team (20022004) St. Helens Miners who won the Country Cup in 2002 - In 2005 the team joined up with Manchester.Notable People, Families & OrganisationsImage:Beecham-October-1910.jpg|thumb|200px|Conductor, Sir Beecham in 1910BeechamsThe Beecham dynasty is one of the most notable families to be associated with St. Helens. Thomas Beecham opened his first factory, what was to become the worlds largest pharmaceutical producer, Beechams, in St. Helens, 16 years after launching, and producing, his products from a small premises in nearby Wigan.()His son Joseph Beecham built up the business and promoted classical music in the town. Conductor Sir Beecham, son of Joseph, was born in St Helens.Pilkingtonsthumb|200px| A liveried Pilkingtons trailerThe Pilkington dynasty is another notable family associated with St. Helens having founded the largest glass manufacturer in the Kingdom as well as inventing the revolutionary float glass process which was subsequently licensed for use by other glass manufacturers.Sir Pilkington, inventor with Kenneth Bickerstaff of the float glass process, was not however a member of that family.EntertainmentGeorge Groves is credited with being Hollywoods first sound man, as he was the recording engineer on the seminal Al Jolson picture, The Jazz Singer (1927), as well as many other early talkies.OtherE. Arth, artist, author (and the Common Wealth), documentary filmmaker (Urban Cowboy), urban designer and futurist, spent his toddlerhood in St. Helens (from birth in 1953 to 1955), before moving with his parents to the United States.Seddon, who went on to become Minister of New Zealand, was from St. Helens. He is currently the countrys longest-serving Prime Minister, holding the office from 1893 until 1906.Rylands, the Victorian philanthropist, was born and raised in St Helens, forming and building the Ryland & Son textile manufacturing empire in nearby Wigan.Harold Dacre Robinson Lowe was born in St Helens, the 1901 Census stating that Harold D.R. Lowe lived at 260 Boundary Road, St Helens.(Father: Mathew B Lowe 42 (a cattle dealer), Mother: Sarah A 39, Mathew R 18 (a provision dealer), Thomas E 16 (a carter), Harold D R 15, James 9.) A dinosaur was named for him by CM Sternberg in 1940; Monoclonius lowei.William Draper was born in St Helens in 1811. He went on to become a noted scientist in the field of photochemistry, chemistry and other sciences.Cultural referencesA famous Punch cartoon had Napoleon lamenting, Oh, no! Ive been banished to St Helens! This was a pun on Helena, the South Atlantic island to which Napoleon was exiled.International linksSt Helens has links with two towns:*  - Chalon-sur-Sane, France - twin town to St. Helens*  - Stuttgart, Germany - partner town to St. HelensReferencesBibliography**  Available online from British History Online***  Available online from Google BooksExternal linksAuthorities & Governance*Helena Housing; Local Social Housing Company*St Helens Chamber Chamber of Commerce*St Helens Council*St Helens Re:new Neighbourhood Management ProjectArts, Culture & Entertainment*Haydock Racecourse*St.Helens Big Art Project featuring Plensa*St Helens RLFC official website*Visit St Helens tourist information*The Citadel Arts Centre*The World of GlassHealth*Halton & St Helens Primary Care Trust*St Helens & Knowsley Teaching Hospitals NHS Trust*St Helens & Knowsley Trust; A Healthy HeartLocal History*St Helens - Historical information*Sutton Beauty & Heritage - Local area history*Sankey Canal Restoration Society - The Sankey Canal Restoration SocietyNews & Media Services*St Helens Reporter Newspaper*St Helens Star Newspaper*WISH FM 102.4 Freq Local RadioParishes & Churches*Billinge Parish Council*Bold Parish Council*Eccleston Parish Council*Rainhill Parish Council*St Helens Parish Church*St Marys Lowe House*Windle Parish CouncilPublic Organisations*St Helens Citizens Advice Bureau*St Helens Community Transport SHIFT*St Helens Council for Voluntary Service*St Helens Sutton Athletic Club*St Helens ScoutsHelens (Merseyside)Helens (Merseyside)HelensHelens (Merseyside)Helens (Merseyside)HelensasHelens (Merseyside)Helens i MerseysideHelensHelensHelens, MerseysideHelens (Merseyside)HelensHelens, MerseysideHelensHelens, Merseyside
1106296
Navoiy
Navoiy also spelled as Navoi (; ) is a city (pop 125,800 in 2007)(Official Website of Navoiy Province) and the capital of Province in the southwestern part of Uzbekistan. It is located at latitude 40 5 4N; longitude 65 22 45E, at an altitude of 382 meters.HistoryOriginally known as Kermine (Karmana)  under the of Bukhara, the city was re-founded in 1958, under the name of the great Uzbek poet and statesman Navoi, who wrote in Persian and Chaghatai at the court of Emir Husein Boykara (or Husayn Bayqaro) in Herat.EconomyNavoiy Region has large stocks of natural gas and deposits of precious metals, as well as large stocks of raw materials for production of construction materials. Among these enterprises are Navoi and Zarafshan Gold Mining and Metallurgical Complexes, which extract one of the purest gold in the world. The enterprise NavoiyAzot is the largest producer of mineral fertilizers in the country.Navoiy Free Industrial Economic Zone (FIEZ)According to the Decree of the President of Uzbekistan, Free Industrial Economic Zone (FIEZ) with special conditions for foreign investments have already created in Navoi Province of Uzbekistan, in the area of Airport.FIEZ is designed to promote a wide range of high-tech and internationally competitive production using modern high-efficiency equipment, technological lines and units, as well as latest innovations. The operation period of FIEZ is 30 years with possible prolongation.Business entities registered in FIEZ will enjoy exceptional customs, currency and tax regulations, simplified procedure for entry, stay and obtaining of work permit for non-resident citizens. They shall be exempt from paying land, property, income, development of social infrastructure, single payment (for small businesses) taxes, mandatory payments to Republics Road Fund and Fund of School Education, depending on the amount of direct investments:from 3 to 10 million euros - for 7 years;from 10 to 30 million euros - for 10 years, with reduction of profit and unified tax payment rates by 50% in the next 5 years;more than 30 million euros - for 15 years, with reduction of profit and unified tax payment rates by 50% in the next 10 years.Along with this, business entities will be exempted from paying customs duties (excluding charges for customs clearance) for equipment, raw materials and components imported for the production of export oriented goods. They will be able to make payments in foreign currency within the FIEZ, as well as to use convenient terms of payments for exported and imported goods.Coordination and management of FIEZ activity will be carried out by Administrative Council composed of representatives of state bodies and zone administration. The Council can select international company to manage the zone on a contract basis. It is envisaged to create a FIEZ development fund aimed to support infrastructure development.Navoi province is located in the central part of Uzbekistan, being one of the largest industrial centres of the country. The province possesses rich minerals and raw materials resources  Muruntau gold-bearing field, silica sand fields (of more than 1.5 billion tons), deposits of granite (1.9 billion cubic meters), marble (420 million cubic meters), phosphorites (1.5 billion tons) and many others.Navoi Mining and Metallurgy Combinat  the biggest enterprise of the province, is included in top ten largest world producers of uranium and gold (9999 standard). Gold bars produced by the Combinat are awarded with the status of optimal gold delivery by London Precious Metals Market and Tokyo Commodities Exchange. Along with mining, the provinces economy is based on production of building materials, chemical, textile and food industries.40 foreign investment enterprises operate in Navoi province. Most of them are established with participation of investors from USA, China, Russia and the United Kingdom  Uzbek-British Joint Venture Amantaytau-Goldfields is successfully working in the province.(Uzinfoinvest Agency)(Investment Guide for Navoi Region)TransportationThe Zone will be located at a distance of 800 meters from the highway E-40, 1,8 km from the cargo terminal of Airport, connected to international railway routes towards countries of Europe (via Russia), South Asia (via China), Middle East and the Gulf (via Iran). The distance to the nearest water and gas distribution centres is 800 m, electrical station - 8 km. In August 2010, Hanjin Group (the parent of Korean Air) opened a new cargo terminal at Airport.()ReferencesExternal links*navoi.uz*Navoi.Ru*Gov.Uz*NGMK.uzda:Navoide:Navoiyes:Navoifr:Navoko:(citt)lt:Navojisnl:Navoiyja:(shahar)pl:Nawoiro:Navoi()fi:Navoisv:Navoitr:Navoiy()vi:Navoiywar:Navoiyzh:
1109345
Maytown
Maytown is the name of several places. In the United States:*Alabama*Florida*Kentucky*Pennsylvania*WashingtonAustralia:*Queensland was a significant gold mining town in north Queensland. It is now a town. United Kingdom:*County Armagh, a townland in County Armagh, Northern Ireland See also*Mayvillede:Maytownes:Maytownit:Maytownnl:Maytownpl:Maytownpt:Maytownvo:Maytown
1111540
Callington,_Cornwall
Callington () is a civil parish and town in southeast Cornwall, Kingdom. The town is situated approximately seven miles (11 km) north of Saltash and nine miles south of Launceston(Ordnance Survey: Landranger map sheet 201 Plymouth & Launceston ISBN 9780319231463). Callington parish had a population of 4,783 in 2001, according to the 2001 census.GeographyThe town is situated in east Cornwall between Dartmoor to the east and Moor to the west. A former agricultural market town, it lies at the intersection of the south-north A388 Saltash to Launceston road and the east-west A390 Tavistock to Liskeard road.Kit Hill is a mile northeast of the town and rises to  with views of Dartmoor, Moor and the Tamar. Railway stationCallington railway station was the terminus for a branch line that ran from Alston, the junction with the Southern Railways Tavistock to Plymouth line.  The railway line beyond Gunnislake to the Callington terminus was closed in the 1960s, due to low usage and the fact that the final sections of the line had several severe gradients and speed restrictions which made operating difficult.  It is still possible to travel by rail on the Valley Line from Plymouth as far as Gunnislake via Bere Alston, where trains reverse. For most of its journey the line follows the River Tamar. The nearest mainline train station to Callington is at Saltash.EconomyFood manufacturer Ginsters is the largest employer in the town and employs hundreds of locals  as well as many immigrants who have arrived as a consequence of the recent accession to the EU of a number of Eastern European countries.Ginsters uses local produce in many of its products, buying potatoes and other vegetables from local farmers and suppliers.()Cornwall is a predominantly low wage economy with a high proportion of its income being derived from agriculture and tourism.HistoryFile:TombOfRobertWilloughbyCallington.jpg|thumb|upright|Tomb and effigy of Willoughby, 1st Baron Willoughby de Broke(d.1502), St.Marys Church, Callington, north wall of chancelThe town has long been supposed to be the site of the ancient tribal capital of the of Cornwall and Arthurian base, known in the sources as Celliwig. References to it are made repeatedly, particularly in the Triads and other manuscripts. However, it should be noted, that Callington is only the foremost among several contending possible locations. In the 18th century, Callington was one of the most important mining areas in Great Britain. Deposits of silver were found nearby in Silver Valley. Today, the area is marked by mining remains, but there are no active mines. However, granite is still quarried on Down.The former Callington constituency, a borough, elected two members to the House of Commons but was abolished by the Act 1832. The town is now in the South East Cornwall constituency.St Marys Church was originally a chapel of ease to South Hill: it was consecrated in 1438 and had then two aisles and a buttressed tower, a second north aisle was added in 1882. Unusually for Cornwall there is a clerestory; the wagon roofs are old. The parish church contains the fine brass of Nicholas Assheton and his wife, 1466.(Pevsner, N. (1970) Cornwall, 2nd ed. Penguin Books; pp. 48-49)(Dunkin, E. (1882) Monumental Brasses. London, Spottiswoode; pp. 16-18, pl. XV)DevelopmentIn recent years, the town has seen much residential development with more, including social housing, planned for the next few years. The neighbouring village of Bray has almost doubled in size in recent years with houses still being built in the area.TwinningCallington is twinned with Guipavas in Brittany, France, and also Barsbttel near Hamburg in Germany.See also* People from Callington* Well* Cornwall Mineral RailwayReferencesExternal links* Callington Town Council website* Online Catalogue for Callington at the Record Office* br:Kelliwikkw:Kelliwik(Verenigd Koninkrijk)no:Callingtonnn:Callingtonpl:Callington
1114542
Worrall
Worrall is a small rural village within the boundary of the City of Sheffield. It stands in an elevated position at a height of approximately 230 metres and is 6.5 km north west of the city centre. The village has an area of 233 hectares and a population of 1,306 in 2006.(Sheffield Council Neighbourhood Profile for Worrall. Gives details of population and area of village.) Although a distinct village, Worrall has tenuous borders with the Sheffield suburbs of Wadsley, Middlewood and Loxley to the south and east and with the adjoining village of Oughtibridge to the north, to the west is a rural area extending out towards the village of Bradfield.HistoryThe origins of Worrall go back to Anglo-Saxon times, it had its roots in farming and was mentioned in records as part of a manor which also included the areas of Ughill and Wadsley. The manor was held by the Saxon chief Aldene and included 14 bovates of land and an open woodland, a mile square. The villages name derives from the Saxon word Hrivfull meaning top and this would certainly apply to Worralls lofty position above the Don and Loxley valleys.After the Norman Conquest Worrall was mentioned in the Book of 1086 as being part of the land held by de Busli. Throughout its history Worrall was closely connected with the nearby village of Wadsley which lies two km to the SW. In 1541 Henry Everingham was named as lord of the manor of both villages in a charter which granted relief from paying certain duties as long as tenants paid their annual rent. The manor of Worrall was transferred to the ownership of Robert Swyft in 1557 and then to Sir Francis Leake before passing into the estates of the of Shrewsbury. In the 18th century the Stead family estate owned properties in Worrall, at his death Thomas Stead (172893) owned 16 properties and  in various parts of Hallamshire and Sheffield. Throughout this period Worrall was predominantly a farming community.(Historic Hallamshire, David Hey, ISBN 1 84306 049 3 Gives historical information.)Worrall developed some small scale industry at the onset of the Revolution in the late 18th and early 19th centuries when some small Little Mester workshops were set up to make cutlery and knifes. Nearby Wadsley had a reputation for making pocket knives and Worrall found it easier to trade with Wadsley than with the more distant Sheffield.(A Laymans Look at the History, Industry and Places of Oughtibridge, Worrall and Wharncliffe Side, Doug Sanderson, no ISBN. Gives historical details.)thumb|right|275px|The centre of Worrall with the Blue Ball pub on the right and local shops on the left.thumb|right|400px|Worrall Hall Farm (right) and Worrall Hall (left).thumb|left|250px|Worrall Independent Chapel on Towngate Road dates from 1878.thumb|right|275px|The old school house is now a private residence.Ganister mining and quarrying were other industries that grew in the area. Quarrying developed from the middle of the 17th century when there was an expansion of farming in the area and farmhouses and cottages needed to be built for the workers. The biggest quarry in the area was the Middlewood quarry off Mowson Lane which was owned by George Turner. Local historian Joe Castle has suggested that stone from this quarry was used to build the Arches in Sheffield.(Middlewood 18411901. Gives quote that stone from Middlewood quarry was used to build the Wicker Arches.) The quarry closed at the start of War II and is now a new housing development. There were three Ganister mines in the immediate Worrall area. The Yews Mine and the Langhouse Mine were owned by Charles Bramall, while the Stubbin Mine was owned by the Oughtibridge Silica Firebrick Company and was the last to close in November 1927.(The Forgotten Mines Of Sheffield, Ray Battye, ISBN 1 901 587 40 1 Gives details of ganister mining in the Worral area.)Present dayToday Worrall is mostly a residential village with a mixture of new and older housing. Most of its working residents commute to their jobs in Sheffield and other areas. There is a higher proportion of older people in the village compared to the rest of Sheffield with 32% of the population aged between 45 and 64. 87% of the houses in Worrall are owner occupied, a high figure compared to the 60% average for Sheffield as a whole.(NHS Worrall Neighbourhood Profile. Gives details of demographics.) There are still several farms on the periphery of the village but farming is much reduced from the 19 farms that existed in the immediate area in the 1930s. Some such as Lund Farm, Grange Farm and The Yews Farm have been sold for housing development in recent years. The last farm to operate in the centre of Worrall is the Wiggan dairy farm on Towngate Road.Significant buildingsThere are two houses in the village. The Blue Ball is believed to have been originally two cottages which were connected at some time to make bigger premises. There is no documented date of origin although it was registered as a public house in the Sheffield Directory in 1851. The Shoulder of Mutton was formerly farm buildings but has been a pub since at least 1817, it was modernised in the 1980s. Worrall Independent Chapel dates from 1878 and has a foundation stone inscribed This stone was laid by John Wycliffe Wilson of Sheffield July 15th 1878. Worrall National school was founded in 1848 and eventually closed in 1966 with the pupils being transferred to Oughtibridge Primary School, the old school house is now a private residence. School, a secondary school for pupils aged between 11 and 16 was built in 1957 on Kirk Edge Road as it leaves the village, there are approximately 1000 pupils at the school.(Roads To Worrall, Joe Castle, no ISBN. Gives much of history and details of Worrall in article.)Worrall Hall situated on Kirk Edge Road is the oldest building in Worrall but it has three distinct sections all of different time periods. The west wing dates from the 16th century while the central section has a date stone of 1720, the eastern section dates from 1820. The Hall was formerly a building but was taken of the list in 1985, it is a private house and has undergone renovation work in recent years after becoming run down. The adjoining Worrall Hall Farm has not been a working farm for many years. The Yews is a building located on Worrall Road as it enters the village from the SE. It dates from the 1880s and was formerly a hospital it is now owned by Sheffield Primary Care Trust and is used as offices for the Mental Health Team.The Worrall Memorial Hall is a venue for local social and fundraising activities, it is situated near the local park. Hillsborough Golf Club lies to the south of the village, the course was created in 1920 with the club house added in 1936. Worrall Male Voice Choir was formed on 7 September 1970 and is a highly respected local vocal group which is based in the village, it has a busy schedule of concerts and fund raising activities.(Worrall Male Voice Choir. Gives details of choir.)References
1117328
Pickaxe
A pickaxe (sometimes spelled pickax) or pick is a tool with a hard head attached perpendicular to the handle.Some people make the distinction that a pickaxe has a head with a pointed end and a flat end, and a pick has both ends pointed, or only one end; but most people use the words to mean the same thing.The head is usually made of metal, and the handle is most commonly wood, metal or fiberglass.The head is a spike ending in a sharp point, may curve slightly, and often has a counter-weight to improve ease of use. The stronger the spike, the more effectively the tool can pierce the surface. Rocking the embedded spike about and removing it can then break up the surface.The counterweight nowadays is nearly always a second spike, often with a flat end for prying.The pointed edge is most often used to break up rocky surfaces or other hard surfaces such as concrete or hardened dried earth. The large momentum of a heavy pickaxe, combined with the small contact area, makes it very effective for this purpose.The chiseled end, if present, is used for purposes including cutting through roots.A Mandrill is a miners smallish pick for use in confined spaces.Also note that during war in medieval time the pickaxe was used as a weapon.Originally used as agricultural tools as far back as prehistoric cultures, picks have also served for tasks ranging from mining to warfare. The design has also evolved into other tools such as the plough and the mattock.In prehistoric times a large shed deer antler from a suitable species (e.g. deer) was often cut down to its shaft and its lowest tine and used as a one-pointed pick. http://www.ingenious.org.uk/See/Tradeandindustry/Handandmachinetools/?targetSeeMedium&ObjectID%7BB316DA4B-0B90-D31E-C28F-94EC504B8D04%7D&viewbyimages http://www.dkimages.com/discover/previews/847/970747.JPG http://www.museumoflondon.org.uk/piclib/images%5CTHUMB%5C0330000190_5mb.jpgIn the Symbols block, 5.2 introduces the glyph  (U+26CF PICK), representable in HTML as &#9935; or &#x26cf;, to represent this tool.Pickaxe handleA pickaxe handle (sometimes called pickhandle), without the head, is sometimes used, often unofficially, as a baton: for example it is an official issue baton used in the Army.A pickaxe handle has been known to be used while diving to fend off sharks by hitting them bluntly on the nose with it (underwater, by jabbing with it, not swinging it).A normal pickaxe handle is made of ash or hickory wood and is about three feet long and weighs about 2.5 pounds. Army pickaxe handles must, by regulation, be exactly three feet long, for use in measuring in the field .The pickaxe handle was used as a pro-segregationist symbol by Maddox in his campaign for governor of the State of Georgia. When demonstrators protested outside Maddoxs segregated restaurant, Maddox led a group of employees and customers wielding pickaxe handles to chase them off.See also*Dolabra*axean:Picabe:be-x-old:bar:Grompmbg:ca:Piccs:Krump(Werkzeug)el:(herramienta)eu:Pikotxfa:fr:Piochega:Piocidko:io:Piochoit:Picconehe:lv:Crtelb:Pioschli:Bikkel(szerszm)mr:nl:Houweelja:ps:pl:Kilofpt:Picaretaro:Trncopru:uk:zh:
1120301
Eschweiler
Hauptbahnhof.jpg|right|thumb|Eschweiler Central StationEschweiler () is a municipality in the district of Aachen in Rhine-Westphalia in Germany on the river Inde, near the German-Belgian-Dutch frontier, and about 15 km east of Aachen and 50 km west of Cologne. History * Celtics (first ore mining) and Romans (roads and villae rusticae).* 828 First mentioned by Einhard, the biographer of Charlemagne.* 1394 Coal mining first mentioned.* For some centuries part of the of Jlich.* 1678 Completely destroyed except one house and the valuable leather Piet.* 1794 To France.* 1800 French municipal rights and capital of the Canton of Eschweiler in the French Dpartement de la Roer.* 1816 To Prussia. The French Cantons of Burtscheid and Eschweiler are put together to form the Prussian Kreis Aachen.* 1838 Foundation of the first joint stock company in the then Kingdom of Prussia: Eschweiler Bergwerksverein (i.e. Eschweiler Coal Mining Company) EBV.* 1858 Prussian municipal rights. Its quarters Hehlrath, Kinzweiler and St. Jris are released in order to form the new municipality of Kinzweiler.* 1932 Hastenrath and Nothberg become a part of Eschweiler.* 1944 Heavily destroyed in War II, the last coal mine was flooded during the war and never been re-opened.* Part of the federal land of Northrhine-Westfalia.* 1960s Complete modernization of Eschweilers downtown and regulation of the Inde in order to prevent the regular inundations.* 1972 Reorganization of administration in Northrhine-Westfalia: Eschweiler increases overnight from some 38,000 inhabitants to about 55,000 by receiving the villages Drwi, Laurenzberg, Lohn and Weisweiler. Kinzweiler, after 114 years, comes back.* 1970s Eschweiler loses seven quarters because of the brown-coal opencast mining: Erberich, Hausen, Langendorf, Laurenzberg, Lohn, Lrken and Ptzlohn. Main sights  Eschweiler main sights include:*Artificial lake Blausteinsee (Blue Stone Lake)*the Old Townhall (which is now the restaurant and conference wing of a hotel)*two pilgrim churches*main parish church of St. Peter und Paul with the Leather Piet from 1360*the chapel*dwelling house of the former Cistercians nunnery of St. Jris, skull relic in St. Jris church, baroque altar in Hehlraths church*Old Mill of Gressenich.Also present is a series of castle and manors:*Castle of Eschweiler (only three towers from the 13th century are left)*Castle of Kambach (beautiful castle besides the golf course)*Castle of Kinzweiler*Castle of Nothberg*Castle of Palant*Castle of Rthgen*Castle of Weisweiler (only the towers and the outer walls are left)*Manor of Broich*Manor of Drimborn*Manor of Nothberg Culture Eschweiler has three municipal halls (Drwi, Kinzweiler and Weisweiler), a cinema, a municipal art collection and the so-called Culture Centre Talbahnhof for cabaret and music events. Every summer the Eschweiler Music Festival EMF takes place. People go to the numerous pubs around the Market Place and in the old-town alley Schnellengasse as well as to the large-scale discothque Klejbors. Carnival Eschweiler is a center of Rhineland carnival. It has more than 20 active carnival clubs, and every Monday before Lent it has the third of Germanys longest carnival processions. Culinary specialities * Sauerbraten* Potato fritters (Reibekuchen) with black bread, apple syrup, sugar beet syrup or stewed apples* sausage (Blutwurst) crude or fried* Hemmel on ed (i.e. Heaven and Earth) mashed potatoes with stewed apples and fried blood pudding* Rice pies, apricot pies, pear pies (Schwatze Flaam) - 20 cm in diameter; the pear pies, also called black pies, are traditionally served at funerals* Horse and horse by-products Medical care Eschweiler is home to the St. Antonius Hospital with 443 beds and 13 departments. Every year, there are some 15.000 in-patients and 25.000 out-patients. The Euregio Breast Centre is part of the hospital. Sports Soccer, ice hockey, golf, open-air swimming pool, indoor swimming pool, horse sports. Industry Chemical and metall industries, logistics and a brown-coal power plant. Science The lignite (brown coal) deposits in the region are former Miocene swamp forest dominated by Castanopsis , a type of chinkapin. Such plants do not occur naturally in Europe today. A type of wood has been described from logs found in Eschweiler mines. It was named Castanoxylon eschweilerense in reference to the town; the name would translate as Eschweiler chinkapin wood, as it probably belonged to Castanopsis but perhaps to some other genus of chinkapin. TransportationEschweiler has six railway stations: Hauptbahnhof (central station), Eschweiler-Aue (from 2009), Eschweiler-West, Eschweiler-Talbahnhof, Eschweiler-Nothberg, Eschweiler-Weisweiler and Nothberg (till 2009). Eschweiler-St. Jris is planned.Eschweiler has two bus terminals and bus lines in every quarter and in its whole vicinity. Autobahn exits on the A 4 include Eschweiler-West, Eschweiler-Ost and Weisweiler. The city can be reached also by three exits on the A 44: Aldenhoven, Alsdorf and Broichweiden. Notable people* Altmeyer* Briefs* Fieseler* J. Gnkel* Lexis* Reuleaux* Schaffrath* Schreiner* Smuda* Thyssen* Rinckens* Souquet* KleinInternational relationsEschweiler is twinned with:*  Wattrelos, France, since 1975*  and Banstead, Kingdom, since 1985(Reigate and Banstead twinning info)References External links * Official site af:Eschweilerast:Eschweileraz:vaylerbs:Eschweilerbg:ca:Eschweilercs:Eschweilerda:Eschweilerpdc:Eschweilerde:Eschweileret:Eschweileres:Eschweilereo:Eschweilereu:Eschweilerfa:fo:Eschweiler(Allemagne)ga:Eschweilergl:Eschweilerhr:Eschweilerio:Eschweilerid:Eschweileria:Eschweileris:Eschweiler(Germania)he:ka:kw:Eschweilersw:Eschweilerla:Ascvilarelv:Eveilere(Rheinland)lt:Eveilerisli:Eschweilerlmo:Eschweilerhu:Eschweilermg:Eschweilermt:Eschweiler(Duitsland)nds-nl:Eschweilerja:(Rheinland)nn:Eschweilernds:Eschweilerpl:Eschweiler(Rennia)ty:Eschweilerksh:Aischwielero:Eschweilerru:se:Eschweilersco:Eschweilersq:Eschweilersimple:Eschweilersk:Eschweilersl:Eschweilersr:fi:Eschweilersv:Eschweilertl:Eschweilertr:Eschweileruk:vi:Eschweilervo:Eschweilerwa:Eschweilerwar:Eschweilerbat-smg:Eveilerszh:
1123088
Australian_Manufacturing_Workers_Union
footnotesThe Australian Manufacturing Workers Union, or more fully, the Automotive, Food, Metals, Engineering, Printing and Kindred Industries Union (AMWU) (The Metalworkers) is an Australian union that is registered with the Industrial Relations Commission and is affiliated with the Council of Trade Unions.The AMWU is considered to be a left-wing union by the trade union movement.  It has a number of subdivisions: Vehicle division, Metal and Engineering division, the Food and Confectionery division, the Technical, Supervisory and Administrative division (for white collar workers) and the Printing division.  The AMWU has membership coverage over most workers in Australias manufacturing industry.Australia NSW Sydney IRProtest AMWU.jpg|right|thumb|200px|AMWU workers protest Howards IR reformsHistoryTodays AMWU was formed in 1995 as a result of recent amalgamations.  The AMWU has a trade union history that goes back to 1857 and the Stockade in Ballarat.Printing DivisionIn 1917 the Printing Industries Employees Union of Australia (PIEUA) registered federally.  In 1966 it changed its name to the Printing and Kindred Industries Union (PKIU) when it merged with the Amalgamated Printing Trades Employees Union of Australia.  In 1986 the PKIU merged with the Federated Photo Engravers, and in 1992 with the Victorian Printers Operatives Union.  In 1995 the PKIU became the Printing Division of the AMWU.Western Australian Branch on the PIEUAIn 1888 the Western Australian Typographical Society formed.  This union changed its name in 1900 to the Western Australian Typographical Industrial Union of Workers and became the Australian branch of the Printing Industries Employees Union of Australia in 1916.Victorian Branch of the PIEUAThe formation of the Victorian branch of the PIEUA only occurred in 1921 due to disputes between the small craft unions in the printing trade.*The Victorian Typographical Society merged to become part of the PIEUA Victorian branch.*The Australian Bookbinders & Paper Rulers Association is believed to have formed around 1878, and merged to become part of the PIEUA Victorian branch.*The Ballarat Typographical Society formed in 1857.  It was a small and conservative group, which avoided amalgamations until it merged to become part of the PIEUA Victorian branch.Victorian Printers Operatives UnionThe Victorian Printers Operatives Union was registered in 1987, but existed well before this date as the Printing Trades General Workers Union.  This union merged with the PKIU in 1992.Federated Photo Engravers Photo-Lithographers & Photogravure Employees Association of AustraliaThe Federated Photo Engravers were active from 1910 as a smalled union of skilled workers in Australian and Victorian newspaper officers.  They registered federally in 1942 as Federated Process Engravers Photo-Lithographers & Photogravure Employees Association of Australia.  They were then deregistered in 1943, and then reregistered under the same name in 1943.    It changed its name to the Federated Photo Engravers Photo-Lithographers & Photogravure Employees Association of Australia in 1952.  In 1986 it merged with the PKIU.Food and Confectionery divisionAround 1898 a union of jam sauce and pickle workers formed, but only registered in 1911 as the Jam Sauce Pickle & Food Preserving Employees Union of Australia.  In 1916 it changed its name to the Amalgamated Food Preserving Employees Union of Australia.  The union was insignificant in organising food workers until 1922, when it was reorganised under the leadership of Clarey, a Victorian.  The union changed its name again in 1929 to the Food Preservers Union of Australia.  While it had fluctuating membership due to the seasonal nature of canning work, the union was one of the few which maintained a strong presence in rural Australia.  In 1992 the union merged with the Confectionery Workers Union.In 1925 thee Federated Confectioners Association of Australia registered with the AIRC.  In 1986 they changed their name to the Confectionery Workers Union of Australia.  In 1992 it merged with the Food Preservers Union of Australia to form the Confectionery Workers & Food Preservers Union of Australia.  This new union then amalgamated with the Automotive Metals & Engineering Union in 1994 to form the Automotive Food Metals & Engineering Union.Vehicle divisionIn the late 1890s the Coach-Makers society was formed as a union in the horse-drawn coach building industry.  In 1917 it registered as the Australian Coach Motor Car Tram Car Waggon Builders Wheelwrights and Rolling Stock Makers Employees Federation.  In 1930 it reregistered under the even more cumbersome name of the Australian Coach Motor Car Tram Car Waggon Builders Wheelwrights & Air Craft Rolling Stock Makers Employees Federation.  In 1938 it changed its name to the much simpler Vehicle Builders Employees Federation. In 1993 the Vehicle Builders Employees Federation of Australia merged with the Metals & Engineering Workers Union to form the Automotive Metals & Engineering Union.Until a more extensive history is written, please see the Australian Trade Union Archive entry listed below.Metal and Engineering divisionIn 1991 the Amalgamated Metal Workers Union merged with the Association of Draughting Supervisory & Technical Employees to form the Metals & Engineering Workers Union  In 1993 the Metals & Engineering Workers Union merged with the Vehicle Builders Employees Federation of Australia for form the Automotive Metals & Engineering Union.Association of Draughting Supervisory & Technical EmployeesIn 1918 the Commonwealth Public Service Artisans Association was registered.  It changed its name in 1975 to the Australian Public Service Artisans Association which then merged in 1986 with the Association of Draughting Supervisory and Technical Employees.In Brisbane in 1915 the Association of Architects Engineers Surveyors and Draughtsmen of Australia (AAESDA) was formed.  It registered in Queensland in 1917.  In 1944, with branches in Victoria and New South Wales, AAESDA achieved federal registration.  In 1948 it took over members from the deregistered Australian Association of Draughtsmen, and in 1971 took over members from the deregistered Federation of Scientific and Technical Workers.  The union changed its name in 1981 to the Association of Draughting Supervisory and Technical Employees (ADSTE).  In 1986 it amalgamated with the Australian Public Service Artisans Association, and again in 1991 with the Amalgamated Metal Workers Union to form the Metals and Engineering Workers Union.Amalgamated Metal Workers UnionIn 1851 the British Amalgamated Engineering Union established a branch in Australia.  This branch registered in 1905 as the Amalgamated Society of Engineers.  It changed its name in 1921 to the Amalgamated Engineering Union, which was deregistered in February 1938.  A replacement, the Amalgamated Engineering Union (Australian Section) was formed in 1938.  The union remained a section of the British Amalgamated Engineering Union until 1969.  After 1969 the union changed its name to the Amalgamated Engineering Union (AEU).  In June 1972 the AEU merged with the Sheet Metal Workers, Blacksmiths & Boilermakers and Federated Jewellers, forming the Amalgamated Metal Workers Union (AMWU) in 1973.  The AMWU merged in 1976 with the Federated Shipwrights (forming the Amalgamated Metal Workers & Shipwrights Union) and in 1983 with the Federated Moulders (Metals) Union (forming the Amalgamated Metals Foundry & Shipwrights Union ).  In 1985 the union changed its name to the Amalgamated Metal Workers Union again.Federated Moulders (Metals) Union of AustraliaA small Australia-wide union of skilled tradesmen occupying a strategic position in Australian engineering with strong links to the mining and railway industry. It was formed through the amalgamation of several state unions in 1899 although it did not gain federal recognition until 1916Federated Shipwrights & Ship Constructors Association of AustraliaThis small, skilled union whose members specialised in ship construction and ship repair, was first registered federally in January 1916 as the Federated Shipwrights of Australia. Just a few months later, in September 1916, it changed to the Federated Shipwrights Ship Constructors & Boat Builders Association of Australia. By the end of 1917, in what was a tumultuous period, the union had changed again, this time to the Federated Shipwrights Ship Constructors Naval Architects Ships Draughtsmen and Boat Builders of Australia. This union operated until 1933 when it succumbed to a further name change: the Federated Shipwrights & Ship Constructors Association of Australia. Operating until 1976 the Federated Shipwrights & Ship Constructors Association amalgamated with the Amalgamated Metal Workers Union to form the Amalgamated Metal Workers & Shipwrights Union. When the Federated Moulders (Metals) Union amalgamated in 1983, the union changed slightly to the Amalgamated Metals Foundry & Shipwrights Union, but in 1985 reverted back to the Amalgamated Metal Workers Union. A 1991 amalgamation with the Association of Draughting Supervisory & Technical Employees created the Metals & Engineering Workers Union. Two years later a further amalgamation with the Vehicle Builders Employees Federation of Australia resulted in the Automotive Metals & Engineering Union. Finally in 1994 this union merged with the Confectionery Workers & Food Preservers Union to form the Automotive Food Metals & Engineering UnionExternal links*Official Website*Australian Trade Union Archive entry for AMWUManufacturing Workers Union
1126540
Kumara,_New_Zealand
Kumara is a town on the West Coast of the Island of Zealand. It is located 30 kilometres south of Greymouth, close to the western end of State Highway 73, which leads across Arthurs Pass to Christchurch. The River flows past to the north.()() The population was 318 in the 2006 Census, a decrease of 6 from 2001.()The name may come from the language Kohe mara, which is the blossom of the ttarmoa, or bush lawyer.(The Coast to Coast annual multisport race starts at Kumara.()HistoryKumara was founded and become one of the countrys chief mining centres following the discovery of gold at Dillmanstown, about  to the south-east, in 1876. The tramline from Greymouth to Paroa was extended to Kumara the following year. The population was 4,220 in October 1877. The town became a borough in 1877.(Dollimore, Edward Stewart. - Kumara, Westland. - of New Zealand (1966).) Kumara Hospital was operating by 1881() and continued into the twentieth century.() In 1882, the Kumara volunteer fire brigade was formed.(Rogers, p 115)Kumara was the home town of prominent politician Seddon, who was elected mayor of the town in 1877,(Rogers, pp 71-72) and served as Minister of New Zealand from 1893 until his death in 1906.In 1925, the manager of Pearns Hotel in Kumara was charged by police after she refused to supply accommodation to two visiting temperance lecturers.() The Pearns Brewery became part of Westland Ales around this time.(Rogers, p 160)Although the town once had 50 pubs, the numbers dwindled. In June 2009, the last remaining pub, the Empire Hotel, had its licence cancelled by the Liquor Licensing Authority.() In 2010, the last store of the town is facing closure, with only a few hundred inhabitants left. However, it is hoped that one of the Zealand Cycle Trails to run through the town could lift the settlements fortunes again.()EducationSchool is a coeducational full primary (years 1-8) school with a decile rating of 5 and a roll of 20.() The school celebrated 120 years of education in the district in 1997.(format &ndash; Scholar search)References(Neuseeland)(Nueva Zelanda)Junctionnl:Kumara
1130298
Social_history_of_England
The social history of England demonstrates innumerable changes over many centuries.  These major social changes have affected England both internally and in its relationship with other nations. The themes of history include  history, Labour history and the working class, history, Family history, of education in England, history and rural and agricultural history.  The topic generally excludes politics, diplomacy and intellectual and constitutional studies. Prehistoric societyThe distant past does not offer us much information on the structures of society, however, major changes in human behaviour make it likely that society must have changed dramatically. In common with much of Europe, the switch from the hunter-gatherer lifestyle to farming around BC must have heralded an enormous shift in all aspects of human life. Nobody knows what changes may have occurred, and recent evidence of permanent buildings and habitation from 3,000 years ago means that these may still have been gradual shifts. One of the most obvious symbols of change in prehistoric society is Stonehenge. The building of such circles, mounds and monuments throughout the Isles seems to have required a of labour. Builders would have needed to dedicate themselves to the task of monument construction to acquire the required skills. Not having time to hunt and farm would make them rely on others to such an extent that specialised farmers would emerge who provided not only for themselves but also for the monument builders.What we know of prehistoric times apart from their monuments is mostly derived from the remains of burials, and this shows another major change in society: the rise of an aristocracy. It is perhaps inevitable that a division of labour would give some people less work while others got more, and the increase of lavishly furnished graves seems to confirm this. Again, care should be taken not to infer too many complex ideas of social history from grave sites. However, graves do show that people had surplus time for the production of decorative items and they hint at early beliefs about death and religion. This aristocracy, whether it gained its position through martial strength or technological skill, made further social stratification highly likely.Two other changes which surely influenced social change were the beginning of the Age and the building of forts. The first probably necessitated the second, although the need for forts was probably greater due to the growth in population, competition for resources and an unwillingness to simply move on and abandon settled lives or farms.Fortification and war raise one important unanswered question about British society: the role of invasion. Any incursion of other peoples into the British Isles is bound to have major social effects, nevertheless we do not really know whether these events were invasions, immigrations or simply adoptions of outside ideas; and the native populations may have been mostly killed, slowly supplanted, integrated with the new or just had the aristocracy replaced. These questions relate to many of the changes in culture seen in prehistoric and later times such as the people, the Celts, the Romans and the Anglo-Saxons. Romans The arrival of the Romans in BC probably did not alter society greatly at first, as it was simply a replacement of the ruling class, but numerous, at first minor, ideas would later gain footholds. Certainly, it wouldnt have affected Ireland in the slightest. It is from the Romans, and particularly Tacitus, that we get the earliest detailed written records of Britain and its tribal society. We get fascinating glimpses of society in Britain before the Romans, although only briefly and disparagingly mentioned, particularly the importance of powerful women such as Cartimandua and Boudica. City dwelling was not new to pre-Roman Britain, but it was a lifestyle that the Romans preferred even though available to only a select few Romanised Britons. Romanisation was an important part of the Roman conquest strategy, and British rulers who willingly adopted Roman ways were rewarded as client kings; a good example of this is Togidubnus and his ultramodern Roman-style house at Fishbourne.Although the Roman conquest was relatively swift, there was often rebellion, and war with the unconquered Caledonian tribes in the far north, and so the army became an important part of Roman British life. An army, probably larger than that of most medieval monarchs, gave a low-status Briton the chance of a steady job, the possibility of seeing the rest of the empire, and rewards for service if they survived. The army also brought people to Britain, not just from present day Italy but from all over the empire. To subdue and control the country, the Romans built a major road network which not only was an important engineering project but formed the basis of the countrys communication links. The Romans brought many other innovations and ideas such as writing and plumbing, but how many of these things were the preserve of the rich or were even lost and re-appropriated at a later date is uncertain. The one other great social change the Romans brought to Britain was Christianity, whose effect on society was probably minimal at first but eventually far succeeded. Early medieval society The collapse of the Roman Empire in the 5th century is thought to have brought general strife and anarchy to society, but the actual events are not well understood. Archaeology certainly shows a reduction in the expensive goods found before and the Roman cities began to be abandoned, but much of British society had never had such things. Certainly, numerous peoples took advantage of the absence of Roman power, but how they affected British society is far from clear. The hegemony of Roman rule gave way to a selection of splintered, often competing, societies, including later the heptarchy. Rather than think of themselves as a small part of a larger Roman empire, they reverted to smaller tribal allegiances.The Anglo-Saxons arrival is the most hotly disputed of events, and the extent to which they killed, displaced, or integrated with the existing society is still questioned. What is clear is that a separate Anglo-Saxon society, which would eventually become England with a more Germanic feel, was set up in the south east of the island. These new arrivals had not been conquered by the Romans but their society was perhaps similar to that of Britain. The main difference was their pagan religion, which the surviving northern areas of non-Saxon rule sought to convert to Christianity. During the 7th century these northern areas, particularly Northumbria, became important sites of learning, with monasteries acting like early universities and figures such as Bede at the forefront of European thought.  In the 9th century the Great was extremely interested in creating a literate, educated people and did much to promote the language, even writing books himself. Alfred and his successors unified and brought stability to most of the south of Britain that would eventually become England, and he is also credited with organising the country into shires, the forerunners of current counties. Late medieval society Feudalism, although always a very contentious idea, is often used to describe medieval society. Basically stated, a lord owns land or a fief which he allows vassals to work in return for their military service. The vast majority of the people were peasants who would work on the vassals fiefs. This or a similar system was the basis of later medieval society. It probably existed in some form in England before the conquest, but the Normans did much to institute it, either replacing existing lords or by becoming overlords above now-demoted lords. A wealth of information on these social structures can be drawn from one of the best early surveys of its type, the Book.After the Norman conquest of England, English society seemed fixed and unchanging for several centuries, but gradual and significant changes were still taking place, the exact nature of which would not be appreciated until much later. The Norman lords spoke Norman, and in order to work for them or gain advantage, the English had to use the language that developed in England. This became a necessary administrative and language (see literature), but despite this the language was not supplanted, and after gaining much in grammar and vocabulary began in turn to replace the language of the rulers. At the same time the population of England more than doubled between Domesday and the end of the 13th century, and this growth was not checked by the almost continual foreign warfare, crusades and occasional civil anarchy.The crusades are one measure of the ever-increasing power of the church in medieval life, with some estimates suggesting that as many as 40,000 clergy were ordained during the 13th century. This is also shown by the spate of cathedral building, common throughout Europe, at the time. These great buildings would often take several generations to complete, spawning whole communities of artisans and craftsmen and offering them jobs for life.The increase in population led not only to larger cities and towns, but also to the building of many more towns. This did not change England significantly from being a mainly rural society, and many agricultural changes, such as rotation, kept the countryside profitable. It has been suggested that the 13th century experienced a mini-industrial revolution, with the increased use of wind power and changes in the wool industry. Wool, always important to the British economy, was traditionally exported to be processed, but it was now frequently processed in England, creating a variety of extra jobs. The export of cloth continued to increase from the 14th century onwards, and after the closing of the port of Calais (which consumed much of the raw wool) by the Spanish in the late 16th century, cloth became the primary type of wool exported.() Many people were finding different roles and responsibilities within English society too, with the growth of law giving people greater access to the law and the commons starting to have a place in the of England during I of Englands time.thumb|The Black Death re-shaped societyAfter many years of growth and gradual change, there was one seismic event which changed British society dramatically. The Death in the middle of the 14th century, according to some estimates, almost halved the population. Whole villages were wiped out by the plague, but rather than destroying society it managed to reinvigorate it. Before the plague there was a large, perhaps excessive, workforce with overpopulation and people competing for scarce resources. The drop in population meant that labourers were in short supply, and peasants who had once been confined to a landowners estate now had great incentive to travel to areas without workers. This social mobility was combined with the fact that peasants could charge much more for their services, and this began a switch from indentured labourer to wage earner which signalled the decline of the feudal system.The peasants new-found freedoms were very worrying to the authorities, who passed laws specifying the maximum that a peasant should be paid, but this had little effect on wages. The first of several laws were also made, dictating exactly how people at every level of society should dress and what they could own, in an effort to enforce social distinctions. These new laws, plus a newly levied tax which had been calculated on pre-plague population figures, led directly to the Revolt. Although quickly put down, the revolt was an early popular reform movementa precursor to later, more successful uprisings.Chaucers Tales give an illuminating picture of many of the different people who made up medieval society, although these portraits are limited mainly to the middle classes. The of Bath is one particularly vibrant character within the Tales and a few years later a real-world equivalent, Kempe, showed in her autobiography that women had an important part in medieval society. Tudor society The dynasty period was seen as a very stable time compared to the previous years of almost constant warfare. The Reformation caused not only internal and external conflict, but also had some surprising effects on society. Before the of the Monasteries these institutions had been one of the important parts of social welfare, giving alms and looking after the destitute, and their disappearance meant that the state would have to adopt this role, which culminated in the law of 1601. The monasteries also had been the major educational establishments in the country; after they had gone, many new grammar schools were founded and these, along with the earlier introduction of the press, helped to improve literacy. At the same time, though, language suffered when the Laws in Wales Act 1535, which combined England and Wales into one state, outlawed the use of language for public offices.The agricultural reforms which had begun in the 13th century accelerated in the 16th century, with inclosure altering the field system and denying many of the poor access to land.  Large areas of land which had once been common, and whose usage had been shared between many people, were now being enclosed by the wealthy mainly for extremely profitable sheep farming. This change in farming practices probably contributed to the growth of cities, as the unlanded and unemployed moved to look for work; at the same time, there was a marked growth in the suburb. These features were described by an explorer of England, John Leland, as not a place for the excluded poor, who were traditionally kept on the outskirts of the city, but a place for the middle classes to escape the crowded centre.Many new opportunities presented themselves for people to alter their places in society. There were the refinements of both the furnace and gunpowder which made the arms trade lucrative, and science, art, trade and exploration were all on the increase. Shakespeare is a very good example of the burgeoning society, showing not only that a lowly son of a glovemaker could go on, apparently without a university education, to become an actor, playwright and theatre owner - not highly socially regarded professions - but also that people increasingly had the money and time to attend the theatre. Stuart society left|thumb|Oliver Cromwell, the man with the most influence on British society?If Shakespeare and his contemporaries symbolised the start of true social mobility, then Cromwell reached the high point of social movement, unequalled even in the 20th century. The son of a farmer, he went on to become a king in all but name, and the effect of that short-lived republicanism would permanently alter British society.Cromwells rise to power was in part the outcome of religious conflict and dissent present since the Lollards of the 14th century. However, these religious radicals and even the Protestant Reformation did not seem to affect society greatly, and in the case of the Reformation it was in England a relatively calm transformation compared to other parts of Europe. There was burning of heretics on both sides as the two factions vied for power, but the vast majority of laypeople seemed unmoved or even uncertain as to which faith they belonged to. It was only in Stuart times, when the population felt itself to be strongly of England, that fear of the re-adoption of the Catholic religion began to cause problems.The civil war was far from just a conflict between two religious faiths, and indeed it had much more to do with divisions within the one Protestant religion. The austere, fundamentalist Puritanism on the one side was opposed to what it saw as the crypto-Catholic decadence of the church on the other. Divisions also formed along the lines of the common people and the gentry, and between the country and city dwellers. It was a conflict that was bound to disturb all parts of society, and a frequent slogan of the time was the world turned upside down.In 1660 the Restoration was a quick transition back to the Stuart.  Public opinion reacted against the puritanism of the Puritanssuch as the banning of traditional pastimes of gambling, cockfights, the theatre and even Christmas celebrations. The arrival of Charles II&mdash;The Merry Monarch&mdash;brought a relief from the warlike and then strict society that people had lived in for several years. The theatre returned, along with expensive fashions such as the periwig and even more expensive commodities from overseas. The Empire had been expanding since the late 16th century, and along with much wealth returning to the country, expensive luxury items were also appearing. Sugar and coffee from the Indies, tea from India and slaves (briought from Africa to the sugar colonies, along with some enslaved servants in England itself) formed the backbone of imperial trade.One in nine of the population of the country is estimated to have lived in London near the end of the Stuart period and, as a hub of trade, expensive goods from all over accumulated there. houses were becoming the centres of business and social life, and it has also been suggested that tea might have played its own part in making Britain powerful, as the antiseptic qualities of tea allowed people to live closer together, protecting them from germs, and making the Revolution possible.(Alan Macfarlane, Did tea and beer make Britain great?) These products can be considered as beginning the consumer society which, while it promoted trade and brought development and riches to society.(Roy Porter, English Society in the Eighteenth Century (2nd ed. 1990) pp 214-50)The James Bible as a standard text it also was a major influence on literature, language and thought for centuries to come. Newspapers, were new and soon became important tools of social discourse and the diarists of the time such as Pepys and Evelyn are some of the best sources we have of everyday life in Restoration England. Georgian society AgricultureMajor advances in farming made agriculture more productive and freed up people to work in industry. The Agricultural Revolution included innovations in technology such as Jethro Tulls drill which allowed greater yields, the process of enclosure, which had been altering rural society since the Middle Ages, became unstoppable. The new mechanisation needed much larger fields &mdash; the layout of the British countryside with the patchwork of fields divided by hedgerows that we see today. Industrial RevolutionHistorians typically date the coming of the Revolution to Britain in the mid-18th century.  Not only did existing cities grow but small market towns such as Manchester, Sheffield and Leeds became cities simply by weight of population.(For scholarly essays covering a range of issues see Patrick OBrien and Roland Quinault, eds. The Industrial Revolution and British Society (1993) )Middle class and stability The middle class grew rapidly in the 18th century, especially in the cities.(Paul Langford, A Polite and Commercial People: England 1727-1783 (1994) pp 59-122) At the top of the scale The legal profession succeeded first, establishing specialist training and associations, and was soon followed by the medical profession. The merchant class prospered with imperial trade. Wahrman (1992) argues that the new urban elites included two types: the gentlemanly capitalist, who participated in the national society, and the independent bourgeois, who was oriented toward the local community. By the 1790s a self-proclaimed middle class, with a particular sociocultural self-perception, had emerged.(Dror Wahrman, National society, communal culture: an argument about the recent historiography of eighteenth-century Britain, Social History, 1992, Vol. 17 Issue 1, pp 43-72 )Thanks to increasing national wealth, upward mobility into the middle class, urbanisation, and civic stability, Britain was relatively calm and stable, certainly compared with the revolutions and wars which were convulsing the American colonies, France and other nations at the time.(W. A. Speck, Stability and Strife: England 1714-1760 (1979))  The politics of the Revolution did not translate directly into British society to spark an equally seismic revolution, nor did the loss of the American Colonies dramatically weaken or disrupt Great Britain. ReligionHistorians have emphasized the importance of religion, including the domination of the Anglican establishment.(J. C. D. Clark, Revolution and Rebellion: State and Society in England in the Seventeenth and Eighteenth Centuries (1986) ) The Act of Toleration of 1689 granted rights of free religious worship to the non-conformist Protestant sects which had emerged during of the Civil War. Baptists, Congregationalists, Methodists, and Quakers were all allowed to pray freely. These groups took the opportunity of the expanding empire and set up in the Colonies, where they expanded rapidly after the Great Awakening.In response to the religious and moral apathy of the common people, Methodist preachers set up societies divided into classes  intimate meetings where individuals were encouraged to confess their sins to one another and to build each other up. They also took part in feasts which allowed for the sharing of testimony and mutual surveillance of moral behavior. The success of Methodist revivals in reaching the poor and working classes concentrated their attention on spiritual goals rather than political grievances.(David Hempton, Methodism and Politics in British Society, 17501850 (1984)  )Cultural historyScholars have recently been privileging cultural history over social history, with the language and self images of people the chief targets of research. Of special importance is the concept of an emerging consumer society. Studies of middle- and upper-class manners, tastes, and fashions have proliferated, along with studies of gender, national, and racial identities.(David Henige, Are You Getting Enough Culture? Moving from Social to Cultural History in Eighteenth-Century Britain, History Compass, Jan 2008, Vol. 6 Issue 1, pp 91-108)Victorian eraThe social changes during the era were wide-ranging and fundamental, leaving their mark not only upon the United Kingdom but upon much of the world which was under Britains influence during the 19th century. It can even be argued that these changes eclipsed the massive shifts in society during the 20th century; certainly many of the developments of the 20th century have their roots in the 19th. The technology of the Revolution had a great impact on society. Inventions not only introduced new industries for employment, but the products and services produced also altered society. Mining to extract the coal and other raw materials needed to fuel the  Industrial Revolution was a major new industry, and before 1842 even women worked in the mines.The status of the poor is one area in which huge changes occurred. A good illustration of the differences between life in the Georgian and Victorian eras are the writings of two of Englands greatest authors, Austen and Dickens. Both writers held a fascination for people, society and the details of everyday life but in Austen the poor are almost absent, mainly because they were still the rural poor, remote and almost absent from the minds of the middle classes. For Dickens, only a few years later, the poor were his main subject, as he had partly suffered their fate. The poor now were an unavoidable part of urban society and their existence and plight could not be ignored. Industrialisation made large profits for the entrepreneurs of the times, and their success was in contrast not only to the farm workers who were in competition with imported produce but also to the aristocracy whose landowning wealth was now becoming less significant than business wealth. The British class system created an intricate hierarchy of people which contrasted the new and old rich, the skilled and unskilled, the rural and urban and many more.Wesleys Methodists had succeeded in their campaign for the abolition of slavery in 1807, but at the same time labour and near-slavery were still common, even at the heart of the Empire. Some of the first attacks on industrialisation were the Luddites destruction of machines, but this had less to do with factory conditions and more to do with machines mass-producing linen much quicker and cheaper than the handmade products of skilled labourers. The army was called to the areas of Luddite activity such as Lancashire and Yorkshire and for a time there were more British soldiers controlling the Luddites than fighting Napolon in Spain. The squalid, dangerous and oppressive conditions of many of the new Victorian factories and the surrounding communities which rose to service them became important issues of discontent, and the workers began to form unions to get their working conditions addressed.The first unions were feared and distrusted,and ways were devised to ban them. The most widely known case was that of the Martyrs of 1834, an early attempt at a union whose members were tried on a spurious charge, found guilty and transported to Australia. The sentence was challenged and they were released shortly afterwards, but unions were still threatened. It was not until the formation of the TUC in 1868 and the passing of the Union Act 1871 that union membership became reasonably legitimate. Many pieces of legislation were passed to improve working conditions, including the Hours Act 1847 to reduce working hours, and these culminated in the Act 1901.Many of these acts resulted from the blight of Britains agricultural depression.  Beginning in 1873 and lasting until 1896, many farmers and rural workers were hard-pressed for a stable income. With the decline in wheat prices and land productivity many countrymen were left looking for any hope of prosperity. Although the British parliament gave substantial aid to farmers and laborers, many still complained that rents were too high, wages too low, and the hours laborers were required to work were too long for their income. As a result many workers turned to unions to have their concerns heard and, with the acts listed above as proof, were able to achieve some success.Links and progressthumb|240px|right|The railways changed communications and society dramaticallyAnother important development during the Victorian era was the improvement of communication links.  coaches, canals, ships and most notably the railways all allowed goods, raw materials and people to be moved about, rapidly facilitating trade and industry. Even later communication methods such as photography, cinema, telegraph, telephones, cars and aircraft, which would not have an impact but also leisure. Many people used the train services to visit the seaside, helped by the Bank Holiday Act of 1871 which created a number of fixed holidays which all sectors of society could enjoy.  Large numbers travelling to quiet fishing villages such as Worthing, Brighton,  Morecambe and Scarborough began turning them into major tourist centres, and people like Cook saw tourism and even overseas travel as viable businesses. The trains became another important factor in regulating and ordering society, with railway time being the standard by which clocks were set throughout Britain. Steam ships such as the Great Britain and Great Western made international travel more common but also advanced trade, so that in Britain it was not just the luxury goods of earlier times that were imported into the country but essentials such as corn from the America and meat from Australia. One more important innovation in communications was the Black, the first stamp, which standardised postage to a flat price regardless of distance sent.The Victorians were impressed by science and progress, and felt that they could improve society in the same way as they were improving technology. The model town of Saltaire was founded, along with others, as a planned environment with good sanitation and many civic, educational and recreational facilities, although it lacked a pub, which was regarded as a focus of dissent. Similar sanitation reforms, prompted by the Public Health Acts 1848 and 1869, were made in the crowded, dirty streets of the existing cities, and soap was the main product shown in the relatively new phenomenon of advertising. Victorians also strove to improve society through many charities and relief organisations such as the Army, the RSPCA and the NSPCC, and at the same time there were many people such as Nightingale trying to reform areas of public life. Another new institution was Peels peelers, one of the earliest formal police forces.Queen Victoria was possibly one of the most powerful women in Britain since Queen Elizabeth, but her status did not dramatically improve the position of women within society. There were many movements to obtain greater rights for women, but voting rights did not come until the next century. The Womens Property Act 1882 meant that women did not lose their right to their own property when they got married and could divorce without fear of poverty, although divorce was frowned upon and very rare during the 19th century. The Victorians are often credited with having invented childhood. Despite the image of large Victorian families, the trend was towards smaller families, probably because of lower infant mortality rates and longer life spans. Legislation reduced the working hours of children while raising the minimum working age, and the passing of the Act 1870 set the basis for universal education. 20th century War and depressionVictorian attitudes and ideals continued into the first years of the 20th century, and what really changed society was the start of War I. The army was traditionally never a large employer in the nation, and the regular army stood at 247,432 at the start of the war. By 1918 there were about five million people in the army and the fledgling Air Force, newly formed from the RNAS and the RFC, was about the same size of the pre-war army. The almost three million casualties were known as the lost generation, and such numbers inevitably left society scarred; but even so, some people felt their sacrifice was little regarded in Britain, with poems like Sassoons Blighters criticising the ill-informed jingoism of the front. Conscription brought people of many different classes, and also people from all over the empire, together and this mixing was seen as a great leveller which would only accelerate social change after the war.The social reforms of the previous century continued into the twentieth with the Labour Party being formed in 1900, but this did not achieve major success until the 1922 general election. Lloyd George said after the First World War that the nation was now in a molten state, and his Act 1919 would lead to affordable housing which allowed people to move out of Victorian inner-city slums. The slums, though, remained for several more years, with trams being electrified long before many houses. The of the People Act 1918 gave women householders the vote, but it would not be until 1928 that equal suffrage was achieved.A short lived post-war boom soon led to a depression that would be felt worldwide. Particularly hardest hit were the north of England and Wales, where unemployment reached 70% in some areas. The General Strike was called during 1926 in support of the miners and their falling wages, but little improved, the downturn continued and the Strike is often seen as the start of the slow decline of the British coal industry. In 1936 two hundred unemployed men walked from Jarrow to London in a bid to show the plight of the industrial poor, but the March, as it was known, had little impact and it was not until the Second World War that industrial prospects improved. Orwells book Road to Wigan Pier gives a bleak overview of the hardships of the time.The World War is sometimes regarded as simply a continuation of the previous war after a brief period of peace, but the conflicts were significantly different, particularly for British society. The war started with a war in which threats of major actions did not materialise, but thousands of children were moved from the cities into the country. Ten times the number of children were evacuated in 1939, when there were troops on the early expeditionary force in France, but many returned some months later and remained in the cities until the end of the war. There were half the number of military casualties in this war than the last, but the improvements in aerial warfare meant that there were many more civilian casualties and a foreign war seemed much closer to home. The early years of the war in which Britain stood alone and the spirit which developed as Britain suffered under aerial bombardment helped pull the nation together after the divisions of the previous decade, and campaigns such as for Victory helped give the nation a common purpose. The focus on agriculture to feed the nation gave some people their first introduction to the countryside, and women played an important part in the war effort as the Girls; there were also half a million women in the armed forces, with even Princess Elizabeth, the future queen, training as a lorry driver. The measure of freedom women received through these jobs, and working in factories in the jobs of male workers who had gone into battle, is considered as contributing to the later revolution. Late 20th century The Labour Party victory after War II was seen as a vote by the returning soldiers for what they felt were their rights after serving their country. The most important reform was the founding of the Health Service on July 5, 1948. It promised to give cradle to grave care for everyone in the country, regardless of income. Rationing, which had been instituted during the war, was extended even after the war &mdash; with bread rationed between 1946 and 1948, and sweets rationed until 1954. For some of the very poorest, rationing was beneficial, because their rationed diet was of greater nutritional value than their pre-war diet. Just as after the War I, there was a short-lived economic boom after the Second World War, followed by an economic downturn in the early 1950s, which became known as the austerity years.Leisure activities began to be more accessible to more people after the war. camps, which had first opened in the 1930s, became popular holiday destinations in the 1950s &mdash; and people increasingly had money to pursue their personal hobbies. The BBCs early television service was given a major boost in 1953 with the coronation of Elizabeth II, attracting an estimated audience of twenty million, proving an impetus for people to buy televisions. At the same time, other new consumer goods were coming into homes, and houses were more likely to be owned with mortgages. The markets where people traditionally bought their goods were being replaced by stores and centres, and advertising became widespread. Cars were becoming a significant part of British life, with city-centre congestion and developments springing up along many of the major roads. These problems led to the idea of the belt to protect the countryside, which was at risk from development.The 1960s are often considered a time of great shifts in attitudes in the United Kingdom. One notable event was the publication of H. Lawrences Chatterleys Lover by Books in 1960. Although first printed in 1928, the release in 1960 of an inexpensive mass-market paperback version prompted a court case. The prosecuting councils question, Would you want your wife or servants to read this book? highlighted how far society had changed, and how little some people had noticed the change. The book was seen as one of the first events in a general relaxation of sexual attitudes. Other elements of the revolution included the development of Pill, Quants miniskirt and the 1967 legalisation of homosexuality. There was a rise in the incidence of divorce and abortion, and a resurgence of the liberation movement, whose campaigning helped secure the Pay Act and the Discrimination Act in 1975.The 1960s were a time of greater disregard for the establishment, with a satire boom led by people who were willing to attack their elders. music became a dominant form of expression for the young, and bands like Beatles and the Stones were seen as leaders of culture. Youth-based subcultures such as the mods, rockers, hippies and skinheads became more visible.Reforms in education led to the effective elimination of the school. The rise of the school was aimed at producing a more egalitarian educational system, and there were ever-increasing numbers of people going into education.In the 1950s and 1960s, immigration of people to the United Kingdom, mainly from former British colonies in the Caribbean, India and Pakistan, began to escalate, leading to racism. Dire predictions were made about the effect of these new arrivals on British society (most famously Powells of Blood speech), and tension led to  a few riots. In the longer term, many people with differing cultures have successfully integrated into the country, and some have risen to high positions.One important change during the 1980s was the opportunity given to many people to buy their houses, which resulted in many more people becoming property owners in a stakeholder society. At the same time, minister Thatcher weakened the unions. The United Kingdoms entry into the Community (EEC) in 1973 meant that Britain was now more closely tied to its member states than ever before, and the countrys relationship with the Union (as the EEC is now called) is still much debated. The ecology movements of the 1980s reduced the emphasis on farming, and promoted farming and conservation of the countryside.Religious observance declined notably in Britain during the 20th century, even with the growth of non-Christian religions due to immigration and travel. of England attendance has particularly dropped, although it is not clear if personal spirituality has changed markedly. The movement to Keep Sunday Special seems to have all but lost its battle, and the move towards a 24-hour society continues, with working and living patterns changing accordingly.HistoriographyThe social history of the medieval period was primarily developed by Power, H. S. Bennett, Ambrose Raftis, Hilton, and Sylvia Thrupp before the rise of the New Social History in the 1960s.Burchardt (2007) evaluates the state of English rural history and focuses on  an orthodox school dealing chiefly with the economic history of agriculture. The orthodox historians made impressive progress in quantifying and explaining the growth of output and productivity since the agricultural revolution. A challenge came from a dissident tradition that looked chiefly at the negative social costs of agricultural progress, especially enclosure. In the late 20th century there arose a new school, associated with the journal Rural History. Led by Alun Howkins(Alun Howkins, Death of Rural England: A Social History of the Countryside since 1900 (2003)), it links rural Britain to a wider social history. Burchardt calls for a new countryside history, paying more attention to the cultural and representational aspects that shaped 20th-century rural life.(Jeremy Burchardt, Agricultural History, Rural History, or Countryside History? Historical Journal 2007 50(2): 465-481)NotesReferences***Bibliography*Bdarida, Franois. A social history of England, 1851-1990, Routledge, 1991, ISBN 0415016142, 9780415016148* Britnell, R. H.  Britain and Ireland 1050-1530: Economy and Society (2004) * Crick, Julia, and Elisabeth van van Houts. A Social History of England, 900-1200 (2011) * Daunton, M. J. Progress and Poverty: An Economic and Social History of Britain 1700-1850 (1995) online edition* Devine, T. M. and Rosalind Mitchison. People and Society in Scotland: A Social History of Modern Scotland: 1760-1830 (1988) * Glynn, Sean, and Alan Booth; Modern Britain: An Economic and Social History (Routledge, 1996) online edition*Hobsbawm, Eric, and George Rud. Captain Swing (1969)*Horrox,Rosemary,  and W. Mark Ormrod, A Social History of England, 1200-1500, Cambridge University Press, 2006, ISBN 978-0-521-78345-3* Kanner, Barbara. Women in English Social History, 1800-1914: A Guide to Research (2 vol 1988-1990). 871 pp.*Mathias, Peter. The transformation of England: essays in the economic and social history of England in the eighteenth century, (Taylor & Francis, 1979), ISBN 0416731201* Platt; Colin. Medieval England: A Social History and Archaeology from the Conquest to 1600 A.D (1994) online edition * Porter, Roy. English Society in the Eighteenth Century (2nd ed. 1990) * Royle, Edward. Modern Britain: A Social History 1750-1997 (2nd ed. 1997), with detailed bibliography pp 406-444* Sharpe, J. A. Early Modern England: A Social History 1550-1760 (2009) * Stearns, Peter, ed. Encyclopedia of Social History (1994) 856 pp.* Stearns, Peter, ed. Encyclopedia of European Social History from 1350 to 2000 (5 vol 2000), 209 essays by leading scholars in 3000 pp.* Thompson, E.P. The Making of the English Working Class (1963) * Thompson, F. M. L., ed. The Cambridge Social History of Britain, 1750-1950. Vol. 1: Regions and Communities. Vol. 2: People and Their Environment; Vol. 3: Social Agencies and Institutions (1990). 492 pp.* Youings, Joyce A. The Social History of Britain in the 16th Century (1991)Historiography* Burchardt, Jeremy. Agricultural History, Rural History, or Countryside History? Historical Journal 2007 50(2): 465-481. Issn: 0018-246x*Hawke, Gary. Reinterpretations of the Industrial Revolution in Patrick OBrien and Roland Quinault, eds. The Industrial Revolution and British Society (1993) pp 54-78* Navickas, Katrina. What happened to class? New histories of labour and collective action in Britain, Social History, May 2011, Vol. 36 Issue 2, pp 192-204* Thompson, E. P. The Essential E. P. Thompson (2001). 512 pp. highly influential essays on 19th century working class* Wilson, Adrian, ed. Rethinking Social History: English Society, 1570-1920 and Its Interpretation (1993). 342 pp.de la socit britannique
1131858
Tarleton_State_University
Image:Entrance to Tarleton State University Picture 2230.jpg|200px|right|thumb|Entrance sign to Tarleton State University in Stephenville, Texas200px|thumb|right|Tarleton CenterTarleton State University is a public, coeducational, state university located in Texas. It is the largest non-land-grant university primarily devoted to agriculture in the States.Located near the Dallas/Fort Worth Metroplex, Tarleton is a growing institution, known for its internationally recognized horse production program and innovative teacher education programs. The university has one of the largest and oldest public school improvement partnerships in the United States that benefits more than 50 area school districts. In the Fall of 2006, the university had 9,462 students enrolled at two campuses up from 8,540 in 2004 making it one of the fastest growing universities in Texas and the third largest university in the A&M system.(Texas A&M University System http://www.tamus.edu/overview/about.html)AcademicsFounded in 1899, John Tarleton Agricultural College became a member of The Texas A&M University System in 1917, a four-year degree-granting institution in 1959 and gained status as a university in 1973. Tarleton State University is now one of the states fastest growing institutions with an enrollment of approximately 10,500 for fall 2009.  Tarleton State enjoys the second largest enrollment in the Texas A&M System; with only Texas A&M at College Station being larger. Located one hour from Fort Worth in Stephenville, Texas, Tarleton serves as the educational and cultural flagship of the Timbers Region. With a population of 20,000, Stephenville is known as one of the countrys most desirable places to live and is included in Norman Cramptons The 100 Best Small Towns in America published by Prentice Hall.Upgraded campus facilities and affordable tuition, combined with Stephenvilles economical cost of living, make Tarleton one of the best university values in Texas. A new  sports recreation center, complete with weight rooms, track and gym, opened in fall 2007. The two-story building holds four racquetball courts, a weight room, cardio equipment as well as multi-purpose rooms, classroom and office space. The new facility is also home to a climbing wall and an outdoor pursuit area, allowing students the opportunity to sign up for such outdoor items as kayaks, tents, and camping equipment.A new $13 million,  dining facility opened in Fall 2008. For student convenience, the new building is an extension of the student center and has two floors, a convenience store, executive meeting rooms and a cafe with a wireless network.Other recent additions include a new $30.8 million science building complete with a 64-seat planetarium and a new observatory at Tarletons Hunewell Ranch, which houses a fully robotic  research-grade telescope. The old science building went through an extensive $13.5 million renovation and expansion upgrading laboratories and classrooms. Tarletons recent progress also includes a remarkable expansion and renovation of the Dick Smith Library and comfortable new housing facilities.Students come from around the world26 countries and 49 states in the United Statesto attend Tarleton. Students have the opportunity to choose from 64 undergraduate, 21 graduate, two associate degree programs and one doctoral program.The largest non-land grant agriculture university in the United States, Tarleton is a leader in teacher education. It has one of the largest and oldest public school improvement partnerships in the United States, benefiting more than 50 area school districts. The university also is a national leader in educating agricultural education teachers.Data mining and data warehousing research at Tarleton is improving crop insurance for farmers. At the Center for Agribusiness Excellence (CAE), researchers seek to improve the integrity of the U.S. Department of Agriculture Risk Management Agencys delivery of services to farmers. Data mining research has identified patterns and schemes for cheating the system that are then reported to the Compliance Branch of the agency. In addition, systematic mistakes causing farmers claims to be underpaid are reported for corrective action. To date, more than $300 million in cost savings has been attributed to CAE research.Bachelors degrees in nursing, environmental engineering, engineering physics, international agriculture, interdisciplinary business, and communications, as well as a masters degree in environmental science and a doctoral degree in educational administration, have been added to the curriculum.The Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board recently approved an Associate of Applied Science degree and Advanced Technician Certificates in both Medical Laboratory Technology and Histotechnology for Tarleton (April 2004).Image:tarletongraduation.jpg|thumb|left|Tarleton students graduate at Gym in December of 2010A doctoral degree in educational administration and online masters degrees programs are offered. GetEducated.com named three of Tarletons online masters programs as Best Buys for affordability and quality: Tarletons online MBA (regionally accredited)(); its master of science in information systems(); and its master of science in human resources (which placed first)().Tarleton was recognized for its Tarleton Model for Accelerated Teacher Education (TMATE), which received special notice from the Association of Teacher Education for program excellence. Through the TMATE program, Tarleton is the provider of alternate teacher certification for Fort Worth ISD.The Computer Information Systems Department was selected by the International Data Processing Management Association as the outstanding four-year program in North America in 1989, 1996 and 2003 making Tarleton the first university to be a three-time award recipient.Tarletons Laboratory for Wellness and Motor Behavior houses a unique training machine called The Psycle for individuals with quadriplegia, paraplegia, hemiplegia, spina bifida, multiple sclerosis, or other mobility impairments that require special training. Research showing the importance of moving paralyzed body parts is ongoing.The Department of Animal Sciences oversees the Tarleton Equine-Assisted Therapy (TREAT) program that is designed to utilize horseback riding as a form of physical, emotional and recreational therapy. Hippotherapy (physical therapy on horseback using the horse as a therapist) has developed as a medical field recognized by most major countries.The Texas Institute for Applied Environmental Research on the Tarleton campus plays a national leadership role in environmental issues related to water quality. This program provides the university, the dairy and beef industries, environmental control agencies and governmental policy groups with water pollution data for the  Upper North Bosque River watershed.In fall 2002 the W.K. Gordon Center for Industrial History of Texas opened at a site located near Thurber, a town located approximately  northwest of Stephenville and about one hour east of the DFW Metroplex. Funded through a $1.2 million grant from the Texas Department of Transportation and a private gift from Mrs. W.K. Gordon Jr. Center is located on  near the site of Texas first coal mine and adjacent to New York Hill. The Center is dedicated to the preservation, research and recording of Texas industrial history including coal mining, brick making and oil and gas exploration.Tarleton operates two radio stations.  KURT-LP 100.7 FM is a student-operated rock station, while KTRL-FM 90.5 FM is a public radio station with National Public Radio news, classical and jazz.  Both are operated by students of Tarleton State University out of the radio station located in the Mathematics building on the TSU campus. Tarleton State University is one of only three universities in the state of Texas to own and operate two radio stations, the only other institutions being the University of Texas in Austin and the University of Houston().Most university activities take place on Tarletons centrally located,  main campus. A  university farm and the  Hunewell Ranch provide additional educational facilities. Tarleton also offers specialized programs at its Dora Lee Langdon Cultural and Educational Center in Granbury and select programs and courses at Community College in Waco, College in Weatherford, and in Fort Worth. Upper-level courses are offered at Tarleton-Central Texas in Killeen.LocationTarleton is located  southwest of Worth, Texas in Stephenville, the county seat of Erath County. With a population of 14,90015,600, Stephenville provides a combination of small-town security and proximity to Dallas/Fort Worth. Most university activities take place on Tarletons centrally located, 173 acre (700,000 m) main campus. A 600 acre (2.4 km) university farm and the 1,200 acre (4.8 km) Hunewell Ranch provide additional educational facilities. Recently, Tarleton also began offering programs at its new Granbury location, the Dora Lee Langdon Cultural and Educational Center.AthleticsTarleton State University athletics compete at the NCAA Division II level in the Star Conference.  Their admission into the conference in 1995 marks their second period of membership having previously participated from 1968 to 1975.  They were a founding member of the Intercollegiate Athletic Association (TIAA) in 1976 and remained in that league until 1990.  From 1991 to 1994 Tarleton played as an Independent.Nicknames for the mens and womens teams are Texans and TexAnns, respectively.  Prior to becoming a four-year institution in 1961 they were known as the Plowboys.Tarleton State University fields five Mens varsity sports and seven Womens varsity sports in the Lone Star Conference(http://www.tarletonsports.com/index.aspx):The basketball and volleyball teams play at Gym.(Wisdom Gym at TSU) The football team plays at Memorial Stadium.Spirit ProgramsCheerleadersThe Tarleton State University Cheerleaders pride themselves in being one of the most enthusiastic and outgoing groups at the University. They rank among Tarletons most visible student organizations and feature a solid core of campus leaders.The Tarleton Cheerleaders are active throughout the entire school year, attending and performing at most of the Universitys home athletic events while also traveling to many of the road contests. Additionally, the Tarleton Cheerleaders perform for those in attendance at the Traditions Rally, Midnight Madness, pep rallies, and many of the homecoming activities. (http://www.tarletonsports.com/sports/2009/8/23/cheerdance.aspx?tabcheeranddance) At football and basketball games, the Tarleton Cheerleaders entertain the crowd with elite stunts, tumbling, basket tosses and pyramids, as well as involving the crowd and providing enthusiasm for the Texan and TexAnn sports teams.The Tarleton State University Cheerleaders have also competed at the National level for many years at the NCA/NDA National Collegiate Cheerleading and Dance Championships in Daytona Beach, Florida. They are known throughout the country as one of the most consistent and impressive teams throughout the years. So much attention has been drawn by the program that recruits come from states across the country including Arkansas, California, Michigan, Illinois, and even Canada, just to be part of this storied program. Since 2008, the Texans have had enormous success at the National Competition:Texan StarsFor over 25 years the Texan Stars Dance Team has been an integral part of Tarleton State University andone of the most recognized student organizations on campus. The Stars were formed in the spring of 1974, and the precision dance team has had a tradtion of excellence and perfection ever since.The Texan Stars Dance Team is active throughout the entire school year. During the fall semester the Texan Stars perform at halftimes of all Tarleton home football games. Also, the Texan Stars perform for those in attendance at the Traditions Rally, Midnight Madness, pep rallies, and many of the homecoming activies.Spring events include a spring variety show featuring different styles of dance, as well as the nationals competition. The Texan Stars Dance team won the title of National Champions at the American Dance and Drill Team Collegiate Competition that was held in March 2002 in Denton, Texas.Additionally, the Texan Stars continue their support for the Texans and TexAnns by attending and performing at home basketball, softball, and baseball games.(http://www.tarletonsports.com/sports/2009/8/23/cheerdance.aspx?tabcheeranddance)MusicThe music program at Tarleton State University is a fully accredited member of the National Association of Schools of Music (NASM). It is housed in the elegant Clyde H. Wells Fine Arts Center, one of the top performance venues among colleges and universities in the Southwest. This multi-purpose fine arts complex contains three theatres: a 243-seat recital hall, an 805-seat auditorium, and the workshop theatre. There is a 16 keyboard piano lab and computer lab. The instrument collection includes two nine-foot concert Steinway grand pianos, the Waggener Memorial Organ  a tracker two-manual pipe organ, a Richard Kingston harpsichord, and several Steinway grand pianos that are designated for piano majors to practice. The Music department at Tarleton State University currently offers two degrees which are B.A. in Music and B.M. in Music Education (with all-level certification). It currently offers one graduate degree (M.M. in Music Education). The program has over 150 full-time enrolled students with 80% of the majority being instrumental studies and 20% being vocal studies. (http://www.tarleton.edu/music/index.html)*The Piano Studies area of the Tarleton State University Music Department operates separately from the instrumental and vocal sections. It  has been recognized internationally and intercontinentally as a source of quality education in the field of piano performance . It is headed by Spotz who is a graduate of Curtis Institute of Music and was a student of the legendary concert pianist Horszowski who had the longest known career as a performing artist. Each year, the area of Piano Studies hosts their Annual Piano Festival which, in the past, has brought in such artists as:Schneider,Penneys,Cabassi,Dick,Martinez,Immel,Mcdonald,Artymiw,During this 23 day open-to-public festival, highly distinguished pianists from all over the world perform and work with students in masterclasses. It is confirmed that, for the 20112012 Tarleton State Piano Festival, international concert pianist Licad will be the guest of honor.  ** Piano Studies at Tarleton State University, with the help of the International Affairs and Study Abroad Department on campus, is able to send their students to study at contracted institutions. In 2007, piano and voice students travelled to Tuscania, Italy where they studied their respective arts with notable musicians such as Conti (who was a student of Bernstein), and Kyriakos (who was a student of Marsh).(http://www.tarleton.edu/music/index.html)TraditionsOscar P. was, according to legend, John Tarletons pet duck who went everywhere with him. The two were so close that the duck is supposedly buried with Mr. Tarleton.  During athletic events, a common sight is students chanting to raise the spirit of Oscar P.TTP  Ten Tarleton Peppers (1921) and TTS  Ten Tarleton Sisters (1923) are the two oldest spirit organizations on campus, also in the state of Texas, and are precursors of the Purple Poo, a secret organization which promotes school spirit. The members in this organization keep their identities secret by appearing in public in costume. The Plowboys, originally the mascot for Tarleton athletic teams, but more recently known as a spirit organization, are recognized by the white shirts, hats and purple chaps. Texan Rider is Tarletons current mascot that at one time rode a horse during the football games (tradition was discontinued due to the renovated stadium), and is also recognized by his/her purple chaps. The Texan Rider has been the mascot of Tarleton since 1961 when the student body chose the Texans and TexAnns to represent its athletic teams. Silver Taps, a ceremony held to honor Tarletons faculty, staff, students, and alumni who have died over the past year and marks the beginning of Homecoming week.John Tarleton Spirit Award originated in 1988, and has since become the most highly-coveted award at TSU, and is given to up to twelve students annually at the Leadership and Service Awards Banquet. Recipients are chosen based on campus involvement through organizations, special projects, and activities that contribute to the overall growth of the individual.Yell Contest  During the 1980s, the Student Government Association added the Yell Contest to Homecoming Week, and it quickly established itself as a traditional component of the celebration. Student Organizations perform step and dance moves to original chants and lyrics; a panel of judges selects the top three teams. The winning team has the honor of beating the drum immediately following the Plowboys. Initially held Administration Mall, the event moved to the Thompson Student Center amphitheater and is currently held in Wisdom Gymnasium.Winners of Yell Contest are split into Large and Small Division; Small Division has 20 or fewer participants and Large Division is split into 21 or more participants. The event was split into two divisions in 2006, whereas before, it was one competition with only one winner.Large Division Winners:                    2006 Delta Zeta                           2007 Kappa Delta Rho                      2008 Alpha Gamma Delta                    2009 Alpha Gamma Delta                    2010 Delta Zeta                           Small Division Winners:2006 Alpha Gamma Rho2007 Chi Alpha2008 Lambda Chi Alpha2009 Delta Phi Xi2010 Delta Phi XiNotable alumni*Bingham Grammy & 2010 Oscar Winner*Ben Barnes, former Lieutenant Governor of Texas (19691973) and Speaker of the Texas House of Representatives (19651969)*Bartel, NFL quarterback*Dearth, NFL tight end*Deravi, economist*B. Douglass, Executive Officer Texas USDA Service Agency*William E. Dyess, survivor of the Bataan Death March during World War II*Fox, MLB player*Glasgow, Texas State Senator*Hughes-Fulford, chemist and astronaut*Kennedy, actor. *Mitchell, radio personality*Michael J. Moncrief, Texas State Representative, judge, mayor of Fort Worth*Mumme, college football coach*M. Russell, U.S. Representative serving 19411947*W. Stenholm, U.S. Representative serving 19792005*B. Thompson, served as President of Tarleton from 19821990 and later as Chancellor of the A&M University System*Winkler, NFL offensive tackle*Zindler, investigative reporter for KTRK-TVReferences External links * Tarleton State University* The Texas A&M University SystemState University
1137242
John_McKay_(politician)
John Norman McKay, PC, MP is a lawyer and a Canadian politician. He is the Liberal of Parliament for the riding of ScarboroughGuildwood. McKay was formerly the Secretary to the Minister of Finance while the Liberal party governed, but now serves as an opposition MP. Having served as Parliamentary Secretary to a cabinet minister McKay carries the designations of Honourable and Privy Council (PC) for life.Born in Toronto, McKay has lived most of his life in Ontario. He has a of Arts degree from the of Toronto at Scarborough and a of Laws degree from Queens University. He is a member of Garden Baptist Church in Toronto.(OttawaWatch: Madeleine, Maurice and the Almighty.  Lloyd Mackey. CanadianChristianity.com. May 11, 2006. http://www.canadianchristianity.com/cgi-bin/na.cgi?nationalupdates/060511ottawa)After practising private law he was elected to represent East in 1997 and was re-elected in 2000. After Scarborough East was abolished in 2003 he was elected to represent the riding of ScarboroughGuildwood in 2004. McKay was re-elected in the 2006, 2008 and 2011 federal elections.Early life and careerMcKay is a life-long resident of Ontario in Toronto. McKay attended five of the areas public schools before attending the of Toronto Scarborough campus where he earned his Bachelor of Arts. He later earned his Bachelor of Laws from University.After completing his degree he went into private practice as a real estate attorney, assuming positions of leadership in the legal community. Most notably, he was the President of the Durham Bar Association, an Executive Member of County and District Law Association, Real Estate Executive of the Canadian Bar Association, and a member of the Law Society of Upper Canadas Committee on Title Insurance.Election to Federal ParliamentMcKay was first elected to the House of Commons in June 1997 as a Liberal during the general election of the 36th Canadian Parliament. McKay was twice elected to the former electoral district of East, in 1997 and 2000, with 54.3 and 59.8 percent of the vote respectively. After 2000, the riding of Scarborough East was abolished and became Scarborough-Guildwood, which acquired parts of Southwest and Scarborough Centre. McKay is currently the Member of Parliament for Scarborough-Guildwood and was elected as the representative for the riding in 2004, 2006 and 2008 with 57.5, 53.3 and 50.2 percent of the vote respectively.Parliamentary experienceParliamentary Secretary to the Minister of FinanceFrom 2003 to 2006, McKay served as Secretary to then Finance Minister Goodale. Martin, during his tenure as Minister, implemented a number of reforms aimed at making parliament more democratic. One of these reforms gave greater authority to MPs serving as parliamentary secretary to a Minister, in contrast to their previous role that had been largely clerical with little purview over government policy. To this end, McKay was given ministerial responsibility for the improvement of partnerships between the public and private sectors.During the 20032006 period the Ministry of Finance tabled two consecutive balanced budgets and implemented its productivity strategy, aimed at improving economic growth through innovation, elimination of domestic trade barriers, competitive taxes, and improved infrastructure among other initiatives.(http://www.fin.gc.ca/news04/04-078_1e.html)  On November 14, 2008 McKay was appointed as the Official Opposition Critic for Small Business and Tourism.(http://www.liberal.ca/pdf/docs/081114_critics_list_en.pdf)CommitteesMcKay was the vice-chairman of the Standing Committee on Justice and Human Rights (20012003), Chair of the Caucus Committee on Economic Prosperity (20072008), and a member of Planning and Priority Committee chaired by Stephan Dion (20072008). He is currently a member of the Standing Committee on Finance (2004present)Other Parliamentary experience* Vice-Chair of Canada-U.S Inter-Parliamentary Association  Present* Official Opposition Critic for Small Business and Tourism  2008* Official Opposition Critic for Crown Corporations  2006* Chair of the Canada-Caribbean Parliamentary Friendship Group  2006* Head of Canadian delegation at Commonwealth Finance Ministers Meeting - Barbados 2005, St. Kitts 2004* Chair of the Canada-Taiwan Parliamentary Friendship Group from 01-04* Head of Canadian delegation to Taiwan 2003Successful Private Members BillsMcKay has successfully sponsored two Members Bills during his tenure as a Member of Parliament:* C-260, passed in 2003, requires cigarette manufacturers to produce fire-safe cigarettes (cigarettes that extinguish when left unattended, reducing their flammability).* C-293, passed in 2008, outlines specific requirements for the disbursement of Canadian foreign aid. The Bill requires that Canadian foreign aid be exclusively targeted toward the goal of poverty reduction, and requires timely and transparent reporting of how such funds are spent.Private Members Bills rarely receive Assent as most bills originate from the cabinet of the party controlling the most seats (the party in government).An Act to amend the Hazardous Products Act (fire-safe cigarettes) - C-260In 2002 McKay introduced Bill C-260, an amendment to the already existing Hazardous Products Act, which forces tobacco manufacturers to produce fire-safe cigarettes in response to the threat of fire posed by cigarettes left unattended. The Bill requires that cigarettes meet regulated ignition propensity standards (RIPs) by law and provide evidence to the Minister of Health of compliance with the regulation. As of October 1, 2005, all cigarettes in Canada are manufactured to self-extinguish before burning to the filter, thus reducing the risk that it will start a fire when forgotten or when the smoker falls asleep. Prior to the C-260, the Canadian Ministry of Health estimated that unattended cigarettes resulted in 2085 fires, 70 deaths and $28.1 million in damages to property.(http://www.johnmckaymp.on.ca/nm-show.asp?story366)  Health Canada further estimates that RIP cigarettes will prevent 34-68% of fire -loss damages.(Ibid) After C-260 received Royal Assent in 2003, Canada became the first country to introduce nation-wide ignition propensity regulations on cigarettes, and has become an example used by advocacy groups in other nations for the imposition of such regulations.(http://www.firesafecigarettes.org/itemDetail.asp?categoryID81&itemID1033&URLLegislative%20updates/Adoptions/Canada%20the%20first%20nation%20to%20enact%20a%20fire-safe%20cigarette%20law)The Development Assistance Accountability Act - C-293In 2006 McKay introduced Private Members Bill C-293, which called for significant changes to the manner in which Canadas official development assistance is delivered and administered. Often referred to as the Better Aid Bill, its primary purpose is to mandate that the International Development Agency (CIDA) target Canadas Official Development Assistance (ODA) to the specific goal of poverty reduction in developing nations. The Bill established a set of principles that CIDA must take into account when adjudging how aid is to be spent. First, it requires that the perspectives and concerns of those who receive ODA be taken into account. This means that Canadian aid flows will have to respect the priorities of its beneficiaries - the people living in poverty. Secondly, it requires that ODA be promulgated in a manner consistent with Canadian values and foreign policy, sustainable development, and the promotion of democracy and human rights. The Bill also requires that Canadian foreign aid spending be more transparent and accountable to Parliament and must be reported in a timely manner. Due to the legislated focus on long-term poverty reduction, ODA cannot be redirected towards international military efforts or short-term disaster relief (areas of policy that the Canadian government must fund separately) and is subject to judicial review and oversight by the Minister. Prior to the passage of C-293, parliamentary committees and NGOs had called for a clearer mandate for ODA. Critics of Canadas aid spending noted that assistance was often sent to countries that have recently experienced strong economic growth and prosperity or have dubious records regarding human rights. In an article from June 19, 2007, National Post columnist John Ivison reported that Canada had sent $7.7 million to the Republic of Ireland and Northern Ireland for creation programs and reconciliation projects, despite the countrys healthy economy, lower taxation rate and higher per capita GDP.(John Ivison. The National Post. Tuesday, June 19, 2007)  In another example, Ivison noted that in 2004-2005 China received $57 million in ODA, amid concerns held by the international community about human rights abuses.Dallaire moved third reading of C-293 in the Senate. Senator Dallaire hailed the Bill saying: My colleague in the other place, the Honourable John McKay, introduced Bill C-293 in the House of Commons in May 2006, almost two years ago. It has come a long way since then and has been put through many valuable and essential debates. I believe the debates initiated by Bill C-293 were so important that they will inform the nature of any future essential international development policy and legislation in this country. It is a first step.(http://sen.parl.gc.ca/SenWeb/speeches/details.asp?langen&sen47&speechID417)On March 20, 2008 C-293 passed third reading in the House of Commons with unanimous support from all parties. It received Royal Assent on May 29, 2008, thus becoming law as the Development Assistance Accountability Act, (An Act respecting the provision of official development assistance abroad).Canadas Development Assistance Accountability Act represents a trend among other nations that provide foreign aid toward legislated mandates for the provision of foreign aid. In 2002 the U.K. passed the International Development Act that entrenched poverty reduction as the preponderant focus of its foreign aid.(http://dsp-psd.pwgsc.gc.ca/Collection-R/LoPBdP/PRB-e/PRB0631-e.pdf)  Other countries with similar legislation include Sweden, Switzerland, Spain, Luxembourg, Denmark and Belgium.McKay is one of the more active Members of the Canadian Parliament on the issue of aid to developing nations, having been the Vice President of CIDO; an organization devoted the development of microfinancing in developing nations. In 2007 McKay travelled with Michael Savage M.P. (Liberal), Alexa McDonough M.P. (NDP), and Bill Casey M.P. (Conservative) to Kenya as part of a Parliamentary envoy to assess the efficacy and potential of ODA in developing nations. Though C-293 had been introduced prior to the trip, according to McKay the Kenyan sojourn gave greater urgency to the need for ODA reform. We did not come away with easy answers regarding development and poverty, but a much clearer sense that we do have the capacity for meaningful change.(McKay, John. The Face of Poverty. http://www.johnmckaymp.on.ca/nm-show.asp?story347, p.7) C-293 has received praise from a diverse array of groups and organizations including Canadas Coalition to End Global Poverty,(http://www.ccic.ca/e/004/news_2008-05-09_development_ngos_applaud_passing_of_foreign_aid_bill.shtml)  Make Poverty History,(http://www.makepovertyhistory.ca/en/blog/view-house-commons-gallery-passage-better-aid-bill) Engineers without Borders(http://www.ewb.ca/en/enews/2008/06/5.html) and the Evangelical Fellowship of Canada.(http://www.evangelicalfellowship.ca/NetCommunity/Page.aspx?pid187)Private Members Bill C-300Corporate Accountability of Mining, Oil and Gas Corporations in Developing Countries Act - Bill C-300On February 9, 2009 John McKay introduced his latest Private Members Bill C- 300 to the House of Commons. The Bill was defeated on October 26, 2010 during its third reading.Bill C- 300, also cited as the Corporate Accountability of Mining, Oil and Gas Corporations in Developing Countries Act, has the stated purpose of promoting environmental best practices and to ensure the protection and promotion of international human rights standards in respect of the mining, oil or gas activities of Canadian corporations in developing countries.  The Act would require the Minister of Foreign Affairs and the Minister of International Trade the to investigate and report on any single complaint against the activities of a Canadian extractive sector company in a developing country.  The Ministers could also investigate matters on their own initiative.  The Ministers would publish the results of any specific investigation, and submit annual reports of activities carried out under the Act to the House of Commons and the Senate for review.  The Act would also amend the laws governing Development Canada, the Pension Plan, and the of Foreign Affairs and International Trade, to require those organizations to withdraw financial support and consular support from companies acting inconsistently with CSR Guidelines.  McKay has stated that the intent of the bill is that these investigations be carried out within the existing organization and with the existing personnel available to the Ministers of Foreign Affairs and of International Trade (40th PARLIAMENT, 3rd SESSION, Monday, September 20, 2010, EDITED HANSARD, NUMBER 066)Said McKay: NGOs and government officials who have expressed concerns about the practices of some mining, oil, and gas operations in developing countries will be encouraged by Bill C- 300.  This Bill will provide strong incentives for Canadian corporations in developing countries to follow environmental and human rights standards.(http://www.johnmckaymp.on.ca/nm-show.asp?story527)  However, the intended and actual scope and impact of the Bill is not clear.  John McKay sometimes characterizes the bill as a modest law that would merely ensure that the Canadian government does not directly support extractive industry companies that do not adhere to CSR standards.(John McKay, Speech to Mining Industry Representatives Addressing Criticisms of C-300, April 15, 2010)  However, it appears that the law would oblige or empower (oblige in response to a complaint, empower if they believe warranted) the Minsters to investigate and report on any Canadian mining or oil company regardless of whether it was currently receiving support  so the potential sanction of government condemnation would apply to any extractive industry company, if one of the Ministers decides it is not acting consistently with the CSR guidelines.   C-300 is not without controversy.  While there has been no disagreement with the bills stated intent in continuing to improve Canadas performance in CSR, many groups argue that the bill has flaws that would prevent it from achieving its objective.  The mechanism of the bill is not aimed at changing the CSR performance of projects in developing countries, only from dissuading Canadian companies from initiating or maintaining investments in projects that may be found inconsistent with the CSR Guidelines.  John McKay has used Energy divesting of its share of a venture in Sudan as an example of how it would be feasible for Canadian companies to comply with the bill.(Standing Committee on Foreign Affairs and International Development, Thursday May 13, 2010)  While this did eliminate Talismans exposure to the poor CSR performance of that venture, there is evidence that this actually reduced the CSR performance Sudan by eliminating Talismans advocacy for CSR measures.  This approach contrasts to the National Roundtables on CSR 2007 Advisory Groups recommendations,(National Roundtables on Corporate Social Responsibility (CSR) and the Canadian Extractive Industry in Developing Countries: Advisory Group Report) and the current government initiatives, that are aimed at supporting and enforcing improved performance in the developing world.Development Canada (EDC) would be required to withdraw even existing financing from a company that has been found in a Ministerial investigation to have activities inconsistent with the guidelines to be established under Bill C-300. EDC notes that they currently conduct CRS assessments of financings in sensitive markets or for sensitive projects, and work with companies to ensure that required standards are met before receiving EDC support.(EDCs response to Bill C-300, Opening Remarks to The Standing Committee on Foreign Affairs and International Development by Jim McArdle, Senior Vice President, October 27, 2009, http://www.edc.ca/english/docs/speeches/2009/mediaroom_17358.htm)  EDC believes that by working with companies to resolve CSR issues they contribute more to CSR than if they were forced to exit the relationship as soon as the guidelines are not met. EDCs support in this sector helped generate $21.4 billion in Canadian GDP and sustain 139,000 Canadian jobs in communities across the country and this might be in jeopardy if Bill C-300 were to become law.  Representatives of the mining industry also note that key stakeholders were not consulted in the development of the bill, and is not in keeping with the spirit and intent of the recommendations of the National Roundtable on CSR.(& Developers Association of Canada, Bill C-300 Position Statement, August 2009 http://www.pdac.ca/pdac/publications/na/pdf/090812-bill-c-300-position-statement.pdf)  Representatives of the legal community in Canada and the extractive industry have noted that C-300 is problematic in several ways, including Canadas capacity, expertise or jurisdiction to enforce CSR guidelines abroad or to supersede local authorities.  It also forces the Canadian government into a punitive approach, rather than allowing the government to assist companies is resolving CSR issues.(Comments by Jim Peterson, Counsel with the Faskin Martineau and former Canadian federal Minister of International Trade, while appearing before The Standing Committee on Foreign Affairs and International Development, November 26, 2009)  As is evidenced through public statements and media appearances, Bill C-300s critics represent a wide array of extractive industry and business interests.(http://www.fasken.com/files/Publication/b7267ac4-e6f4-4edc-a2fd-030456fbacd4/Presentation/PublicationAttachment/99a7581f-ff68-4c4d-8b27-05a086ed4fbb/Bill%20C-300%20threatens%20Canadas%20Extractive%20Industries%20-%20Bourassa.pdf)(http://www.fasken.com/firm-opposes-bill-c-300-in-ottawa/)(http://network.nationalpost.com/NP/blogs/tradingdesk/archive/2010/03/08/pdac-2010-miners-unite-against-bill-c-300.aspx)(http://www.pdac.ca/pdac/publications/na/pdf/091217-bill-c-300-briefing-note.pdf)(Richard J. King, Ogilvy Renault LLP, CSR in the Mining Sector - An environmental law perspective on Bill C-300)(BDO Dunwoody Weekly CEO/Business Leader Poll - Compas Survey on C-300)(Fraser Institute - Private members bill unfairly targets Canadian mining industry) However, Bill C-300 is also supported by a wide array of public academics, and NGOs both internationally and within Canada.(http://www.johnmckaymp.on.ca/newsshow.asp?int_id80590)  Supporters of the Bill include (but are not limited to): International,  the Initiative, Poverty History, Mining Watch Canada, Africa Files, Vision, North-South Institute, Labour Congress, and Peace (Canada), Canada, and Democracy, Social Justice Committee of Montreal, and Canadian Network on Corporate Accountability.(  Various private individuals and foreign governments have weighed-in both as supporters and as critics of the Bill.Professor Richard Janda of the University Faculty of Law produced a report entitled, Bill C-300: Sound and Measured Reinforcement for CSR.(http://www.johnmckaymp.on.ca/images/newsmanager/newsfiles/bill%20c-300%20report%20-%20final.pdf)  According to Professor Janda Bill C-300 would make Canadian companies world leaders in CSR, and that good CSR performance would give Canadian extractive companies a competitive edge and international business advantage.  Industry submissions agree that good CSR performance is generally a source of competitive advantage.  Professor Jandas report does not examine the current position of Canadian companies and CSR, nor does it examine whether C-300 is required in order to make Canadian companies world leaders, both which are beyond the scope of the report.  However, John McKay has stated that Canadian companies already have a competitive advantage in some developing countries because they are held to higher standards of practice and more likely to fulfill licensing conditions.(  Essentially, there is agreement that CSR is important, and that Canada is already in many ways a strong player - the debate is whether C-300 will improve CSR performance, and if so whether it is the most appropriate way to do so.An important difference between the basis of Professor Jandas conclusions and the concerns of industry is the presumption of how easy, or not, it will be for the Minister receiving a complaint to determine if it is frivolous or vexatious.  Professor Janda states that the general requirement that a complaint appear to be reasonable on its face is nevertheless sufficiently stringent to allow the Minister in question efficiently to screen out complaints that are frivolous and vexatious, whereas industry representatives state that this will not be an easy determination, given that the complaints will likely relate to activities in remote areas and particularly if the complaint comes from an individual outside of Canada (in a developing country).  A second important difference in the view of the Janda report and submissions from industry and other members of the legal community is the presumption of how complaints will be investigated.  Professor Janda refers to the legality in Canada for the Canadian government to hear evidence from witnesses abroad, and gives examples of foreign fact-finding related to assistance in natural disasters to coordinate relief efforts.  However, he does not address the practicality or legality of investigating matters related to breaches of laws in foreign countries, which may include investigation of the actions of the foreign government.  Submissions critical of C-300 point out that many of the various allegations made against Canadian companies also imply breaches of law in the host country, or include accusations against the police or military of the host country, or challenge the conformity of host country laws with international standards (such as for recognition of indigenous peoples) - and that these would likely be difficult to investigate from Canada, or for the Canadian government to investigate in the host country.  The Janda report also finds Bill C-300 is consistent with the National Roundtables Advisory Groups recommendations, with an even more modest set of proposals. However, this is based on examination of the 6 major components of the proposed Canadian CSR Framework, which is a central recommendation in the Advisory Group report, rather than the 26 specific recommendations contained in the Advisory Group report.  In fact, the Bill does not reflect any of the specific recommendations of the Roundtables, although it is frequently referenced to the Ombudsman called for in the Roundtable recommendations.  Supporters of C-300 state that the Bill is a better representation of the Obudsman than the recently created Office of the Extractive Sector CSR Counsellor, because C-300 can force investigations and impose  sanctions.(Mining Weekly, C-300 MP makes his case to a room full of miners)  However, the Ombudsman office described in the recommendations was not to have the power to impose sanctions, it was proposed to provide advisory, fact-finding and reporting functions.(  A separate standing tripartite Compliance Review Committee (presumably representing government, business, and civil society) was proposed that, in cases of serious non-compliance, would make recommendations with regard to the withdrawal of financial and/or nonfinancial services by the government.  The Janda report rebuts further criticism by claiming Bill C-300s direct effects to be within federal jurisdiction, and therefore, not extraterritorial. However, this opinion does not address the legitimacy of the Canadian government investigating allegations related to the activities of foreign governments, nor investigation of crimes (other than crimes of universal jurisdiction) occurring in foreign countries, nor investigation of the activities of foreign nationals working in their home country.  As noted above, critics of the bill point out that allegations that have been presented as justification for the bill would require these sorts of extraterritorial investigations.  The Janda report insists that Bill C-300s expectations on Canadian corporations have a strong legal foundation.Bill C-300 supporters claim that since the mining companies receive investment from Development Canada (EDC), which is funded by Canadian taxpayers, and Canadian Pension Plan (CPP) their actions ought to be transparent and accountable to Canadians.(McKay, John, Holding Mining Companies Accountable for Actions Abroad, Ottawa Life, January 2010.)  The submissions critical of C-300 do not argue against this principle, and have noted that the existing CSR Commitment of EDC,(http://www.edc.ca/english/social.htm) and CPP Policies and Reports on Responsible Investing(http://www.cppib.ca/Responsible_Investing/) currently provide at least a measure of such transparency and accountability.  Additionally, C-300 does not include any of the transparency measures included in the recommendations of the National Roundtables 2007 Advisory Group report - many of which would not require government expenditure and therefore would be suitable for a Private Members Bill.Read the full text of the Bill here: http://www2.parl.gc.ca/HousePublications/Publication.aspx?DocId3658424&Languagee&Mode1Conservation effortsFrom 1998-2000, McKay represented the Federal Government as a board member on the Rouge Park Alliance, a group of government representatives and community leaders dedicated to the conservation, ecological protection, and enhancement of the River watershed and lakefront areas (The former riding of East bordered on the Rouge River area).(http://www.rougepark.com/media/publications/pdfs/annual/1999_ProgRpt.pdf)(http://www.rougepark.com/media/publications/pdfs/annual/2000_ProgRpt.pdf) McKay has also helped with efforts to extend the Waterfront Trail along parts of the Scarborough shoreline and enhance its public accessibility.(http://www.johnmckaymp.on.ca/images/clientupload/JMCN%20Autumn2005.pdf)MiscellaneousMcKay is a leading social conservative in the Liberal Party. He strongly opposed his own partys bill which legalised same-sex marriage in Canada in 2005.(http://www.johnmckaymp.on.ca/nm-list.asp?thisnewscat16) McKay is a past board member of the Doris McCarthy Gallery at the of Toronto Scarborough campus.(http://www.newcenturyinstitute.us/pages/151.html)Electoral recordNote: This section is not complete.ReferencesExternal links* John McKay* * LegalEase on CKUT FM Radio Podcast - Episode 6: Mining For lawMcKay
1138076
Barney_Barnato
thumb|Barney BarnatoBarney Barnato (21 February 1851  14 June 1897), born Barnet Isaacs, was a British Randlord, one of the entrepreneurs who gained control of diamond mining, and later gold mining, in Africa from the 1870s.BackgroundBarney Barnato claimed he had the same birthday as Cecil Rhodes (5 July 1853).  Most biographies give his date of birth as 5 July 1852.  However, his birth certificate (supported by census data) shows he was born Barnet Isaacs in the City of London on 21 February 1851, the son of Isaac and Leah Isaacs.  He was educated by Angel at the Free School. He had a hard life, and is reputed to have begged pass-outs from theatre-leavers at the Garrick Theatre in Leman Street, to sell them on to others for a halfpenny.(Rhodes and Barnato in Ian D. Colvin (1913). Cecil John Rhodes 1853-1902. London: T.C. & E.C. Jack.  Accessed 4 March 2007.) For a while he became a prizefighter and music-hall turn.(Stephen Inwood (2005). City of cities: The birth of modern London. London: Pan Books. p. 33. ISBN 978-0-330-43457-7)Isaacs joined his brother Harry in the Colony in 1873 during the diamond rush which accompanied the discovery of diamonds at Kimberley. His brother had gone out in 1871 and had been working as a comedian and conjurer, and his younger brother wanted to join in, calling out, And Barnett, too!  The oft-repeated phrase evolved, to the point which Isaacs changed his name to Barney Barnato. He was married to Leah (daughter of Solomon) Harris.Barnato Diamond Mining CompanyThe brothers formed the Barnato Diamond Mining Company, and within ten years Barney had become a millionaire, primarily by buying worked-out diamond mines area and mining the abandoned ground heaps.Barnato Diamond Mining competed with Cecil Rhodes in aggressively buying out competitors to gain market share in the Cape Colony diamond mining industry.  The rivalry ended when Rhodes purchased the Barnatos firm for GB4.0 million (equivalent to 2.03 billion in 2010(Measuring Worth, Relative Value of a UK Pound Amount - average earnings, retrieved on the 28 July 2010)); this transaction was a key step in the formation of Beers Consolidated Mines, the international diamond mining conglomerate.  The purchase cheque, signed by Rhodes, is said to have been the largest such instrument ever presented for payment up to that time. Barnato subsequently became Kimberleys of parliament in the Cape Parliament from 1889 until his death.Barnato doubled his fortune in the boom in South African gold mining shares of 189495 before losing most of it in the 1896 share collapse. He built, but never lived in, a vast house on the corner of Park Lane and Stanhope Gate in Mayfair, London, which was bought after his death by the banker Sir Sassoon.(DeathBarnato died in 1897 in mysterious circumstances, officially lost overboard near the island of Madeira, whilst on a passage home to England.(Who do you think you are?  Esther Rantzen on BBC.co.uk. Accessed 3 September 2008.) Although some have wondered if this were suicide and suggested that the Raid had had a major impact on him and left him severely depressed, his family vigorously rejected that theory, saying that it was totally out of character for a man who had been a pioneer in the rough-and-ready days of emerging Southern Africa.(http://www.tokencoins.com/barnato.htm) His body was recovered from the sea and is buried at Jewish Cemetery, London.The theory regarding the suicide of Barnato has also been tied to sinister later events.  One of his heirs, Joel was shot and killed in his business offices in Johannesburg by a con-man named Frederick Kurtze who went away with the name of von Veltheim in 1898.  In the trial for murder, von Veltheim hinted that he was supposed to be orchestrating a plot to kidnap Kruger, President of the Transvaal Boer Republic, that Barnato and Joel were backing.  The murder stemmed from blackmail against Joel, but von Veltheim claimed he was only seeking his promised payment.  As a result von Veltheim was able to get an acquittal from a Boer Jury (possibly due to anti-British and anti-Semitic feelings towards the deceased).  It was suggested by Brian Roberts, in his book Diamond Magnates, that Barnato may have been approached by von Veltheim too, and unsettled by his physical threats and the possibility of exposure.(Brian Roberts, The Diamond Magnates. London: Hamilton, 1972. pp. 232-244. )His will divided up his considerable fortune between his family, amongst which was his sister Sarah and her husband Abraham Rantzen, great-grandparents of TV presenter Rantzen.( Another beneficiary was his son, Barnato, who used part of the multi-million pound fortune he inherited at the age of two, to become a pioneer racing driver in the 1920s, one of the so-called Boys.Woolf Barnatos daughter Barnato Walker died in 2008 at the age of 90. She was the first British woman to break the sound barrier.See also* family* Hays Hammond  A famous mining engineer, diplomat and philanthropist who Barnato brought to Africa.ReferencesSources* Barney Barnato, Dictionary of National Biography. Accessed 28 April 2006* Brief biography of Barney Barnato*Rhodes and Barnato in Cecil Rhodes by Ian D. Colvin*External links*Portrait of Barnett Isaacs Barnato by Furniss at the National Portrait GalleryBarnatoBarnato
1139562
Roava
Roava (, , Latin: Rosnavia) is a town in Slovakia, approximately 71 km by road from Koice in the Region, and has a population of 19,120.The town is an economic and tourist center of the Gemer. Roava is now a popular tourist attraction with a beautiful historic town centre. The town is an episcopal seat. It has above all food, textile and remnants of mining industries.HistoryArchaeological finds show that the region was densely settled by miners as early as around 1200. The first written mention stems from 1291, the royal free town status from 1410. The Roman Catholic of Roava was founded in 1776.In the Middle Ages, Roava was a prosperous mining town for gold, silver, and iron. Mining activities stagnated from the 16th century (when territories to the south of the town were conquered by Turks). Mining - this time mainly of iron ore - was renewed around 1800 and was present in the town throughout the 20th century.The name of the town probably derives from the German and/or Hungarian word for rose (Rose and Rzsa).On 13 September 2003, Roava was visited by Pope Paul II.Noteworthy buildings* an important Mining Museum* a completely preserved medieval central town square with burgher houses* the Cathedral (Gothic, late 13th century) with many precious historic art objects, especially a Renaissance painting of Mestercia showing realistic mining motifs* the Town Tower (Renaissance, 1654) in the middle of the central town square* the Jesuit church (Baroque, 1687)* the Bishops residence (Baroque-Classical, arose 1778 from older houses) with  a column in front of the building* a town hall (Classical, 1711)* an Evangelic Lutheran church (Classical, 1786)* a Reformed church (neo-Gothic, 1905)DemographicsAccording to the 2001 census, the town had 19,261 inhabitants. 69.27% of inhabitants were Slovaks, 26.80% Hungarians, 1.59% Roma and 0.69% Czechs.() The religious make-up was 41.08% Catholics, 32.34% people with no religious affiliation, 12.03% Lutherans and 1.33% Greek Catholics.(Notable citizensA famous son of the town is Jozef afrik.Parts of the town* Nadabula* Roava (proper)* Roavsk Baa (Roava Mine)* Krsnohorsk jaskya (Cave)International relationsTwin towns  Sister citiesRoava is twinned with:*  Topola*  Cieszyn*  Tn*  Glarus*  SzerencsReferences;NotesExternal links* Roava* Information on Roava and the Gemer region* Information on tourist sights (with photo of the main square)* Medial information site about life in Roava (In slovak language)* Official site (Slovak only)ar:cs:Roavade:Roavaes:Roavaeo:Roavafr:Roavahr:Roavait:Roavahu:Rozsnynl:Roavapl:Roavaro:Roavaru:sk:Roavasr:war:Roava
1142686
Cordtex
Cordtex is a type of cord generally used in mining. It uses an core of pentaerythritol tetranitrate which is inside its plastic coating. It is commonly the thickness of electrical cord and burns at 2 km per second.  It is used to daisychain a sequence of explosives together.It can also be used in short lengths in simple boobytraps and early warning devices.See also*cord*Primacordsome types burns 6 km. per second
1147217
The_Angels_(Australian_band)
 past_members         Jim HilbunEcclesSpencerJames MorleyCharlie KingThe Angels are a rock band that formed in Adelaide, Australia in 1970. The band later relocated from Adelaide to Sydney and enjoyed huge local success until well into the 1990s. For the purposes of international release, their records were released under the names Angel City and later The Angels From Angel City. From 2001 to 2007, the bands former members have toured and recorded under various names including Members of the Angels and The Original Angels Band.On 12 September 2006, The Angels were featured on a postage stamp for Post as part of their Australian Rock Posters.(- Australian Rock Posters The Stamps (Australia Post))It was announced in April 2008 that Doc Neeson & The Angels reformed.HistoryEarly yearsIn November 1970, brothers Rick and John Brewster formed The Moonshine Jug and String Band. In 1971 the band was joined by Belfast-born Bernard Neeson, an arts student and former Army sergeant and already a prominent figure on the Adelaide music scene. The band performed at university campuses and in 1973 released their debut EP Keep You on the Move, which made the top 5 in Adelaide. This was followed in 1974 by the single Thats All Right With Me. Both these releases were on John Woodruffs Sphere label. Woodruff went on to become the bands manager for most of its career.In 1974 they changed their name to The Keystone Angels, switched to electric instruments and began playing 1950s rock and roll on the pub circuit. On 3 August 1974, just before Go-Set magazine, a number of small ads started appearing weekly announcing The KEYSTONE ANGELS are coming, possibly the first mention of the band in an Australian national rock music publication.(Go-Set magazine: (13.7.74) page 14. small insert The KEYSTONE ANGELS are coming, repeated page 18, and for the next few weeks) In 1975 the band supported AC/DC during a Australian tour, and later performed as the backing band for Berry.(Long Way to the Top - Stories and Highlights of the band since 1974 - via ABC Long Way To The Top website) 1970s In 1975, on the recommendation of Scott and Young from AC/DC, the band was offered a recording deal with the Alberts label. They dropped Keystone from their name and became simply The Angels. At this point the band was a four-piece with Neeson on bass guitar, Charlie King (Peter Christopolous) on drums, Rick Brewster on lead guitars and John Brewster on lead vocals and rhythm guitar.  The Angels first single, Am I Ever Gonna See Your Face Again, was released in April 1976. The Angels made their debut TV appearance on Countdown. Later in the year, Charlie King, at the time AWOL from the army, was replaced by Graham Buzz Throckman Bidstrup on the drums. This would be the first of three different versions of the song the band released as singles throughout their career. July 1977 saw the release of the bands second single, Youre A Lady Now, followed a month later by their self-titled debut LP, The Angels. By now Chris Bailey had joined the band on bass, allowing Neeson to concentrate on vocals. Bailey had been a member of Mount Lofty Rangers with Bon Scott in 1974. They released Round and Round, later remixed by Lovegrove as Round and Round and Round in 1996. Neesons move to specialist frontman allowed the band to develop an energetic and theatrical live presence. Neeson would typically appear on stage as a wild extrovert, dressed in a tuxedo and shaking maracas. As a foil, Rick Brewster would remain motionless, his head cocked to one side, for the entire performance.  1978s Face to Face album reached #16 in November and stayed on the Australian charts for 79 weeks. Mark Opitz engineered, and along with The Angels, co-produced the album. Peter Ledger, who designed the cover, won Best Australian Album Cover Design Award. Face to Face produced the bands first hit single, Take a Long Line, which has gone on to become one of the Angels most-recognised songs. In November, the band supported Bowie on his first Australian tour, resulting in The Tour EP 7 single.On 23 June 1979, No Exit was issued and entered the Australian album chart at #8 upon its release and again at #15 in September. George Young contributed as a backing vocalist. On 29 September 1979, Albert released Out Of The Blue EP, featuring the third studio version of Am I Ever Gonna See Your Face Again in three years.On New Years Eve 1979, the band performed in front of almost 100,000 people on the steps of the Opera House. Their show, however, was cut short when a riot broke out in the audience. Doc Neeson was hit on the head with a sign and Chris Bailey was knocked unconscious by a flying bottle and hospitalised.1980sThe band signed an international contract with Records and, in March 1980, released a new version of Face to Face - a compilation of tracks from the Australian Face to Face and No Exit albums plus an edited version of the 1979 studio version of Am I Ever Gonna See You Again, on the Epic label. The band billed itself as Angel City to avoid legal problems with the Records act Angel.On 16 June 1980, Dark Room was produced by the Brewster brothers. The overseas version of this album featured re-recorded versions of Ivory Stairs and Straight Jacket in place of Alexander and Im Scared. American band White would later cover Face The Day, from this LP as well as Cant Shake It from Face to Face. In March 1981, drummer Graham Bidstrup left the band, reportedly due to non-musical differences, and was replaced by Zealander Brent Eccles. Bidstrup joined Party Boys in 1983 and later formed GANGgajang. On 24 October 1981,  Never So Live was issued and received heavy airplay and on the strength of the new song Fashion And Fame went to sell some 80,000 copies. On 30 November 1981, Night Attack was produced by Ed Thacker and the Brewsters, was released.The bands third international album, Night Attack included a remixed version of Back On You, previously only available on the flipside of the Into The Heat single. Early in 1982, it became apparent Chris Bailey would be unable to tour with the band in the US; American Jim Hilbun was recruited as replacement.In May 1983, Watch The Red, produced by The Angels and engineered by Andrew Scott and Al Wright, was issued. The first single release, Stand Up, written by Hilbun, was a success. The album, critically acclaimed for its musical inventiveness, featured saxophone leads from Hilbun, John Brewster on lead vocals for one track, and even a piano accordion. A great deal of the material was also derived from a 40 minute jam-session, including an instrumental track and totally improvised lyrics from Neeson. The recording of the album was also dogged by a fire that gutted the recording studio, almost destroying the master tapes.In November 1984, the Two Minute Warning album was released following a three-month recording session in Angeles. The American version of the album, on MCA, included a new version of the 1978 song Be With You, which would become The Angels last commercially available single in the United States. Blade Records re-issued the album in 1990. Unfortunately for the band, an internal personnel purge at MCA meant that Two Minute Warning received no support from the label. MCA would later reject The Angels next album.As Angel City, they performed four songs for the 1985 for Africa concert (part of the global Aid program) - Small Price, Eat City, Underground, Take a Long Line. It was broadcast in Australia (on both Network and Network) and on MTV in the US.()On 27 January 1986, John Brewsters last concert with the band was a double at Meyer Music Bowl and The Palace, which is official statement in Live Line (2 CD set). John Brewster left the band in February 1986. In his place, the band hired ex-Skyhooks guitarist Spencer in March 1986. In October of the same year Howling was released on the bands new label Records. This album included a cover version of Animals hit, We Gotta Get Out Of This Place which, at #6, became the bands highest charting single up to that point. John Brewster joined The Party Boys in the meantime and stayed with them until 1989.In December 1987, the double live album Liveline was released. The collection spanned ten years of the bands career. The majority of the album was recorded at the Bankstown RSL Club in Sydney, with some tracks taken from earlier tours featuring John Brewster. The CD version of Liveline included several songs not included on the vinyl release. A live version of Am I Ever Gonna See Your Face Again was issued as a single, as was a medley of Love Takes Care and Be With You. Following the success of the album, The Angels embarked on a massive tour of Australia with a lengthy two-hour set that covered the entire history of the group. Records in the US issued Beyond Salvation (the band now billing itself as The Angels From Angel City) in November 1989. It included four new songs, three of which would later appear on the Australian version of the album, and new recordings of the classics I Aint The One, Cant Shake It, Who Rings The Bell, City Out of Control and Am I Ever Gonna See Your Face Again, none of which was made available in Australia. Alan Niven was signed on as manager of the bands affairs in the US. At the time, Niven was also managing Great White and N Roses. Jim Hilbun left during these recording sessions and was replaced by Australian James Morley on bass. Alan Niven bailed out soon after.1990s In June 1990, Beyond Salvation was released and became the bands first and only No. 1 album. Produced by Manning, the LP spawned five successful singles, including Dogs are Talking and Backstreet Pickup. The flipside of Dogs are Talking featured demo tracks by three new Australian bands that The Angels had chosen to support them on their upcoming tour, including The Desert Cats, The Hurricanes and the John Woodruff-managed Animals. The Angels then hit the road on their Beyond Salvation Tour with Trick as supporting act. The video for Backstreet Pickup was filmed the day the band were told of the album reaching number one on the charts and shows a very buoyant and enthusiastic band performing for the cameras.Back Fever, parts of which were recorded in Memphis during the Beyond Salvation sessions, was released in November 1991. The band toured for two years, and the song Tear Me Apart was included a multi-million dollar government campaign highlighting alcohol related violence. In July 1992 Mushroom re-issued Red Back Fever / Left Hand Drive as a two CD set. In 1992, both Bob Spencer and James Morley left the band. The next year, the New Zealand chapter of the Angels asked the band to perform for them; to this end, the remaining members asked John Brewster and Jim Hilbun to return, and thus the classic line-up of Brewster-Neeson-Brewster-Eccles-Hilbun was reunited. They immediately set out to write new material. The first results of this collaboration were included on Evidence, a career-spanning collection of the bands hits.In 1993, the band performed at a one-off gig at the of Western Sydney, with The Angels co-headlining with Screaming Jets. Other bands on the bill for the night included as Anything, Peter Wells (formerly of Tattoo) and one other small band from Tasmania.In April 1995, The Hard Evidence Tour EP was issued to coincide with the Barbed Wire Ball tour, a national tour that also featured Screaming Jets, Poor and Whos Guilty. The band then took a break from recording and touring, reconvening in mid-1996 at Darling Harbour studios for the start of what would become the sessions for their last studio album.The Angels hit the road with The Lounge Lizard Tour with Anderson from Tattoo and Ross Wilson from Rock and Daddy Cool in July 1997. The band backed each singer acoustically through classics from their respective bands. On 13 August 1997, The Angels signed a recording deal with Records in Australia. A new single, Caught in the Night, followed in October and a new album, Skin & Bone, in March 1998. Though moderately successful, the album was nominated by ARIA as one of the years best Australian recordings. On 20 October 1998, The Angels were inducted into the Hall of Fame by Angry Anderson.() In November 1998 the band performed a brief set at the Concert of the Century in Melbourne to celebrate Mushroom Records 25th anniversary.In February 1999, Live Line - Definitive Digital Remaster was released. It was a two-CD set that contained ten bonus tracks, recorded between 1981 and 1983.On New Years Eve, 1999, The Angels performed what would be their last concert at the MGM Grand Darwin Millennium Concert. Doc Neeson announced his departure from the band following a major car accident that left him with neck and spinal injuries.2000sWith Neesons departure, the band effectively ceased. In November 2000, Shock Records reissued Left Hand Drive. The following year, the ABC featured The Angels in its music series program Way To The Top.(Long Way To The Top Beserk Warriors 1973-1981 (Episode 4))In March 2001, The Angels reformed as Members of The Angels with John and Rick Brewster, Buzz Bidstrup, Chris Bailey and Jim Hilbun on lead vocals for The Ted Mulry Benefit Concert (released on video as Gimme Ted). This name was used in line with an agreement made with Neeson not to call the band The Angels.() On 24 June 2002, Shock issued The Complete Sessions 1980-1983, a 4-CD box set collection of the bands recorded output from the period between the Dark Room and Watch the Red albums. Around this time, Brewster, Bailey, Bidtrup, Brewster began touring as The Original Angels Band, a name they continued to use until November 2006. In the meantime, Neeson, Hilbun and Westfield chief executive David Lowy formed Red Phoenix who released an album and toured briefly during 2005. In July 2006, Liberation reissued The Angels catalogue. Albums included: Dark Room, Night Attack, Watch the Red, Two Minute Warning, Howling, Beyond Salvation, Red Back Fever, and Wasted Sleepless Night - The Definitive Greatest Hits.On 4 December 2006, Live At The Basement was released, containing all the classics recorded by the line-up of Brewster, Bailey, Bidstrup and Brewster. This group was now once again using the name The Angels, apparently dishonouring their agreement with Neeson, leading to the singer taking legal action to prevent them using it.()() Neeson toured as Doc Neesons Angels, with a line-up that included Hilbun, Lowy, Dave Leslie (ex-Animals) and Paul Wheeler (ex-Icehouse) who was later replaced by Mick Skelton.() Neeson released the album Acoustic Sessions featuring Jim Hilbun, Dave Leslie and Tim Powles on percussion and production through Liberation Blue on 1 September 2007. The Brewster-led band meanwhile released the EP Ivory Stairs. It was assumed that Neesons successful action would mean this line-up must bill itself as The Angels Band. In October 2007 Neeson and band toured the Middle East playing 13 shows in 16 days for Australian servicemen and women in Afghanistan, Iraq and Kuwait and other countries in the region. The lineup for this tour consisted of Mick Skelton (drums), Dave Leslie (guitar), Sarah Graye (ex-Nitocris (bass) and Mitch Hutchinson (guitar).(http://www.defence.gov.au/media/download/2007/Oct/20071030c/index.htm)In November 2007 on Rockwiz on SBS, Doc Neeson claimed the origins of the audience chanting No way, get fucked, fuck off as the response to the line Am I ever gonna see your face again? was from the crowd at a Mount Isa Blue Light Disco although it is unclear if this is accurate as Neeson was quoted in nineteen eighties Australian music publication Smash Hits as saying it originated in Far Western NSW (presumably Broken Hill, a mining city associated with enthusiastic rock concert audience participation).Wasted Sleepless Nights() was released on 11 July. It included live footage never before released and tracks recorded live from ABCs Studio 22.Undercover announced the reunion of Doc Neeson with the Brewster brothers, Chris Bailey and Buzz Bidstrup in April, 2008.(http://www.undercover.com.au/News-Story.aspx?id4611Undercover.com.au)(The Angels reunite) The reformed band played a string of dates in July 2008 to celebrate the 30th anniversary of their seminal album, Face to Face.Iconic live audience chorusStarting when The Angels were a pub band their song Am I Ever Gonna See Your Face Again has received an iconic response from audiences.  Whenever Doc Neeson sang the words of the Angels classic love song Am I Ever Going to See Your Face Again? back came the ingenious response: No way, get fucked, fuck off.()Whilst outside Australia this may have been seen as a negative response, from an Australian audience and in the context of the Australian sense of humour this was recognised as high praise.Band lineups1975 - 1976*Doc Neeson (bass, vocals)*John Brewster, (rhythm guitar, vocals)*Peter Christopolous, known as Charlie King (drums)*Rick Brewster (lead guitar, vocals)August 1976*Graham Buzz Bidstrup (drums, vocals)*John Brewster (rhythm guitar, vocals)*Rick Brewster (lead guitar, vocals)*Doc Neeson (bass, vocals)January 1977 - March 1981*Chris Bailey (bass)*Graham Buzz Bidstrup (drums, vocals)*John Brewster (rhythm guitar, vocals)*Rick Brewster (lead guitar, vocals)*Doc Neeson (lead vocals)March 1981 - April 1982*Chris Bailey (bass, vocals)*John Brewster (rhythm guitar, vocals)*Rick Brewster (lead guitar, vocals)*Brent Eccles (drums)*Doc Neeson (lead vocals)April 1982 - February 1985*John Brewster (rhythm guitar, vocals)*Rick Brewster (lead guitar, vocals)*Brent Eccles (drums)*Jim Hilbun (bass, vocals, sax, keyboards)*Doc Neeson (lead vocals)March 1985 - July 1989*Rick Brewster (lead & rhythm guitars, vocals)*Brent Eccles (drums)*Jim Hilbun (bass, vocals, sax, keyboards)*Doc Neeson (lead vocals)*Bob Spencer (lead & rhythm guitars, vocals)1990 - 1992*Rick Brewster (lead & rhythm guitars, vocals)*Brent Eccles (drums)*James Morley (bass, vocals)*Doc Neeson (lead vocals)*Bob Spencer (lead & rhythm guitars, vocals)1993 - January 2000*John Brewster (rhythm guitar, vocals)*Rick Brewster (lead guitar, vocals)*Brent Eccles (drums)*Jim Hilbun (bass, vocals, sax, keyboards)*Doc Neeson (lead vocals)Members of The Angels - March 2001  *John Brewster (rhythm guitar, vocals)*Rick Brewster (lead guitar, vocals)*Brent Eccles (drums)*Jim Hilbun (lead vocals)*Chris Bailey (bass, vocals)*Graham Buzz Bidstrup (drums, vocals)From December 2001 to November 2006 The Angels were known publicly as The Original Angels Band featuring 4 of the 5 original members that made the band famous *John Brewster (rhythm guitar, lead vocals)*Rick Brewster (lead guitar, vocals)*Chris Bailey (bass, vocals)*Graham Buzz Bidstrup (drums, vocals)2008 - The Reunion*Doc Neeson (lead vocals)*Rick Brewster (lead guitar, vocals)*John Brewster (rhythm guitar, vocals)*Chris Bailey (bass)*Graham Buzz Bidstrup (drums, vocals)DiscographyAlbumsThe Angels released albums under different names. The Angels (TA); Angel City (AC); The Angels From Angel City (TAFAC); The Original Angels Band(TOAB); The Angels 2006>(TA1)SinglesThe Angels released singles under different names. The Angels (TA); Angel City (AC); The Angels From Angel City (TAFAC); The Angels 2006 (TA1)Compilation appearancesAwards* 1998 - Hall of Fame InducteeReferencesExternal links*The Angels website*The Angels**The Angels Biography - Encyclopedia of Australian Rock and Pop by Ian McFarlane.Angels (Australische band)
1154363
Stiperstones
OS Landranger 137The Stiperstones is a very distinctive hill in the county of Shropshire, England. It is a quartzite ridge formed some 480 Million years ago. During the last Ice Age the summit stood out above the glaciers and was subject to constant freezing and thawing which shattered the quartzite into a mass of jumbled scree surrounding several residual rocky tors. At 536 metres above level it is the second highest hill in the county, surpassed only by Clee Hill (546 m). Stiperstones five-mile (8 km) long summit ridge is crowned by several rugged, jagged outcrops of rock silhouetted against the sky.GeographyThe Stiperstones is noted for its tors of quartzite.(Stiperstones Introduction) The principal ones are named as follows, from north-east to south-west:* Shepherds Rock  ()* Devils Chair  ()* Manstone Rock  ()* Cranberry Rock  ()* Nipstone Rock  ()* The Rock  ()Manstone Rock is the highest of these at 536 metres, and is topped with a point. The Devils Chair is the largest and best known.The Stiperstones ridge is a good place to view the upland landscape of the Hills, particularly the Mynd to the east, and also gives extensive views towards the Shropshire plain and the hills of Wales. The small village of Stiperstones lies just under the ridge to the north-west; it has a pub called the Stiperstones Inn.  Nearby are the villages of Snailbeach, Minsterley, Ratlinghope and Pontesbury.Wildlife and conservationThe Stiperstones is a Nature Reserve and in the Hills of Outstanding Natural Beauty. It is a haven for wildlife, with birds that are normally associated with upland areas present, including Grouse, Curlew, Falcon and the rare Ouzel. Recently, a project called Back to Purple has commenced, to clear some of the hill of remaining plantations of coniferous and wooded areas, restoring the land to heather based heath, seeing once again in season a glorious purple heather upland tract covering the summits around the tors and enhancing the views of the Stiperstones from the surrounding peaks and valleys.(Shropshirewildlifetrust.org.uk)Back to Purple is managed by a partnership of England, Forest Enterprise and the Wildlife Trust. Their work has so far seen removal of thousands of pine trees and conifers, including the whole Gatten Plantation (still shown on OS maps) and the previously covered Nipstone Rock has emerged from hiding. Thousands of heather seedlings have been successfully planted to supplement natural regeneration.To balance this out and complement it further work below summit level has also aimed at restoring grasslands, rich in herbs, hay meadows, wet flushes which produce bog cotton, Bedstraw and the rarer Pansy and natural woodlands.Cultural referencesThe general area has a long history of lead mining, most notably during the occupation of Britain. Several pigs of lead have been found nearby, and the tradition continued into Victorian times. The area around the Stiperstones is rich in myths and folklore relating to the rocks of the Devils Chair. According to one legend, the ghost of Edric, a Saxon earl who held lands that were confiscated after 1066 and successfully defied the Normans, for a time at least, rides the hills whenever England is threatened by invasion. The Stiperstones feature in the literary works of Webb and childrens author Saville and in a jazz work commissioned by Music at Leasowes Bank, written and performed by the Tracey Quintet.The Man Half Biscuit album Bisodol (Crimond) contains a track entiteld Descending the Stiperstones about a meeting with former Crossroads actress McMorrough.GalleryImage:Devils Chair.jpg|The Devils ChairFile:The Devils Chair - geograph.org.uk - 1194214.jpg|The Stiperstones feature in the literary works of Webb and childrens author SavilleNotesExternal links
1157773
Llanymynech
Llanymynech is a village straddling the border between Montgomeryshire/Powys, Wales and Shropshire, England about 9 miles (14 km) north of the Welsh town of Welshpool. The name is Welsh for Church of the Monks.The border runs for the most part down the centre of the villages main street, with the eastern half of the village in England and the western half in Wales. The border also passed right through the now closed Lion pub, which had two bars in Shropshire and one in Montgomeryshire. At one time Welsh counties were referred to as wet or dry depending on whether you could drink in pubs on Sundays. When Montgomeryshire was dry it was legal to drink on Sundays in the two English bars of the Lion but not the Welsh bar. Two of the remaining open pubs in the village are entirely in England and the third is entirely in Wales.Just to the north of the village is Pant (the civil parish of and Pant covers the English part of Llanymynech and the whole of Pant). Further north is the English market town of Oswestry.FeaturesLlanymynech Ogof (Llanymynech Cave) is a former copper mine with origins perhaps in the Age. Two forts are associated with the workings. The mines were exploited by the Romans: over the years, a great many Roman artifacts have been found in the mine including a hoard of thirty first and second century silver coins found in 1965 by some schoolboys, now conserved at the National Museum of Wales. The short lives of miners are commemorated in burials in and around the mine.(Llanymynech Ogof, extract from Adrian Pearce, Mining in Shropshire, 1995) The hill is now the site of Golf Club perched atop the cliffs, whose 18-hole course is unique in the UK for being in 2 different countries - England and Wales. The village is home to one of only three remaining kilns in the British Isles, and the only one with a chimney. The kiln at Llanymynech was used for lime burning. The area around the kiln is designated as Heritage AreaThe former limestone quarry which fed the kiln is now the Wildlife Trusts  Rocks Nature Reserve and its cliff-face is popular with rock climbers.The Dyke Path passes through the village.TransportLlanymynech no longer has a railway, but it was once on the main line of the Railways. However, the section from Whitchurch to Welshpool (Buttington Junction), via Ellesmere, Whittington, Oswestry and Llanymynech, closed on 18 January 1965 in favour of the more viable alternative route via Shrewsbury. Llanymynech was also junction for a Cambrian branch line to Llanfyllin, also closed on 18 January 1965, and the and Montgomeryshire Railway line which ran to Shrewsbury Abbey station; this closed to passengers on 6 November 1933 but remained open as a military freight route until 1960.A branch of the Canal passed through Llanymynech, where it joined the Eastern section of the Montgomeryshire Canal at Carreghofa. Today the canal is known as the Montgomery Canal, and the section through Llanymynech is isolated, with a 800m section being navigable to boats. To the north to Pant the canal is dry. To the south the canal is isolated by lowered bridges. A campaign is in hand, to restore the canal to through traffic. Notable people * Spencer-Thomas, Inventor who pioneered new farming practices during 1930s depression.* Richard Roberts, Inventor famous for the automation of the spinning jenny.ReferencesExternal links*Llanymynech Community Website*Photos of Llanymynech and surrounding area on geograph.org.uk*Shropshire County Council: Llanymynech Heritage Areacy:Llanymynechpl:Llanymynech
1161823
Udo_Proksch
Udo Proksch (May 29, 1934 (Rostock, Germany) &ndash; June 27, 2001 (Graz, Austria)) was an Austrian businessman and industrialist. In 1991, he was convicted of the murder of six people as part of a major fraud. Proksch died in prison.(Club 45 in Vienna: https://openaccess.leidenuniv.nl/dspace/bitstream/1887/4551/12/04.pdf (Page 13))In 1977, the ship Lucona sank in the Ocean, after an explosion, killing six people. Proksch, the owner of the cargo, also then owner of famous Viennese confectioners Demel, claimed US$20 million from his insurance company, saying that the ship was carrying expensive uranium mining equipment. Lucona was located by American shipwreck hunter Mearns, revealing that the ship had been sunk by a bomb. Fraud was suspected; but investigations were obstructed by powerful Austrian politicians, who were friends of Proksch.Several ex-Ministers were eventually convicted over their involvement. The ex-Minister of Foreign Affairs was sentenced for forging documents authenticating the cargo. Two other Ministers were dismissed for obstructing the investigations. The Minister of Defense, a shareholder in the Proksch firm, had given permission to deliver explosives to sabotage the ship and committed suicide when that became clear.In 1988, Proksch fled to the Philippines after Pretterebner published a book about the scandal. Proksch stayed at the palace of his personal friend, the dictator Marcos.In 1989, he returned to Vienna, incognito, but was recognized and arrested. On March 11, 1991, he was sentenced to 20 years in prison. A year later, the sentence was increased to a lifelong term in prison. He died on June 27, 2001, during heart surgery.Proksch was the first husband of the actress Daphne Wagner, daughter of Wagner, great-granddaughter of the composer Wagner and great-great-granddaughter of Liszt.Works about Proksch and the Lucona case*1988: Hans Pretterebner published a book about the Lucona case, Der Fall Lucona.*1993: A film about the Lucona case (starring Suchet) is released.*2004: The art group monochrom stages Udo 77, a musical about the life of Udo Proksch.*2010: A documentary about Proksch, entitled Proksch: Out of Control and directed by Dornhelm is released.External links* Netcyclo: Austrian history 1983 onwards* IMDb entry about Der Fall Lucona* Homepage of Udo 77 (German language) Notes and references (Proksch
1164554
Malmberget
website                 Malmberget (The Ore Mountain) is a locality and mining town situated in Municipality, County, Sweden with 6,017 inhabitants in 2005.( It is situated 5 kilometres from the municipal seat Gllivare.Malmberget is known as a major site for the extraction of ore from deep mines by the company LKAB. The iron ore mining started in 1741 at the Illuvaara mountain, later known as Gellivare malmberg and eventually just Malmberget. The first train transporting iron ore was loaded in 1888 - this was the beginning of the great iron ore rush which would change the entire area of Northern Lapland. In Malmberget there were lots of job opportunities but no dwellings - a striking resemblance to the conditions during the gold rush in North America. During the first years, workers lived in shacks built from wasted dynamite crates. Right down the center of Malmberget, the deep mine has reached daylight and thus created a huge hole called Gropen (The Pit). Gropen has grown southwards as the deep mining continued, and thus divided the town while making the old town centre uninhabitable and forcing many institutions (e.g. the two existing cinemas and the church) to move to the western part of Malmberget or, even more commonly, to the neighbouring town of Gllivare. Today Gropen is being filled up with stone which is dug up as a by-product from the underground mines. Gropen will eventually be filled in, but the uninhabitable area is continually growing as underground mining undermines the area and seismic events caused by the mining regularly shake the remaining parts of Malmberget. The future of Malmberget is currently uncertain, but prospecting by LKAB indicates that even more of Malmberget may have to move in the future. The moving of several large residential houses owned by the mining company, as well as private villas, has been a major issue locally for the past few years.The iron ore extracted from Malmberget is mainly transported by rail southeast to the port of Lule.  (See iron ore during World War II).SportsMalmbergets largest sports association is named Allmnna IdrottsFrening (MAIF). MAIFs colors are green and white and has an athletic tradition spanning more than a hundred years.The local football club is Malmbergets FF. References bg:da:Malmbergetde:Malmbergetfa:nl:Malmbergetno:Malmbergetpl:Malmbergetpt:Malmberget(kyl)sv:Malmberget
1168493
Scott_Creek_Conservation_Park
 official_site  Scott Creek Conservation ParkScott Creek Conservation Park is a park in Australia, approximately 20 km south of Adelaide.FacilitiesThe park has an extensive network of walking trails which enables visitors to select walks appropriate to their level of fitness, specific interests and personal time frame. The Almanda Mine ruins can be explored via two half hour interpretative trails starting from the car park on Dorset Vale Road. Sites of interest include remnants of the engine house, a stone chimney, the mine office, dairy and several mining shafts.(HistoryFormerly Peramangk Aboriginal territory, European settlers first arrived in the late 1830s with timber from the area used in the construction of the city of Adelaide.(South Australian Department of Environment and Heritage: Scott Creek Conservation Park Information Sheet) From the 1850s the area was mined for copper and silver with the Almanda Mining Association formed in 1868. By the time production ceased in 1887 (due to economic reasons), 310 kilograms of silver had been mined.( The land was privately owned until the early 1970s when land was purchased by the South Australian Government, with the park being officially declared in 1985.(See also*areas of South AustraliaReferencesExternal links*The Friends of Scott Creek Conservation Park*Bush-walking in Scott Creek blog by SA-hiker
1170514
USS_Yorktown_(PG-1)
{|Ship decommissioned8 December 1897broken up at California(Ship notes|}USS Yorktown (Gunboat No. 1/PG-1) was ship of her class of steel-hulled, twin-screw gunboats in the States Navy in the late 19th and early 20th centuries. She was the second U.S. Navy ship named in honor of the Revolutionary Wars Battle of Yorktown.Yorktown was laid down by Cramp and Sons of Philadelphia in May 1887 and launched in April 1888. She was just over  long and  abeam, and displaced . She was equipped with two engines which were supplemented with three schooner-rigged masts. The ships main battery consisted of six  guns and was augmented by an assortment of smaller-caliber guns.At launch, Yorktown joined the of Evolution of Navy steel-hulled ships. Detached from that squadron, Yorktown, under the command of D. Evans, sailed to Valparaso, Chile, during the 1891 Baltimore Crisis and relieved  at that port. After that situation was resolved, Yorktown took part in the joint BritishAmerican sealing patrol in Alaskan waters and duty on the Station before returning to the United States in 1898. Yorktown was out of commission during the War, but took part in actions in the War and the Rebellion in 1899 and 1900, respectively, after she had been recommissioned.After three years out of commission from 1903 to 1906, Yorktown hosted the of the Navy on board when he greeted the White Fleet on its arrival in San Francisco in May 1907. Over the next five years, most of Yorktowns time was spent in sealing patrols in Alaska and duty in American ports. From July 1912, Yorktown was out of commission for alterations, but resumed duties off the Mexican, Nicaraguan, and Honduran coasts beginning in April 1913. Through War I, Yorktown continued in the same role, until she departed for the Coast of the United States in April 1918. She served an escort for one convoy headed to Halifax in August, and remained in coastal escort duties in the east until January 1919. After arrival at San Diego in February, she was decommissioned for the final time in June 1919; she was sold in 1921 to an California, firm and broken up that same year. Design and construction The Yorktown class gunboatsunofficially considered third-class cruiserswere the product of a States Navy design attempt to produce compact ships with good seakeeping abilities and, yet, able to carry a heavy battery. Yorktown was authorized in the 1886 fiscal year, and the contract for her construction was awarded to the Cramp and Sons shipyard of Pennsylvania. The hull for Yorktown was designed by the Navys of Construction and Repair while the mechanical design was left to the Cramp yard.( Yorktowns keel was laid on 14 May 1887.(The ship was launched on 28 April 1888 and sponsored by Mary Cameron, the daughter of U.S. Senator Don Cameron of Pennsylvania.( The dynamite-gun cruiser  was launched a few minutes after Yorktown in the same ceremony. According to a news account, 25 States Senators, 180 Congressmen, the Secretary of the Navy Collins Whitney, and the governors of six states attended the dual ceremony, many arriving from D.C., via the and Ohio Railroads passenger steamer .() By 19 March 1889, Cramp had completed Yorktown and was prepared to turn her over to the Navy.() Layout As built, Yorktown was  in length and  abeam. Her steel hull had an average draft of ,( which was expected to give her the ability to escape from larger ships into shallow water.( At the waterline was a turtleback deck of -inch (9.5 mm) steel that formed a watertight seal over the lower spaces. The deck had a crown at the level of the waterline and curved downwards to  below the waterline at the sides of the ship. Below this armored deck were twelve compartments separated by watertight bulkheads; the spaces above were equipped with watertight doors intended to be closed during battle.(Above the armored deck, Yorktown had forecastle and poop decks with an open deck that spanned the length of the ship between them. The tower was located forward on the forecastle deck and was oval-shaped to deflect shot. It was outfitted with a steam-powered steering wheel, an telegraph, and speaking tubes; it was protected by  of steel armor plate.( Propulsion Yorktown was powered by two steam engines which each drove one of the pair of , three-bladed propellers. The cylinders of each engine were 22, 31, and 51 inches (56, 79, and 130 cm) in diameter and had a  stroke.( Each engine was rated at  and together were designed to move the ship at ,( though the ship exceeded that in her trials.(The engines, situated in separate watertight compartments, were each fed by a pair of coal-fired boilers. Each boiler was horizontally mounted and was  in diameter and  in length with a total grate area of . Yorktowns coal bunkers could carry up to  of the fuel, and were shielded from shot and shell. At a near top-speed of 16knots, the ship could cover  in 6 days; at the more economical speed of  she could cruiser  over 62 days.(To supplement her steam power plant, Yorktown was built with three masts that were schooner-rigged. She had a total area of . The steam and sail combination was expected to allow Yorktown to remain at sea for months at a time during wartime.( Armament Yorktowns main battery consisted of six /30 guns,(()(The 30 denotes the length of the gun barrels; in this case, the gun is 30 calibers, meaning that the gun is 30 times long as it is in diameter.) with each gun weighing in excess of .( Two were mounted on the forecastle deck, two on the poop deck, and the other pair amidships on the gun deck. The two guns on the gun deck were mounted  above the waterline, while the other four were  above.( The guns fired  armor-piercing projectiles with a propellant charge weighing  at . At an elevation of 30.2, the guns had a range of .( Each gun was shielded with steel plating  thick.(Yorktowns secondary battery consisted of two  guns a caliber of , two  guns , and two  guns .( All were based on designs of the French arms company Hotchkiss.( According to a 1902 of Ordnance publication, an armor-piercing round fired from a 6-pounder gun could penetrate  of armor at a distance of .() 18891897 File:The White Squadrons Farewell Salute to the Body of John Ericsson, New York Bay, August 23, 1890.jpg|thumb|right|Yorktown participated in the ceremonies centered on the repatriation of the remains of Ericsson to his native Sweden in August 1890.The ship was commissioned at the League Island (Philadelphia) Navy Yard on 23 April 1889 under the command of Commander French E. Chadwick.(After Yorktown conducted her final sea trials, she was assigned to the of Evolutionsometimes also referred to as the White Squadron in late 1889. Yorktown operated with that unit as it developed tactical maneuvers for use by the new steel-hulled naval vessels then coming into service in the United States Navy. After this duty, Yorktown departed the east coast of the United States on 7 December 1889, bound for European waters; stopped briefly at Fayal in the Azores; and arrived at Lisbon, Portugal, two days before Christmas. The ship subsequently cruised the Mediterranean into the early spring of the following year, calling at ports in Spain, Morocco, France, Italy, Greece, and Malta. Following her return to the United States on 17 June 1890, the warship entered drydock at the York Navy Yard on 1 July for repairs that lasted until 8 August. Upon the completion of these alterations, Yorktown took part in the ceremonies marking the embarkation of the remains of the noted inventor, Ericssonof  famefor transportation back to his native Sweden for burial.(Yorktown next again operated in the Squadron of Evolution off the eastern seaboard and into the of Mexico into the summer of 1891. Under Acting Rear Admiral G. Walker, the squadron normally cruised in the of Mexico from January to April and off the east coast from May to October. While in the gulf, the ships called at Texas; New Orleans; and Florida; and carried out target practice in Bay. Later, the squadron conducted small arms practice at Virginia, after arriving at Roads. In July 1891, the squadron carried out exercises and maneuvers in connection with the naval militias of New York and Massachusetts during which it added torpedo attacks upon the Fleet to the usual target practices. In addition, it conducted drills and landing exercises. The of the Navys report for the fiscal year 1891 noted that useful experience had been gained by the Squadron of Evolution in the training of commanding, navigating, and watch officers in skillfully and safely maneuvering vessels in formation and in restricted waters. In addition, engineers were trained in regulating and maintaining economical coal consumption.( Baltimore crisis On 8 October 1891, Yorktown, under the command of Commander Robley D. Evans, departed New York to join the Squadron. The gunboat put in to Charlotte Amalie, West Indies, to coal ship on 14 October. While the ship was engaged in this duty, Yorktown was ordered to Valparaso, Chile, in response to the Baltimore Crisis.(During the Civil War, the Itata, a cargo ship employed by Chilean Congressionalists, had loaded weaponry in California, but was detained in San Diego by U.S. officials.(Hardy, pp. 20405.) After Itata was able to slip away from San Diego,(Hardy, p. 210.)  caught up with the ship at the Chilean port of Iquique in July 1891 and escorted the ship back to San Diego before her cargo could be unloaded.(Hardy, p. 22021.) In October, some months after the Itata Incident had ended, the American cruiser  put in at Valparaso. On 16 October, a group of sailors from Baltimore ashore on liberty were attacked by Congressionalists, still angry at the Itata affair.(Hardy, pp. 19899.) Two of Baltimores sailors were killed and eighteen wounded; thirty-six other American sailors were arrested by the local authorities. Tensions ran high in both Chile and the United States.(Yorktown, a part of the United States response, departed Charlotte Amalie for Valparaso on 17 October for a six-week, storm-tossed voyage around the South American continent via the of Magellan. Less than two weeks after Yorktowns 30 November arrival, Baltimore departed, leaving American interests in the hands of Evans and Yorktown. Over the ensuing weeks, Chile and the United States came close to war, but cooler heads prevailed. Locally, Evans patience was dangerously tested, but it held. One inflammatory incident occurred when Chilean boats bore down on Evans ship, turning their helms hard over at the last possible instant to avoid a collision. On another occasion, a group of locals threw rocks at Evans and his gig as it lay at the foot of a jetty.(After a month at Valparaso, Yorktown took on refugees from the American, Spanish, and Italian legations in mid-January 1892. She got underway on the 19th and arrived at Peru, on the 25th. While Yorktown lay anchored there, tension between the United States and Chile relaxed and the crisis abated, and the Chilean later government provided compensation for the families of the American sailors that were killed.(File:Seal rookery, Pribilof Islands, 1891.jpg|thumb|left|Yorktown took part in the sealing patrol that hoped to curb poaching of seals, like these photographed at the Garbotch rookery, Saint Paul Island, Alaska, in August 1891. Sealing patrol Yorktown stood out of Callao on 4 March 1892, steamed northward via Diego and Francisco, and eventually arrived at the Island Navy Yard, California. The gunboat subsequently underwent repairs there until late in the following month. Having weathered one diplomatic storm and international incident, Evans and his command soon set sail on another mission that, if handled wrongly, could have caused ill-feeling with the British.(That spring, Yorktownalong with two other naval vessels and a trio of cuttersheaded toward Arctic waters on 27 April to protect the great herds of seals in the Sea from poachers. Traveling along the coast of the United States, the gunboat and her crew braced, in Evans words, at the prospect of doing something. As at Valparaso, Evans faced the possibility of becoming involved in an international incident arising from possible confrontations with Canadian sealers. Operating under the protection of the British crown, the latter had taken particularly heavy catches. Many American vessels put to sea under the British flag in an attempt to evade prosecution by their own government. The British agreed to help put an end to the slaughter of seals and decided upon joint action with the United States in prosecuting the poachers. About 110 schooners, large and small, made up the sealing fleet, typically armed with double-barrelled shotguns for killing the animals and Winchester rifles for dealing with any humans who attempted to interfere. The fact that the great majority of seals killed had been female still with young in many casesalmost doubled the toll of slain seals. As Evans noted: the slaughter in the North Pacific was fearful.(Arriving at Townsend, Washington, on 30 April, Yorktown put to sea on 13 May, arriving at Iliuliuk, Unalaska, one week later. Coaling there, the gunboat skirted the ice floes near the seal rookeries of the Islands, reconnoitering the vicinity for sealers. Assisted by a revenue cutter, Yorktown guarded the passes to the Bering Sea. The crews of the patrolling American ships lacked fresh provisions but carried on in spite of the hardships imposed by both diet and climate. Fresh fish, however, proved abundant. Codfish was the staple with an occasional gourmet treat of salmon.( Telescopic gunsight File:Bradley A. Fiske cropped.jpg|thumb|right|upright|As a lieutenant, Fiske tested a successful telescopic gun sight on Yorktown in 1892.Besides the patrols made during this deployment in northwestern waters, Yorktown conducted routine operations such as target practices. Among the officers assigned to the ship at that time was Lt. Fiske, a young officer who had invented and constructed a practical telescopic gunsight. Fiskes sight had been tested in Baltimore and had favorably impressed that ships officersincluding her commander, Captain Winfeld S. Schley. Evans, however, had not taken a liking to Fiskes newfangled gadget but nevertheless consented to allow a second test on board Yorktown (the first one had failed miserably). On the afternoon of 22 September 1892, during scheduled target practice, Fiskes invention worked as designed and elicited praise from Evans. As Fiske himself later wrote in the States Naval Institutes magazine Proceedings, modern naval gunnery had its birth not in the British Navy but in the Americanoff Unalaska on 22 September 1892, in Yorktown.(Yorktown continued her task of patrolling until 21 September when she departed Unalaska for the Island Navy Yard. From 11 October to 24 October, the ship underwent repairs there before proceeding on to the east coast via Horn. Yorktown eventually arrived at Virginia, on 24 February 1893.(After repairs at the New York Navy Yard from 25 April to 26 July, Yorktown retraced her route south and sailed again around Cape Horn back into the Pacific. She then moved north to resume patrolling the Bering Sea. She protected seal rookeries into 1894 before returning to Mare Island for repairs which lasted into mid-September.(On 24 September 1894, Yorktown sailed for the western Pacific and duty on the Station. Sailing via Honolulu, she reached Yokohama, Japan, on 8 December 1894 and spent the next three years, under the command of Commander Stockton touching at the principal ports-of-call along the coasts of China and Japan. She departed Yokohama early in the autumn of 1897 and made port at Mare Island on 18 November 1897. Subsequently laid up at Mare Island and decommissioned on 8 December, the gunboat remained inactive there through the War in 1898.( 18981903 Recommissioned on 17 November 1898, with Commander S. Sperry in command, Yorktown sailed again for the Far East on 7 January 1899. Rumors of German machinations in Samoa lengthened Yorktowns stay at Hawaii from a few days to a few weeks; but, when the anticipated trouble failed to materialize, Yorktown resumed her voyage to the Islands. On 23 February, she arrived at Navy Yard, near Manila where patrolled to prevent gun-runners thought to be supplying guns and ammunition to the Insurrectos, Filipinos fighting for independence.(At one point, rumors flew concerning possible German gun-running activities; and Yorktown patrolled off the entrance to Subic Bay and from thence to Lingayen to keep a lookout for the filibusters. She continued coastal patrol work over the next three years, cooperating with the Army, transporting and convoying troops, and patrolling wide areas of often badly charted waters. Upon occasion, Yorktown served as mother ship to smaller gunboats, providing officers and men to staff the smaller patrol craft. Ensigns Harrison Standley and E. Yarnell (both future admirals) and future naval historian and archivist Wright Knox were among the junior officers who served in Yorktown during this time.( Philippine-American War During the War, Yorktown stood in to Bay, on the west coast of Luzon, on 11 April 1899, on a mission to relieve a Spanish garrison that had been under siege by Filipino troops for nine months. Lt. C. Gillmore and a party of sailors in the ships whaleboat provided a decoy, ostensibly taking soundings of a nearby river. Meanwhile, Standley and an enlisted man landed farther up the coast to reconnoiter. The next day, Gillmore and his boat crew drifted into a trap, running aground too far from the rivers mouth and out of sight of Yorktown. Filipino troops, hidden in the jungle-covered banks, raked the boat with rifle fire. Two American sailors were killed; two were mortally wounded; and the remainder, including Gillmore, were slightly wounded. The survivors were taken prisoner until freed by U.S. Army troops. Standley completed his mission and, together with the enlisted signalman, made it back to the ship.(File:US Marines in China 1900 HD-SN-99-01986.jpg|thumb|left|U.S. Marines in China during the Rebellion; Marines from Yorktown participated in operations at Tientsin, JuneJuly 1900. Boxer Rebellion In 1899, the situation in China worsened until it culminated in the Rebellion. The following spring, Yorktown was withdrawn from her patrol duties in the northern Philippines to provide assistance to the operations off the coast of North China. She departed Manila on 3 April 1900, bound for China; and, after she reached the mainland, her landing force served ashore at Taku.( In addition, Marines from Yorktown participated in the actions at Tientsin between June and July.( Also: ) In June 1900, she assisted  back off a reef near that Chinese port.(19001903The gunboat departed Shanghai on 10 September 1900 and reached Cavite on the 17th. In the Philippines, she resumed her cooperation with Army forces, still engaged in pacification operations, and continued these duties for the next two years. In between pacification missions, she performed survey work: at Guam in November 1901 and at Bay, Philippines, in February 1903.( In April 1902, Yorktowns Coxswain Joseph Quick rescued a shipmate from drowning while the ship was in port at Yokohama, Japan. For his efforts, Quick was awarded a peacetime of Honor.()()Yorktown departed the Far East in early 1903 and returned to Mare Island on 3 June. Two weeks later, on the 17th, she was decommissioned.( 19061912 Recommissioned at Mare Island on 1 October 1906, with Commander Richard T. Mulligan in command, Yorktown was fitted out there until 9 November. Underway on that day, she operated off the west coasts of Mexico, Honduras, and Nicaragua into the following summer. After repairs at San Francisco and Mare Island, Yorktown conducted target practice at Bay, Mexico, and relieved  as station ship at Acapulco. She then cruised with the 2d Squadron of the Pacific Fleet to Magdalena Bay and San Francisco. Over the ensuing months, Yorktown continued her regular local operations.(Yorktown hosted the of the Navy, H. Metcalf, to witness the arrival of the White Fleetcommanded by Yorktowns former commander, Robley Fightin Bob Evansinto San Francisco.(Wimmel, p. 230.)(Albertson, p. 48) The fleet arrived on 6 May, and the flagship  saluted the secretarys flag on Yorktown with the discharge of seventeen guns. Metcalf also boarded Yorktown on the 8th to review the assembled battleships, armored cruisers, and torpedo boats of the Pacific and Great White Fleets.(  On 30 May 1907, Yorktown participated in festivities for the Rose Festival at Oregon. From June to September, Yorktown conducted seal patrols in Alaskan waters, out of Nome, Unalaska, and Sitka and, between 15 and 19 September, established a site for a wireless station at Valdez. Afterwards, Yorktown sailed south to rejoin the Pacific Fleet, conducting battle practices between 19 November and 1 December at Magdalena Bay. She later joined the armored cruisers  and  and the tender  at Acajutla, Salvador, before sailing for Corinto, Nicaragua, in March 1909. After more target practices at Magdalena Bay, Yorktown was repaired at Mare Island in June and into July before shifting to Seattle, to participate in festivities for the Exposition. Later in July, the ship visited Esquimalt, Columbia. She subsequently cruised off the Pacific coast and participated in the Festival at San Francisco in October.(From 13 December 1909 to 27 March 1910, Yorktown operated off Corinto, Nicaragua, with the Expeditionary Squadron. She then pursued a schedule of exercises and maneuvers, operating between California and British Columbia through June and July. She returned to a posture of readiness off Corinto and Juan del Sur between 13 August and 7 September. She then operated off Ecuadorian, Colombian, and Peruvian ports, with the United States Consul General at Large embarked, between 19 September and 16 October before putting into Panama for coal and stores. She subsequently patrolled at Honduras, and the familiar Corinto for most of November and December. She spent Christmas at Corinto before shifting to Amapala, en route to San Francisco and Mare Island. From March to July 1911, Yorktown cruised off the west coasts of Mexico, Nicaragua, and Honduras. On 29 May, she rescued the survivors from the foundered Panamanian steamer ,( which had sunk with the loss of 60 of its 100 passengers and crew.() Another period of repairs and upkeep in the late summer of 1911 proceeded the ships duties off the Pacific coasts of South and Central America. She returned to Mare Island in May 1912, and was decommissioned there for alterations on 15 July.( 19131919 Recommissioned on 1 April 1913, with Commander George B. Bradshaw in command, Yorktown operated out of San Diego on shakedown into mid-April. She was soon back at Corinto, however, remaining in Nicaragua until 5 June. After a brief period of operations off the coast, she returned to Corinto on 21 June and remained there for over a month before departing on 31 July to coal at Cruz, Mexico. She moved to Mazatln on 10 August and there picked up mail, delivering it to the port of Topolobampo, Mexico, on the 11th. Yorktown remained there until mid-September.(For the remainder of 1913, Yorktown conducted local operations out of San Diego and San Francisco. In January 1914, though, the gunboat returned to Mexican waters and investigated local conditions at Ensenada between 3 January and 6 January before moving, in subsequent months, to a succession of Mexican ports: Mazatln, San Blas, Miramar, Topolobampo, and La Paz. Following an overhaul at Mare Island from 24 June to 2 September 1914, Yorktown served in Mexican waters again into June 1915. From that point until the entry of the United States into War I in April 1917, Yorktown continued her routine of patrols off Mexican, Nicaraguan, and Honduran ports with occasional repairs at Mare Island and maneuvers out of San Diego.(File:SobrevivientesClipperton.jpg|thumb|right|Yorktown rescued the last surviving members of the guano mining settlement on Island in July 1917.After the United States joined the Allies, Yorktown operated off the coast of Mexico until August 1917, when she paused briefly at San Diego. On 18 July 1917, Yorktown rescued the last surviving members of an abandoned guano mining settlement on Island.  From a peak population of roughly 100 in 1915, only four women and seven children survived.  After her time off the Mexican coast, Yorktown then cruised off the west coasts of Central and South America into 1918. After a refit at Mare Island, Yorktown, sailed for the east coast on 28 April 1918, transiting the Canal en route, and arrived at New York on 20 August. The gunboat escorted a coastal convoy to Halifax, soon there after before returning to New York. She performed local coastwise escort duties through the end of World War I. After a period of upkeep at the York Navy Yard in December, she departed the east coast on 2 January 1919 on her last voyage to California.(Arriving at San Diego on 15 February 1919, Yorktown was placed out of commission at Mare Island on 12 June 1919. On 17 June 1920, she was assigned the hull number PG-1. The veteran steel-hulled gunboat was sold to the Union Hide Company of California, on 30 September 1921;( she was broken up in Oakland sometime after that.( Notes  References  Bibliography * * * *  
1174674
Geolocation_software
In computing, geolocation software is used to deduce the geolocation (geographic location) of another party. For example, on the Internet, one geolocation approach is to identify the subject partys address, then determine what country (including down to the city and post/ZIP code level), organization, or user the IP address has been assigned to, and finally, determine that partys location. Other methods include examination of a address, image metadata, or card information.Data sourcesThere are a number of free and paid subscription geolocation databases, ranging from country level to state or city - including ZIP/post code level - each with varying claims of accuracy (generally higher at the country level). These databases typically contain address data which may be used in firewalls, ad servers, routing, mail systems, web sites, and other automated systems where geolocation may be useful. An alternative to hosting and querying a database is to obtain the country code for a given IP address through a DNSBL-style lookup from a remote server.()The primary source for IP address data is the regional Internet registries which allocate and distribute IP addresses amongst organizations located in their respective service regions:* African Network Information Centre (AfriNIC)* Registry for Internet Numbers (ARIN)* Network Information Centre (APNIC)* Latin American and Caribbean Internet Address Registry (LACNIC)* RIPE Network Coordination Centre (RIPE NCC)Secondary sources include:* mining or user-submitted geographic location data. For example, a weather web site might ask visitors for a city name to find their local forecast. Another example would be to pair a users IP address with the address information in his/her account profile.* Data contributed by service providers.* Merging databases from different suppliers.* Guesstimates from adjacent Class C range(An example is the guessed city provided by hostip.info.) and/or gleaned from network hops.Accuracy is improved by:* scrubbing to filter out or identify anomalies.* Statistical analysis of user submitted data.* Utilizing third-party tests conducted by reputable organizations.PrivacyA distinction can be made between co-operative and oppositional geolocation. In some cases, it is in the interest of users to be accurately located, for example, so that they can be offered information relevant to their location. In other cases, users prefer to not disclose their location for privacy or other reasons.()Technical measures for ensuring anonymity, such as servers, can be used to circumvent restrictions imposed by geolocation software. Some sites detect the use of proxies and anonymizers, and may either block service or provide non-localized content in response.(RealNetworks detects proxies and anonymizers; Google serves non-localized content if location is in doubt. )In the UK, the application of the Protection Act means that geolocation will only yield the physical address of the ISP. Any further tracking (e.g for criminal tracing) has to be carried out by getting the ISP to check their logs.ApplicationsGeolocation technology has been under development only since 1999, and the first patents were granted in 2004.() The technology is already widely used in multiple industries,(  ClientSideNews, Nov/Dec 2010 issue, Page 6 You Can Really Do That?  The Power of Geolocation Technology ) including e-retail, banking, media, education, travel,(Marketing Magazine, February 10, 2011 Thetrainline brings Digital Element on board for localised ad task) hospitality, entertainment, health care, online gaming and law enforcement, for preventing online fraud, complying with regulations, managing digital rights(Music Streaming site we7 Cranks up the Volume for Digital Rights Management and Ad Targeting)  and serving targeted marketing content and pricing.()Criminal investigationsAmerican banks, software vendors and other online enterprises are now subject to strict new your customer laws imposed by the PATRIOT Act, the Secrecy Act, the US Treasury Departments of Foreign Assets Control and other regulatory entities in the US and Europe. These laws are designed to prevent money laundering, trafficking with terrorist organizations and trading with banned nations. By identifying where online visitors really are, geolocation can protect banks from participating in the transfer of funds for illicit purposes.Fraud detectionOnline retailers and payment processors use geolocation to detect possible credit card fraud by comparing the users location to the billing address on the account or the shipping address provided. A mismatch  an order placed from USA on an account number from Tokyo, for example  is a strong indicator of potential fraud. IP address geolocation can be also used in fraud detection to match billing address postal code or area code.() Banks can prevent phishing attacks, laundering and other security breaches by determining the users location as part of the authentication process.Government, law enforcement and corporate security teams use geolocation as an investigatory tool, tracking the Internet routes of online attackers to find the perpetrators and prevent future attacks from the same location. Censorship It has been suggested that legislation should mandate the use of geolocation software, for example for companies distributing pornography considered obscene in some jurisdictions or to enforce international trade agreements. (See geolocation).Geo marketingSince geolocation software can get the information of user location, companies using geomarketing may provide content or products that are famous or useful in that location. Advertisements and content on a website may be tailored to provide the information that a certain user wants.(Internet Retailer Personalized web site content gives retailers an edge, June 25, 2010)Regional licensingInternet movie vendors, online broadcasters who serve live streaming video of sporting events, or certain TV and music video sites that are licensed to broadcast their videos of episodes/music videos are permitted to serve viewers only in their licensed territories. By geolocating viewers, they can be certain of obeying licensing regulations.() Online casinos must also know where their customers are or risk violating national laws against Internet gambling.Jim Ramo, chief executive of movie distributor Movielink, said studios were aware of the shortcomings going in and have grown more confident now that the system has been shown to work.()Target contentIn targeting web sites can show different content based on a users geolocation or other information. For example, going to google.com may redirect you to your local (translated) Google site like Google Belgium, or it may show a Go to Google Belgium. In various European countries, Google or Yahoo! do not display results which would show negationist websites (see v. Yahoo!). In marketing applications, web sites with geolocation software can display different content based on a users location, such as different advertising offers, merchandise selection, pricing and/or local currency and local news. Colleges and universities can use geolocation software to display relevant courses offered in specific locations. Chain store retailers, including restaurants, can display local offers, menus, and promotional offers unique to a certain geographical area. Financial institutions can show customers the nearest facilities based on their geographic location, as well as the lowest available home equity rates.Hulu is notorious in geo-targeting. Hulu uses IP filtering that prevents anyone outside of U.S. IP ranges to use its service. Some users within U.S. are also being blocked because their IP has not been added to Hulus Geo-IP database. Many users are able to navigate through geo-targeting by simply employing proxy or VPN service such as UnoTelly and Hotspot Shield.Spam fightingThough controversial, some ISPs use geolocation software to help with the prevention of email and website spam. Many countries are known to have loose spam laws, and the use of geolocation software allows ISPs to identify or flag messages and posts from these countries.See also* service* software* Personalization* Geolocation APIReferencesExternal links* *CSV file mapping IP ranges (networks) to country and owner at http://linuxbox.co.uk/ip-address-whois-database.php*Adres-IP.eu - IP Address Geolocation (and/or) Location*Ip to Location - FREE Geo Location API*Personal Geo ip information at http://geo-ip.indbuzz.com*IP Address Lookup. Geolocation by IP and/or domain name - http://lookup.xamex.com*Joomla-Office.net: Joomla! Component to create a Geolocation Service (Open Source)* geoPlugin geolocation API: A free online API to geolocate and reverse geocode IP addresses and lat/lon values*Towards Street-Level Client-Independent IP Geolocation: Recent research paper explaining how to find a location from an IP address within 1 kmsoftwarede:Geolokationssoftwarenl:Geolocatiesoftware
1178781
Whitianga
thumb|right|220px|Buffalo Beach, WhitiangaWhitianga is the main settlement of Bay on the Island of Zealand. The population was 3768 in the 2006 Census, an increase of 690 from 2001.() The population is now 4100 an increase of 332 since 2006.SocialSince 2001 there has been an increased development of new commercial areas, as well as dwellings. Two distinct trends can be seen in the development of accommodation.* Apartments are being developed in several locations, many overlooking the harbour.* A canal development has commenced providing a waterways environment, with houses being located along canals allowing marine access from the estuary.HistoryMaori HistoryWhitianga has been continuously occupied for more than a thousand years since Maori explorer Kupes tribe settled here after his visit in about 950 AD. Following this visit, many of Kupes tribe settled here. Te Whitianga a Kupe is the original place name of the town, meaning Kupes crossing place. There is still a passenger only ferry crossing from Whitianga to Ferry Landing, close to Beach. The alternative to the two minute ferry crossing is a 45 minute drive.Whitianga Pa, located on the Ferry landing side of the river is a notable site. According to Ngati Hei history the earliest known chief occupying the rock was Hei Turepe. The Pa is protected on three sides by sheer cliffs. The hill leading up to the Pa on the fourth side is defended by a 22-foot man made ditch which is now part of the track leading down to Back Bay where Pa inhabitants had access to shellfish. On Cooks visit to the site in November 1769, the inhabitants who welcomed him believed the Pa had been disused for a generation since it had been attacked by a Tauranga chief who married the slain chiefs wife and settled peacefully into the area. Whitianga rock has several holes cut into the stone that were used as firepits, water stores, and palisade holes. Cook noted burnt palisade stumps as evidence that an earlier attack had evicted the ancient Pas residents. Captain Cooks visit - 1769at Cooks Beach to commemorate Cooks observation of the transit of MercuryThe people of Hei commemorated their leader in a few place names, one being the bay at the head of which he had settled, Whanganui A Hei, (the Great Bay of Hei). This large sheltered bay was later renamed by James Cook when he came here in November 1769 to observe the transit of Mercury. Cook was accompanied by Charles Green, the Society expedition astronomer who died on the homeward journey in 1771.From Cooks journal - my reasons for putting in here were the hopes of discerning a good harbour and the desire I had of being in some convenient place to observe the Transit of Mercury, which happens on the 9th instant and will be wholly visible here if the day is clear between 5 and 6 oclock. Cook also named the Whitianga Harbour River of Mangroves and this area is still referred to as The River.The sighting of the Transit of Mercury is commemorated at Beach by a cairn of Coromandel granite which tells the story ; In this bay was anchored 5 Nov 1769, HMS Endeavour, Lieutenant James Cook RN, Commander. He observed the transit of Mercury and named this bay.European SettlementThe original European settlement was situated on the opposite side of the river from approximately 1836 to 1881.GeographyWhitianga is located on the Eastern side of the Peninsula, 208 km from Auckland, 93 km from Thames, 42 km from Tairua. It is situated on the coast of Bay, the body of water stretching from the Islands in the north to approximately Tairua.IndustryHistorically Whitianga was a centre for boat building, kauri milling, flax milling, gold mining and gum digging. For many years, it was a leading timber port, with sailing ships from Norway, Sweden, France, Italy and Britain coming to load timber. Overseas vessels of 2000 tons with a draught of 18 and carrying with their decks loads over a million feet of timber worked the harbour entrance. The larger ships were towed into the port from near Centre Island. Over a period of sixty years, it is estimated over 500 million feet of kauri was exported from the Whitianga district.The first gum was exported in 1844. It reached its peak in 1899 when over 11,000 tons of gum was exported at an average of $120 per ton.Today Whitianga serves as a small regional centre for the eastern side of the Peninsula / Bay area and is a focal point for local fishing, farming and tourism industry, such as to the nearby Whanganui-A-Hei (Cathedral Cove) marine reserve and associated famous beach / cave. Cathedral Cove was used in the movie Chronicles of Narnia: Prince Caspian.EducationBay Area School is a coeducational composite (years 1-15) school with a decile rating of 6 and a roll of 759.() The first primary school opened in the area in 1872. A District High School opened in 1951 and moved to the present site two years later. In February 1981 it became an area school. It is now New Zealands largest Area School.()ControversiesIn 2010 Mercury Bay Area School made national news when it allegedly covered up an alleged sexual assault on a comatose female student, allegedly destroying films of the event instead of reporting the matter to police or to the girls parents. Subsequently, the police found no criminality in alleged sex tape incident.() The school is currently under Statutory Management after a series of complaints from parents and community.()In 2011 Mercury Bay Area School again made national news when it was revealed that teacher Pat Doube placed adhesive tape over the mouths of two 7 year olds as a punishment for talking. () The teacher was not stood down.()EventsAn Annual Scallop Festival is held in August to celebrate seafood, particularly scallops.The Whitianga Speed Festival was first held in 2009.A New Years Eve festival and concert, known as Coromandel Gold, was first held in 2009.NotesExternal links* Mercury Bay Area School websitede:Whitiangafr:Whitiangako:mi:Whitiangaja:nn:Whitiangapl:Whitiangazh:
1180985
Ground-penetrating_radar
Image:LINE21.jpg|300px|thumb|A ground-penetrating radargram collected on an historic cemetery in Alabama, USA. Hyperbolic reflections indicate the presence of reflectors buried beneath the surface, possibly associated with human burials.Ground-penetrating radar (GPR) is a geophysical method that uses radar pulses to image the subsurface.  This nondestructive method uses radiation in the microwave band (UHF/VHF frequencies) of the spectrum, and detects the reflected signals from subsurface structures.  GPR can be used in a variety of media, including rock, soil, ice, fresh water, pavements and structures. It can detect objects, changes in material, and voids and cracks.()GPR uses high-frequency (usually polarized) radio waves and transmits into the ground. When the wave hits a buried object or a boundary with different constants, the receiving antenna records variations in the reflected return signal. The principles involved are similar to seismology, except that electromagnetic energy is used instead of acoustic energy, and reflections appear at boundaries with different constants instead of impedances.The depth range of GPR is limited by the conductivity of the ground, the transmitted center frequency and the radiated power. As conductivity increases, the penetration depth decreases. This is because the electromagnetic energy is more quickly dissipated into heat, causing a loss in signal strength at depth. Higher frequencies do not penetrate as far as lower frequencies, but give better resolution. Optimal depth penetration is achieved in ice where the depth of penetration can achieve several hundred meters. Good penetration is also achieved in dry sandy soils or massive dry materials such as granite, limestone, and concrete where the depth of penetration could be up to 15 m. In moist and/or clay-laden soils and soils with high electrical conductivity, penetration is sometimes only a few centimetres.Ground-penetrating radar antennas are generally in contact with the ground for the strongest signal strength; however, GPR air launched antennas can be used above the ground.Cross borehole GPR has developed within the field of hydrogeophysics to be a valuable means of assessing the presence and amount of water.Applicationsthumb|right|Ground penetrating radar survey of an archaeological site in Jordan.GPR has many applications in a number of fields. In the sciences it is used to study bedrock, soils, groundwater, and ice. Engineering applications include testing (NDT) of structures and pavements, locating buried structures and utility lines, and studying soils and bedrock. In remediation, GPR is used to define landfills, contaminant plumes, and other remediation sites, while in archaeology it is used for mapping archaeological features and cemeteries. GPR is used in law enforcement for locating clandestine graves and buried evidence. Military uses include detection of mines, unexploded ordnance, and tunnels.Before 1987 the Reservoir in Birmingham, England UK was leaking 540 litres of drinking water per second. In that year GPR was used successfully to isolate the leaks.(Penguin Dictionary of Civil Engineering p347 (Radar))Borehole radars utilizing GPR are used to map the structures from a borehole in underground mining applications. Modern directional borehole radar systems are able to produce three-dimensional images from measurements in a single borehole.One of the other main applications for ground penetration radars to locate underground utilities, since GPR is able to generate 3D underground images of pipes, power, sewage and water mains.Three-dimensional imagingIndividual lines of GPR data represent a sectional (profile) view of the subsurface. Multiple lines of data systematically collected over an area may be used to construct three-dimensional or tomographic images. Data may be presented as three-dimensional blocks, or as horizontal or vertical slices. Horizontal slices (known as depth slices or time slices) are essentially planview maps isolating specific depths. Time-slicing has become standard practice in archaeological applications, because horizontal patterning is often the most important indicator of cultural activities.LimitationsThe most significant performance limitation of GPR is in high-conductivity materials such as clay soils and soils that are salt contaminated. Performance is also limited by signal scattering in heterogeneous conditions (e.g. rocky soils). Other disadvantages of currently available GPR systems include:*Interpretation of radargrams is generally non-intuitive to the novice.*Considerable expertise is necessary to effectively design, conduct, and interpret GPR surveys.*Relatively high energy consumption can be problematic for extensive field surveys.Recent advances in GPR hardware and software have done much to ameliorate these disadvantages, and further improvement can be expected with ongoing development.Power regulationIn 2005, the Telecommunications Standards Institute introduced legislation to regulate GPR equipment and GPR operators to control excess emissions of electromagnetic radiation (ETSI EG 202 730 V1.1.1 (2009-09), Electromagnetic compatibility and Radio spectrum Matters (ERM); Code of Practice in respect of the control, use and application of Ground Probing Radar (GPR) and Wall Probing Radar (WPR) systems and equipment). The European GPR association (EuroGPR) was formed as a trade association to represent and protect the legitimate use of GPR in Europe.Similar technologiesGround penetrating radar uses a variety of technologies to generate the radar signal, these are impulse, stepped frequency, FMCW and noise. Systems on the market in 2009 also use DSP to process the data, while survey work is being carried out rather than off line.There is also a special kind of GPR that uses unmodulated continuous-wave signals. This is holographic subsurface radar that differs from other GPR types in that it records plan-view subsurface holograms. Depth penetration of this kind of radar is rather small (up to 20-30 cm), but lateral resolution  is enough to discriminate different type of landmines in the soil or cavities, defects, bugging devices, or other hidden objects in walls, floors and structural elements.GPR is used on vehicles for close-in high speed road survey and landmine detection as well as in stand-off mode.Pipe Penetrating Radar (PPR) is an application of GPR technologies applied in-pipe where the signals are directed through pipe and conduit walls to detect pipe wall thickness and voids behind the pipe walls.Wall-penetrating radar can read through walls and even act as a sensor for police. GPR is used for hand held landmine detection to reduce the false alarms experienced by the standard metal detector and systems are available off the shelf (Vallon and L3Com Cyterra)The Mineseeker Project seeks to design a system to determine whether landmines are present in areas using wideband aperture radar units mounted on blimps.References(Borchert, Olaf: Receiver Design for a Directional Borehole Radar System Dissertation, University of Wuppertal, 2008, http://nbn-resolving.de/urn/resolver.pl?urnurn%3Anbn%3Ade%3Ahbz%3A468-20080382  External links *EUROGPR  The European GPR regulatory body*GprMax  GPR numerical simulator based on the FDTD method*Short movie showing acquisition, processing and accuracy of GPR readingsca:Georadarde:Bodenradares:Georradar pntration de solpenembus tanahhu:Fldradarradarja:nds:Eerdradarpl:Georadarru:sr:tr:GPRuk:
1183940
Royal_Engineers_Museum
thumb|Royal Engineers Museum.The Royal Engineers Museum, Library & Archive is a engineering museum and library in Gillingham, Kent, England. It tells the story of the Corps of Royal Engineers and British military engineering in general.HistoryThe Library was founded in 1812. The Museum and Library collection received Designated status in 1998 (it is recognised as having an outstanding collection of national and international significance), one of only three military or regimental museums in the country to hold this status.CollectionsThe RE Museum and Library hold over 500,000 objects relating to the history of the Corps of Royal Engineers and the development of military engineering.On display are objects of great significance like the Waterloo map, complete with markings made by Wellington himself.  It has the revolver used by Chard against the Zulus, Russian glass grenades from the Crimea, and a huge selection of objects belonging to Charles Gordon found on his travels in China and the Sudan. There is a relic of the Kashmir Gate and a set of armour reported to belong to the Last King of the Punjab, Duleep Sing. There is a Brennan Torpedo on display alongside an early prototype. The museum also has one of the largest public collections of orders, awards and medals in the country; most of which is on display, including 25 of the 52 Victoria Crosses awarded to REs, and three George Crosses.  The collection and museum galleries tell the story of the Corps and cover areas such as:Aeronautics (the Corps was responsible for this prior to the formation of the RFC and RAF)      Bomb Disposal, Bridging - the Bailey and other examples.     Camouflage, Civil works (Pentonville Prison & the Royal Albert Hall are examples of RE engineering)     Submarine Mining & Diving,     Electrical (Searchlights),    Forestry, Field (or Combat) Engineering (airborne, amphibious, armoured, commando, Queens Gurkha, tunnelling),   Gas Warfare,Military Works - mining, water supply, roads, airfields, canals,  Photography including early aerial photographs and trench layouts,      Postal & Courier, Quarrying,     Royal Engineers Band,   Survey (eg. Canada, Great Britain & India)     Telegraph and Signals,      Transportation (Railways, Ports).Maps & Plans of places the Corps have been or built.It has many prototype armoured vehicles, both inside the museum and externally in the grounds and within Chatham Dockyard. Also inside the museum is a complete Harrier Jump-Jet.  Currently the Library is situated on the Military Camp behind the museum building, but developments are proposed to bring this historic collection into the main building, where it will be stored in its very own purposed built area, a project expected to cost well over three million pounds.The Model Bridge Gallery, again a purpose built display space, is currently under construction and will be ready later in the year to house a huge collection of bridging models - some very early Victorian teaching models - and all manner of associated objects, photographs and archives.External links*Royal Engineers Museum Official Website*Medway Council pageEngineers Museum
1188122
Mariupol
footnotes  Mariupol (, pronounced ; ; ), formerly known as Zhdanov (Ukrainian and Russian: ), is a port city in southeastern Ukraine. It is located on the coast of the Azov Sea, at the mouth of the River. Mariupol is the largest city in Priazovye - a geographical region around Azov Sea, divided by Russia and Ukraine - and is also a popular sea resort. Administratively, the city is located in the oblast and historically formed a part of the broader Donbas region. As of June 1, 2010, the city population stood at 490,063 people.(Mariupol is an important industrial centre and seaport. Two of its mills - Iron and Steel Works and Azovstal - are among the largest in the country and make up a significant part of Ukraines total exports. Azovmash, a machine-building concern, located in Mariupol, is the largest company of its kind in Ukraine. Overall, Mariupol industry accounts for 37.5% of Donetsk oblasts total exports and about 7.0% of all Ukraines exports. From 1948 to 1989 the city was named Zhdanov in honour of Zhdanov and has historically had a relatively large Greek minority.  History Mariupol was known from the beginning of the 16th century as the Cossack fortress Kalmius, but only became a real city after the migration of the Crimean Greeks to Priazovye from 1778 - 1780. In 1779 it became the first city in the present Oblast to receive city status. The railway, a new big port, and a metal works appeared at the end of the 19th century. The city has undergone much industrialisation, such as the appearance of a large Azovstal plant. Mariupol was occupied by Germany from (19411943). It was one of two Soviet cities where Hitler stayed for a night (the other being Vinnitsa). The war caused tremendous damage to the city, with its factories and port facilities laid to waste and significant part of population killed. Now it is a major centre of industry in the Donetsk Oblast, but also a resort destination. It is recognised as the centre of Greek culture in Ukraine. City Image Today Mariupol is the second most populous city in oblast, (after Donetsk) and is among ten most populous cities in Ukraine. See of cities in Ukraine. Architecture  Old Mariupol (an area limited to the south coast of the of Azov, in the east - Kalmius River, in the north - Shevchenko Blvd., in the West  Metalurhiv Av.) is built up mainly of few-story houses and has kept its pre-revolutionary architecture. Only Artem Street and Lenin Avenue were built after the Patriotic War and are considered modern buildings.The central area of Mariupol (from the Metalurhiv Avenue up to Budivelnykiv Avenue) is almost entirely administrative and commercial buildings, including a city council building, post office, the Lukov cinema, Humanitarian University, State Technical University, the Korolenko central city library, and many large shops.Architecture of other residential areas (Zakhidny, Skhidny, Kirov, Cheremushky, 5-th, 17-th catchment area etc.) are not especially different or original and are typically 5 and 9-storied houses. Cheremushki carries a special meaning in Russian culture and now entwined with Ukrainian. It usually refers to the newly settled parts of a city in Russia. The accommodation of the city is 9.82 million meters square the common area. Security of the inhabited parts of the city is 19.3 meters square per 1 inhabitant. Densities of privatised habitation in 2003 were 76.3 % Important streets * Avenues (Prospects): Lenin (the central highway), Metalurhiv (Metallurgists, one connects 3 right-bank areas of city), Budivelnykiv (Builders), Ilyich (after Vladimir Ilyich Lenin), Nakhimov, Peremohy (Victory), Lunin (after admiral Lunin), Leningradsky (in Ordzhonikidzivsky Raion)* Streets (Vulitsi): Artem, Torhova (Trading), Apatov, Kuprin, Uritsky, Bakhchivandzhi, Gagarin, Karpinsky, Mamin-Sibiryak, Taganrog, Olympic, Azovstal, Makar Mazay, Karl Libknekht.* Boulevards: Shevchenko, Komsomol, Prymore (Sea), Khmelnytsky etc.* Squares (Ploscha): Administrative (Administrative), Nezalezhnosti (Independence), Peremohy (Victory), Mashinobudivnykiv (Mechanical engineers), Lenins Komsomol, Vyzvolennia (Liberation).In December, 1991 by the decision of city council of Mariupol the following Soviet names of some streets have been renamed to their pre-revolutionary names in an old part of city:* First of May Street - Heorhiyevska Street, * International Street - Torhova Street, * Apatov Street (a part - to the east from the Metalurhiv Avenue) - Italian Street, * Donbass Street - Mykolaivska Street, * Franko Street - Fontanna Street, * Karl Libknekht Street (a part - to the east from the Metalurhiv Avenue) - Mitropolit Street, * Marks Street - Greek Street, * Komsomol Street  Yevpatoriya Street, * Krasnoarmeyskaya Street - Gotfeyska Street, * Kuindzhi Street - Karasivska Street, * Proletarian Street - Kaffayska Street, * Rose Luxembourg Street - Zemska Street, * Soviet Street - Harlampiy Street. From 19902000 the following streets and areas have been renamed:* Sergo Street - Jacob Gugel Street (in Ordzhonikidzivsky Raion) - in honour of the head of construction and the first director of Azovstal, * Republic Lane - University Street (in city centre), * Constitution Square - Mashinobudivnykiv (Mechanical engineers) Square, * Square near to Neptune swimming pool  Nezalezhnosti (Independence) Square.See also - of streets and squares of Mariupol. Parks * City Square ( the Theatrical Square ), * Extreme Park (new attractions near to the biggest in city of the Palace of Culture of Metallurgists), * Gurovs Meadow-park (former Meadow-park a name of the 200-anniversary of Mariupol), * City Garden (, Childrens Central Public Garden), * Veselka Park (Ordzhonikidzivsky Raion), named as the rainbow* Azovstal Park (Ordzhonikidzivsky Raion),* Petrovsky Park (near modern stadium Illyichivets and constructions of Azovmash basketball club, Illyichivsky Raion),* Primorsky Park (Prymorsky Raion). Monuments File:shevchenko Mariupol.jpg|thumb|Statue of ShevchenkoMariupol has monuments to Shevchenko, Vysotsky, Kuindzhi, Lenin and many other famous persons. The monuments in honour of the liberation of Donbass, the metallurgists, and others can also be found.There are also monuments to Maza, Hryhoriy Yuriyovych Horban, K.P. Apatov, Tolya Balabukha, to seamen - commandos, pilots V.G. Semenyshyn and N.E. Lavytsky, soldiers of the Soviet Aviation Division, victims of political repressions of 1930-50, etc. During the Soviet times the central square of the city was decorated with the monument to Zhdanov after whom the city was named for sometime (it was demounted in 1990). The artists V. Konstantynov and L. Kuzminkov  are sculptors of some of the monuments and also created the monument to Ignatiy, the founder of Mariupol. City Holidays Holidays exclusive to Mariupol include:* Day of liberation of the city from fascist aggressors (on September 10) * Day of the city (the following Sunday after the day of liberation of Mariupol in September) * Day of the metallurgist - a professional holiday for many citizens* Day of the machine engineer * Day of the seaman and other professional holidays.  Emblem The modern emblem of Mariupol was confirmed in 1989. In the shield is the anchor with a ring as a ladle with poured metal. The number 1778 indicates the year of the citys founding. The argent symbolises steel, azure means sea, the anchor represents the port, and the ladle is for metallurgy.Administrative divisionMariupol is divided into 4 naighborhoods or raions. There are:*Raion (after Vladimir Ilyich Lenin ) is the northern part of the city, the largest and most industrialized neighborhood in the city. Commonly known as: Zavod (Factory) of Ilyich.*Ordzhonikidzivsky Raion (after Ordzhonikidze) is at the east part of the city, on the left coast of Kalmius river. Common name: the Left Coast.*Raion is in the south of the city, on the coast of the Azov Sea. The everyday name of the central part this neighbourhood is simply Port.*Raion (  after the Great Revolution, 1917) is the central city raion. The everyday name of the raion is simply the Centre, or the City.The Kalmius river separates the Ordzhonekidzivsky Raion from the remaining three raions. Mostly the population is concentrated in the Zhovtnevy and the Prymorsky Raions. Ilyichivsky Raion houses the large Ilyichs mill and the Azovmash plant. The Ordzhonekidzivsky (Left Bank) is home to the Azovstal metallurgic combine and the Koksohim factory. The map also shows that settlements of Stary Krym and Sartana are located in the close proximity to the city limits of Mariupol. Demographics As of June 1, 2010, the citys population was 490,063 inhabitants.( For the last century the population has grown almost 12 times. The city is populated by Ukrainians, Russians, Greeks, Belarusians, Armenians, Jews, etc. The main language is Russian.The population in 2007 was estimated at 496,700, with the subordinated territories (settlement Sartana, settlement Talakivka, settlement Krym, village Hnutove, and village Lomakine) - 502,800. Annual reduction of the population is 1,9. The death rate is 15,5. Ethnic Structure Ukrainian make less than half of the population of the city, the second greatest ethnicity of Mariupol is Russian. Other peoples include Greeks, Jews, Armenians, Belarusians etc. The city home to the largest Greek population in Ukraine (Greeks of Priazovye): 21,900, with 31,400 more in the 6 nearby rural areas, totaling to about 70% of the Greek population of the area and 60% for the country.Ethnic structure in 2002.  Language Structure There is a large number of Greek-speaking (Rumaiic) people but the city is predominantly Russian-speaking. From 60% up to 80% Ukrainian-language dwellers communicate on so-called Surzhyk, due to a large influence of Russian culture.  Most Greek-speaking villages in the region speak a dialect called Rumaiica. There are about 17 villages that speak this language today. Modern scholars distinguish five subdialects of Rumaiica according to their similarity to standard Greek. This was derived from the dialect of the original settlers from the Crimea. Quite often Rumaiica is described as a Pontic dialect. This is, in fact, not the case. Many Romaiic features are similar to those found in Cretan, Cypriot and Greek dialects. As we still do not have a detailed description of Greek dialects, Rumaiica should be regarded as a separate unit in Greek dialectology. The village of Anadol speaks Pontic proper, being settled from the Pontos in the 19th century. Along with those speaking Rumaiica, there were and are a number of Tatar speaking Orthodox villages, the so called Urums, which is the Tatar term for Romaios or Rumei. This subdivision had already occurred in Crimea before the settlement of the Azov Sea steppe region by Greeks which started in 1779, part of the Russian policy to populate and develop the region while depriving the Crimea of an economically active part of its population.Though Greek and Tatar speaking settlers live separately, the language of the Urums was the franca of the region for a long time, being called the language of the bazar. There are a number of settlements of other communities also, including Germans, Bulgarians and Albanians (though the meanings of all such terms in this context is open to dispute).After the Revolution of 1917, a Rumaiic revival occurred in the region. The Soviet administration established a theater, several magazines and newspaper and a number of Rumaiic language schools. The best Rumaiic poet Kostoprav created a Rumaiic poetic language for his work. This process was reversed in 1937 as Kostoprav and many other Rumaiics and Urums were killed as part of Stalins national policies. A large percentage of the population was transported to Gulags. A new attempt to preserve a sense of ethnic Rumaiic identity started in the mid-1980s. The Ukrainian scholar Biletsky created a new Slavonic alphabet for Greek-speakers. Though a number of writers and poets make use of this alphabet, the population of the region rarely uses it. The Rumaiic language is declining rapidly(!), most endangered by the standard Modern Greek which is taught in schools and the local University. The latest investigations by Gromova demonstrate that there is still hope that elements of the Rumaiic population will continue to use the dialect.(Maxim Kissilier(editor), Language and Ethno-Cultural Situation in Greek Villages of Azov Region, St. Petersburg, 2009. The work is based on field research in the Greek villages in Mariupolis region. The expeditions were carried out in 20012004 and were organised by St. Petersburg State University) Language structure in 2002 Employment About 59% of the people whose occupation is in a national economy work in the industry, 11% of them in transportation. As of July 1, 2009, the official rate of unemployment in the city stood at 2%.() The figure, however, only includes people registered as unemployed in the local job center. The real unemployment rate is therefore higher.Historic Unemployment Rate in Mariupol (year end)(()()() * - as of July 1 Geography & Ecology  Geography Mariupol is to the south of the Donetsk area, on the coast of the Azov Sea, in a mouth of the river Kalmius. The city occupies an area of   (64 mi) (with suburbs, i.e. the territories subordinated to the Mariupol city council    (94.2 mi)). The down-town area is   (40.9 mi), the area of parks and gardens is   (31.1 mi). The city is mainly built on land that is made of Solonetzic chernozems, with a significant amount of underground subsoil waters that frequently leads to landslides. Climate There is a moderate-continental climate with recurring droughts and dry winds in the summer and thawing weather, fogs - in the winter. Annual precipitation is 400 mm (15.75 in) a year. Agro climatic conditions allow the cultivation in suburbs of Mariupol thermophilic agricultural crops with long vegetative periods (sunflower, melons, grapes etc.). However water resources in the region are insufficient, and consequently ponds and water basins are used for the needs of the population and industry. Direction of a wind in the winter mainly east, in the summer - northern.Average temperature of air in January , in July . Quantity of deposits  450 mm annually.Absolute maximum of temperature of air in the summer is ; a minimum in the winter is . Ecology Mariupol wins first place in Ukraine on volumes of emissions of harmful substances by the industrial enterprises. Last years ecology problems have started to be engaged by leading enterprises of city. For last 15 years industrial emissions thus have decreased almost in 2 times.Due to the stable work of the majority of the large enterprises, the city constantly collides with environmental problems. At the end of 1970s, Zhdanov (Mariupol) by quantity of industrial emissions in an atmosphere occupied third place in the USSR (after Novokuznetsk and Magnitogorsk). In 1989 by all enterprises of city it had 5,215 sources of atmospheric pollution producing 752,900 tones of harmful substances a year (about 98% from metallurgical enterprises and Markokhim). Even during some easing activity of the industry in the state (the middle of 1990s) of maximum-permissible concentrations (concentration limit) many pollution limits of the environment have been exceeded:* For ammonia by 1.3 times* For phenol by 1.3 times* For formaldehyde by 2.0 timesIn the residential areas adjoining industrial giants, concentrations of benzapiren changes to within of 6-9 times the maximum concentration limits, fluoric hydrogen, ammonia and formaldehyde - 2-3 to 5 times the maximum concentration limits, dust and oxides of carbon, sulphide are 6 to 8 times the maximum concentration limits, and dioxides of nitrogen are 2 to 3 times the maximum concentration limits. It has exceeded the maximum concentration limit on phenol by 17x, and benzapiren till 13 to 14x! Not absolutely thought over arrangement of platforms for construction of Azovstal and Markokhim (the economy in transport charges was assumed, both during construction in 30th, and during the subsequent operation) has led to that the wind rose basically carries all emissions in the central areas of Mariupol. Intensity of these winds and geographical flatness of a relief that long time pollutions does not allow to accumulate a little saves the situation.The of Azov near the city is in distress. The catch of fish in the area was reduced by orders of magnitude over the last 3040 years.The nature protection activity of leading enterprises in Mariupol cost millions of hrivnas, but it appears to have little effect on the environmental problems built up in the city over the years. Government & Politics File:Mariupol 2004.png|thumb|Support for Yushchenko in 2004 presidential election campaign by city boroughsThe Mariupol population traditionally supports the left and pro-Russian political forces. On last parliamentary elections (2006) city has voted for of Regions - 39,72 % of votes, Party of Ukraine  20,38 %,  Natalia Vitrenko Block - 9,53 %, Party of Ukraine - 3,29 %.Mayor of city (chairman, head, cities and chairman of executive committee of city council) - Yuri Yuriyovych Khotlubey.Mariupol in Rada is represented with four Peoples Deputies:* Volodymyr Semenovych Boyko - the chapter (head) of the board Ilyich Mariupol Iron and Steel Works, the of Ukraine.* Serhiy Anatoliovych Matviyenkov - the representative Ilyich Mariupol Iron and Steel Works* Dmytro Arnoldovych Livshyts - the representative of Azovstal Iron and Steel Works* Oleksandr Volodymyrovych Savchuk - the representative of Machine-building Concern AzovmashThe city traditionally supports the left and pro-Russian political forces in Ukraine. In the presidential elections of 2004 the city voted for Viktor Fedorovych Yanukovych (91.1%) and for Viktor Andriyovych Yuschenko (5.93%).At the turn of the 21st century in the City Council of Regions numerically prevails, followed by Party of Ukraine. Economy  Industry In Mariupol there are 56 industrial enterprises under various patterns of ownership. The industry of the city is diverse, among which the citys heavy industry is dominant. Mariupol is home to the major mills (including some globally important) and plants; there is also an important seaport and a railroad junction. The largest enterprises are Iron and Steel Works, Azovstal, Concern Azovmash, and the Sea Trading Port.  There are also shipyards, fish canneries, and the various educational institutions relating to the study of metallurgy and science.The total industrial production of the city for eight months in 2005 (January - August) was 21378.2 million hryvnas, i.e. 4.233 billion USD (compared to 1999 - 6169.806 million hryvnas, i.e. 1.222 billion USD). This is 37.5% of the total production for Oblast. The leading business of the city is in metallurgy, which makes up 93.5% of the citys income from industrial production.  The output estimates in millions tones of iron, steel, rolled iron, and agglomerate annually.* Open Society Mariupol steel and iron works (Mariupol Metallurgical Combine named Ilyich) is an integrated mill, with all the facilities for a full metallurgical cycle. Housing around 100 thousand of workers, in Ukraine it is the second in size only after Kryvorizhstal.  The company is the collective property of the society of tenants (Joint-Stock Company Ilyich-steel; with about 37,000 worker-shareholders).  The head of the board of enterprise is the Peoples Deputy, Volodymyr Boyko.  The enterprise has many structural divisions: Management of catering and trade (, a network of 52 enterprises), a chemists network Ilyich-Pharm, more than 50 agro shops (former farms of the south of Donetsk and Oblasts), the office of the Mines, various machine-building enterprises in the Oblast, International Airport, and the Mariupol Television Network (locally known as MTV).* Open Society Azovstal is another integrated mill (Combine), the third largest in Ukraine in terms of gross revenue.  Its production varies in millions of tones of pig-iron, steel, and rolled iron annually. The companys general director is Oleksiy Bilyi.  Azovstal is closely connected with the Mariupol coke works Markokhim, which serves as the supplier of coke.* Open Society Azovmash (Concern) is the largest machine-building enterprise in Ukraine specialising in production of equipment for mining-metallurgical complexes, cars, port cranes, boilers, fuel-fillers etc. The President is Oleksandr Savchuk. The enterprise formally owned by state was privatised by System Capital Management, a Donetsk and economic group.* ship-repair factory () is the largest enterprise of its class on the of Azov, also owned by System Capital Management.* Open Society  sea trading port  is the largest sea post in the eastern Ukraine through which is accomplished a great deal of transportations of various products such as coal, metal, products of engineering, varieties of ores and grains from and to different cities such as Donetsk, Kharkiv, Luhansk, and the near regions of the Federation. * sea shipping company which was owned until 2003 by the Merchant Marine fleet, now is also under the ownership of System Capital Management. Donbass Merchant Marine now is a bankrupt enterprise which formerly operated from ports on the of Azov such as Mariupol, Berdyansk, and  Taganrog (Russia). The above mentioned enterprises and not including the plethora of others are located in the free economic zone Azov. Transportation In city there are buses, trolley buses, trams, fixed-route taxi. Mariupol is connected by the railway, sea transport and the airport with many cities, ports and the countries of the world.* Urban electric transport (MTTU, Mariupol Tram-trolleybus management):** A trams, street-cars (since 1933) - 12 routes (machines of type -5 and -8 work),** Trolley buses (since 1970) - 14 routes (machines of type: 14r, ZiU-10, ZiU-9, YuMZ T-1, YuMZ T-2).* Buses - mainly the private minibuses which are carrying out transportation in city, on suburban and long-distance routes.* Road service station (which includes transportations to Taganrog, Rostov-upon-Don, Krasnodar, Kiev, Odessa, Yalta, Dnipropetrovsk are carried out etc.) and a suburban auto station (with routes mainly to Pershotravnevy, Volodarsky and areas of oblast).* Railway station Mariupol . The city is connected by the railway to Donbass (the Direction of trains being: Moscow, Kiev, Lviv, Petersburg, Mensk, Bryansk, Voronezh, Kharkiv, Poltava, Slavyansk-na-Kubani).* A marina in the aria of sea trading port.* International airport Mariupol (the property Mariupol steel and iron works). Construction Industrial construction prevails. Mass building of inhabited quarters in city has terminated in 1980s. Mainly the comfortable habitation is under construction now. The construction organisations of city for 9 months 2005 execute volume of contract civil and erection works on 304.4 million hrivnas ($60 million). Densities of city on this parameter in city - 22,1 %. Communications In city all leading Ukrainian operators of mobile communications work. During Soviet time in city 10 automatic telephone exchanges worked, 6 digital automatic telephone exchanges recently were added. Finances The GDP of the city in 2004 was  22,769,400 ($4,510,400); they listed in the state budget of Ukraine  83,332,000 ($16,507,400). The city is one of the largest donors to the state budget of Ukraine (after Kiev and Zaporizhia).The GPA of the city is  1,262.04 (~$250.00) a month - one of the highest in the country. The average pension in the city is  423.15 ($83.82). Commercial debts in the city were reduced for 2005 to 1.1% and made  5.1 million ($1.01 million).Income from rendered services for 9 months in 2005 where  860.4 million ($107.4 million) and the volume of retail trade for the same term was  838.7 million ($166.1 million). The enterprises of the city for 9 months of 2005 received a positive financial result (profit) of  3.2 billion ($634 million), which is 23.6% more than the previous year (2004). Culture  Cultural Institutions Theatres:* regional Russian drama theatre. In 2003 the oldest theater of region has celebrated the 125-anniversary. The talented collective of actors among which 2 folk and the 2 honoured artists of Ukraine work in a theater. For contribution to spiritual education of theatre in 2000 became the laureate of the competition Gold Scythian. * Theatre of dolls (it is created in 1999)Cinemas:* Burevesnik (Storm foreteller)* Komsomolets (Komsomol activist)* Lukov cinema * Pobeda (Victory)* Savona* Soyuz (Union)* Yubileyny (Anniversary)Palaces of Culture (Recreation centres) (together with so-called clubs - 16 units):* Metallurgov (Metallurgists) of Steel & Iron Works* Azovstal of Azovstal Steel & Iron Works* Iskra (Spark) of Azovmash machine-builder Concern* MarKokhim (Mariupol Coke Chemistry)* Moryakov (Sailors)* Stroitel (Builders)* Palace of childs and youth art (Palace of Children art) * Municipal Palace of Culture Showrooms & museums:* Mariupol Museum of Regional* Kuindzhi Art Exhibition* Museum of ethnography (in the past the museum of Andrey Zhdanov) * Museum of Literary* Harbarbond * Museum halls of the industrial enterprises and their divisions, establishments and the organisations of city and so on.Libraries (only 35 units):* Korolenko Central Library; * Gorky Central Childrens Library; * Serafimovich Library (The oldest library of city); * And also: Gaydar Library, Honchar Library, Hrushevsky Library, Krupskaya Library, Kuprin Library, Lesya Ukrainka Library, Marshak Library, Morozov Library, Novikov-Priboy Library, Pushkin Library, Svetlov Library, Turgenev Library, Franko Library, Chekhov Library, Chukovsky Library, the libraries of industrial enterprises, establishments and the organisations of city. In the environs of city on the shore of of Azov the monument of archaeology is opened neolithic burial ground of end of the third millennium AD. During excavations here it is discovered over 120 skeletons. Near them stone and bone instruments and beads are found, shell-works the shellfishes, teeth of animal. Art & Literature Creative organisations of artists, union of journalists of Mariupol, the literary union Azovye (from a 1924, about 100 members) and others. Works of Mariupol poets and writers: N. Berilov, A. Belous, G. Moroz, A. Shapurmi, A. Savchenko, V. Kior, N. Harakoz, L. Kiryakov, L. Belozerova, P. Bessonov, A. Zaruba are written in the Russian, Ukrainian, Greek languages. Presently 10 members of National Union of writers of Ukraine live in a city. Religious Communities File:Mariupol 2007 (133).jpg|right|thumb|200px|Suleiman Mosque in Mariupol* 11 churches of the Ukrainian Orthodox Church of the Moscow Patriarchy. * 3 churches of the Ukrainian Orthodox Church of the Kiev Patriarchy. * 52 various religious communities. A city is decorated by the St. Nicol Cathedral (in Zhovtnevy borough) and churches of city:* St. Nicolas (Primorsky borough) * St. Michael (Ordzhonikidzevsky borough) * St. Preobrazheniye (Transfiguration) (Primorsky borough) * St. Ilya (Ilyichevsky borough) * St. Uspensky (Ordzhonikidzevsky borough)* St. Vladimir (Ordzhonikidzevsky borough)* St. Amvrosy Optinsky (Illyichevsky borough, Volonterobvka)* St. Varlampy (Illyichevsky borough, Mirny)* St. George (Illyichevsky borough, Sartana)* Nativity of the Virgin Mary (Illyichevsky borough, Talakovka)* St. Boris & Gleb (Prymorsky borough, Moryakov)* St. CrimeajewelIn addition to Churches, there are Mosques around the city. Media & Entertainment More than 20 local newspapers work mostly Russian language based, including:* Priazovsky Rabochy (Priazovsky worker)* Mariupolskaya Zhizn (Mariupol life)* Mariupolskaya Nedelya (Mariupol week) * Ilyichevets * Azovstalets * Azovsky Moryak (Azov Seaman) * Azovsky Mashinostroitel (Azov Machine-builder) etc. 12 wireless stations, 7 regional television companies and channels:* Broadcasting Company Sigma * Broadcasting Company MTV (Mariupol television) * Broadcasting Company TV 7 * Broadcasting Company Inter-Mariupol * Broadcasting Company Format and othersRetransmitting about 15 state channels (Inter, 1+1, STB, NTN, 5 Channel, ICTV, First National TV, New Channel, TV Company Ukraina etc.). Tourism & Recreation A tourists interest of mainly coast of Sea of Azov. Around of city the strip of resort settlements was pulled: Melekino, Urzuf, Yalta, Sedovo, Bezymennoye, Sopino, Belosaray Kosa etc. Travel companies work (Azov-voyag-tour, Azovintur,Limpopo and others).The first sanatoriums are opened in a city in 1926. Along a sea here during 16 the narrow bar of sandy beaches stretches to the one km. Temperature of water in summer . Duration of bathing season 120 days. Sports File:Illichivets Stadium, Mariupol 05.jpg|right|thumb|250px|A football match in progress in Stadium.Mariupol is the hometown of the nationally famous swimmer Oleksandr Sydorenko who lives in the city.The citys steel industry (Steel & Iron Works ) sponsors the Illichivets football club, with a great sport traditions and a history of participation at the European level competitions.Water polo team Ilyichevets is the absolute champion of Ukraine. It has won the Ukrainian championship for 11 times. Every year it plays in the European Champion Cup and Russian championship.Azovstal Canoeing Club on the river Kalmius. Vitaly Yepishkin - 3rd place in World Cup on 200m K-2.Azovmash Basketball Club similarly to Ilichevets Water-polo club has numerous national champions titles. Serious successes were obtained as well by the Mariupol schools of boxing, Greek-Roman fighting, artistic gymnastics and other types of sport.Sport building of city (only 585):* Ilyichevets stadium* Azovstal sports complex * Azovets stadium (in the past the Locomotive) * Azovmash sports complex * Sadko Sports complex* Vodnik Sports complex* Neptune public pool* Azovstal chess club etc. Education 81 general educational establishment work, including: 67 comprehensive schools (where 48 500 pupils study), 2 grammar schools, 3 lyceums, 4 evening replaceable schools, 3 boarding schools, 2 private schools, 11 professional educational institutions (6 274 pupils), 94 childrens preschool establishments (12 700 children).3 higher educational establishments:* State Technical University* Humanitarian University* Azovsky Institute of marine transport Public organizations There are about 300 public associations, including 22 trade-union organisations, representation about 40 political parties, 16 youth, 4 female organizations, 37 associations of veterans and invalids, 134 national & cultural societies.There is a General Consulate of the Republic of Greece in as well as the Republic of Cyprus in Mariupol. Health Service There are 70 medical, medical-health and medical establishments in a city  hospitals, policlinics, the station of blood transfusion, station of urgent medicare, sanatoriums, sanatoriums-preventive clinics regional centre of social maintenance of pensionaries and invalids, city centers: gastroenterology, thoracal surgery, bleedings, pancreatic, microsurgery of eye. Central pool-hospital on a water-carriage etc. Famous Mariupol citizens *Zhdanov, Soviet politician *Kuindzhi, Russian landscape painter of Greek ethnicity*Sacharoff, Jewish dancer, teacher, and choreographer. See also * in Ukraine* in Russia References  External links *  welcome-to-mariupol.org.ua - Welcome to Mariupol! - support and assistance for foreign visitors *  Entertaining-information portal of Mariupol*  Mariupol city catalog of shops*  Mariupol city catalog*  Ilyich Mariupol steel and iron works*  Photos of Mariupol*  Bab B Melkino and others (Hits of 80s-90s), modern cultural background of Azov coastal area.ar:az:Mariupolbe-x-old:bg:cs:Mariupolda:Mariupolde:Mariupolet:Mariupolel:es:Mariupoleo:Mariupolfa:fr:Marioupolgl:Mariupolko:hy:hi:hsb:Mariupolhr:Mariupoljid:Mariupolos:it:Mariupolhe:kl:Mariupolka:la:Mariupolislv:Mariupolelt:Mariupolishu:Mariupolmr:ro:Mariupolnl:Marioepolja:no:Mariupolnn:Mariupolpl:Mariupolpt:Mariupolru:sk:Mariuposr:fi:Mariupolsv:Mariupoltr:Mariupoluk:vi:Mariupolvo:Mariupolwar:Mariupolzh:
1192748
Dawley
Dawley is a small town in the borough of and Wrekin and ceremonial county of Shropshire, England. Today it forms part of the town of Telford (which was originally, in 1963, going to be named Dawley New Town before it was decided in 1968 to name the town Telford instead after the engineer and road builder Telford). Dawley is however one of the older settlements in Shropshire, being mentioned in the Book. It is divided into Dawley Magna (Great Dawley) and Dawley (also shown as Dawley Parva (Little Dawley) on older maps). The towns main parish is officially called Great Dawley - Hamlets is a separate parish, which covers Little Dawley and other neighbouring villages/suburbs.The nearest railway station is Telford Central.HistoryDawley is mentioned in the Book and is therefore one of the older settlements in Shropshire. It was, for over three centuries, a mining town, both for coal and ironstone. Clay extraction for local industrial-pipe factories, brickyards and the pottery industry has been a major influence on the landscape.Prior to large scale levelling as part of the development of Telford New Town, the area was covered by clay mounts and large clay pits that dominated the landscape to the extent that they formed points of reference for the locals. There is still a local clay pipe factory in the adjacent Doseley village; grey clay predominates on the immediate outskirts of Dawley.The mining had an important impact on the culture. The Pit Disaster in 1872 cost eight men and boys their life.There was a castle in Dawley, but it was demolished around 1648. The site is unknown, although the Castle Pools (on the old quarry site) and Castle Ironworks (built by the Darby family, one of whom commissioned the world-famous Iron Bridge) possibly indicate the general area where it may have stood. Prior to the landscaping, following the creation of Telford New Town, extensive ruins were detectable next to the Castle Pools and are shown on old maps as being the location of the castle. In the 1980s, the whole area was buried under thick topsoil and planted with trees. Ironbridge is a short distance away.The adjacent village of Horsehay was the site of a bridge and later a crane fabrication factory that exported around the world. The bridge over Falls is said to have been built there. Steam Railway trust is located across the road from the former factory site.On Monday, June 7, 2010, Dawley had become subject to plenty of media attention. This is because some locals had recreated the Hollywood sign on a noticeable Dawley bank. but with Dawley instead of Hollywood. The Shropshire Star had a full page spread article on that days evening edition to honour the effort made by locals. As of midday on Tuesday, June 8, 2010 over 1000 Telfordians had joined a Facebook group showing support for the sign and acknowledging the efforts by its creators.GeographyImage:TelfordMap.jpg|thumb|right|Dawley and Stirchley shown within Telford in Grey.Dawley has a street market every Friday. Dawley town centre consists of a single pedestrianised street that was previously the main route from Bridgnorth in the south to Wellington in the north. The area around Dawley, not covered by Telford New Town, is rural and provides extensive opportunities for walking. The Gorge and Wrekin are both pleasant walks from Dawley.On the northern edge of Dawley is Malinslee where St. Leonards church stands.The design of St. Leonards, a slightly irregular octagon, is said to have been influenced by Thomas Telford.Other churches supposedly influenced by Telford, during his work in Shropshire, are at nearby Madeley and Bridgnorth.thumb|left|altSt. Leonards Church Malinslee|St. Leonards Church MalinsleeEducationThere are seven schools in the Dawley area, and a comprehensive school, The School.()  There are two schools in Dawley: the Mount Gilbert and Southall schools.()Notable peopleDawley was the birthplace of Captain Webb who was the first man to swim the Channel - his monument stands on the High Street. Legend suggests that a pig stood up against a wall to watch the parade in Webbs honour that was held on his return.() Edith Pargeter, who under her pen name of Peters wrote the Cadfael novels, went to school in Dawley.()   Numerous roads in Aqueduct, such as Cadfael Drive and Ellis Peters Drive, are themed after her.Danielle Jones, a character in EastEnders, came from Dawley.Dawley received some unwanted media attention in July and August 2011, when the Star newspaper revealed that Nicola Holmes, a local councillor currently suspended by the local Labour party, was working as a prostitute - a story which was then picked up by the Sun. Ms. Holmes has since resigned as a councillor.See also* Revolution - Football Team, based in DawleyReferencesExternal links*Telford Culture Zone*Dawley Town Guide*St Leonards Church Malinsleeit:Dawleynl:Dawleynn:Dawleypl:Dawleyvo:Dawley
1195161
Cwmcarn
Cwmcarn is a village situated in the Ebbw valley in south Wales, in the historic boundaries of Monmouthshire. It grew with 19th-century mining, but is now known for its extensive mature forestry and greenery, that attract thousands of visitors and biking enthusiasts each year. Pre-industrial history Significant settlement at Cwmcarn came with Age migration of local tribes from the  Gwent levels to the uplands of y Grug, Machen and Maen (Twmbarlwm) and led to a later Age (900&ndash;55 BC) hillfort to be constructed by the Silures on Twmbarlwm.Roman forces took control of most of what became the Roman province of Superior in 43 AD but then took a further 25 years to gain control of the present day South Wales valleys. Roman control remained established until full scale withdrawal in the 5th century AD when the Kingdoms of Gwent and Glywysing were established. Gwent was defined as the land between the Usk and the Wye and Glywysing, the land between the Usk and the Tawe. Cwmcarn, located where the Carn and Ebbw river valleys meet, being situated within the Welsh Kingdom of Glywysing.The placename of Cwmcarn came about in 942 when Llywarch ap Cadogan gave Villa Treficarn Pont (estate near the bridge over the Carn) to a of Llandaff named Wulfrith with King Cadells guarantee, i.e. the place where the Carn meets the Ebbw (now Cwmcarn).Following the invasion of Wales the separate townships of Abercarn, Cwmcarn and Newbridge were given a manorial title of Abercarne. The three townships were also within the boundaries of the ancient parish of Mynyddislwyn and remained therein up until comparatively recent times. Economic activity  Coal mining Cwmcarn lies at the south-eastern edge of the Wales coalfield. The colliery development in the Cwmcarn area started in 1836, when a single shallow, 180ft downshaft, the Abercarn No.6., was sunk into the Rock (or Tillery) seam, for the nearby of Wales Colliery at Abercarn operated by the Iron and Coal Company. The second shaft was excavated by the Vale Steel Iron & Coal Company to target the deeper No.4 Steam and Black Vein seams. The colliery was run as an individual unit until it was later acquired by Jones and John Paton and Company in 1935. It was closed by the Coal Board in November 1968 and the site was cleared after becoming uneconomical to run.The Forest Drive now runs over the shafts of the colliery and a relics of colliery buildings can still be seen on the slope above the old shaft. The present day lake that is stocked by the Cwmcarn Angling Association was originally down stream of the collierys washery. Manufacturing A telecoms factory located between the River and the A467 road was part of the Post Office and Telecom before being sold to STC plc, Northern Telecom (Nortel), and more recently Solectron. The factory closed during Spring 2007. Tourism & mountain biking To the east of the village of Cwmcarn is the popular Forest Drive, a popular 7 mile drive through hills and forests on the flanks of the mountain of Twmbarlwm which is operated by the Forestry Commission. The area has seen significant recent development as the world-class Y Mynydd Mojo DH Track mountain biking trail is attracting an increased volume of visitors. A new 2 million visitor centre has been opened. External links * Recreation at Cwmcarn Forest Drive and Visitor Centre* Mountain Biking in Cwmcarn - MBWales*  Cwmcarn United RFCcy:Cwmcarn
1198297
Stewart,_British_Columbia
Stewart is a small town, incorporated as a municipality at the head of the Canal in northwestern Columbia, Canada.()  In 2006, its population was about 496.Historythumb|left|200px|Stewart, British Columbia, main street (5th Avenue)The Nisgaa, who lived around the River, called the head of Portland Canal Skam-A-Kounst, meaning safe house or strong house, probably because it served them as a retreat from the harassment of the Haida and Tlingit from the outer coast.(() They travelled in the area seasonally to pick berries and hunt birds.  It and the rest of the Portland Canal had been the domain of the people, also called the Skam-a-Kounst Indians, or Jitsaawit in Nisgaa, an Athapaskan people who became decimated by war and disease and were driven out of the Stewart area by either Haida or Nisgaa in 1856-57.The area around the Portland Canal was explored in 1896 by Captain D.D. Gaillard of the States Army Corps of Engineers (after whom the Gaillard Cut in the Panama Canal was later named). Two years after Gaillards visit, the first prospectors and settlers arrived. Among them was D. J. Raine, for whom a creek and a mountain in the area are named. The Stewart brothers arrived in 1902. In 1905, Robert M. Stewart, the first postmaster, named the town Stewart.Gold and silver mining dominated the early economy. Nearby Hyder, Alaska, boomed with the discovery of rich silver veins in the upper Salmon River basin in 1917 and 1918. Hyder became an access and supply point for the mines, while Stewart served as the port for Canadian mining activity, which was centred on the town of Premier, which was accessed by a  road from Hyder.Other mines in the area were the Jumbo, BC Silver, Red Cliff, and Porter-Idaho. More large camps were south of Stewart at Anyox and Maple Bay.Stewart had a population of about 10,000 prior to War I, which then declined to about 700 in 2000.  As of 2005, its population had reduced to less than 500.LocationStewart is accessible by highway from the British Columbia highway system, via Highway 37A.West of Stewart is Hyder, Alaska, which is only  from the town. East of the town is Junction, which is  from the town. Also east is British Columbia, which is located  from the town, and Lake, British Columbia, which is located  north of Stewart.ClimateStewart has a coastal rainforest climate, with about  per year of precipitation, much of it as snow, and an average yearly temperature of , according to Environment Canada.( Stewart is Canadas most northerly port.See also*boundary disputeReferencesExternal links*Stewart and Hyder International Chamber of Commerce*Stewart Community Information(British Columbia)(Colombie-Britannique)British Columbia
1202325
Orava_(castle)
right|thumb|250px|Orava CastleOrava Castle (, , ) is situated on a high rock above Orava river. It is considered to be one of the most beautiful castles in Slovakia. The castle was built in the thirteenth century.  Many scenes of the 1922 film Nosferatu were filmed here, although until recently it was thought to have been shot in Transylvania.Orava Castle stands on the site of an old wooden fortification, built after the Tartar invasion of 1241. Its history since then reveals a familiar pattern of construction, destruction, reconstruction, fire, various ownerships and territorial squabbles. The original design was in Romanesque and Gothic style; it was later reconstructed as a Renaissance and Neo-Gothic structure, hugging the shape of the 520-metre spur on which it perches.The mining magnate Thurzo family, who took charge in the mid 16th century, were responsible for a great deal of rebuilding work, although its present form was not finalised until 1611. It burnt down again in 1800, after which the Plffys occupied the castle. And then, after a period of dilapidation and War II, the castle became a national monument.Originsleft|thumb|240px|rva Castle from above The natural rock formation known as castle cliff  a limy spur 112 meters (367 ft) high, surrounded by the River and its right tributary stream Racova  has been inhabited since primeval times. During its history a wooden rampart became a strong walled castle of which the first written record dates back to 1267. At that time only the ground floor was built of stone, while the upper floors were made of wood.In 1370 as part of the Hungarian Kingdom the castle became the center of county. A tetrahedral multi-story towerntury was built here in the 14th century, probably on older foundations, as a donjon - the place of last defense within the castle. After 1474, King Matthew gave orders to build a square and a residence-wing in the Middle Castle. The buildings were situated in front of the castle. In 1534 of Dubovec obtained the castle and became head of the county. He started to rebuild the castle and to make new fortifications. He ordered the building of a half-round tower in the Upper Castle that in 1539 was followed by two large round fortifications for cannons in the Middle Castle. The middle platform was also configured for cannon firing. In the years 1539 - 1543 John of Dubovec built a five-story palace in the empty space between the tower and the stone wall of the Upper Castle. The Turkish threat was the reason for building these new fortifications. A new gate with a ditch and drawbridge in the Lower Castle was completed in 1543. The Tower of the Archives was built against the castle walls.Sixteenth to Eighteenth CenturiesAfter the death of John of Dubovec, his heirs quarreled over the inheritance and the situation became so bad that the castle even became a store-house. It was paid for by the mine owner Thurz. A lot of building activity took place at the castle following this time period. The wooden stairs in the Upper Castle were replaced by stone stairs. The same was done to the stairs between the Middle and the Upper Castle with the drawbridge. A cellar was also dug out of the stone of the castle court and a one-story residence-wing was built in the Lower Castle near the west wall.Thurz also carried out some important repairs. One of the first was the building of a tunnel between both castle gates, above which was formed a large terrace. After this was all done he moved the living-quarters and the building of the Chapel started using parts of some old architecture. The interior furnishing of the Chapel was later arranged in a taste which suited the new owners of the Castle. One of the most well-known features is the Renaissance grave tomb of Gyrgy Thurz from the beginning of the 17th century and the Baroque altar from 1751 - 1752.Disuse, fire and the museumright|thumb|140px|View of the lower castleAfter the death of Czobor, the widow of Gyrgy Thurz, the castle became the property of Thurzs daughters, who entrusted its administration to an elected administrator. Because of changes in politics, society and the economy, the castle gradually lost its important functions. Only a few clerks stayed on and the uninhabited and disused parts of the castle gradually deteriorated. The greatest catastrophe affected the castle in 1800, when a gigantic fire destroyed all the wooden parts of the castle. Some objects from the Lower Castle were recovered after the fire because they had been cover by the shingles. However, the objects from the Middle and Upper Castle were not reconstructed until 1861. To find a use for the historical object, dn Zichy, the administrator of the property (Kompossesorat), organized a foundation which had the aim of founding a regional museum of Orava. The first exhibition took place at the Thurzo Palace in 1868. Nowadays, the Orava Museum is one of the oldest in Slovakia. Its most attractive expositions are those of the Castle Chapel, the Knights Room, and several rooms with period-style furnishing. Further highlights include the Painting Gallery, the Weapon room, and the scientific, ethnographic and archaeological collections.RestorationAt the turn of the twentieth century, the castle became severely run down. Plffy organized major repairs. Walls were fortified with iron bars in the area of the third gate and in the tunnel. Plffy also set himself the task of restoring the interior. Some rooms received wooden tiles and period-style furnishing. In the Knights Room Joseph Plffy had paintings restored and completed by the German painter Mann from Munich. After the World War Orava Castle was again generously renovated, and it was declared a national cultural monument in 1953.External links* Orava Castle Museum Official Website* Orava Castle from Slovak Heritage* Orava Castle Tour Information from Muzeum.sk* Photographs of Orava Castle from Muzeum.sk* Christmas at Orava Castle* http://www.oravskyhrad.sk/*Slovak Spectator - Orava Castle: Dradculas Slovak residencehradde:ArwaburgvraOrawskide Oravahrad
1204969
Tudhoe
Tudhoe is a village in Durham, in England. It is situated approximately  south of the City of Durham. It lies just outside Spennymoor, a short distance to the west of the Great North Road. The village is now a quiet backwater, its green a cul-de-sac that runs down from the main road towards the Wear. In former times, however, Tudhoe lay at the centre of a network of roads: one ran to Durham by way of Sunderland Bridge and Croxdale, another to Merrington, a third to Auckland, a fourth to Whitworth and Green, and a fifth across a ford to Castle and village on the far side of the river. All except the Brancepeth road are shown, somewhat schematically, on Thomas Jeffreys map of County Durham of 1758.Tudhoe is now dwarfed by Spennymoor, an industrial town that grew up around the Tudhoe iron works in the 19th century. The modern town of Spennymoor lies only a few fields from Tudhoe, but the contours are such that it cannot be seen from most of the village, and Tudhoe today gives the impression that it is still an isolated country village.For most of its history, Tudhoe has been in the parish of Brancepeth. The parish church of St Brandons, dating from the 16th century, was one of the finest village churches in County Durham until its destruction by fire in 1998. Brancepeth lies across the River Wear from Tudhoe; there has never been a bridge, and the ford was not an easy one. In winter, it was often impassable, and Tudhoe baptisms, weddings and burials then took place at Whitworth. Because of this, Tudhoe was always seen (from Brancepeth) as an isolated outpost. Tudhoes own Anglican churches, Holy Innocents and St Davids, were not built until 1866 and 1880, respectively, though there is a large Catholic church, dedicated to St. Borromeo, which was founded in 1858.Tudhoe was renowned as a mining village up until the end of the 20th Century. Up until the closure of the mines, the wealthy Colliery Masters took up residence in a grand mansion known as The Loggins, which stands in several acres of its own land and overlooks the area.Tudhoe United FC are the local football team and play in Spennymoor Sunday League.External links* Village history* Picture Spennymoor (including Tudhoe)* Tudhoe Cricket Clubpl:Tudhoe
1208665
Five_(band)
Scott RobinsonConlonFive (also known as 5ive) were  an English boyband put together in 1997 by the same team that managed the Girls before they launched their career. The five members were Scott Robinson, Neville, J Brown, Abs Breen and Conlon. Signed by Cowell, they were a manufactured band and held several rounds of auditions in London, in 1997. the auditions resulted in a provisional casting of 7 members with 2 standby members Peter Montpellier and Paul Taylor who were later cut when the final 5 were chosen is September. The band enjoyed great success worldwide, particularly in the UK, most of Europe and Asia, Russia, Brazil, Australia, Zealand and the USA. They split up on 27 September 2001, after selling almost 7 million records, and having 11 top ten singles and four top ten albums in the UK. Four of the five original members, Robinson, Breen, Neville and Brown briefly reformed the group without Conlon in September 2006, with a new management team headed by music manager Beck. Eight months later, having secured a lucrative tour, but failing to gain enough record company interest, Five made an announcement via their official website they would again disband.Biography5ive: the debutIn 1997, an advertisement was placed in the UK performing arts newspaper Stage, asking for young male singers/dancers to audition for a boyband-style group with attitude and edge. Bob and Chris Herbert, the two men who had earlier created the Girls, thought the time was right for a male group. Over 3,000 hopefuls, including Brand, auditioned and they were finally narrowed down to only fourteen, five (5ive) of whom had arranged themselves into a group while waiting for their audition and subsequently were signed with BMG/RCA for a six-album deal. The group practiced and demoed their work at Trinity Studios in Knaphill  the same place the Spice Girls did a few years previously.In November 1997, the band released their first single in the UK, Slam Dunk (Da Funk), which debuted at #10. The song was also released in the US in 1998 but had little chart success, although it was chosen as the new theme song by the NBA. In 1998 Five earned their first major international hit, When The Lights Go Out, which cracked the US top 10 and earned Gold status there soon after. Five then went on an eight-day tour to promote their upcoming album, appearing in a concert special for the Channel with Irish group B*Witched, in Square in New York City, and on MTVs TRL. The debut album peaked at Number 27 in the US, and topped the charts in other countries worldwide, including the UK. Its The Things You Do was released in late 1998 in the US, only to receive a lukewarm reception. The group embarked upon a US tour with band *NSYNC, but soon after pulled out due to exhaustion, flying back to England to rest and start work on a new album. Still mining the first record, The Feelin, Get Up, and Until The Time Is Through were all released as singles throughout 1998. Reaching the top 5 in different countries around the world, the latter two singles each rose to the number two spot in the UK, and Five had well and truly made their mark in the world of boy band mania. A significant element in 5ives popularity was their resemblance to American boy bands such as Kids on the Block, Boys and Sync in their uptempo musical style and street image, in contrast to That, Degrees, and Boyzone, who at the time were primarily known for their ballads. Also notable is that the band wrote or co-wrote almost all of their own songs, something boy bands had never done much until then.Invincible: the new millenniumIn August 1999, the first single of their second album, Invincible, the catchy dance tune Ya Gettin Down, was released and became a major hit worldwide but yet again failed to go to Number 1 in their home country, kept out of the top spot by Martin. Finally in October 1999, after three consecutive number-two peaks, Keep on Movin became their first UK Number 1, as well as their biggest selling single to date. The second album hit the top five shortly thereafter. Dont Wanna Let You Go was released in early March 2000, peaking at Number 9. On 3 March 2000, Five opened at the Awards with rock legends Queen, performing an updated version of that bands hit, We Will Rock You. That night Five won their first BRIT Award, as Best Pop Act, and their cover of the Queen song went on to become their second Number 1 in the UK in July 2000. The first half of 2000 found Five on a successful world tour, performing concerts in the UK, Europe, Russia, Australasia andas a foursomeSouth America, after Ritchie contracted chickenpox and had to be flown back to England.After finishing the tour, the group continued to perform at many concerts in the UK, including in the Park with Queen. A re-issue of their album Invincible included remixed versions of a couple of songs and five live tracks from their tour, as well as a bonus track, Dont Fight It Baby. Due for release in July 2000 in the US, the song was pulled from release after the group was dropped by their stateside label, Records. Five also had problems with their Asian record company, and subsequently cancelled their Asian tour.Suffering from this major blow, the lads headed back to the studio and started writing songs for their next album. They continued to win awards in the UK and Europe, and in December 2000 launched their second big tour, in their home country. In January 2001, Five went to perform at one of the biggest festivals in the world, Rock in Rio in Rio de Janeiro and Caracas, to an audience of almost half a million people.Kingsize and the end of an eraIn May 2001, after many months of creative writing and developing their own personal sound, Kingsize was completed. When it was time to begin filming the video for their first single off the album, however, band member Sean had fallen ill with fever. The Lets Dance video was released with a life-size cardboard cut-out standing in for the ailing singer, and rumours that he had in fact left the band had to be quashed. Ritchie said in an interview several years later that the bands management kept Seans departure from the band a secret, so they were not aware that he had left when they filmed the Lets Dance video.(http://www.thismustbepop.com/2011/01/whatever-happened-to-five.html) Scott also temporarily left the band for a few weeks to be with his childhood sweetheart fiance Oaker, who was having troubles with her pregnancy. Their son, Brennan Rhys, was born on 11 July 2001, five weeks premature. The remaining three members, J, Abs and Ritchie, pressed on with heavy promotion of the groups third album and the Lets Dance single. Whilst performing at a concert in Belgium in July, Ritchie tore the tendons in his left foot, putting a halt to all promotion and prompting the group to have a few meetings to re-think their options and future. Lets Dance was released in mid August 2001, however, and became their third UK #1, holding the top spot for two weeks. Kingsize debuted two weeks later at #3, and went on to achieve Gold status.After a month of serious meetings with record management, Five came to the decision that they were calling it a day, and the group disbanded on 27 September 2001, via an announcement on Select. On 28 September, a day after the announcement, Scott married Kerry at a ceremony with all of his former bandmates in attendance.In November 2001, Closer to Me, featuring rare footage of the band, and Rock the Party, with an animated video, were released as a double-A-side single. A Greatest Hits album followed.In the bands short life-span, they experienced success around the world, racking up three number-one singles in the UK and selling an estimate of 15-20 million records worldwide,() including 7 million albums worldwide and two million in the United States, and picking up numerous awards along the way.Life after Five and futureIn November 2001, Five member Abs went to Australia for the major pop festival Rumba! and performed on stage with boy band Blue. About a year after the breakup, he enjoyed a brief but fairly successful solo career, releasing the album Theory in 2003, which produced three top 10 singles in the UK.Ritchie and Sean also initially attempted solo musical careers which seemed to stop almost before they began, although Ritchie has made occasional appearances as a TV guest star, presenter, actor and reality show celebrity contestant. Scott Robinson joined his friend Brooks at local Essex radio station,EssexFM, in 2002 for a few months as a radio DJ. He starred in the UK regional theatre musical Boogie Nights 2 from late 2004 through most of 2005. Scott also became a father for a second time, with the birth of his second son on 13 September 2006.() He is the only member of the band who still makes appearances performing songs from Fives back-catalogue.( J had almost disappeared entirely from public view for nearly four years, but has recently resurfaced as a writer and producer, and also came third in the 2007 series of Im a Celebrity... Get Me Out of Here!. Sean ultimately became the second group member to sign a solo recording deal, with Sony, and began work towards a new album. He has since been dropped by the label.2006-2007: Failed comebackOn 17 September 2006, an announcement was made via Fives official MySpace page that a press conference was to be held at The Scala in central London on 27 September, at around 11am GMT.()  After a venue change due to a shooting at The Scala, the conference was moved to the Bar Academy Islington. It was rumoured that four of the five members would be reuniting (Sean now being committed to his Sony deal),() and this was confirmed at the press conference. Five recorded new material for what was to be their fourth studio album, working with Chambers, Swedish producer/songwriter Anders Bagge, and French DJs Trak Invaders, and also planned to tour in 2007.()  As of January 2007, Five had completed half of their album and were looking to sign up to a record company with a new manager, Beck. The album was expected to be released within the next few months.() On 8 March 2007, at midnight, Five premiered one-minute clips of three brand new songs that were to have been on the new album. The songs, titled 70 Days, Settle Down and Its All Good can be heard on the bands official webpage and also on their MySpace page. Beck also secured an MTV documentary series titled Five - The Revive.On 19 May 2007, only eight months after reforming, having failed to secure a lucrative enough record deal, Five announced via their official website that the group will no longer be pursuing a comeback.()In 2009, Neville opened a Myspace page for his new band RagztoRichez. It is rumoured that most of Five will reunite under this name.(http://www.myspace.com/ragztorichezmusic)Discography*5ive (1998)*Invincible (1999)*Kingsize (2001)Tours*Invincible Tour (February - May 2000)Awards(*) For source, see References.BRIT Awards* Best Pop Act - 2000Europe Music Awards* The MTV Select Award - 1998Silver Clef Awards* Best Newcomer - 2000Smash Hits Poll Winners Party* Best New Act - 1997* Best Haircut (Scott) - 1997, 1998, 1999* Best British Band - 1998, 1999, 2000* Best Album - 1998* Best Cover - 1998Awards (Holland)* Best Single - 2000* Best Album - 2000* Best International Group - 2000TV Hits Awards* Best New Band - 1999* Best Single (We Will Rock You (Queen cover)) - 2000See also*of 1990s one-hit wonders in the United States*of Number 1 singles from the 1990s (UK)*of Number 1 singles from the 2000s (UK)References;General*5iveweb.com - Achievements &mdash; archived 21 December 2001; retrieved 10 November 2005;SpecificExternal links*World of Five - official website*Fives Official MySpace*5iveUSA*Five Fansite*Billboard charts*ARIA charts*The Official UK Charts*SonyBMG*RCA Records*Czech fansiteda:Five(Band)(banda)it:5ive(egyttes)nl:5iveja:5iveno:5ivenn:5ivepl:5ivept:Fiveru:5ive(band)(musikgrupp)()(ban nhc)
1211171
Cooperative_Research_Centre
Cooperative Research Centres (CRCs) are key bodies for Australian scientific research. The Cooperative Research Centres Program was established in 1990 to enhance Australias industrial, commercial and growth through the development of sustained, user-driven, cooperative public-private research centres that achieve high levels of outcomes in adoption and commercialisation. The program emphasises the importance of collaborative arrangements to maximise the benefits of research through an enhanced process of utilisation, commercialisation and transfer. It also has a strong education component with a focus on producing graduates with skills relevant to industry needs.(). Most CRCs offer scholarships for postgraduate students.(http://crca.asn.au/study-with-crcs) The CRC Program is administered by the Commonwealth of Innovation, Industry, Science and Research (Australia).The Cooperative Research Centre Association (CRCA), established on 1 December 1994, to promote the CRC program while also acting a conduit for information sharing and learning between CRCs.(). Over time the role has evolved to the extent that today the CRCA is also recognised as the principal non-Government advocate of the CRC Program.()History of the CRC ProgramSince the commencement of the CRC Program in 1991 there have been 14 selection rounds.() Selection rounds were conducted in March 1991, December 1991, December 1992, December 1994, and then at regular two year intervals: 1996, 1998, 2000, 2002, 2004, 2006. Following the review of the Program in 2008, the 11th and 12th Selection rounds were both held in 2009. Selection rounds are now annual.()Results of CRC funding rounds can be found at www.crc.gov.auThe Annual Conference of the CRC Association brings together all CRCs from across Australia to discuss the latest approaches and achievements in collaborative science and education. The 2011 conference was held from 17 May to 19 May at the Brisbane Convention Centre. Winners of the 2011 CRCA conference prizes for innovation and student awards can be found at the CRCAs website.List of CRCsThe CRC Program provides funding to CRCs across six industry sectors:*Manufacturing Technology*Information and Communication Technology*Mining and Energy*Agriculture and Rural Based Manufacturing*Environment*Medical Science and TechnologyA current directory of CRC Association members is maintained by the CRCA.Manufacturing Technology*CRC for Advanced Automotive Technology*for Advanced Composite Structures*CRC for Bioproducts*CAST CRC*CRC for Construction Innovation*CRC for Intelligent Manufacturing Systems and Technologies*CRC for MicroTechnology*CRC for Polymers*CRC for Railway Engineering and Technologies*CRC for Welded Structures*CRC for Wood InnovationsInformation and Communication Technology*Australasian CRC for Interaction Design*Australian Photonics CRC*Australian Telecommunications CRC*CRC for Enterprise Distributed Systems Technology*CRC for Integrated Engineering Asset Management*CRC for Satellite Systems* CRC for Sensor Signal and Information Processing*Smart Services CRC*for Spatial Information*CRC for Technology Enabled Capital MarketsMining and Energy*CRC for Optimising Resource Extraction*Parker CRC for Integrated Hydrometallurgy Solutions*CRC for Clean Power from Lignite*CRC for Coal in Development*CRC for Greenhouse Gas Technologies (CO2CRC)*CRC for Landscape Environments and Mineral Exploration*CRC for Mining*CRC for Sustainable Resource Processing*Predictive Mineral Discovery CRCAgriculture and Rural Based Manufacturing*Aquafin CRC (CRC for Sustainable Aquaculture of Finfish)*Australian Biosecurity CRC for Emerging Infectious Disease*Australian Sheep Industry CRC*Cotton Catchment Communities CRC*CRC for an Internationally Competitive Pork Industry*CRC for Beef Genetic Technologies*CRC for Forestry*CRC for Innovative Dairy Products*CRC for National Plant Biosecurity*CRC for Sugar Industry Innovation through Biotechnology*CRC for Sustainable Rice Production*CRC for Sustainable Sugar Production*CRC for Tropical Plant Protection*CRC for Value Added Wheat*CRC for Viticulture*Innovative Grain Foods CRC*CRCEnvironment*Bushfire CRC*CRC for Australian Weed Management*CRC for Coastal Zone, Estuary and Waterway Management*CRC for Contamination Assessment and Remediation of the Environment*CRC for The Barrier Reef World Heritage Area*CRC for Greenhouse Accounting*CRC for Plant-based Management of Dryland Salinity*CRC for Rainforest Ecology and Management*CRC for Tropical Savannas Management*CRC for Water Quality and Treatment*CRC for Irrigation Futures*CRC for The Antarctic Climate & Ecosystems*CRC for Landscape Environments and Mineral Exploration*CRC for The Antarctic Climate & Ecosystems*CRC for Water Quality and Treatment*Desert Knowledge CRC*Environmental Biotechnology CRC*eWater CRC*Invasive Animals CRC*Tourism CRCMedical Science and Technology*Biomedical Imaging CRC*CRC for Aboriginal Health*CRC for Asthma*CRC for Chronic Inflammatory Diseases*HEARing CRC*CRC for Diagnostics*Oral Health CRC*CRC for Vaccine Technology*The Vision CRC Notes and references ( See also * NICTA - Australias national information and communication technology research centre*  CSIRO - Commonwealth Scientific and Industrial Research OrganisationExternal links*CRC Program website*Cooperative Research Centres Association (CRCA) website*Cooperative Research Centres Association Annual Conference 2009 website*Commonwealth Department of Innovation, Industry, Science and Research (Australia) website
